THE MOTLEY BOOK.
PREFACE TO THE THIRD EDITION.
An
author stands in the portal of a Third
Edition
,
like a prosperous host, smiling a welcome to
the public. To have gratified the palate of the
readers of former impressions gives him confidence
in spreading his table again for another round of
customers, and warrants him in the presumption
of swinging cut a new preface, like a new sign, to
catch the eye, and inform those who read as they
run, that there is entertainment within for man and
woman.
To leave metaphor for the plain level of
historical
narrative, the author must express his deep
sense of the flattering manner in which the
Motley
Book
has been heretofore regarded by the
public
.
The kindness with which his earliest effort is
received, seizes hold on the heart of the young
author
,
and can never be loosened thence or
forgotten
:
it is then that enemies are hardest and friends
most doubtful, when his hopes are at best
questionable
,
and when to question his success or his
powers is neither slander nor sacrilege. If the
little
light which he ventures to set up can be blown
out, it accomplishes a double end; proving the
power of a malicious critic, and furnishing a
clearer
firmament for such false orbs to twinkle in as he
may be pleased to summon into existence. The
present author must be considered, however, as
speaking more for the sake of others who may be
struggling than for himself, for he has the great
satisfaction of adding, that praise has been
bestowed
by the critics of the Motley Book with an
open and liberal hand.
In the present edition, the author has amended
the work, he believes, by substituting the sketch
entitled Noadiah Bott, in place of that which
formerly opened the volume.
New York
,
October
1, 1839.
NOADIAH BOTT;
OR,
ADVENTURES WITH A GOVERNOR AND
A WIDOW.
The
two most delightful and exciting pursuits
an ordinary citizen can be engaged in, in time
of peace, are certainly office-seeking and
courting
a widowcombining as they do the
excitement
of bloodshed, and the more animating
prospect of quiet and unobstructed plunder.
In the year of our Lord , it fell to the
portion of Noadiah Bott to embark in this double
undertaking, with great advantages of mind and
person. He was a little corpulent man, slightly
asthmatic, and generally clad in garments about
one size too small for his person, which of course
gave him very much the appearance of a stuffed
penguin promenading for exercise after dinner.
Noadiah had derived his knowledge and
experience
from several professions, for he had been
in succession a hardware-merchant, a
market-gardener
,
and a pawn-broker. During his
continuance
in the first business he had learned a
very singular fact in natural history, which gave
him a strong prejudice against the traffic in
andirons and table-knivesnamely: that
native
rats, particularly the species indigenous to
New York, possessed tremendous powers of
digestion
;
for he found they had discovered a
passage into his money-drawer, and were in the
habit of carrying off, and actually made way
with quarter-dollars, half-dollars, sixpences, and
sometimes were even so famished as to fasten
on husky dry bank-bills, and counterfeit
coppers
and five-cent pieces. At least, this was the
explanation given by an ingenious clerk, and so
he broke up his establishment.
Reserving a few spades, rakes, and coulters,
from the general sale of his goods, he made his
next experiment with a small garden in the
suburbs
,
from which he proposed to raise
vegetables
for the supply of the city market. Never
was such a season known as the one in which
Noadiah Bott undertook the management of
four acres of kitchen esculents. Tornadoes
rushed down from the North and played the
devil with his apple and plum-trees; scorching
dry zephyrs came sighing and stealing from the
South and wilted his asparagus and cabbage.
What the tornadoes failed to blow away and the
freshets to wash away, was nothing but a heap
of dry sand, which would have been very well
in the centre of the Arabian Desert, but was
rather out of place in a kitchen-garden under
actual cultivation. Then he had a left-handed
mule, that kept turning the wrong way in the
furrow, and who made himself so impracticable
and disagreeable that Bott thought he might as
well introduce the hippopotamus as a
plough-horse
at once, and sow his four acres with
trade-winds
and hurricanes. Besides all this, every
thing noxious and pestiferous and destructive
was put down in the almanacs for this year. First
came an army of locusts, which took quarters on
the neighboring trees and fences, and after
electrifying
Bott for two nights and a day with their
pleasant martial music, made an onset, and left
his garden so stripped of leaf, twig, and every
green thing, that it looked like a ship with its
sails tattered into ribands by a stiff nor'wester.
Directly upon the track of this greedy swarm,
came a mad dog, that one half the population of
the city thought proper, for the sake of their own
exercise, and the conservation of the public
health, to hunt with great racket and outcry
through Bott's garden into a neighboring poad,
where the poor animal ended his troubles by
committing suicide. Then there were
ground-moles
and midnight thieves, and the
greenworm
,
andthe Lord knows what else. Poor
Bott was almost distracted, and resolved to quit
market-gardening for life, and return to town
with what small capital remained, and invest it
in dead stock, for as to vegetables, he said
he had no faith in 'em, either as a medicine
or a means of living.
Abandoning his lease and making up a
wagon-load
with old ploughshares, harness, hoes,
rakes, and a second-hand bureau, he started for
town, and with this miscellaneous stock of
trumpery opened a pawn-broker's shop. He
was now entirely out of his element, for he
had been in the habit of carrying about under
his jacket a little piece of curious mechanism
which was infinitely more in his way in his
present
line of business than an idle partner, a bad
season, or a dishonest clerk. What could poor
Bott do? Dilapidated old men, who had been
in the revolutionary war,
would
come to his
shop to pledge the very musket that had figured
at Yorktown, and the very sword that had cut
off the head of a Hessian at Trenton, and how
could he refuse to add this to his collection of
venerable relics, and just loan a few shillings to
the poor old veteran? And then the widow of a
sailor that was with Decatur off Algiers, hadn't
seen a loaf of bread for the past fortnight, and
all she asked was to be saved from starving by
a small advance on a model man-of-war that
her dear Jack had built when he was at home
the lastlast time. Every cloak that was left
in pledge with himevery rusty beaver, every
baby's cap, and every pair of plated
candlesticks
,
had some little pathetic history
connected
with it that would have gone to the heart of
a stone. So that, after being in business about
nine months, Mr. Noadiah Bott had as pretty a
collection of good-for-nothing rubbish as an
auctioneer could wish to stand over in the dog
days. In fact, his shop was a perfect limbo,
haunted by the ghosts of cracked fiddles, feeble
flutes, disbanded earthen jars, and wine-bottles
with holes in their bottoms. With a few old
wine-flasks, a curious lizard in a vial, and two
or three stout beaches, and a train of
out-of-the-way
utensils clattering at his heels,
Noadiah
,
like a conqueror from a ravaged territory,
marched out of the sterile region of
pawn-broking
,
into a more promising field of labor.
He was, therefore, at present, the proprietor
of a political tavern, consisting of a bar and
fixtures
down stairs, and a room, twenty-five by
twelve and a half, in the second story, where
meetings were held for the purpose of settling
the politics of the ward. It was the business
of Bott to light up this apartment once or twice
a week; to arrange the platform for a speaker;
and, on extraordinary occasions, to embellish it
with a wooden eagle perched on a staff or a
banner, stretched over an entire side of the
room. Sometimes, in the absence of the regular
speaker, Bott had been known to mount the
platform himself, and puff away at a speech of
considerable length and power. Besides these
regular duties, he was expected to get an
audience
together, and, if it fell short, to treat
loafers
enough till the room was tolerably crowded;
to get up all extraordinary rounds of applause,
and, finally, to preside over the crackers and
beer which are frequently furnished to the
democracy
at the close of an exciting and thirsty
debate. It was a very entertaining spectacle to
see Bott on a night of meeting, bustling up and
down stairs, now at the bar and now at the ear
of some leading politician, commenting on the
news from Ohio or North Carolina, or
discussing
the effects of the new law regulating the
size of pint-pots, on the habits of sailors, or
some other abstruse and recondite topic. When
the business of the meeting had commenced,
you might see him every now and then rushing
up from the bar-room, and thrusting his
corpulent
little body in at the mouth of the door,
with considerable effort and puissance, as if to
ascertain whether the audience were well
packed or not.
Bott had kept these quarters for several
years. In that time he had grown stout and
rubicund
,
and had formed a large circle of
politial
acquaintance. By dint of listening at the
key-holes, when committees and juntos were in
session at his house, and by looking grave
whenever
trifles were discussed, he at length
attained
such importance in the political world as to
venture to invite the Honorable the
Corporation
of the city to visit, in a body, a
remarkable
tortoise that had been discovered in his
yard, where it had lived twenty-three weeks
under a stone, without a particle of food. They
accordingly came, headed by his Honor the
Mayor, and when there, Bott gravely asserted,
before the assembled magistracy of the city,
that this identical tortoise had been recently
heard, at midnight, when not a soul nor a sound
was stirring in the neighborhood, to cry Bah!
very distinctly, which (Bott whispered to an
Alderman, a particular friend of his) certainly
portended the dissolution of the Union and the
rise of bread-stuffs!
Strengthened by the popularity he deservedly
acquired by this bold and sagacious movement,
Bott determined to apply to the Governor for a
small office. It was some time before he could
fix upon one which was suited in all respects to
his habits. He had a list of all the offices in the
State, from Governor itself down to licensed
master sweep, with the salaries or perquisites
annexed; and at length he concluded to take
the humble station of inspector of stavestwelve
hundred a year. He was getting too corpulent,
and this out-door business would bring him
down. Besides, the sea-air would be good for
his health, for he thought, and so he intended
to represent to his Excellency, that drinking so
much beer nightly for the good of the party,
had somewhat impaired his constitution.
Inspector
of stavesthat was the office; and he
must bustle about, bustle aboutand move the
very foundations of the island but he would
have it.
About this time it was that Bott cast an eye
of affection upon a black-eyed little widow,
whom he discovered one day by chance, sitting
in an upper window over a coffin warehouse
into which he had made his way to engage a
coffin for one of his customers that had fallen
down that morning in his bar-room with his
glass in his hand. What was very singular
about this case of sudden death was, that the
man had infused a third more water in his
brandy than he was in the habit of using; so
that it was a capital question for discussion,
whether he had died of cold water or
alcohol
.
After chaffering awhile for the
cheapest
coffin in the shop (for Bott buried his own
customers, and liked to underbid himself),
Noadiah
set about sounding the proprietor as to
the black-eyed lady up-stairs. He began by
expressing a profound anxiety as to the health
of the coffin-maker's family, and a deep
conviction
of the manifold benefits of living over the
store.
His own people, the coffin-maker,
however
,
informed him, lived in a different part
of the city. His wife was a woman of weak
nerves, and couldn't bear the sight of a coffin,
it reminded her so much of her little
Bartemus
who was dead and gone.
I haven't the pleasure, then, continued
Bott, of knowing the lady with black eyes,
that lives above you. I wonder who she is?
Not know her! exclaimed the
coffin-maker
,
not know the widow Bobbinthe gayest
widow in this city! Why, Mr. Bott, if I wasn't
a married man with two small children, I'd
soon know who's who, and what's what.
I'm often surprised at myself that she hasn't
driven me from this melancholy business of
coffin-making, into ladies' hair-dressing, or
French shoe-making, or some such light and
cheerful occupation.
This was enough for Bott. She was
unmarried
,
and just such a gay, joyous soul as he
needed to keep his spirits up in these gloomy
times. He accordingly went home, buried the
poor customer, and made up his mind to
marry
the widow, and obtain the office of inspector
of staves forthwith.
Bott, without difficulty, obtained an
introduction
,
through his friend, the coffin-maker,
to Mrs. Bobbin, the gay widow. He found her
to be a sly creature, as full of fun as a
snuffbox
,
and, in fact, a woman exactly after his
own heart. It is true, she had one childa
boy about thirteen. This was a slight objec
tion, but the widow prevailed upon Bott to
remove
it by taking the boy under his own
charge, and supplying him with food, lodging,
and clothes, with a few quarters' schooling;
for the boy, as the widow cunningly insinuated,
had a good deal of his mother in him, and it
would be a pity to allow so much natural
smartness
to run to waste. Things advanced so
swimmingly
,
and Bott managed with so much skill,
that, before a month was over, he had not only
pledged himself to provide for the widow's son,
(who, he had by this time discovered, enjoyed
a tremendous appetite, wore his pantaloons at
the rate of about a pair in a fortnight, and was a
little fond of tippling,) but had also engaged the
pleasure of the widow's company to the
Cartmen's
Fancy Ball, to be given in a short time.
To make the matter still more pleasing, Bott
had the satisfaction of meeting, at the house of
the widow, an agreeable gentleman, whom he
was delighted to be introduced to, by Mrs.
Bobbin, as her uncle Jonas, from
Androscoggin
.
He seemed to have the same
pleasant
turn as the widow herself, and was
constantly
employed, when Bott was present, in
saying or doing some amusing thing or other.
How could Noadiah be otherwise than happy,
while the current ran so sparkling and clear?
In the mean time, he devoted himself
assiduously
to his application for the inspection of
staves. He had a petition drawn up, setting
forth his claims and services; his three years'
untiring opposition to the other party; his
ardent
devotion to his duties as retailer of spirits
to his political friends; his zeal in gathering
audiences and preparing inflammatory
hand-bills
,
and his declining health, occasioned by
these extraordinary labors. With this in his
hand, he scoured the city; and, presenting it
firmly, he brought every man to a stand as
summarily
as if it had been a pocket-pistol instead
of a petition. His enthusiasm was
considerably
quickened when he learned that a
competitor
was out before him, and had a start of
twenty-seven names.
Besides signatures to his petition, Bott
rushed
hither and thither, obtaining letters
recommendatory
from every person of note or
standing
who had the slightest claim of
acquaintance
with his Excellency, the Governor of
the State. Among others, he procured an
invaluable
and pressing epistle of
recommendation
from a gentleman who had enjoyed the
extreme felicity of beholding the skirts of his
Excellency's coat, as he passed through
Onondaga
county, during a violent storm.
The day had, at length, arrived, the
evening
of which was to be signalized by the
celebration
of the Cartmen's Fancy Ball; and Bott
was hurrying through his political toils, in
order
to be in good time to wait on the widow.
With this view he was making rapid progress
past a certain market on the East River side,
when his eye caught a crowd. Now, a crowd
was a perfect harvest to Bott, and he had
scarcely ever plunged into one without
bringing
out one or two first-rate names to his
paper
.
The widow would be impatient, he
feared
;
and, though the temptation was great, he
determined to hurry by, when he beheld a
distinguished
functionary, whose name would be
an all-important acquisition. He accordingly
resolved to run the risk, and make up lost time
by additional speed in his after-movements.
Your signature, if you please, cried Bott,
pushing boldly through the crowd, toward the
Coroner (for it was that officer, preparing to
hold an inquest), whose ruddy countenance
was a conspicuous beacon for the office-seeker.
As Noadiah rushed forward, the crowd,
supposing
him to be some near relative of the
deceased
,
come to take possession of his chattels
and moveable funds, parted; and, just as he
had succeeded in breaking the inner circle, the
Coroner stepped aside, and Mr. Noadiah Bott
found himself presenting his petition to an
upright
corpse with a most doleful countenance,
and a faded blue handkerchief about its neck.
Get his name, by all means, Bott, said
the Coroner, whose office, after he had held it
three months, had, somehow or other, made
him remarkably facetious. To him, Bott, to
him; he can say a good word for you in the
next world, though he plays dummy in this.
The poor gentleman, cried a voice in the
crowd, to several of whom Bott seemed known,
has been down drinking your health, Mr.
Bott, in salt water, and success to your
application
.
Look in the defunet's pockets, Mr.
Coroner
,
urged a second voice; p'r'aps he's got
a petition up for surveyor-general of sharks and
codfish.
More likely, said a third, a special bill,
for privilege to bathe in the docks below the
lamp district.
No such thing, retorted the first citizen;
I'll bet he's a quack-doctor, been in to try a
new pill that he's been inventing to keep
water
out of the stomach.
Come, gentlemen, said the Coroner, the
corpse begins to look melancholy. We must
have a jury on the poor fellow, whoever he is;
and Mr. Bott, you will make a good foreman,
and I've no doubt, if you render a true verdict,
provided the poor man can serve you by a good
word with the devil, he'll do it with all his
heart.
Bott entreated his friend the Coroner to
excuse
him from service. The Coroner
discovered
his extreme urgencywas inexorable,
and the inquest proceeded. The body was
laid at full length on the top of a fish-stall, and
the jury took their seats on market-benches on
each side. With a word or two from the
Coroner
,
they proceeded to examine witnesses, as
to the manner of death of the gentleman in the
faded blue handkerchief. The first that was
produced was an old fishmonger, who looked
as dry and withered as a salted haddock:
It was about two o'clock, he guessed, it
mought be more, or it mought be less, for he
recollected there was a little blast of cloud jist
over the sunwhen what should he see but
the dead one there walking, melancholy-like,
up and down the wharf (as true as he lived),
with a piece of rope and the tail of a dried
herring
(herrings
was now a shilling the dozen;
if the season set in earlier, it mought so be
they would be down to nine-peace ha'penny)
sticking, for all the world, out of his coat
pocket behind. He guessed at once, and
without
help, the moment he got sight of the
herring
and the rope-end, that something was
wrong with the poor gentleman's head. He's
loose in the attic, thinks I; but how he'll use
that rope to any advantage, with this high
wind, I can't guess. If he tries a spile, he's
sure to be interrupted unpleasantly; and if he
goes into the market and gets possession of a
hook, why, some butcher or other'll come next
morning, and be offended mightily at the
liberty
he's took. `What will the poor gentleman
do?' says I, almost in convulsions to see how
he was put out, as he rambled up and down
the wharf, looking one time on the ground
and then gazing up at the mast-heads, and
then stopping, and taking a melancholy view
in a basket at some fresh black-fish, just out
of the water. This put him in a doleful train;
and what does he do next, but makes right
down to the river, all of a sudden, and spoils
his herring and rope's-end, and his own dear
body, by jumping straight into the tide.
An idle fellow, a sort of wharf vagabond,
was next produced, to furnish his evidence as
to the mode of death of the deceased. All that he
could testify to was, that he differed from the
first witness; for that the herring and the rope,
according to his best belief, were in different
pockets: that the herring was in the right
pocket, and the rope's-end in the left. This
witness was followed by a match-spirit,
another
river loafer, who was as sure as veal
was dead calf, that the rope's-end was in the
right pocket, and the bit of herring in the left.
This brought out his predecessor, and a furious
altercation sprang up between the two minute
and accurate observers, as to the particular
depository of the fish and cord. They battled
it out for some time without interruption,
when, being ordered off by the Coroner, they,
in a very gentlemanly spirit, locked arms, and
marched away together to a neighboring
porter-house
,
there to discuss the question over a
pot of pale ale, and, after an hour's
enthusiastic
debate, to come to the conclusion that they
were both right, and that that old
curmudgeon
,
the fishmonger, had parboiled (perjured)
himself.
Bott, all this time, was suffering under the
most hideous state of feeling. Time was
flying
;
the sun was down; the widow must, by
this, be dressed; she had put on her hat; in
a rage she had torn out of the house, and gone
to the ball alone! This was the masterly
picture
that Bott's mind painted for its own
amusement
,
while he sat at the head of the corpse.
All the customary evidence had been
examined
,
and a pretty palpable case of
self-drowning
was made out; when who should
rush forward, to increase his discomfiture, but
half a dozen medical worthies, in breathless
haste, panting, and covered with sweat. They
all eagerly approached the body, felt its
temples
,
its wrists, and its ankles, with the most
affectionate tenderness, and unanimously
pronounced
itdead! Here was a discovery for
the Coroner and jury. The corpse was
decided
to be a corpse; but, as all their names
could not appear in the next morning's report,
the Coroner allowed a couple of them to
unbutton
the jacket of the corpse, put their
fingers
in its mouth, and hand their names to
his clerk.
Bott was now allowed to escape, and,
choosing
the most direct route, started for home.
He had successfully accomplished several
blocks, when he heard a tremendous noise,
resembling
the approach of a furious army, the
bursting of a volcano, or the thunder of a
cataract
;
it was a New York fire engine. With a
horrible uproar, dragged forward by a hundred
men, and with a tail of boysblack, white,
and piebaldas long as that of a comet, it
rushed
on. It neared the place where Bott was
hurrying along; it approached a cross-walk
that Bott must pass to the opposite side of the
street. He undertook to achieve it before the
engine came up; but, mistaking his time, he
was caught in the current and hurried along.
He had got entangled in the rope at the head
of the machine, and it was under such
headway
that he must go with it, or be trodden
under
foot, and furnish a mournful casualty or
melancholy accident for next day's papers. It
was a dreadful situation for a gentleman of a
rather corpulent habit, and slightly asthmatic!
He entreated the foreman to put his
trumpet
to his mouth and stop the engine; he offered
him two shillings if he would do ita new hat,
his watch! It was all in vain; you might as well
attempt to arrest the progress of a herd of
buffaloes
on the prairie; and they swept onone
long block, two, three. At length they came
to a square, where there was a large heap of
dirt; and chance accomplished what a new
beaver hat, a watch, and the amazing sum of
twenty-five cents, had failed to doit arrested
the engine; and Bott, with his hair almost on end
with fear and anxiety, disengaged himself, and,
retracing his steps at a hard gallop, reached
his own door.
Composing his spirits with one glass, he
proceeded
to arrange his toilet in another; and at
last stood, in full trim, before the widow's door.
With trembling hand he knocked, and was
answered
.
She had gone to the ball an hour
before
,
with her uncle Jonas, from Androscoggin.
The devil take uncle Jonas! (and heaven be
thanked it's no worse!) thought Noadiah;
and he speeded to the scene of festivity.
Bott soon arrived at a large room, lighted
with mould candles; and from a box, in the
centre of which, where a negro and five white
men, like so many captive Troubadours of the
feudal time, were imprisoned for the evening,
proceeded certain instrumental sounds, of a
very spirited and melodious character. On
the floor thereof he discovered, besides the
customary
number of well-dressed ladies, about
one hundred and fifty men, apparently in the
enjoyment of robust health, and endued in
cartmen's frocks, every soul of them. This
was the Cartmen's Fancy Ballthe fancy of
the thing lying entirely in the frocks. After
he had somewhat recovered from the dazzling
effect of the refulgent mould-candles, and the
gorgeous apparel of the gentlemen, so that he
could look about with tolerable composure,
nearly the first object his eye fell upon, was
as true as Bott wore a ruffle!uncle Jonas, of
Androscoggin, clad also in a cart-frock, and
dancing away, at a very vigorous rate, with
the widow. They appeared to be enjoying
themselves charmingly; and Noadiah thought
he had never seen, in his whole life, a more
affectionate uncle, or a more delightful niece.
He, however, advanced into the centre of the
room, where he was stared at by the frocked
gentry as if he had been a Turk in a turban,
or a Mohawk in his blanket, and accosted the
worthy pair.
The widow playfully rebuked him for his
tardiness and irregularity, adding, with a sly
look at her partner, that uncle Jonas had
been so kind as to drop in and wait upon her,
in his absence, with the ticket he (Bott) had
left. She added, in a whisper in Bott's ear
Uncle Jonas is one of the best men living;
and, to tell you the truth, Bott, it's the
remarkable
resemblance between yourself and him,
that made me take such a liking to you.
At this, Bott laughed in his sleeve, and
uncle
Jonas, who somehow or other had
over-heard
the substance of the whisper, roared
right out. Bott glanced stealthily at uncle
Jonas, very often, throughout the evening, and
satisfied his own mind that he was one of the
best looking men it had ever been his
happiness
to behold.
The fancy ball proceeded merrily; and
every
time the hundred and fifty male dancers
jumped up and cut a pigeon's wing, or struck
their heels in the air, they made a noise with
their cart-frocks like the sails of a whole fleet
of merchant-ships flapping in the wind. But
what astonished Bott most, in the career of
their proceedings, was, that although he was
extremely
anxious to dance with the widow
Bobbin
,
yet, by some marvellous combination of
circumstances
,
he was deprived of that pleasure
through the whole evening; and what was, if
possible, still more miraculous, uncle Jonas,
by equal good luck, seemed to dance every
individual
cotillon with that lady. Sometimes
he was pleasantly requested by the widow to
bring her a lemonade from the saloon; and
before he could return, she was engaged, and
dancing in high spirits with her respected
relative
.
Then he would be courteously
entreated
,
by one of the managers, to snuff a
chandelier
,
as his frock was in the way, and he was
afraid of a general conflagration if he
attempted
it. Then a polite invitation would be sent
down from the musicians' box, requesting Mr.
Bott to come up the ladder, and give the
orchestra
his opinion on the rumble of the drum,
and to pronounce whether it wasn't a trifle too
harsh for the ears of the very genteel
company
below. In this way the evening glided by,
without giving Bott an opportunity to
distinguish
himself on the floor; till, just as the
ball was about to break up, Mrs. Bobbin
prevailed
upon him to exhibit himself in a sailor's
hornpipe, in which, she slyly informed the
company
,
he was a most capital hand. A ring was
accordingly formed by the rest of the
assembled
gentry, and Bott executed a hornpipe in
most brilliant and comic style; in fact, his
performance
was so pregnant with humorous
motions
of the leg and swayings of the person,
that, at the conclusion, a general
complimentary
laugh was raised for Bott's especial benefit.
Upon the whole, Bott was pleased, and his
pleasure was increased by uncle Jonas
informing
him that he must go another way, and that
he (Bott) must see the widow home. Bott
readily
accepted the agreeable trust, innocently
(and like the primeval Adam, before the days of
omnibuses and licensed hacks) forgetting the
coach-hire. A hack was therefore called, and
Noadiah
and the widow, bidding uncle Jonas
good-night
,
mounted inthe widow giving Bott the
back seat, and taking the forward one herself,
remarking, that she preferred riding backwards,
she had been in the habit of rowing so much
on a pond, when a girl. During their progress
through the streets, Bott observed that the
widow
every now and then looked just over the
top of his hat, and smiled; but he didn't
observe
that uncle Jonas was standing up behind
the carriage, and making numerous pleasant
signals and indications (now and then tapping
his forehead significantly) to Mrs. Bobbin
through the coach window. Having deposited
the widow and discharged the hack, (for he
preferred to walk home, and chew the cud of
amorous fancy at leisure,) about three o'clock
that morning Noadiah stretched himself to
pleasant
dreams!
The inspection of staves now engrossed a
large portion of the thoughts of the sagacious
Bott, and he left no influence unasked, and no
politician unannoyed, but that he would obtain
the office. He was, by this time, in possession
of the autographs of more than fifty important
and respectable men, twenty tolerably great
men, and twelve actually great men, that
expected
to be members of Congress, before they
yielded the ghost. To strengthen his claim,
and bring himself more prominently before the
party, he resolved to abandon the
comparatively
private theatre where he had heretofore
performed
,
and exhibit on a larger stagein a
word, he determined to make a speech at Ma
sonic Hall, which bears the same relation to
the political taverns of the wards, as a
primate's
cathedral does to the little chapels
connected
with it. After forming this resolution,
Noadiah strenuously devoted himself to the
perusal
of the newspapers, and the orations of
Patrick
Henry, as given in the American
Speaker
,
and to the practice and cultivation of his
voice by a strict regimen of table-beer and
lozenges
.
In accordance with his design he
prepared
an elaborate speech, beginning,
Fellow-citizens
,
unaccustomed as I am to public
assembliesand ending with an ecstatic
description
of the blood-stained Genius of
Liberty
,
wrapped in a winding-sheet of stripes
and starswhich was a tolerable figure,
considering that Bott had no interest in an
incorporated
cemetery, and was not a tailor by trade.
The eventful evening having at length
arrived
,
Bott disposed of an early tea, and
ascended
to the public room up stairs, and locked
himself
in with a tumbler of brandy-and-water,
and a fourth-size tallow candle, having given
strict orders to Master Bobbin to cry fire! if
any one attempted to interrupt him. He then
recited his harangue, from beginning to end,
with great vigor addressing a group of large
barrels
that stood in a corner, as his
fellow-citizens
,
and a small barrel on his right hand,
with Old Rum branded on it, as Mr.
Chairman.
Master Bobbin (although, like a true son of
New York, strongly disposed so to do) had no
occasion
to cry fire, and if the non-interruption of
Mr. Bott's speech was to be taken as evidence of
no conflagration, any company might have
ensured
all the property, as far as his voice could be
heard, with perfect safety, and at a very trifling
premium. Having gone through his speech to his
own perfect satisfaction, and without any
symptoms
of animation having manifested themselves
either in the brandy-keg or the sturdy group of
barrels, Mr. Bott descended, endued his stout
little person in a rough over-coat with
tremendous
pearl buttons, and thrusting his manuscript
speech in his hind-pocket, sallied forth. It was
a clear, moon-light evening. Bott was in
capital
spirits, and he dropped into a cellar and took
a couple of dozen of York Bank oysters, just to
strengthen his voice. He had not gone far,
however, (reciting to himself favorite passages
from his harangue,) when he was unconsciously
followed by a slight youthful figure, which glided
cautiously behind him, took a peep into his face,
and extending its right arm, withdrew from the
pocket of Bott a white roll which, in all human
probability, contained the speech of the evening.
The purloiner then stole off, and turning a
corner
,
halted a moment under a lamp, opened the
roll, laughed quietly, and then made way for a
political club or association of the opposite party
to Bott's, and there finding a numerous
assembly
of choice spirits gathered, he regaled them
with the recitation of the able and eloquent
harangue
of Noadiah (or Noddy, as the reader
took the liberty of calling him) Bott, Esq.,
B
which you may be sure was interrupted with
frequent exclamations like theseWell done,
Bott! Good, for the inspector of staves!
Equal to fifth-proof with five-fifths water!
In the mean time the hilarious and innocent
Noadiah was wending joyously toward the scene
of his glory, stopping now and then, however,
when he was reminded by a hydrant, or some
other upright and stationary object, of an
attentive
listener, to get into the shadow of the
buildings and recite some striking passage with
appropriate extension of arms, contracting of
brows, and planting of the foot.
An immense crowd had assembled; the
meeting
was called to order; a Chairman and
seventeen
Assistant Chairmen (to help the presiding
officer look grave) were appointed, and five or
six speakers, ranging from three feet and a half
to six feet high, and from twenty years of age
to seventy, with every variety of voice, from the
kettle-drum to the fife, addressed the audience
and Bott listened to them all, sometimes
pleased that his own time had not arrived, and
sometimes eager to take the platform at once.
At length the cry of Bott! Bott! was
heard rising from different quarters of the room,
(for certain vagabond friends of his, there by
his special invitation, were on the alert,) and
swelling into a perfect tempest of acclamation,
Bott came forward, aided in the rear by two or
three sturdy scamps, and helped in the van by
a couple of the secretaries, who seized him
forcibly
by the collar and drew him forward.
Three cheers for Bott! shouted one of his
vagabond friends the moment his nose became
visible as he assumed the stand. Three cheers
were accordingly given, and Bott began.
Through the first half-dozen sentences of his
harangue he marched in triumphant style,
keeping
his eye fixed keenly on a bald-headed man
in about the centre of the crowd, to steady his
nerveswhen suddenly the bald-headed man,
prompted by a current of air that came in at a
broken pane, clapped on his hat, and Bott
stopped
short as if he had been struck with the
apoplexy
.
Go on! was the universal cry. But
Bott had lost his self-possession, and stared
around like a frightened rabbit, first at the
Chairman, then at each one of the seventeen
Assistant Chairmen, then into the bottom of his
hat, and then he thought of his manuscript. A
smile gleamed over his face, and he thrust his
hand behind him, found nothing, brought it
back again, and the sickly smile went out. At
last he stammeredBeer three cents a glass
nutmeg extrano trust in this shopand he
was hurried off the stage by the two benevolent
secretaries who had dragged him on by the
collar.
Recovering himself from the shock as well as
he might, and making his way through the
press as speedily as possible, he rushed into the
open air and aimed at once for the widow's.
There he was sure to find one respectful
auditor
at least, and ample consolation for the
miscarriage
of his oratory.
To his utter and unqualified astonishment, he
was there informed that the widow had gone
out with her uncle an hour before, and wasn't
expected back in a week! What could this
mean? His mind was filled with dreadful
forebodingshorrible surmises! It could not
be that they had left home to drown themselves
together? that they had gone out to fight a
promiscuous duel because the widow had seen
fit to show more partiality and affection for him
than for her own uncle? that they had
ascended
the top of the shot-tower to study astronomy
for a short time, and then to plunge for ever
from its dizzy height? Notwithstanding these
conflicting conjectures, Noadiah went straight
home, and immediately examined the Table of
Consanguinity in the Bible, to ascertain whether
uncle and niece were within marriageable
degree
.
Next morning's paper explained the whole
matter in the most artless manner. It was
neither drowning, murder, nor aerial
precipitation
but
simply matrimony. The
announcement
set forth the parties as Jonas Tupp,
cartman
,
and Mrs. Amelia Bobbin, both of this
city. The relationship appeared to have been
perfectly imaginarya merely playful
hypothesis
.
As to the inspection of staves, it was
considered
so far beneath Bott's dignity and the
worth of his services as to be given to one
Zacchias
Bull, or Bullwinkle, or some such
zoological
fellow; and Bott was informed by private
letter that his application had been hotly
opposed
by his very good friend, the Alderman
who had tendered his invitation to the Common
Council to visit a remarkable tortoise
twenty-three
weeks under a stone, &c., on the ground
that said invitation (the most serious operation
of Bott's life) was a deliberate imposition, as
he was satisfied, on the understanding of the
Honorable the Corporation!
POTTERS' FIELD.
I stand
upon the graves of the poor. Over
this simple field, unvaried by mark or
monument
,
I cast my eye and feel the power and
presence
of death more than in the tombs of kings,
or standing beside those huge mausoleums, the
pyramids. Here the grim phantom stalks
naked
;
not skulking as in the cemeteries of the
rich and prosperous, behind funeral piles, or
stealing away from the gaze amid masses of
carved
marble. Every step of the tyrant falls
clear and distinct upon the grave of some lowly
son of earth and poverty. How many of the
children of sorrow have tottered into this
humble
burial-place, and thrown down the weary
burden of grief and wretchedness under which
they had fainted in the sun.
All-accordant must be the trumpet-blast that
can melt into one harmonious web of life these
motley elements. What a pageant of
wretchedness
,
and rags, and penury would the habitants
of this single acre form, could they be
summoned
from their rest. Moscow's bell should ring
to raise the awful curtain, and bring upon the
stage the parti-colored company.
An archangel's peal alone could startle back
into life, (from which their suffering was so deep
and piercing,) the various multitude. An
omnipotent
edict in truth it would require to force
them once more upon a scene where anguish
and tears were their only legacy, and the grave
the quiet, rent-free grave, their reversion!
Many as the citizens that people the bottom
of the deep, are the myriads that have sunk
silently
as into an ocean billow, into the bosom
of this green earth. I will try a simple spell
of my own: perchance it may bring them up,
at least in phantasy.
Re-appear, ye sad tenants of the narrow
house, once more on the earth where ye suffered!
I here establish a court of death. Ye, are
summoned
to the trial; answer ye to your names.
Hear ye! hear ye!
Saul Rope? Saul Rope? Slowly from the
earth, near at my feet, a pale, shrunken being
shakes off the green mould, and feebly aiding
himself with his hand on his grave's side, steps
into the twilight.
His dress is an entire suit of gray, coarse
linsey-woolsey, with a plain, cheap hat, without
nap or buckle. I was a saw-filer, said the
poor apparition, and kept a small shop in
Doyer street. When I set up there I had a few
friends at first, but they soon dropped off. The
street was so crooked that nobody could find
their way to me, even if they wanted my
services
;
no one except an old bachelor with a
twist in his neck, who seemed to have a natural
facility in threading the windings of the alley,
and who came not on business, but to enjoy my
pleasant conversation! Besides, a middle-aged
lady, who was born in the street, and who had
a praiseworthy fondness for her place of nativity,
and who visited me annually the day before
Christmas, to have her carving-knife put in
order
for the holydays. By-and-by the old lady
died offthe bachelor bought a little farm and
retired into the country, and I was forced to
abandon my thankless trade of saw-filing and
go upon the watch. Of a feeble frame, I soon
caught a cold, fell into a galloping consumption,
and you see me here. Thank God! there was
no wife nor little child to weep the day that the
simple saw-filer died.
The next dead defendant was a corpulent,
hale fellow, who answered to the name of
Robert
Drum, and was clad in tattered and ragged
garments, without hat, shirt, or boots, whose
story in brief was, that he had been a beggar,
and had died of good-living and repletion.
After him Peter Packhorse and family were
called. At first no one appeared, but on a
repetition
of the summons, a small middle-aged
man was seen making his way from a remote
part of the field, with a sickly woman hanging
on his right arm, and a train of twelve or thir
teen thinly clad, pale girls and boys following
them.
The tale of Peter's distresses was touching
and pathetic.
Upon the banks of the sunny Bronx, in the
sweet and cheerful village of White Plains,
said Peter, God cast my lot. I owned a few
patrimonial acres, and in my early youth took
to myself a buxom and bonny wife, and together
we made a little Paradise of our farm, for every
thing was abundant and in good order. The
seasons were our friends, and the clear stream
that ran by our door kept us close to our home
by its cheerful voice and its ever delightful,
rippling
music. In summer I gathered in my
harvest
,
with my first-born boy and girl at play
between the swathes and winrows, and when
the autumn came, and the winter was provided
for, I would take my gun or my angle in my
hand, and strolling away into the rich crimson
woods or along the mossy streams, meditate upon
the autumn and blessings Heaven had given
me in my fertile farm, my bonny wife, and my
sweet-featured boy and girl. Thus three
joyous
years glided by, and prosperity made me a
Christian in the open fields, and a devout
worshipper
in the church. On the last day of the
winter of , a cousin of mine, a
blackbrowed
,
thoughtful man, arrived in the mail
coach from the city on a visit of friendship.
He stayed little more than a week, but made so
good use of his time, as to persuade me to sell
my farm, turn it into cash, and, carrying my
family with me, settle in New York, and become
a brokera sorry shaver of notes. The profits
that he conjured up before me seemed so rapic
and sure, the business so light, airy, and
gentleman-like
,
(who is it that has never been fired
with the passion of becoming a gentleman!)
that I fell in with his proposition, and early in
spring, disposing of my farm and stock at
vendue
,
hastened to town. Here I soon lost the
better half of my ready cash; my dark-browed
city cousin absconded with the balance, and I,
with a family which had doubled, was upon the
town. In a short time, even my darling
children
(yes, the bright fairy boy and girl of my
country days too!) were snatched from me by
an envious fever, and I was alone with my wife
in the vast city without bread. I obtained
employment
,
precarious and cheap employment it
was, as a journeyman shoemaker: for every
farmer in the parts where I was born knows
something of the trade. Thus I sustained
myself
for a few years, a new family of children
having sprung up and died at my side in the
mean time. My wife followed her thirteenth
child, (a pretty, lovely girl!) My staff of life
was broken. The trade at which I toiled bent
me double, and in the ninth year after I had
left that little Eden on the banks of the Bronx,
a disease of the spine fastened upon me. I lay
sick for months, in a low, vile shed, racked by
intolerable pain of body, and worse anguish of
mind, until I died and came here to lie with my
wife and children in everlasting rest! I would
that a river ran by our gravessomething like
the Bronx!
I could hardly refrain from tears at the
recital
of Peter's simple story, but mastering my
emotion, and turning my face toward another
quarter of the field, I cited
Paula Hops?At this summons, a light
female form, endued in a black bombazine gown,
with a white vandyke about the neck, stepped
cut of her grave upon the earth, with something
of natural grace in her gesture, and gave the
following history of herself.
I am a poor seamstress, said the fair
vision
,
a hectic glow shining through her pale
cheek, and a doubtful brilliancy kindling her
eye, I was born to that vocation. My mother
and grandmother before me were seamstresses,
and lived in comfort and plenty; but that was
in different times from these. Tailors did not
ride in carriages then, that poor girls might
starve.
Their labor was at least worth the candle
they burned far into the night to pursue it by;
but I do them wrong,
they
never burned the
midnight lamp. Their hours were at the worst
from sunrise to sunset. I toiled often from the
first streak of morning till the neighboring
clock tolled twelve at midnight, or one on the
morning of the next day. And see! this is my
rewardthese are the wages for which I
wasted my young blood, health, and spirits, and
finally my life! and saying this, she took from
her bosom and handed me a soiled and rumpled
paper, containing the following particulars:
Seamstresses' Prices
:Six hours work
on a common vest, six and a quarter cents.
Twenty-four hours work on Baboon coats of
kersey, fifty cents. Twelve hours work on Navy
shirts with star-collars, twelve and a half cents.
Two days work on blanket coats with fourteen
buttons, fifty cents. Frocktees of duffle-cloth
for stout-bodied men, twenty-four hours labor,
thirty-seven and a half cents. Pantaloons with
fly fronts and straps, eleven hours, twenty-five
cents, &c.
And leaving this guilty and barbarous
catalogue
in my hands, the fair victim disappeared.
Next, I called up in succession and heard the
elegiac histories of poor Joe Crutch, an old
pauper, with a red bandanna about his head;
Susan and Sarah Sparkels, a pair of spinster
sisters, withered and sad, who came up
arm-in-arm
,
as if they occupied a joint grave; Sam
Weatherly, a paralytic poultry-merchant; Moll
or Mary Jones, huckster; two red-faced
butchers
that died of apoplexy within a day of each
other (the old co-partnership), Bull and Bullock;
a pauper negro, Nick Johnson; five or six
sickly-looking
,
crook-backed wood-sawyers;
Quibble
,
a rusty attorney, with the dirty end of a
declaration in covenant sticking out of his
breeches' pocket, &c., &c.
Call into Court! I exclaimed, in a voice
of command, to a feeble old crier of the
Common
Pleas, that had appeared (privilege of his
former office) without summons to tell his tale
of woCall into Court all those that have
died of harsh usage and broken hearts! and,
feeble as was the voice of the tottering beadle,
at his summons an innumerable company of
haggard
creatures started up and swarmed in every
part of Potters' Field. A countless throng of
faces was before me, men, women, and children
but all of them wearing a certain proof of
the deep anguish that had cut to the heart and
brought them to the grave. Who knew their
malady, as they pined away day by day, like
fruits that perish internally, and drop from the
tree without seeming frost or blight? None!
not one!
Some of them died off abruptlyothers
lingered
along for months, and a few, to whom
nature
had furnished stout masculine hearts,
weathered it for a year or two; and then the
undertaker (such a one as poverty could afford)
was called in; the hearse stood at the door;
the neighbors' children gathered wonderingly
about the house and walk; a few of the
better-hearted
neighbors dropped in; more of them
looked out at their windows, or put their caps
together and discussed the dead one's disease
some calling it pleurisy, and some, nearer the
truth, an affection of the heart, but none, not
one, (unless some single sister or shrewd aunt
that lived with the poor family,) dreaming it
was that terrible and crushing form of the
disease
a
broken heart. Thus the poor-house
train passes from the door; the corpse in its
plain pine-coffin is deposited in the grave; and
henceforth the dead is dead to
all
the earth!
There is nothing by which to remember the
poor that are gone! It is only over them as a
multitude, whose combined sorrows and
sufferings
assume to the fancy a huge and dreadful
aspect, that any one mourns.
As individuals, while living, none cares for
them but death;dead, none regards them but
God!
GREASY PETERSON.
Smooth
, unctuous, fish-faced being! that
sittest
duck-like, perched on the oil-barrel's edge,
ready to make a plunge into the sea of business
that roars at thy feetCalmness personified,
holy Peace, Placidity, and Quiet descended to
earth in the guise of a green-grocer! Greasy
Peterson, vulgar mortals have named thee,
knowing not the true sweetness and blessedness
of thy life in its even flow. Judged by thy
garments
,
thou art in truth a poor devil. A blue
coat patched like the sky with spots of cloudy
black, oil-spotted drab breeches, cased in coarse
overalls of bagging, are not the vestments in
which worldly greatness clothes itself, or
worldly wisdom is willing to be seen walking
streets and highways. True, thou hast a jolly
person and goodly estate of flesh and blood
under
such habiliments. Glide on, glide on,
Oleaginous Robertlike a river of oil, and be
thy taper of life quenched silently as pure
spermaceti
!
Robert Peterson, Esq., green-grocer and
tallow-chandler
,
possessed the most incongruous
face that ever adorned the head of mortal.
His nose thrust itself out, a huge promontory
of flesh, at whose base two pool-like eyes
sparkled
small, clear, and twinkling, while a river
of month ran athwart its extreme projection,
flowing almost from ear to ear, with only a
narrow
strip of ruddy cheek intervening.
Within, greasy Bob possessed a mind as
curiously
assorted as his countenance. It was
composed of fragments of every thing, bits of
knowledge of one kind and another strangely
stitched together, and forming an odd
patchwork
brain, whose operations it was a merry
spectacle to observe.
Good morning, neighbor Peterson, said a
small, snipe-nosed fruiterer from next door,
Good morning!I hope we shall have fine
weather now the wind has shifted his tail to the
Nor'-west.
Hopes it may be so, Mr. Tartthe stars
were precious clear last night, the sky was a
healthy red this morningand farmer Veal
brought in his poultry to be ready for sale by
noon. I hope the bank will give me a lift to
day, for I didn't know but we should lose our
little girl last nightwith the measles; she was
sickly, very sickly. Perhaps peaches are cheap
now? aren't they, Mr. Tart?, How is the little
widow, Mr. Tart? I bought a firkin prime
butter
Wednesday afternoon, Mr. Tart, only one
and six per pound. That dress of the young
parson's is horrid taste, bright buttons and
rainbow-colored
neckerchief! And so Mr.
Peterson
would ramble on by the hour, touching on
every imaginable subject, exhausting none,
adorning all by a placid and inimitable face, and
a peculiar, emphatic, jerking delivery. It is
calculated by an acute and accurate neighbor
of his, (a patent astronomical instrument-maker,)
that in one day Greasy Peterson touched on one
hundred and twenty-three distinct subjects
without
devoting more than two seconds and a
quarter
of remark to any one.
There was a flavor of this same grotesque
humor in every thing that he said or did.
The store in which he carried on trade
presented
the same parti-colored confusion and
variety
as his conversation. It was a congregation
of an infinite diversity of wares and
merchandises
;
a piebald assemblage of boxes, candles,
loaves, dried fish, fresh fish, green cabbage, red
roses in pots in the window, scales, antique
hatchets, pyramidal and cone-shaped loaves of
sugar in blue-paper caps, cinnamons and cloves
in flaunting frocks of yellow, and Greasy
Peterson
,
presiding in the midst, mounted on keg or
counter, like a Turkish Muezzin, in a rusty
cocked beaver.
The outside of this singular edifice answered
aptly to the interior. Originally it was a low
stone building, with a tile roof, occupied as a
powder-house, with small square windows, pro
tected by iron gratings. About the twentieth
year of the present century the tile roof had
been shattered by a heavy thunder-clap, and for
a time the little powder-house remained
tenantless
,
unless the landlord chose to collect his rent
from a ghost in goggle eyes that was said to
occupy
the premises. In the year twenty-five (
I
think it was) it fell into the hands of Mr.
Peterson
,
who immediately set about converting it
into a store and dwelling. The first step in this
important undertaking was, to build upon the
stone-work that had survived the storm, an
upper
story and attic of wood; and when this was
completed, the innocent little powder-house
looked very much like a stiff old maid that has
weathered half a dozen changes of fashion, and
chooses to wear an under-gown of the last
century
,
topped with a boddice and head-dress of the
newest gloss.
Next, the windows were enlarged in length
and breadth, the bars removed, and a noisy pair
of shutters given to each.
But the finishing-stroke remained. The
fantastic
tenement was yet to be painted, and here
the riant humor of Mr. Robert Peterson broke
away from rein and bridle, and fairly galloped
off with all the plain sense of the worthy
chandler
.
He entered into contracts with no less
than six painters for the painting and
ornamenting
of his new-fangled edifice, believing that no
less a number could furnish a sufficient
assortment
of colors. And to each one of the six he
gave special directions as to the compounding
of novel and unheard-of varieties of tint.
And now that Peterson's powder-house has
left the brush of six painters, it shines upon the
adjacent streets, a many-colored meteor!
rivalling
the sky itself in the brilliancy and variety
of its tints. It is sunset imbodied in stone and
wood, only with new and greater accessions of
gorgeous hue. An enormous dot of paint, as it
were, planted at the corner, saying, Stop
here! A vasty exclamation-mark of red and
blue and yellow, dashed down at the junction
of the streets, demanding the wayfarer's pause,
and the wagoner's mounted admiration.
As in a hero everything is (or should be)
horoic
,
so, as I have before noted, every thing
connected
with the worthy green-grocer assumed
some color of the humorous.
The eleventh year from his opening store and
establishing his family in the powder-house,
Mr. Peterson, by dint of large profits and small
expenditures, was able to set up a snug
equipage
for family use. This was a light vehicle
with a green leather cover, extending over the
whole length, so that it resembled an airy
market
wagon, fixed upon high stout springs, and
containing four seats within. Drawn by a
single
,
sleek, shining nag of very moderate size and
stature, the Peterson family were accustomed to
visit certain kindred of theirs living at Pelham
and West Farms. It was a rare sight to see
them setting forth from the front-door of their
gaudy dwelling: in front sat Greasy Peterson
himself, smiling in a new sky-blue coat, with
2
bright buttons, tightly fastened up to his chin,
light plush pantaloons, and an unctuous face
and a pair of buckskin gloves; the whole
person
surmounted by a glossy black beaver hat;
driving his way forward with considerable
speed, by the aid of sundry encouraging
chirrups
and admonitory, Ge-ups, and
Get-a-longs
.
By the side of him was discovered the
slim, upright form of Robert Peterson, jr., his
eldest son, holding a black-handled coach-whip
in his hand, with which he greeted, in the
progress
of travel, innumerable vagrant curs, that
hailed him open-mouthed at the doors by which
they passed. On the seat immediately behind
these two worthies sat Messrs. Eliphalet and
Bildad Peterson, holding transverse across their
breasts a child white and slim as if cast in a
candle-mould, recently baptized Thalia, (
softened
by the same monsters that christened her
sire Greasy,) into Tallow Peterson. On
the next seat rearward were disposed two
interesting
children in calico frocksMoses and
Johnny Peterson, and supporting the uttermost
rear reposed Mrs. Sophia Peterson, the
corpulent
spouse of Robert, and Sophia Peterson, jr.,
a girl with a large head and beautiful set of
delicate
small teeth.
With this burden behind him, the little nag
ambled on quietly and in good cheer, although
the vehicle that he drew was elevated so high
above him, that the tenants of the wagon and
the sleek horse, seemed to belong to altogether
different planets. Their return from these visits
was still more grotesque, for their
family-carriage
generally trundled into town garnished
with baskets of fresh, sweet-scented apples, and
a pair or two of tender poultry, presented by the
kindly farmer friends whom they had visited,
hanging at the sides, enlivened at times by a gay
string of onions, or an ambitious head of cabbage.
If I were called upon to name the prevailing
characteristic of Mr. Peterson's mind, I should
say, with deference to better judgments, it was
a certain, practical, business shrewdness, that
never allowed itself to slumber or to be
overreached
.
Whenever trade was the subject, or
bargain the object of conversation, all the
incoherence
I have spoken of disappeared, and his
mind flowed forth in a quiet, steady stream of
plain good sense and useful knowledge. Those
outward limbs and flourishes were instantly
lopped off by the exacting knife of business and
gain, and the simple, unadorned trunk of the
matter stood disencumbered. Many are the
prime bargains Peterson has entrapped unwary
boatmen and butter-merchants into, by help of
his rude garments and vagabond presentment.
How much do you ask a pound for these
firkins, squire? asked Greasy Peterson one day,
dressed in his roughest suit of clothes, and a hat
with only half a rim.
Why, loafer, replied the captain of the
loop, to whom this question was addressed in
slouching, careless tone, why uncle
oily-reeches
,
I guess
you
may have it at six pence
a pound the lot.
I'll take it, sir! said Greasy Peterson,
throwing an air of considerable seriousness and
dignity into his remark, which startled the rash
butter-merchant slightly.
But mind ye, neighborit's cash down at
that price! Come, fork over the solid, Old
Rags, said the boatman, with a loud laugh,
and turning with a quizzical leer to a group of
captains, and sloop-boys that had gathered to
see the fun.
Here it is! responded Peterson, coolly,
taking out a dirty buckskin bag, and counting
down in hard silver the sum to which the
twenty-five
firkins of butter amounted; ordered the
whole upon a cart, and jumping on himself,
touched his hat very politely, and bade the
astounded
crew of boatmen, Good afternoon!
The rash captain lives to this day, and
indulges
in a curious half-laugh, when he is engaged
in bargaining, that is known along the wharves
as the famous
Greasy Peterson chuckle
.
About the forty-third year of his age, the
worthy grocer was visited by apoplexy which
dried up his vital juices, and withered his person
like an apple blown from the tree, nipped by
autumn frosts. The physicians straightway
hurried in, and bled him so freely, that the fresh
gloss and old smoothness departed from his
countenance, and left him a sorry spectacle
compared with the former galliard and jovial
creature that answered to his name. He
however
recovered so far in a few weeks as to be
able to hobble out towards noon, and plant
himself
on a stool, on the sunny side of his store,
to air his constitution, and receive the
congratulations
and good wishes of his friends and
neighbors
as they passed or paused awhile to inquire
more minutely after his health. In a short
time (despite his careful diet and the skilful
practice of his physicians), a second and heavier
stroke of the disease fell upon him and carried
him off, at two o'clock in the afternoon of the
same day on which the celebrated fat ox, Billy
Lambert, arrived in town.
THE ADVENTURES OF SOL.
CLARION.
Gentle
, charitable, benevolent reader! if
thou feelest disposed to aid thine author in a
sore perplexity, and to dispense unto him, out
of the abundance of thy geographical erudition,
permit him to address to thee (humbly
confessing
his manifold ignorance) a single
interrogatory
:
Where
is the city of Peth? Many
times have I journeyed along the highway, that
runs through Greenwich, in the state of
Connecticut
,
and heard some learned traveller that
rode with me say, Yonder is the city of Peth!
pointing to the northeast: and looking thither,
I have discovered nought but a common
hill-side
,
with a single low tenement feebly
sustaining
itself amid a score of rocks, and three or
four straggling apple-trees.
Nevertheless in that illustrious city,
wherever
it be, the city of Peth, of whose inhabitants
the country doggerel says
Half ran away, and half starved to death,
did the equally illustrious Solomon Clarion find
a dwelling-place.
Humanity never assumed a more joyous and
gladsome form than thine, blithe Sol. Clarion!
Ah! why didst thou leave the tumbling
haymow
,
and the fresh stream, to become a pilgrim
to this Babel of ours? Why didst thou
abandon
the festal company of rustic youths and
maidens, to mingle with the tide of dark or
care-worn
faces that flows through our streets?
In his earliest prime, young Clarion lost his
mother (a golden womanfull of the delicacies
and rich fruits that belong to her sex, dashed
with something of a wilder savor), and was
brought to yonder poor dwelling to be a
housemate
with his mother's parents.
Young Solomon's character soon developed
itself, and proved to be of a mingled yarn.
None was gayer at school or in the orchard at
play than he: and yet, at times, none was
sadder
or more thoughtful.
Some holydays he passed in merry game and
wild frolic with his little school companions,
others he spent far away in the woods, or
wandering
through the green meadows, or loitering
slowly by the babbling brook. It was Solomon
Clarion (that fear-nought boy) that rode the
wild colts, and ran at the heels of every mad
bull that roared in the county! It was
Solomon
Clarion that was caught in an attitude of
breathless and reverential regard, watching the
glorious sunset or the stars climbing the sky!
In front of his grandfather's dwelling, and by
the road-side, stood a dry, dead old cherry-tree,
which had been barren of fruitage for many
years. It had been planted by a quaint old
bachelor uncle, and was considered a precious
family relic; and as such, Sol. himself
regarded
it until one day, a clear April holyday, in a
gamesome mood he doomed its overthrow.
Gathering
a noisy band of school-fellows, he issued
his warrant against old uncle Cherry (the name
by which it was known throughout the
neighborhood
),
and, producing a coil of rope,
ascended
the tree, and fixed a halter round its
mossy
old neck. At a signal the boys gave a
hearty
pull (none heartier than Clarion!) and,
with a clamorous shout, it fell to the earth. In
a moment or two Solomon was missing, and his
comrades, after considerable search, discovered
him over the fence, with tears in his eyes,
sliding
a fragment of the mouldering bark of old
uncle Cherry thoughtfully into his pocket. So
strange a creature was Clarion!
Sol's chosen friend and boon companion, was
a simple fellow by the name of Will Robin
or Foolish Will, as he was better known, and
whose general character, although brightened
and improved by occasional flashes of wit and
shrewdness, justified the epithet. He was the
butt and target of all the boors for twenty miles
around. If any farmer, or farmer's son, or
serving-man
,
wished to be witty at the very
cheapest
rate and smallest possible expenditure of
thought, no better luck could betide him than
to chance upon foolish Will. If a gallant was
anxious to obtain the reputation of vast
facetiousness
and great brilliancy of intellect with
his mistress, his fortune could be no sooner
made than by having poor Robin drop in to
have a few small, innocent jests thrust into his
pin-cushion brain without reply.
But Solomon Clarion found better matter and
better services in Will than these. He saw in
the poor varlet concealed veins of feeling and
odd streaks of fancy, checkering what the world
considered his vacant heart and blank intellect.
He saw in him innocence and purity, a sense of
love, and a deep sense of attachment wasted
(unless some human being like himself chose to
garner them for the simple owner) on dogs, and
birds, and horses, and others of the thoughtless
tribe.
Conversation with Will, too, though sadly
strange and disjointed, occasionally let the light
in, as it were through the chinks of a
disordered
brain, upon curious trains and passages of
thought. At times, he garnished his remarks
unconsciously with rare conceits that might
have gained for a wiser man the reputation of
a bountiful wit.
As true as I'm Will Robin, he exclaimed,
one clear, fair evening, as they were returning
together through a meadow, from a long
summer's
day ramble, yonder's Preacher Purdy's
new white beaver hatnailed up by the rim
Look!
Sol. Clarion gazed in the direction to which
he pointed, and answered, Why, Will, I see
nothing where you point but the plain, old moon
in her first quarter.
You may well call her plain, replied Will,
catching a new thread of thought; if it be the
moon (I'm not clear on that point yet), she is
the only decent planet in the sky.
She
behaves
something like, and keeps up a good bright light
when it's wanted, and is dressed in good,
homely
,
clean linen in the bargain; while your
fiery old sun capers up and down in crimson
velvet
,
making everybody lecherous and
apoplectic
I
don't care who knows it.
It's Preacher Purdy's hat, is it, Will? said
Clarion, anxious to bring him back to his
original
suggestion, and to see what he would make
of it.
Yes, it
is
Preacher Purdy's hat, I'm sure of
that; for don't I see the woolly nap on it now I
look closerclapping his hand, folded like a
telescope, to his eye, and watching as two or
three fleecy clouds crossed the disc of the
planet
what
a beautiful wren-house and place
for swallows and martens! I wish my little flock
of blue-coated beauties had as good quarters
it's softer and nicer than an old black hat. But
the preacher'll have to go bare-headed to
meeting
next sabbaththat'll be funny! And poor
Will burst into a boisterous roar of laughter,
in which Sol. was forced to join, for the sake of
good fellowship.
In all Sol. Clarion's jovial doings and
merry-makings
,
Foolish Will was a faithful squire and
attendant; and, simple as was the brain of the
strange creature, it always had sufficient
sagacity
to comprehend the drift and purpose of a
joke of Sol's., and to furnish its little tribute of
suggestions to help it forward. One day (it
was Sunday, in June), it came into Sol.
Clarion's
head to make a pilgrimage, with rod and
line, to Rye Pond or Lake Westchester, some
five or six miles distant from his home. He lay
under an apple-tree, cogitating some method of
safe and easy conveyance, when Foolish Will,
in one of his wild capers, came rolling down the
hill into the orchard, and directly against the
ribs of the thoughtful Solomon.
Heigho! cried he, this is a new style of
salutation on a Sunday morning. I have full
confidence, Will, in your affection, without
these heavy tokens. Be pleased to take off your
carcass, and give me a comfortable morsel of
advice.
Advice! Sol., if you want that, it is but a
stone's-throw to friend Bloom's, and he has
enough to turn his own mill and some over for
his neighbors. That's a fine owl of a fellow,
his oldest sonI'm sure of that, Solomon! and
he twisted his face as nearly into an outline of
the bird's visnomy, as his smooth features would
allow.
Never mind Booby Bloom, Will, continued
Clarion, I'm bent for a fishing excursion
to-day
.
And want me to hang on, as a poor worm,
for a bait I suppose; and an altogether
unnecessary
tear filled the eye of the gentle-hearted
fool.
No, no, Will, not for that, returned
Solomon
,
in a persuasive accent. No, Willie, you
must borrow some good neighbor's horse and
wagon and ride with me.
Black snakes and tree-toads take me if I
will, exclaimed poor Robin, I'll ride without
loan or purchase. There's old Bloom's black
nag running at large in the woods; all the
family's away to meeting, save blind Dick and
deaf aunt Sally. Come, I'll bring down
gran'father's
rusty saddle, and we'll mount and shog
off. Come, he concluded, taking Clarion by
the hand, and drawing him up from his
recumbent
position, come, Master Solomon, it's the
best thing we can do. And so Master
Solomon
seemed to think too, for he leaped up, ran
into the house, and in a trice brought forth a
dusty demipique saddle and broken bridle,
which latter he handed to Foolish Will. They
soon reached the woods together, the black nag
was speedily caparisoned, and they were on
their way to the Fond.
That was a delicious day to the soul of Sol.
Clarion. Grave joys, if I may so speak, and
pleasing sadness blended together, and steeped
him in a stream of pure delight. Nature on the
one side opened her fair page, and on the other
side sat Will Robin, a most rare and queer
commentator, turning all things into fantastic
shapes, and startling the woods and the waters
with fancies never before heard. Before Sol.,
as he sat upon a jutting rock embowered in
trees, the cheek of the sweet pond swelled with
the curve and fulness of beauty itself; kissed by
forest shadows, that here and there fell like
caresses
from the waving trees. Now and then a
stray duck started out from the shore, and flew,
like a silent thought, to an opposite quarter of
the lake; or a water-snake slipped, from its
sunny covert on the margin, back into its
native
element. Afar the meadows stretched and
swelled into gentle hills, which lay basking in
the sun, with an ox or horse now and then
stealing
quietly across the landscape. Behind them
(the Prince of Darkness must have a
foot-hold
somewhere!) Bloom's black nag is
tethered
in the bushes, munching a handful of
fresh clover.
See yonder thick-skinned philosopher!
said Will Robin, pointing to an old turtle that
had perched himself upon a rock in the middle
of the pond, I suppose he has mounted that
dry pulpit to hold forth to his watery
congregation
.
D'ye know Solomon (Master Solomon,
I mean), that I sometimes think that these
turtles
are evil spirits, that haunt ponds and
marshes
,
in the same way as bad men run up and down
the world with wicked designs. That fellow's
like a watchman in his box, that I've heard tell
of in the city, he sees everybody, but no one
(unless the great Jehovah) can see the workings
and twistings of his ugly face in his shell. I
believe that vile turtle yonder
is
Satan,
concluded
Will, his eyes gleaming with
supernatural
light, and his frame trembling with some
sudden fear suggested by the allusion, for I
saw him snap a poor sinner of a fly in his jaws;
and now see he's going to bear him down with
him to hellto hellto hell! And poor Robin
mumbled the last phrase over and over, as the
turtle glided slowly from the rock and
disappeared
.
About sunset they returned home, and
loosed the black nag in the woods from which
they had taken him.
The next morning, just after breakfast, a man
about forty-five years of age presented himself
at the door in a brown, quaker-cut coat, low
shoes, and a pair of loose, gray pantaloons, that
flaunted about his ankles. Furthermore, he had
a short nose, and a broad-brimmed hat, from
underneath
which a stiff, bristling shock of hair
spread out over his coat-collar like the tail of a
young wren.
A good morning to thee, my friends, said
this personage, through his short organ, and
a very good morning to
thee
, my young friend,
after that pleasant ride of thine on the Lord's
day, and on a stolen horse!
These latter words were more particularly
addressed to our friend Solomon, who sat on a
bench at the feet of the old people, his
grandfather
and grandmother. Clarion blushed, and
the old people turned pale at the heinous and
diaboheal enarge. They were so completely
astounded, that they sat silent.
My young friend, continued Mr. Bloom,
giving a not very amieable look at Solomon,
I'll tell thee what, I will not put thee in the
White Plains' jail this time, but I will give thee
some wholesome advice. Perhaps Sol. Clarion
would have chosen the jail rather than the
advice
;
but Friend Bloom gave him no option,
and proceeded: Abandon that crack-brain
William Robin to his fate; go to thy school
many more times than thou dost; spend thy
holydays
nearer at home; and ride not my black
mare to the Pond without my permission. He
then addressed a solemn chapter of advice and
admonition to Sol's. grandfather and
grandmother
,
and wiping the corner of his mouth with
his coat-sleeve, placidly disappeared through
the same door that introduced him to the reader.
Solomon Clarion was now fast verging
toward
manhood. In a few days, he would be
entitled
(besides a moderate sum of ready money)
to enter upon whatever right he possessed in a
small cantle of property (three or four acres,
with a house) that his mother had bequeathed
to him. An uncle of Solomon'sthis was the
present situation of the propertyhad purchased
or paid a mortgage upon it given by Mrs.
Clarion
,
and taken possession and enjoyed it ever
since her death, upon that barren title.
Possession
he still maintained, and refused to hold
any conversation with young Clarion on the
subject. A neighboring farmer, into whose
land the acres in question made an awkward
elbow, was anxious to buy Solomon's title, and
dispossess the unlawful occupant. In this
perplexity
,
Sol. thought he would have recourse to
a legal gentleman whom he had heard Will
Robin often mention. This was Lawyer
Doublet
,
a strange old man, some fourscore years
old who lived upon the road, not far from the
city of Peth: and upon him he resolved to call.
Accordingly, one morning about a week
before
his minority expired, Solomon set out, in
company with Will, for the residence of
Counsellor
Peter Doublet. In a short time, they
reached an ancient-looking stone house; and,
poor Robin knocking at the door, and inquiring
for the legal genius of the place, they were
ushered
up stairs: and here Clarion was introduced
by his friend Will to Lawyer Doublet, and was
particularly struck with his appearance. As
that venerable advocate rose and came forward
with a very graceful bow to welcome them, he
presented to Sol's. eye a well-preserved model
of mortality, with a flowing while wig, like
that in the portraits of Sir Isaac Newton,
curling
over his shoulders; a black velvet coat,
with silver buttons, and skirts stiffened with
buckram, covering a very moderate set of
limbs; a scarlet vest beneath the same; a set
of white small clothes joining black silk hose,
and shoes with huge silver buckles.
The personal history of this antique-looking
member of the bar dwelt under a haze of
considerable
obscurity. It was rumored that he
had taken an active part on the royalist side
during the revolutionary war, and now lived
upon a pension which he received from the
king's coffers. He still preserved and strictly
maintained the vesture and habits of the last
century, and obstinately refused to lay aside the
smallest tittle or thread of his dress, or to abate
a single jot of the severity of ancient manners.
In truth, he was a creature of past times. The
best part of his life had lain in the eighteenth
century, and he was, in a manner, a trespasser
upon the territory of the nineteenth. All his
thoughts and feelings dated back forty years.
He saw every object through time's telescope
inverted. The books that he read and quoted,
the cogitations that he cogitated, the opinions
he delivered, were all musty with age.
The apartment into which Clarion had been
introduced was in character with its curious
proprietor. From the windows hung old
damask
curtains, with gold-lace borders, which
permitted
a mild twilight to creep through the
room, part of which fell upon an ancient case
of books fastened against the opposite wall.
Every volume was black with years. Behind
a little low table, strown with pieces of
parchment
,
silver-hilted pens, and curious old pipes
and snuff-boxes, stood a high-backed chair with
a red leather cushion, ornamented with a pair
of raised cock-pheasants fighting a duel under
an oak-branch similarly executed, and striving
to pick each other's eyes out: a very happy
illustration
of the benefits of sprightly litigation!
When the whole party was seated, Sol.
Clarion
briefly opened his case, and stated his
strong desire to sell the land to Farmer Bull,
who had offered a fair price: mentioning at the
same time Farmer Bull's reluctance to pay a
very large sum for making and drawing the
deed, and his own unwillingness to become a
party to an ejectment suit against his uncle.
I see the remedy, Mr. Clarion, said
Lawyer
Doublet, rising under considerable
excitement
,
and pacing to and fro between his
high-backed
chair and the window; I see it, sir,
as clear as a plea in chancery with twelve
branches!
And pray what is it, if you please, sir?
asked Solomon, in breathless expectation.
Nothing less, sir, than livery of seisin!
and he looked earnestly into Clarion's face,
expecting
,
no doubt, to see it brighten with joy at
this fortunate and profound suggestion.
Will that cost much? inquired Sol.
Clarion
.
No, sir; a mere trifle. It is the cheapest,
and plainest, and wisest, and noblest, &c., &c.
process ever devised by brain of man for
conveyance
of lands!If I knew the author of it,
my young friend, I would plant his bust up
there: and you, my good old kingaddressing
himself to a bronze head of George II.,
standing
on the top of his book-caseyou would
have to tramp!`when the sage comes up, the
king goes down,' Mr. Clarion, as the Baker's
broadside of 1790 hath it.
Yes, humbly suggested Poor Will, `and
ten to one both have a cracked crown.' Your
sage addles his in attempting to stuff it too full
of reading, and your king breaks his in
attempting
to stretch it larger! and Will burst into a
hearty laugh, while Sol. Clarion smiled.
This sally, however, was not quite so well
received by Counsellor Doublet, who assumed
a portentous look of professional consequence;
and thrusting his hands into his hinder
coat-pockets
,
strided up and down the room,
rebuking
the unfortunate Robin for his audacity
in trying wits with Peter Doublet, Esquire,
counsellor, who had Touchstone at his finger's
end, and was so profoundly read in the Twelve
Tables, as to sometimes believe himself to have
been one of the framers of the same.
Will apologised humbly (Clarion aiding him),
and they relapsed into business.
I will prepare the papers that are necessary
between yourself, Mr. Clarion, and Mr. Obed
Bull, continued Counsellor Doublet, with more
gravity and weight of manner than he had at
first exhibited, and next Wednesday (I think
Tuesday is your twenty-first birthday, Mr.
Clarion
:
Clarion nodded acknowledgment), next
Wednesday morning we will ride to the
property
,
myself and you, Mr. Clarion, and Mr. Bull;
and this poor creature may go with us; perhaps
he may minister some trifling service: and there
we will deliver possession by livery of seisin
under the old law (thedI taking, if he please,
lease and release, and such modern traps and
tricks of pettifoggers).
An hour was named for the parties to
assemble
at the house of Lawyer Doublet; Clarion
and Will Robin arose to depart, and with them
rose the counsellor himself, and opening the
door, he heralded the way down stairs,
unfastened
the front-door, and, standing uncovered
upon the stone porch, he bowed twice or thrice,
and ceremoniously bade Solomon Clarion a
good daywith God's blessing!
Promptly at the appointed hour, Sol. Clarion,
on a bright bay horse, borrowed from a
neighbor
,
and Foolish Will Robin on a rough colt,
obtained in a similar manner, wheeled up to the
door of Lawyer Doublet. In a short time, the
counsellor came forth, dressed as we have
described
him, with the additional personal
ornaments
of a sword at his side, with a silver hilt,
a cocked hat, fringed with gold lace, on his
head, and a blue bag, containing his papers and
documents, under his arm. As he stepped from
the porch, a high, raw-boned steed, of a mixed
sorrel complexion, was brought up, tricked out
in an antique martingale, old double bits, a
horse-cover in the style of the revolution, and
a saddle about fifty years old. With the aid of
Foolish Will, Counsellor Doublet, having
carefully
attached the blue bag to the saddle-bows,
mounted into the broad shovel-stirrups, and
being
in a few minutes joined by Mr. Obed Bull,
in a buff coat, the party set out for the scene
of action, which was about three miles up the
road. They formed a gallant spectacle for
the dames of King street, as they galloped
along. Each moment a head was thrust out
from some shrewd post of observation, and
some new face broadened with wonder at
beholding
Counsellor Doublet riding between Bull
and Clarion, the representative and memento
of times that they had heard grandsires and old
women only speak of. The rustics in the field
paused in their labor, and leaned upon their
rakes or plough-tails to gaze with dilating eyes.
The horses turned their heads in the furrow
and stared; the oxen licked their hairy cheeks
in admiration; and it was said, with some show
of truth, that a tin pigeon, acting as
weathercock
on Farmer Barley's farm, wheeled about
on its pivot, in spite of the wind, and rolled its
painted eye-balls and shook its painted tail in
wonder and astonishment.
It was a glorious day in mid-August; serene,
tranquil, beautiful. The sky was without spot
or wrinkle of cloud on its clear, blue surface.
On each side of the road tall pear-trees stood,
swarming with rich, ripe fruit; near every house
lay an orchard, enamelled with countless
colored
apples, red, green, damask, yellow, and
white, of every kind. In one field that they
passed, half a dozen fresh-looking countrymen
were at work laying the stout grass upon the
ground, like files of proud soldiers, gay with
green feathers flaunting in the wind in the
morningat eve to be dry and withered. In a
neighboring meadow, a sportsman in a fustian
hunting-coat, and white hat, with shot-pouch,
powder-flask, and gun, was creeping along the
fence to obtain a shot at a meadow-lark sitting
on a rock in the middle of the meadow. He
steals closer and closer. In a moment, the
merry-maker of the skies will lie stretched on
the cold stone.
Peal-it! peal-it! peal-it!
is
the sound issuing from a stout throat in yonder
tree. It is the cry of a sentinel lark, and that
is his watchtower. His winged brother takes
notice, and in a twinkling curves far along the
air, beyond the reach of gun or sportsman.
Away the four horsemen gallop; Will Robin
dropping a little in the rear, to dismount and
catch a woodchuck, which was perambulating
a fence by way of exercise, after a hearty meal
of clover.
This enterprise is nipped in the bud by Sol.
Clarion's falling back with poor Robin, and
asking what he was slipping out of his saddle
for.
It's our duty, Master Sol., to look after the
belly, said Will, and I was thinking that
woo'chuck, which has nothing to do, now that
he's taken his breakfast, but to be cooked
would make a nice pie for supper when we got
home.
Foolish Will's anxiety about provender was
very soon allayed, by Clarion's announcing to
him that they expected to dine at Farmer Bull's
as they returned, and that a fat young turkey
was in preparation. Will's eye sparkled at the
savory announcement, and they speedily
regained
their places in the cavalcade.
On a scaffold in front of a weather-beaten,
yellow farm-house which they passed, a gay
party of travelling carpenters were at work.
There is something charming to the fancy in
the strolling life of these country Chips. They
ramble about pleasant villages and country
placesyour only modern Amphions and
Troubadours
singing
their cheerful catches, and
building as they sing. Half a dozen choice
journeymen cluster together, and form a merry
crew, plying the chisel and mallet in rural
neighborhoods; repairing, like these, some
time-worn
farm-house, or raising up in more bustling
parts a snug cottage, to be the harbor of happy
spirits for many blooming and fragrant years, or
like a flock of piping swallows chirping about a
breach in the roof of some venerable old church.
Now and then bandying a jest with the plump
kitchen-wench (it matters not whether she be
black or whitethey will have their joke!), or
indulging in a sly inuendo among themselves
at the expense of the blushing; young-married
couple, whose home they are finishing.
Everywhere
,
too, they are reguled with grateful
viands
healthful
breakfastshearty dinners
genial suppers; We must have something
good, says the housewife, for to-morrow the
carpenters are coming!
Shortly after they had passed this jovial
company
of workmen, they reached a small wooden
house, with a dry, dull aspect, as if it had been
pelted with all the winds and weathers of half
a century, without the defence of paint or color
of any kind. It stood upon a knoll facing the
north, and had a solitary, lonely appearance, as
they came upon it. In front was a small
court-yard
with barn-yard and poultry-yard blended
with it, and tying their horses to the rough
bar-fence that surrounded it, they all
dismounted
,
and entered a clumsy gate, which opened
into the enclosure, except Foolish Will, who,
under a direction from Counsellor Peter,
scampered
off up the road. The counsellor then
unhooked his blue bag from its place at the
saddle-bows, and hugging it under his right
arm, marched with great solemnity up to the
door of the house, accompanied by Bull in a
buff coat, and Clarion in green pantaloons.
Here he planted himself upon the steps leading
to the same, and laying down his cocked hat
and blue bag with great deliberation upon a
neighboring bench, he stood erect and surveyed
the three acres and a half of arable land to be
conveyed to Obed Bull, farmer, with monstrous
complacency and inward satisfaction. In a few
minutes, Will Robin came dashing down the
highway with great expedition, and heat, and
announced to Counsellor Doublet that none
was to be got! meaning that he could obtain
no persons to attend the important ceremonies
about to take place, as witnesses. Then off
your horse, cried out Mr. Peter Doublet in an
cestasy of authority, blow this vile tin horn!
that will make our proceedings publicand,
perhaps, answer as well! At this behest,
Foolish Will dismounted, and seizing the abject
piece of metal, sounded a dozen or two of round
blasts; and in answer, one lazy-looking young
negro was brought out of the fields (mistaking
it innocently for the dinner-blast, although it
was now only about ten in the morning), and a
limping old farmer from across the way, who
came hobbling into the yard, staring at Lawyer
Doublet as if he had been a genuine phantom
in a velvet coat, flowing wig, and white
small-clothes
.
Fortunately, there was no one in the
house, or they would have been brought down
upon the party in a twinkling by this
uproarious
summons: the barbarous uncle of Clarion
being some distance down the road, helping a
farmer get in his hay, and the lazy-looking
negro
boy alone having charge in his absence.
Now we will proceed to livery of seisin, as
settled in Madox and Craig! said Peter
Doublet
,
fumbling in his blue bag, and first, I will
read in the presence of these many good
witnesses
the warrant of attorney, whereby I am
empowered to fulfil feoffment of this house and
land. And saying this, he recited, in a good
old-man's voice, the contents of a paper which
he had disinterred from its azure sepulchre,
containing
power, authority, warrant, &c., to
convey
said house and land in the name and stead
of Solomon Clarion, of the city of Peth, to Obed
Bull, of King street; and then, drawing forth a
second paper from the same blue receptacle, he
proceeded to declare the contents thereof
describing
the tenement, with all the
appurtenances
,
standing thus and thus, and the lands
belonging to the same, running with this brook,
and under that tree, with a white flint-stone at
its extreme corner.
He then said, descending from his elevation,
Neighbors and witnesses! leave these grounds,
while I do deliver seisin and possession of the
same to worthy Obed Bull!and, after they
had retired into the road, and stood looking
over the fence at the further progress of this
interesting
ceremony, he continued, plucking up
a huge clod in his hand, Mr. Obed Bull, I do
hereby, in the name and by the authority and
attorney's warrant of Solomon Clarion, deliver
to thee seisin and possession of these lands, and
all rights thereto appertaining, as described in
the within deed.
At this precise stage of their proceedings,
Mr. Uriah Bloom, the short-nosed Quaker,
chanced that way on a rusty-gray nag, and,
wheeling up to the fence, turned about in his
saddle, with a face wonderfully full of a
magnanimous
pity, and portentous of a very speedy
discharge of comment and denunciation.
Why friend Obed Bull, said he, through
his short organ, I did not truly expect to see
thee, a man of much worldly sense and
uprightness
,
engaged in this heathenish folly, with that
old white-wigged, silly-pated tory, Peter
Doublet
!
Thou knewest better, Obed, thou
knewest
better! But I will leave thee to thine own
practices, and punishments sequent thereon!
Saying this he turned and cantered at
considerable
speed on his journey down the road. Not
more than five minutes had elapsed before the
broad-brimmed hat and short nose of the quaker
again came in view, hurrying back with an
additional
rider behind him on the rusty, gray nag.
When the face of this new actor made itself
visible, it struck considerable alarm in the bosom
of Will Robin, and Mr. Solomon Clarion. It
was the barbarous uncle. The approaching
steed, thus doubly freighted, was however
hidden
by the house from the gaze of Mr. Obed
Bull and Counsellor Doublet; which latter
worthy was proceeding with great vigor in the
process of livery of seisin.
He had again mounted the stone steps,
searched
the house to find whether it was wholly
empty, and fit for delivery, and laying his hand
upon the iron hasp of the door, exclaimed, I
do hereby, in the name, and by the warrant of
Solomon Clarion, deliver to thee, Obed Bull,
seisin and possession of this house and all unto
it that appertains! Enter into this tenement
and God give thee joy of it. At that moment
a large red rooster who had stood a long time
upon the barn-yard fence, in patient expectation
of a hearing, and who seemed inclined to
perform
the part of clerk in these services, opened
his throat and made the responses to Counsellor
Doublet, in a clear, audible voice: Mr. Obed
Bull seized the hasp, opened the door, and had
just thrust his foreleg across the threshold to
enter, when, lo! he was met full in the face by
the barbarous uncle (unlawful occupant of the
premises), with a stout oak cudgel in his hand,
who dealt the said Obed Bull, donee, &c.,
several very hearty tokens of admiration of the
conduct he had pursued in purchasing said land,
and obtaining livery of seisin as aforesaid. I'll
give your liver-a' seasoningyou lout! cried
the barbarous uncle, as he plied the flail. I'll
mark your title down in black and white! and
he dealt him a sore blow over the bridge of the
nose. By this time Mr. Obed Bull had evaded
the cudgel, and the next object that fell into the
clutches of the barbarous uncle was Peter
Doublet, Esquire, who in consequence of his
age, was not ribroasted and bastinadoed after
the fashion of Mr. Bull, but was taken by the
collar of his velvet coat, and quietly kicked
through the garden-gate into the road.
Meanwhile
Friend Bloom had found his way silently
into the front room of the tenement, and half
opening a window shutter, looked cautiously
on the scene; his short nose and broad-brimmed
hat being skilfully concealed in the shadow of
the shutter. The barbarous uncle tossed
Doublet's
gold-laced cocked hat over the fence, with
the blue bag. The Counsellor picking up the
former, and placing it upon his head, and
Foolish
Will gathering the scattered papers and
parchments and thrusting them into the latter,
the party mounted their horses (Mr. Bull with
great difficulty), and turned their heads
expeditiously
homeward. They had not travelled
far, however, in this direction, before they
slightly slackened their pace, and Mr. Peter
Doublet muttered, By the head of King George,
and the Pandects of Justinian! Mr. Clarion, I'll
have revenge and satisfaction on that scurvy
uncle of thine before the week wanes! yea
will I! and he struck his sorrel a smart blow
across the foreshoulder, I'll to the Supreme
Court of Justice at once, and attach him with a
mandamus writ of privilege! The little
lawyer
hereupon lifted his cocked hat from his head,
and, carefully shaking the dust from its border,
replaced it with an air of much dignity, in its
original position. Then turning upon Sol.
Clarion, he asked in a tone of surprise, as if it
had just crossed his mind, Why, Mr. Clarion,
didst thou not come to our rescue? being young
and strong sinewed we might have justly looked
aidment and reinforcement from thee!
To this Solomon simply replied, that,
however
much he might dislike his uncle, he was
unwilling to come to blows with his mother's
brother.
At length Foolish Will rode up to the side of
Sol. Clarion, and the conversation took a new
channel.
I'm getting tired of this region of country,
said Foolish Will, the people about here are
growing cold-hearted toward poor Will; and
poor Will's getting to be a man, sitting bolt
upright in his saddle, and must go travel and
make voyages and see a little of the world?
What say you, Master Solomon, Will Robin
leaves you to-morrow, and perhaps for ever!
At this announcement the innocent creature
shed a tear upon the mane of his rough colt,
and stretched out his left hand toward Sol.
Clarion
;
and Sol. Clarion, bringing his horse close
to his side, grasped it warmly with his own, and
said, while tears gushed to his eyes, Never!
Will, never!Though I am robbed of my rights
there's yet enough left for us both; and, Will
Robin, long as the world lasts, though all the
world else may turn you from their hearts and
hearths, there's always a warm corner for you
here! And Sol. Clarion, in the genuine
honesty
of nature, struck his hand upon his bosom.
But whither did you purpose to go, Will!
said he, mastering his emotion, and resuming
the discourse, while he looked earnestly in the
face of Foolish Will for a reply.
I thought, responded Will, I would take
the coach for New York; and see if I could find
anybody in that big city, which I've heard tell
swarms with people just like a hive in summer,
that looked like Will Robin; all the folks in
these parts despise the poor vagrant!
Why Will, replied Sol. Clarion, I'm
going
to the city myself to-morrow; will you bear
me company?
I will! I will! exclaimed that worthy,
greatly excited, and almost jumping out of his
saddle with the violence of his delight.
To-night, then, pack up our garments in the
old portmanteau; yours, Will, in one end, mine
in the other, and we'll take the stage with the
first cock that crows!
Yes! said Will, still in an ecstasy of
enjoyment
at the brilliant prospect of travel, and
I'll go to York in a new dress; something
fine. I guess it will astonish the natives.
Hereupon Will discharged a heavy peal of
laughter, and at that moment they found
themselves
in the renowned city of Peth, at the door
of Sol. Clarion's home; those twin martyrs,
Mr. Bull and Counsellor Doublet, having in
the meantime galloped down the road and out
of sight.
The next morning Will Robin was awake
with the dawn; and the sun had no sooner
exhibited
his jolly face from his eastern
tipplingshop
,
than Will Robin's corresponding feature
shone through the portals of Sol. Clarion's
dwelling, upon the whole subjacent region.
Will was all smiles and complacency; bustling
from spot to spot; now taking up the
dinnerhorn
and blowing an idle blast and laying it
down again; and now dashing into the house
to obtain some trifling commodity, and again
bursting through the door into the open air, to
stuff it into the capacious portmanteau. At the
hour when the stage arrived Foolish Will
presented
himself as a passenger, tricked out in a
short brown coat, with something of the
quaker
lurking about the collar, though it had
altogether
fled from the skirts, which were
swallow-tailed
;
close homespun pantaloons; a
monstrous
pair of jack-boots, borrowed from Sol.
Clarion's grandfather, and, upon his head, a
sugar-loaf, white felt hat, picked up in some
random pilgrimage to the garret of Counsellor
Doublet. Sol. Clarion, who lingered behind
Will Robin, having affectionately parted with
his grand-parents, and received God-speed, came
forth modestly attired in a plain, country-made,
black hat, a dark-blue coat with metal buttons,
and other parts of dress to correspond. They
both took up their position on a high back seat,
outside, which overlooked the whole vehicle,
turned their faces for a last look at the old
homestead, the driver cracked his whip, the
stage whirled off, and in a moment the city of
Peth, and all that it held, was lost from their
gaze.
They had not travelled far down the turnpike
before a new and unexpected object arrested
their progress. This was nothing less than that
learned and sagacious legal authority, Peter
Doublet, clad in his black-velvet coat, white
small-clothes, and gold-laced cocked hat, with
his sword at his side, three or four musty
volumes
under one arm, and under the other the
portentous blue bag, with an appearance of
unusual
rotundity and repletion. Sol. Clarion was
not a little surprised at this apparition, at this
peculiar time, particularly as Mr. Doublet
exclaimed
to the driver, I will take a seat, sir,
with my friends on the outside; more especially
as I shall need their services when I get into
town, and wish, therefore, to keep my eye upon
them! Saying this, he passed his three or four
dull looking volumes and well stuffed blue bag
up to Will, and very speedily mounted after
them, into the third seat in the rear.
How is this, Counsellor Doublet? asked
Sol. Clarion, shaking him by the hand, as the
mail-stage again started off. Whither are
you travelling, Mr. Doublet, if I may put so
bold a question?
I am travelling, Mr. Clarion, replied the
counsellor, solemnly, in quest of my lost
professional
honor. Yesterday morning I had it
this morning I awoke, and where was it? Where
was it? he asked again, lifting his voice as if
addressing a jury. You ask me, sir, whither
I travel. I journey to the city of New York to
obtain a mandamus writ of privilege as an
officer
of the court! With this answer to
Clarion's
interrogatory, Lawyer Doublet sunk into
a dignified silence, which was steadily preserved
for almost the entire remainder of the journey.
Onward the stage-coach rolled, here disgorging
a heavy leather bag, filled with letters, like the
moon, that planetary night-coach, discharging
acreolites, pleasant missives of her goddesship;
there taking up a chance passenger, and again
rumbling on its way for miles without pause or
diversion, unless the hurling of a brown-paper
parcel, or some other slight token from friends up
the road, like a bomb, into an open door or
window
be so considered. In this way they rolled
down into the pleasant village of Rye, and
through that Huguenot stronghold, New
Rochelle
,
taking a bird's-eye view of Mamaroneck,
Pelham, and sundry other towns and townlets,
as they glanced along.
Ever and anon Will Robin enlivened the
journey
by carolling forth fragments of rare and
reverend ditties, such as As I walked forth on
a morning in the month of May, or imparting
to his selections an air of greater
sententiousness
and profundity, as in the following scrap
of shrewd rhyme:
A man of words and not of deeds,
Is like a garden full of weeds;
And when the weeds begin to grow,
He's like a garden full of snow, &c.
At Eastchester, a spruce, spare man, in a fur
cap, with a large white cauliflower stuck in the
button-hole of a purple frock-coat, and a
slate-colored
game-cock under his left arm, came
forth. There was something peculiarly queer
and quizzical about this person's nose and
mouth; a playful smile that rippled about the
corners of the latter feature, like a rivulet with
the sun shining on its surface, and a red glow
hovering over the tip of the former, which
seemed
to be the humorous smile lingering above its
birthplace before it disappeared from the odd
little countenance for ever.
The spruce spare man was a new passenger,
who, seeing the single vacancy in the high
outside
occupied by Doublet, Clarion, and Will,
said, I'll take that seat, driver, as I'd like to
make an observation or two on nature as we
go along. P'r'aps, gentlemen, turning to the
worthy trio, it'll not be inconvenient to have
some pleasant conversation on natural
wonders
and such like, as we travel. Besides, young
Joseph, affectionately ogling his game-cock
with one eye, and a brace of young ladies with
in the stage-coach with the other, as he
mounted
into his seat, might be inclined to play the
physician inside there, and draw blood from
the hands of those fair creatures without being
reg'larly called in!
At this sally the indescribable smile kindled
about the mouth of the spruce passengerthe
corresponding glow lit up the extremity of his
nose, and, patting the slate-colored creature
under
his arm kindly on his crest, he sat for a
moment intensely silent.
Gentlemen, said he, warming into a fine
flow of talk as the stage-coach rattled on, the
sooner we're known to each other the better.
My name, bowing at each branch of the
announcement
to one of the King street travellers,
my name is PaulHyaenaPatchell; but
you'll oblige me when you call upon mefor I
intend to invite you all to my house before we
partby inquiring for P. Hyaena Patchell. I
prefer that style, as you'll perceive it's more
ferocious, and better suited for the keeper of a
wild-beast show, and the greatest collection of
natural wonders now extant in the four
quarters
!
I have been, continued the smart
showman
,
scouring the country for a five-legged
calf, to complete my collection; or a cow, with
the horns growing upon her flanks. Confound
the stupid creatures! they put me out. I couldn't
as much as find one with even a moderate
swelling
to pass for a dromedary. Nevertheless I've
met with a little success, brushing down the
feathers of young Joseph cautiously,
gentlemen
,
I've picked up a game-cock with a face just
like General Jackson. See! holding up the
slate-colored bird, every line's distincthere's
the warlike nose, the warrior eye, and, at this
moment one of the legs of the interesting
creature
slipped from his hand, and dashed two thirds
of a spur into the smart showman's wrist, who
exclaimed, smiling faintly, by the Bengal lion,
the general has just drawn his sword! The
conversation of the showman had been sustained
in so high a pitch of voice as to be generally
overheard, and a loud roar of laughter shook the
mail-stage as he uttered this last remark.
Can you tell me, sir, as you seem to be
summ'at
of a philosopher, why horses aren't born
asses? asked Foolish Will, of the smart
showman
.
On the latter gentleman's expressing a
doubt of his ability to accommodate Mr. Robin
with an answer, Will replied, It's mainly, sir,
for the want of ears! And the smart
showman
fell into a thoughtful silence of several
minutes' duration.
They were now rattling over Harlaem bridge.
The smart showman had again opened the
floodgate
of discourse, and a vast deal of good
conversation
passed between him and Will Robin
on the subject of natural wonders; a mermaid,
with bowels of straw, belonging to him, that had
been burnt out one night by an accidental
spark falling upon her tail; a famous Bengal
lion, in his show, with the finest mouth of any
animal of that species in christendom; all of
which closed with the observation that he
thought that the arrival of the general would
create a great excitement in town, and a
fervent
invitation to Will and his friend Mr.
Clarion
,
to call at 9 1-4 Bowery, and see his
collection
.
Meantime, Clarion and Doublet were silent,
until they came opposite. Gallows hill, where
an execution was taking place at that very time,
and as Doublet beheld the poor victim dangling
in the last agonies, he exclaimedMy God!
what sight is yonder!A man by the neck! If
man, continued the counsellor, after a
thoughtful
pauseif man were a poor dried pear or
salted flitch of bacon, it would beseem well
enough. It is bad enough to hang wolves and
weasels, and other carrion. What a contempt
must I have for my humanity, my young sir,
when I see a part of it strung up yonder like a
bunch of foul garlic or hetchelled flax! These
observations on the part of Mr. Doublet were
very sensible and true-spirited, and if he had
ended there he would have deserved the name
of a sober and thinking man, but in a moment
he added, Would to heaven! Mr. Clarion, our
law-makers might re-establish the noble trial by
combat! The erudition of the smart showman
was here sadly at fault, and he was obliged to
put two or three questions as to the character
of this process, to Sol. Clarion, who replied that
it was a method of settling murders (he
believed
)
wherein the party accused of the
homicide
fell pell-mell, with bare fists, case-knife or
other convenient weapon, upon the next of kin
to the deceased, and the next of kin fell
pell-mell
in a similar manner upon the party accused,
and they belabored and thrust at each other
until
one or the other's business accounts with
this world were finally closed up and legered,
and the party thus disposed of was held to have
been altogether in the wrong; and thus, you
see, concluded Solomon, the whole matter
was settled without the expense of rope, judge,
or jury; sheriff, gallows-tree, or new breeches
and bonnet to see the hanging in: the surviving
combatant was fully satisfied, and the dead man
never walked the earth at unseasonable hours!
By the time this judicious explanation was
ended the coach had halted opposite a pleasant
yellow house, with a slim, round cupola stuck
on its roof, like a high-crowned Dutch hat, and
a back-door, with a portico looking out into a
cheerful graveyard. I think this is the house,
said Sol. Clarion to the driver, and a meager
friend of the driver's jumped from the box,
knocked at the door, and inquired if Dr.
Nicholus
Grim lived there. At this, a pretty,
blushing
face was thrust out of a second-story
window
,
smiled softly at Solomon, and replied that
he did, and disappeared in great haste. Sol.
Clarion and Will Robin now dismounted, the
former urging Counsellor Doublet to join them,
who steadily refused, saying he must look after
his mandamus at once; the smart showman
bowed and smirked, and set his slate-colored
game-cock a-crowingthe driver cracked his
whip over the ear of his near leader, and the
stage-coach whirled away. In a moment, the
door of the yellow house opened, and a healthy,
fat man, in a suit of black broadcloth,
projected
himself headlong almost into the arms of
Sol. Clarion, exclaiming, My dear Sol., is this
you? I am heartily glad to see you! This is
better than a new patient, or even a
consultation
at the rich widow's. Why Sol., my dear
fellow! shaking him by the hand again at
arms' length, you look palea little fever,
occasioned by riding in the wind. Come in!
come in! putting one arm about his waist,
and motioning toward the door, oh! here's
your cousin Grace! At this, the proprietor
of the pretty blushing face that was thrust out
of the second-story window came forward from
behind a white pocket-handkerchief, and
extended
her hand to Sol. Clarion, who received
it with a similar demonstration, exclaiming, as
he gave it a gentle pressure, Ah! Grace, you
didn't visit poor Peth this year!
And she, smiling archly upon Mr. Clarion,
replied, Oh! Sol., I am glad I did not; for I
imagine it has brought you down! Then
streaks of crimson and deep red flushed all over
her neek and brow, as if she thought she had
said more than it was proper for a maiden to
disclose, and at the first opportunity she glided
silently away, leaving the discourse with Dr.
Nicholas Grim and his worthy nephew.
Six short months had rolled around from this
period, and Sol. Clarion was domiciliated with
his good-hearted uncletaking the place and
fulfilling the duties of an apothecary, who had
been his uncle's former assistant, and who had
unfortunately died of the fumes of a new pill
he was on the eye of discovering only a week
before Sol. Clarion's arrival. Sol's. journey
had been undertaken in consequence of a letter
from Dr. Nicholas, warmly tendering the
situation
;
and Sol. Clarion had accepted it, on
condition
that he should be allowed to bring
Foolish
Will with him, to serve prescriptions, use
the pestle and mortar, and perform other simple
services of a similar nature. Six pleasant
months have slipped from the calendar, and
now it becomes our duty, however painful, as
faithful chroniclers, to open a strange and
singular
chapter in the history of the generous son
of sculapius in whose house our adventurer
has found a cheerful home.
THE VISION OF DR. NICHOLAS
GRIM.
CONTAINING THE CONCLUSION OF THE
ADVENTURES
OF SOL. CLARION.
Titty and Tiffin, Suckin
And Pidgen, Liard and Robin!
White spirits, black spirits, gray spirits, red spirits,
Devil-toad, devil-ram, devil-cat, and devil-dam,
Why Hoppo and Stadlin, Hellwain and Packle!
The Witch
:
a Tragi-comedy, by Thos. Middleton
.
The
pleasant yellow house of Dr. Nicholas
Grim, with its slim, round cupola, stood in the
skirts of the city. It was surrounded by a
grassy door-yard, with a carriage-gate opening
into the road on one side, another gate leading
into a well-stocked garden in the rear, and a
third facing the northeast, giving access to an
orchard which had been transformed into a place
of burial. The dwelling, with its appurtenances,
had formerly belonged to a dry old curmudgeon,
who had sold the fruit-ground in question, for a
handsome consideration, to an undertaker
reserving
to himself, his heirs and devisees, a
privilege through the orchard-gate. The study
of Dr. Nicholas Grim looked directly forth upon
this graveyard; and recollecting that not a few
of his own patients were slumbering there, it is
singular that the worthy practitioner had not
chosen some other quarter of the building for
his own use. Contemplating those little green
hillocks, and those peculiar, square-cut stones,
unpleasant thoughts might arise in the bosom
of Dr. Grim; particularly as it was hinted that
the patients of Dr. Grim were allowed to enjoy
the pleasure of that worthy Galen's
acquaintance
but a very short time after it was formed,
and after he had administered his first
prescription
,
and were forced by some urgent necessity
to bid him an eternal farewell, and take their
departure, post-haste, for another world.
The truth is, that Dr. Nicholas, as
fine-hearted
and jovial a man as ever lived, was
regarded
by some people as an arrant quack and
pretender. However this might be, Dr. Grim
was, and boasted himself to be, the discoverer
of that invaluable catholicon, The Patent
Pioneer Pill. The ingenious inventor of
this wonderful medicine never asserted that it
could raise a man from the dead, by being
administered
to his corpse nine weeks after burial,
nor that the cause of Methuselah's
extraordinary
longevity was the fact of his having taken
a handful of the Patent Pioneer Pills in his
coffee every morning at breakfast. But Dr.
Nicholas Grim
did
profess that this astonishing
pill could cure every shade and variety of
disease
;
and that, in effecting a cure, it had a mode
of operation peculiar to itself.
The Patent Pioneer Pill, said the doctor
one day to Sol. Clarion, with a grave and
solemn
face, in explanation of its properties,
descends
into the stomach like an ordinary,
medical
prescription or dose: when there, acted upon
by the gastric juice, it loses its original shape
and character, and becomes metamorphosed
into a small apothecary, with a hard, granite
complexionthat being, as you know, the
original
color of the bolusand a lilliputian medical
scalpel or shovel in his hand. Armed with this
instrument, the little apothecary casts about the
stomach to discover any impurities or
obstructions
that may there exist, and at once sets about
removing them with said scalpel or shovel into
the great duct or caual, the rectum, which,
acting like a sewer, carries them off. After
having thus cleansed the grand chamber of the
human body, continued Dr. Nicholas Grim,
the pill-apothecary commences travelling up
the different alleys and by-ways of the system,
fulfilling the part of a philanthropic reformer
wherever he travelsapplying suitable
remedies
while on the spot (you see the advantages
of this mode of practice, Solomon!) to scrofula,
apoplexy, plethora, emaciation, dropsy,
consumption
,
rheumatism, and every other
conceivable
malady.So that by administering this
renowned pill, concluded Dr. Grim, we in
fact despatch a pocket-physician, as it were, a
kind of deputy where we are unable to attend
in personhere I must confess something of a
sly smile crept over the features of the
celebrated
inventoron a tour of scientific
investigation
through the human constitutiona
miniature
,
medical Hercules, to knock in the head
any monster of a malady that dares to show
itself
.
It was the proudest day of my life when
I discovered the ingredients of the Patent
Pioneer
Pill!
What was most singular, notwithstanding the
doctor's lucid and philosophical exposition of
the character and operation of the Patent
Pioneer
Plll, its reception into the human stomach
was, in nineteen cases out of twenty, followed,
as I have before suggested, by the speedy
transfer
of the recipient from his own snug fireside,
and comfortable suit of broadcloth or homespun,
to a cold basement, without windows, under
ground, and a disagreeable mahogany or cherry
overcoat, furnished by that tailor to the corpse,
a sexton. In other words, a large majority
of the patients of Dr. Nicholas Grim died upon
his hands: so that his little apothecary with the
granite complexion, who travelled interior, must,
as Sol. Clarion insinuated, have very often lost
his way!
Now opens that strange chapter in the
history
of the doctor to which we have referred.
It was a pleasant, tranquil afternoon in the
latter part of July. Over all the region within
view of the white round cupola of Dr. Grim, an
unbroken silence hung. Within the house,
there was perfect calm; Sol. Clarion and Grace
Grim were gone to the city in the doctor's gig,
and their laughing dialogue and cheerful tread
were not heard as was wont. Will Robin was
out rambling along the river, practising that
merry device of his, of catching shrimps with
a shot-bag. Without, whatever there was of
life, by its motionless silence, added to the
perfect
quiet of the scene. In his stable stood a
plump, sleek, bay-colored nag, quietly whisking
his tail; while a mouse, noiseless as a
Pythagorean
disciple in the first years of his pupilage,
was foraging about the edge of the door on a
few oat-grains that had fallen from an
over-stocked
bin above. A mottled cat, in glossy
condition, sat couchant upon the half-opened
stable-door, looking down with an air of sleepy
indifference upon the careful little plunderer.
In the door-yard the grass waved slowly, swayed
by the lazy wind that just buoyed a thistle-down
in the air, and prevented its falling too swiftly
to the earth. At a little distance from the
house might be heard the feeble tinkling of a
brook, that earned its channel through the hard
soil by slight but steady labor. The sun was
just disappearing in the west, and Dr. Nicholas
Grim sat in his leather-backed arm-chair, in his
study, with his feet resting upon a stool covered
with a soft cushion of lamb's wool, indulging in
the after-dinner revery of a corpulent man. As
the sun's last ray came in at the window, it east
the shadow of the doctor's enormous bulk upon
the opposite wall, where it assumed a new and
fantastic appearance every moment, as the
angle
at which the sunlight entered the apartment
varied. Now, his protuberant paunch was
thrown into bold relief, like the moon thrusting
its portly front forth from a partial eclipse;
now, as one side of the coat was brought into
the picture, resembling a huge ship of war with
her fore-sail spread; now the broad,
good-natured
countenance of the doctor was caricatured
into a lion's head, or again into a long, thin,
grotesque human face. Dusk crept in, and gave
new touches to the picturefilling the room
with odd shadows, and travestying the
appearance
and character of every object: a slim,
wide-lipped vial, casting from the shelf upon
the floor the likeness of a prim, tall Quaker,
with a broad-brimmed hat; a little gallipot
assuming
upon the wall the counterfeit
presentment
of an oily Dutchman with a peaked nose,
while said nose was, or seemed to be, fastened
upon by the shadowy fingers of a pair of
tweezers, hung up by a string. In the centre
of the apartment stood a stout, circular stand,
from which a number of long-necked bottles,
filled with medical preparations, towered up,
surrounded by a swarm of small vials and
pillboxes
flanked
with a bowl of jelly, near which
a chubby watch, with a heavy gold chain and
seals, lay, and indolently ticked the time. In
another quarter stood an old-fashioned
book-case
,
over the top of which a plaster-of-Paris
Galen and sculapius exhibited their dusty
faces. The windows were hung with heavy
curtains, and every other appointment of the
room denoted competency and comfort. Not
many minutes after the twilight had become
tinged with the deeper colors of advancing
night, a tread was heard in the halla muffled
knock at the door: and as Dr. Grim exclaimed,
Come in! the door opened slowly, a large
man in stout boots, with a round-topped
country
hat, entered, and bowing with a smile, glided
across the room without any of the noise which
might be expected to accompany the motion of
so heavy a body, and silently took his station
in an extreme corner, with his face-turned
toward
Dr. Nicholas. The doctor recognised in
this mysterious personage one of his own
patients
,
and would have taken him kindly by the
hand, had he not remembered that he had buried
him about twelve months before.
A second muffled knock was heard at the
door; and a bold-faced man, in green
spectacles
,
another patient of Dr. Grim's, entered,
crossed the apartment, and took his station
quietly beside the first. Again the ominous
sound was repeated, and a man with an oval
face joined the others. This third apparition
left the door standing ajar; the mysterious,
muffled
knock was heard no more; but there glided
in, without notice or warning, a stream of some
dozen or twenty ghost-like personages, in each
one of whom Dr. Grim, who was rapidly turning
into a vast petrifaction, discovered some recent
patient that had been shot down by that fatal
ball, the Patent Pioneer Pill. Among others,
he recognised a dapper bank-clerk, who had
signalized himself by having outlived double
the number of that celebrated preparation of
any person on record; andhorrid spectacle!
John Simple, his late apothecary. What might
be the purpose of this singular and voluntary
visit, Dr. Nicholas Grim had not sufficient
sagacity
to conjecture. In a short time, however,
the bank-clerk and the apothecary laid their
ghostly heads together, and after a few minutes'
consultation, the bank-clerk drew from his
pocket
a scroll of paper, and pondered over it about
a second: the spare apothecary bustled about
among the shadowy assembly, and, at a nod
from the bank-clerk, the impudent man in green
spectacles advanced from the throng.
I commend these to thee as fresh! said the
impudent man, seizing Dr. Nicholas by the nose
with one hand, and opening his mouth, and
thrusting down the contents of a large pill-box
with the other. The impudent man then
adjusted
his green spectacles and fell back into
his place.
The nod of the bank-clerk was repeated: and a
personage built like a junk bottle, having a small
head and long neck, with a stout round body
and square shoulders, came forward and
subjected
the worthy physician to the identical
operation of the impudent man in green
glasses
,
and retired.
Next a doughty brewer with an immense fist
stalked forth, and crushing the pill-box with
which he was furnished between two fingers,
he filled his huge palm with its contents, and
poured them, with an asseveration, down the
doctor's throat, as if he was using a
barley-scoop
.
This must be dry work, said the first
apparition
that had entered, the large man in
stout boots, and drawing from his side
coat-pocket
a bottle of paregoric, he thrust the neck
into the mouth of Dr. Grim (who began to make
awful contortions of face), and, giving the
bottle
a smart jerk, discharged the whole of the
fluid into his stomach.
I think I'll bag the balls this time! said
the fourth operator, who had been a noted
billiard-player
,
shooting the contents of an
enormous
box into the open mouth of Dr. Grim.
And I'll charge home! said a fifth
patient
,
formerly an artillery-man, stepping out as
the billiard-player drew back, placing the
contents
of a similar box upon the tongue of the
inventor of the Patent Pioneer Pill, and forcing
them with his fingers down the overcharged
throat of the doctor.
What if I throw all the balls at once! said
a sixth, the keeper, in his lifetime, of a
ninepin
alley, and he bowled a handful of pills by
main force into the distended features of the
terrified Dr. Grim.
Then a modest little man came forward, and,
like the stout countryman, moistened this dry
provender with a second infusion of fluid from a
bottle which he produced.
At length the bank-clerk ceased giving nods,
thrust his scroll into his pocket, and came
forward
himself, his skirts stuffed out to an almost
horizontal position by the materials that were
crammed into them.
There's nothing like the Pioneer Pill, Dr.
Grim! said he, with a horrid smirk upon his
countenance, drawing from his pocket another
of the awful chip boxes, which disappeared in
a trice between the jaws of Dr. Nicholas: a
second from the same source soon followed it;
a third, a fourth, a fifth. At length, even the
inexhaustible pockets of the bank-clerk were
exhausted, and he turned to the apothecary for
a fresh supplyand that worthy handed over to
him some dozen boxes more; the last two or
three stuck in the throat of the doctor, and the
bank-clerk was obliged to give him a smart
punch in the bowels to open his larynx. The
bank-clerk now, with large drops of sweat on
his pale brow, drew back, and John Simple
advanced
,
with a grave, doctorial air, to take his
place.
Baring the arm of Dr. Grim, he took him
deliberately
by the wrist with thumb and finger,
and gently feeling his pulse, said, Dr.
Nicholas
,
you appear to have something of a fever;
your face is flushed, too, and there appears to
be a slight flutter in the region of the heart. I
am afraid you are suffering from repletion;
have you any nausea? To this question Dr.
Grim involuntarily shook his head, and Mr.
John Simple proceeded: I think we had better
send down a box or two of our Patent Pioneer
Pills; perhaps the little apothecary with his
shovel may remove the obstruction or
impurity
.
There was a gentle laugh among the
assembled
apparitions, and the same lively process of
administering pills was carried into effect as
the bank-clerk had practised, the latter
gentleman
taking the position formerly occupied by
Mr. Simple, and handing out innumerable boxes
from some invisible reservoir.
As box after box followed each other rapidly
into the capacious stomach of Dr. Grim, he
might have thought, if thought was permitted
to his awe-stricken mind, What the devil! it
can't be that that rascally apothecary, John
Simple, is preparing the Patent Pioneer Pill,
from my recipe in the other placefor
exportation
?
Each one of the shadowy party had now
administered
in turn to the terrified Grim; and
yet they seemed to think that the course was
not quite complete: for, huddling about the
stand in the centre of the room, each one seized
upon vial, powder-paper, or long-necked
bottle
,
C
and despatched its contents after the drugs
and fluids that had already travelled down the
free highway of Dr. Grim's throat. The bowl
of calves'-feet jelly was, however, quaffed off
at a draught by the doughty brewer himself.
The apothecary, casting his eye upon the
fat-faced
watch, exclaimed, Our time is up!
and, resuming their places, they glided out of
the apartment in the same order and with the
same silent tread as they had entered.
In a few minutes, Foolish Will came in from
practising his ingenious exploit by the river,
and advancing cautiously into the study of Dr.
Grim, he discovered that worthy practitioner
with his feet spread out upon the floor, his
hands clinging fast to the arms of his chair, and
his face going through a series of singular and
rapid changes, to which the rollicking motion
of his whole body seemed to lend variety and
vigor. Will Robin, as might be reasonably
expected, thought that the doctor was playing
off his countenance in a sportive way upon
him; and unwilling to be outdone in so capital
a diversion, he drew up a chair directly
opposite
Dr. Grim, and planting himself upon its
edge, placed his hands upon his knees, and
commenced reciprocating faces with that
corpulent
gentleman.
Some of the doctor's exhibitions were,
however
,
so entirely original and astonishing, that
they put at defiance Will Robin's herculean
efforts to rival them; and the doctor rolled his
eyeballs in a manner so picturesque and
expressive
,
as to render every attempt to imitate
their movements utterly fruitless. To these
numerous and inimitable divertisements, the
doctor now began to add certain indescribable
motions of the handswaving them in repid
curves toward the doorjoining them
significantly
upon his stomachand again
brandishing
both, first toward Will Robin, and then
toward the hall. As they sat thus
contemplating
each other, and as Will began to suspect
something more than amusement lay at the
bottom
of the matter, Sol. Clarion entered, with
his gig-whip in his hand, to greet the doctor,
and communicate the result of his city visit as
to certain small messages that had been
intrusted
to him by Dr. Grim. As he drew near, he
discovered that something had gone wrong with
the doctor in his absence; and instinctively
seizing his pulse, and finding it to beat at an
unusual rate, he begged the doctor to speak.
But the doctor was silent as a stone.
For God's sake! exclaimed Grace Grim,
rushing into the room at that moment, from a
brief conversation with Will Robin in the hall,
for God's sake, what is the matter with my
father?
Dr. Grim smiled upon her faintly, but made
no answer. He was carried to his bed, and
there he lay sick for about two weeks,
articulating
not a word distinctly during that time,
but mumbling over, sometimes to himself,
sometimes
aloud, broken phrases, from which the
foregoing narrative was gathered. At the end
of the time, he died in an apoplectic fit, which
seized him about midday. The third day after,
he was buried, and the warm tears of two
affectionate
and simple mourners, at least, wet the
sod upon his grave.
And yet the world remains, although those
whom we love and reverence are buried from
sight, and life must go on in its old courses after
it has leaped the temporary obstructionthe
pebble in its channel.
Obeying this wise, though seemingly selfish
instinct, some twelve months after the death of
Dr. Nicholas Grim, two fair beings in the youth
of life stood up hand in hand, and before them
a reverend man in sable garments likewise
stood, and he pronounced before them a solemn
form of words, andthey were man and wife.
A week or two after his marriage with Grace
Grim, Sol. Clarion received the following
epistle
by the hand of a country neighbor from the
city of Peth; and as he perused it, he thought
he heard each line ring with the peculiar nasal
twang of its author:
Greenwich
, Conn.,
6th Month, 2d Day
, 18.
Friend Solomon:
It
grieveth me much to communicate by this,
tidings that thine uncle is deceased. He
departed
this life on first day morning, of a malignant
fever, as I am informed by Dr. Slanter, who
attended
him during his last sickness. His
malady
wrought much change in thine uncle's
looks, as I can state from personal observance,
having inspected them with great care
immediately
after his lamented decease. The funeral
takes place third day morning, but too early
for thee to come up; thou hadst better not
undertake
the journey, as it may overweary thee,
thou being of a feeble constitution (as I know),
from a boy. Thine uncle hath left no heir, as
thou knowest he was never in wedlock;
consequently
thou art his successor in the
homestead
,
and whatsoever cash, moveables, and
stock, he hath left. I would advise thee to
plough the meadow behind the house, and to
sow timothy in the blue grass meadow. The
garden needs to be looked after, and the
fruit-trees
,
as they are at present well-stocked, should
be thinned out. Perhaps I had better use the
kitchen herbs and early apples for my own
family use, until thou comest hither. My spouse
Deborah says they make exceeding good pies.
Zekiel can pluck them, and it will be no great
trouble; if it be, a small commission will make
all right between me and thee. Zekiel proposes
to gather the vegetables and fruit for us in
consideration
of thy letting him have a little of the
live stock; a pair or two of the fowls, and a
well-looking calf that is just cast by the spotted
cow. I regret to add that Gideon Barley's fine
red heifer hath strained her off shoulder, and he
may lose the crittur. I recommended salt and
water for the animal; whether Gideon will use
it yet is not decided. The old people are well
and ask the stagedriver daily (as I have
observed
from the kitchen window) questions
concerning
thy welfare. I would bring this news
to thee in person, and be enabled to satisfy thy
grandfather and grandmother touching thy
progress
and behavior in the Babylon where thou
art, but there is much ploughing to be done, and
I am deprived of Zephaniah's aid, he being sore
of a foot with a seythe wound. Leonard hath
gone over to tend the mill for Miller Kirby, and
Zekiel will be busy running to and fro betwixt
us and thy garden and orchard. Advising thee
to keep from the snares that beset the feet of
youth in the ungodly city, and recommending
thee to pay thy tailor's bill, and avoid the night
air:
Thine,
Uriah Bloom
.
It is thought that Doublet, the old-fangled
tory lawyer, will not last the summer out. I
have called upon him a score or so of times in a
neighborly way, and do verily believe that the
old man hath lost his wits, for he ceases not to
cry out for one Mand Hamus, a king's counsel
I judge, from such words as he delivers with the
name. However on this point I will inform
thee further in a short time, as I intend to watch
with him to-night, to see what further hints he
may drop in his fever, touching this and other
matters.
U. B.
Happening a short time after this in the
neighborhood of 9 Bowery, Sol. Clarion's eye
was attracted by a gorgeous painting, exhibiting
a great variety of monsters in fanciful colors,
and observing the words, Wonderful Wild
Beast Exhibition, he stepped in and asked for
the proprietor, Mr. P. Hyaena Patchell. But
Mr. Patchell came not forth. In answer to his
inquiry, he learned that the smart showman had
had his head bitten off by the famous Bengal
lion, in an attempt to investigate the lungs and
bronchia of that interesting animal, for the
amusement of a very pleasant assemblage of
apprentices, maid servants, children under
thirteen
at half price, and a musty medical
gentleman
,
who was very curious to learn the
physiological
effect of a full grown man's placing his
cranium within the jaws of a Bengal lion in
robust health.
Counsellor Doublet, he ascertained, had
bustled
about the clerks' offices for a day or two, and
been laughed at by all the clerks and scriveners
in the same; was told the supreme court no
longer granted the writ of privilegeand
returned
to the country and took to his bed.
By the next mail after that which brought the
epistle of Friend Bloom, he learned that the little
lawyer had died over night, demanding a
mandamus
writ of privilege! in a voice of
authority
;
and threatening an appeal to parliament
if it were not granted!
THE MELANCHOLY VAGABOND,
It
was a clear October morning. The hum
of the city was just beginning to swell into a
distinct sound; the sun, like a cheerful face
smiling from amid doubt and adversity, was
pushing aside the clouds in the east, and
exhibiting
his broad, rubicund features in full glow
and freshness; sloops, here and there, and other
trim vessels were starting out from the shore,
and gliding up or down the river; and in the
middle of the stream two men occupied a
weather-beaten
,
red fishing-boat, motionless and
silent. One of them sat in the stern with his
hands clenched upon his knees, and a wo-begone
expression of countenance; and the other
occupied
the middle seat with an oar in each hand
dipping in the water.
The first had a dry, shrivelled face, was short
of stature, and was attired in a tattered gray
overcoat, stretching from chin to heel, with a
woollen cap, fashioned very much like a
nightcap
,
on his head. The second was a round,
beef-fed personage, built like a duck, with an
immense bill and corresponding mouth, and
amply filled every inch of his garments with his
person. He was clad in a long-tailed
clay-colored
coat, mud-colored vest, colorless pair of
breeches, and dusty hat.
Don't you feel any sort of a freshness from
the morning air, Neddy? asked the
duck-featured
gentleman, pulling a stroke or two down
the river.
No, none at all, no how; there's something
here, Nosey, laying his right hand upon his
heart, a dead sickness I'm afeard that breeze
nor physicianer can cure! He then heaved a
sigh, and joining his hands together again,
exclaimed
in a still more pathetic voice, Ah!
you knows not, Nosey Bellows, tho' you be's a
father, what it is to have a ungrateful dau'ter!
To have a girl what marries throw herself away
against her daddy's will.
Per'aps we'd better pull for the fishing
ground, Neddy, said the duck-faced man, the
sight of the cheerful porgies comin' up on the
hook may sort o' revive you, and make you
forget your suff'rin's. A bit of nature now and
then is very pleasant to the spirits! Come,
concluded the duck-faced man, we'll try a
stroke for the island!what say you, Neddy
Budge?
Neddy Budge can't go, Nosey, no how;
you'd better pull to shore and land me, for
somehow
or other I always feel more melancholy on
water. So I'll turn rudder, giving the tiller
a turn feebly, and go ashore and take a stroll
along the banks!
Well, if you will, you will! said Mr.
Bellows
,
drawing his oars smartly through the
water, and the red boat shot swiftly toward
land. In a few minutes they struck the shore,
Budge jumped out, and Bellows turning again
scudded down the river, took in another friend
of his, and pointed prow for Governor's island.
The history of Neddy Budge up to this period
was simply this. He had opened life as a
constable
in a fifty-dollar court. From his humble
position on the floor of a court-room, clearing
the bar and bawling to order! he had, one
lucky day, by a sudden change of parties and
favor with political leaders, found his way to
the justice's seat, and there he presided for
many years a legal dark-lantern, by whose
uncertain
and wavering light many an unfortunate
plaintiff or defendant was plunged into a pit of
costs. Again the wheel of fortune turned.
Again he handled the marshal's truncheon for
a time; but even that simple staff of authority
was wrested from his hand, and he became an
idle hanger-on upon the court, without business
or profit, until the sweeper of the court-room
died, and then, in consideration of his former
luminous services on the bench, Neddy Budge
was inducted into that modest office. He soon
became a poor devil, and slipping rapidly through
those nice gradations which are known only
in low life, he settled into the character in
which he has appeared before the reader, namely
that of a vagabond fisherman.
After Neddy Budge had abandoned Bellows
and his boat, he directed his steps along the
shore indulging, as he walked, a melancholy
vein of thought and meditation.
Who'd have thought it, said Neddy,
torturing
his face into an expression of refined
suffering, a girl as was bro't up so kindlyand
so well edecated as Nancypoor Nan! and a
small drop of fluid distilled from the eyes of the
Melancholy Vagabond, and then to marry sich
a tripe! a mere dog-queller.Here Mr.
Budge's feelings of indignation became too
strong for oral expression, and he accordingly
plucked his woollen cap from his brow and
crushed and twisted it between his hands until
all semblance of its character as an ornament
for the human head had entirely disappeared.
I can't stand it no how any longer, at length
uttered Neddy Budge, stamping his foot fiercely
on the ground, I'll wring his neck off, and
they may take the law of me! I don't care no
how!I'll choke him with soot afore he shall
live with my daughter! Yes I will! and the
evil-minded Budge doubled his fist and shook it
in the air as if the powerful proposition he had
just made had been assailed by some invisible
casuist. Upon the delivery of this emphatie
threat, Mr. Budge directed his steps with
considerable
speed toward the city. He had not
walked many paces in this direction before he
resumed his original course with more
moderation
,
falling again into a strain of dolorous
reflection
.
But I ha'n't the spirit to murder a man,
though he be a dog-killer, and as helpless and
feeble as a puppy just whelped. If he'd have
been a rag-picker, or a horse-doctor, or a
master
chimley-sweep, or any sort of a thing but a
dog-killer, Neddy Budge could have stood it.
But then, he's a despisable murtherer of poor
curs! and knocks 'em in the head for the cor
poration, a dollar a-piece. I hope Nancy 'll
starve afore she coats bread earned by sich
practices
!
As he uttered these words, with his eyes cast
sadly upon the ground, a laughing fellow, with a
crimson complexion, slapped Neddy Budge
heartily
upon the shoulder.
This worthy was a jolly constable, a former
companion of Budge's, and always known and
addressed as William. And here, kind
reader
,
allow me to drop a pithy apothegm, founded
on much observation and experience. There is
a class of persons whose full name is as difficult
to get at as to discover the longitude, or the
meaning of a Hebrew commentator. They are
known simply as Johnson, or Hodges, or Smith;
or as John, Bob, Philip, or Dick. Hostlers,
coachmen, negroes, errand-boys, constables, and
park-keepers, are generally known in this way.
They seem to constitute a kind of
half-humanity
,
which is sufficiently honored and recognised
by a single appellative. Why clergymen are
put to the inconvenience of christening them
into full names, is a mystery I could never
fathom.
Good morning, judge! said the jolly
constable
,
touching his hat with a mock air of
profound
reverence, as Neddy Budge looked up,
how does your honor feel this morning!
Miserable, William, miserable. I'm in sich
low spirits, and have sich a ringing in my head
I can't hardly live.
Why, how is this, Neddy? continued the
jolly constable, your mind ought to be as light
as a lark, now; you've got no cases to try, no
juries to panel
You say true, William, interposed the
Melancholy Vagabond, but I'm afeard a
jury
'll be panelled on me afore long that will give
in a final verdict; and my case will be tried
beyond appeals to higher courts! And the
Melancholy Vagabond let fall a tear upon his
coat-sleeve.
Hereupon the jolly constable looked very
solemn
,
and said, Neddy Budge, you didn't use
to be this way in the old court; there, Justice
Budge was as laughing a fellow as ever sat on
the bench. Don't you recollect, he concluded,
smiling, and nudging Mr. Budge under the small
ribs, the case of Wright
vs.
Passnips, where
you threatened one of defendant's witnesses, if
he didn't stop snivelling in court you'd send
him up to the dry dock to be new calked!
Upon the delivery of this funny reminiscence
the jolly constable exploded in a horse-laugh,
which, however, produced only a sickly smile
upon the countenance of ex-Justice Budge. At
this, Catchpole was slightly disconcerted, and,
shaking Neddy hastily by the hand, hurried off
to court, saying he must take out a fresh
summons
in the case of the huckster woman, who
always puts her head out of the garret-window,
saying, she's just gone out of town!
Neddy Budge thereupon seized his woollen
cap by the top, gave it two or three uneasy
turns upon his head, settled it with a new part in
front, and, plunging both hands in his deep
coat-pockets
,
proceeded on his way more thoughtful
and melancholy than ever.
The gloom which now pervaded the bosom of
Mr. Budge, had been gathering over it for more
than a twelvemonth. It had, at length, become
insupportable. The poor fellow as he now
travelled
along, keeping the river in view, burst
forth at times with some heavy passage of
complaining
,
or sitting down upon the stump of a
tree, or a rock, or any chance object, wrung
his hands and indulged in a copious discharge
of tears. The man's only and darling
daughter
had married a dog-killer! Thus Neddy
Budge rambled about the whole morning,
sometimes
keeping upon the road, but oftener
straggling
through the fields or along the shore. At
length he formed a desperate resolve. He had
reached an old, deserted granary, standing near
the river, with a door, over which swung a
rusty iron crane, looking forth upon the water.
Into this Neddy Budge easily made an entrance.
For a long time he seemed to be searching
about the building for some object in vain. At
length, discovering a stout piece of cord, his
object
seemed to be attained, and, forming one end
of the same into a noose, he proceeded calmly
and thoughtfully into the upper story of the
granary
.
Here he threw open the door, drew in the
crane, and attached to its extremity one end of
the rope. In a moment the other end was about
his own neck, he had given the crane an
outward
swing, and Neddy Budge hung dangling
in the air!
Nosey Bellows, his companion of the
morning
,
had been unsuccessful in his fishing
venture
at Governor's island, and had glided up the
river, and dropped anchor off the Long island
shore, opposite the very building from which
Neddy Budge had just thrown himself. He was
sitting on the landward side of the boat, with
his line carelessly dipping in the water, and
looking over toward the city. The sun was
sunken low in the west, and brought out the
object upon which his gaze was now fastened,
with great distinctness against the sky.
As sure as a fish is a water animal,
exclaimed
the duck-featured gentleman to his
friend in the boat, there's a man hanging from
Astor's old granary by the neck!
At this his friend turned, and, looking in the
direction to which he pointed, replied, Poh!
Nosey, it's nothing but a sack of wheat that
they're swinging in, or a sheaf of straw! and,
looking more earnestly, he seemed to doubt
something the report of his own vision.
Sheaf of straw nor sack of wheat has
passed
that door or hung on that crane this twenty
year; never sin' the dead pedler was found
in the loft. I'm sure its a man, and what's more,
we'll pull over and cut him down; there may be
some snuff o' life in him yet.
Instantly they took in their lines and anchor,
and, each seizing an oar, they pulled with main
and might straight across the river. As they
drew nearer, Bellows, observing the long gray
overcoat, exclaimed, It's Neddy Budge, as I
live! and he threw greater strength into every
stroke. They soon landed, and both ran at full
speed toward the old granary. In a moment
they drew in the crane, but, finding him
stone-cold, the duck-featured gentleman
remarked
,
with considerable trepidation in his
accent, that It wouldn't do to cut him down
till the crowner came. It was agin the law!
So I've heard poor Neddy himself say many a
time!
Nosey Bellows soon despatched his friend in
quest of that functionary, and, allowing the body
of Neddy Budge to swing back to its original
position, he descended below stairs and stood
underneath the crane looking up, with singular
expression of visnomy, into the shrivelled face
of his deceased friend. He was there joined
by a second party, namely, the jolly constable,
who had come that way to try the inaccessible
huckster (who lived near by) with a fresh
summons.
They now observed, for the first time
together
,
that Neddy Budge held his woollen cap in
his hand, which was extended forward as if in
the act of tossing it from him, when it was
arrested by the death-pang. The philosophy of
neither could solve this mysterious position of
the dexter arm, and there they stood
wondering
till the coroner arrived. He very speedily,
with the aid of the constable, summoned a
jury from the neighborhood; who, hearing the
testimony of Nosey Bellows and jolly William,
as to his morning's conversation with each of
them, rendered the verdict, died of his own
act, in consequence of melancholy and
depression
of spirits. The jolly constable thereupon
departed in search of the ingenious huckster;
the body of Neddy Budge was lifted into the
red fishing-boat, and Nosey Bellows and his
friend rowed sorrowfully down the stream. The
next day the Melancholy Vagabond was buried.
THE MERRY-MAKERS.EXPLOIT NO. I.
THE MERRY-MAKERS IN QUEST OF A DINNER;
AND THE COSTUME IN WHICH THEY
INTRODUCED
THEMSELVES TO CHICKEN PIE AND
CIDER.
Everywhere
, all over the face of the earth,
are scattered, like dimples, crews and
companies
of droll fellows, to keep the world in
humor
,
and preserve the arts of laughter and
frolic from total oblivion. Here and there,
some two or three of them will obtain a
foot-hold
,
and, practising their mad pranks, and
uttering
their witty sayings, make whole counties
and townships ring with the echo. These are
your wild blades, roaring boys, with something
of the goosecap, something of the swaggerer in
their composition, whose exploits are part of
3
the history, and their mirthful speeches part of
the vernacular of country villages and
neighborhoods
.
In the chronicles and traditions of
such places, they fill the posts of Robin Hoods
and court-jesters; every old woman in a cap
takes their fame into keeping, and it is handed
down from chimney corner to chimney corner,
sometimes even as far as the third generation!
God bless the jovial tribe! for they have saved
many a good face from becoming mouldy and
wrinkled, and sent a cheerful ray down into
many a fine heart that would otherwise have
become dull and torpid.
Some thirty miles from the good city of New
York, a pleasant road winds through the bosom
of a cheerful range of low hills, covered all the
way with rich woods and pasture-lands. In the
very heart of these hills stood a dilapidated and
ancient out-house, in which were assembled,
early on a clear midsummer morning, some six
or eight laughing fellows, shabbily dressed, and
engaged in earnest conversation.
Well, my lads! said one of them, a
good-sized
man, in a hawk nose, I think we had
better forego the project of tapping uncle
Aaron's cider-barrels to-day. The liquor will
be better a month or two hence. I have a
better
game to propose, that I think you'll like to
have a hand in.
What is it, Bobbylink?let us have it,
was the general acclamation and question of
the party, as they gathered eagerly about the
speaker.
As many as would as leave as not have
clean rigging and a hot dinner to-day, will
please to not keep their mouths shut! and a
universal Amen! burst from the throats of
the persons assembled.
If so, continued the speaker, who seemed
to be master of the revels, report yourselves
and your condition as I call your names.
Saying this, he drew a dirty piece of paper
from his hat, and called Habbakkuk Viol.
Here: breeches open as Deacon Barker's
mouth when he's praying; coat with tails
fighting
agin each other, and suing for separation;
shirt turned into ribands, and gone into boots
which are on a visit to the cobbler's; belly in a
state of insurrection.
John Smally.
On the spot, sir, and has a faint
recollection
of a breakfast he eat 'bout a month ago;
believes there was such a meal as dinner once
in vogue in these parts. Garments
similar-like
to Mr. Viol's.
Sam Chisel.
Your sarvant! said a stout-built fellow,
with a slight hump on his shoulders, throwing
a somerset and lighting in front of Mr.
Bobbylink
with a solemn expression of face. Has
attended three house-raisin's, two weddin's, and
one christenin'; come off with a dry belly from
all six. For why? One man fell down dead
with an opoplexy, the furst mug of cider he
swallered; 'cordingly, the barrels was all
spiked, for fear of fudder accidents. The oth
er two raisin's was on the rock crystal, cold
water plan: the baby at the christenin' was too
small herself for to eat, 'cordingly they giv'
nothin' out. The two weddin's was over when
I got there'cause why? 'Bak. Viol told me
the wrong hour.
That will do, Mr. Chisel, said the
good-sized
man; fall in with Smally there, and
save your stories for next twenty-first of June.
Harry Harvest.
Overcoat in good condition. Hat, coat,
breeches, and breakfast, missing.
After these, one or two other very similar
personages
gave corresponding responses, and the
roll-call was completed.
Follow me, my lads! said Mr. Bobbylink,
taking up the line of march toward a
crumbling
,
old-fashioned building, of which the
outhouse
was an appurtenance. The edifice which
they now approached had been unoccupied and
gradually falling into decay for several years.
The owner of the lands on which it stood had
erected a new tenement on a different part of
his farm, and abandoned this to bats and owls,
and such companions of owls as Mr. Bobbylink
and his club of wild fellows.
There was a part of the building, however,
into which even these dare-devils were afraid
to intrude, and that was an upper chamber
which was said to be tenanted by the ghost of
a Jew who had died there at the close of the
last century. In that room it was currently
rumored
that the spirit of the Hebrew kept
bachelor's
chambers in a very ghostly manner
taking
his meals, clinking and counting his silver,
and retiring to bed, with all the regularity of a
gentleman in the flesh. To confirm this state
of things, Mr. Sam Chisel said that he had seen
a man in a thin face and Roman nose stand at
the window several times atween daylight and
dark, his hand stroking a dry tuft of whisker,
like a goat. And Habbakkuk Viol asserted,
on his own personal hopes of salvation, that he
had heard a graveyard-voice distinctly
enunciate
,
when Joshua Jolton, Esquire, was ringing
his barrow shoats, Dem those shwine! Into
this chamber, notwithstanding the terrors which
guarded it, Bob Bobbylink now boldly advanced,
followed by Smally, Chisel, Viol, and their
compatriots
,
in a state of considerable trepidation
and paleness.
Yesterday afternoon, said Bob Bobbylink,
in explanation of this sudden intrusion into the
haunted apartment, I was crossing the open
garret in search of an old firelock: all at once
the casement of the north window rattled, one
of the window-frames fell out, and a gust came
roaring through the buildingswept my hat
from my headthe little Jew's door burst open,
through rolled my hat, and I stood shivering,
bareheaded, in the wind. In a trice, however,
I was filled with huge promptings of valor and
adventure, and pushed forward toward the little
Jew's bed-chamber. I found nothing but an
old high-backed chair, a bedstead with the cords
mouldering to pieces, and this black
clothes-press
standing against the wall. The little
Jew had quit the premises, and as I was the
first one to make a voyage into these unknown
parts, I claim a right in all that is found, as
first discoverer. I searched diligently, my good
fellows, every nook and cranny of the room, for
cash and hard silver, and, to my utter
astonishment
,
found not a farthing. Nevertheless, I have
fallen upon something, that, if it be well
managed
,
will purchase a prime dinner for us for
to-day, at least. At the conclusion of this
brief narrative, Mr. Bobbylink advanced to the
clothes-press, turned a rusty key in the lock,
and the doors flew open, and disclosed to the
starting eyes of the party a great number of
curious
dresses, carefully folded up and laid in
order on the shelves, interlarded here and there
with old-fashioned swords, matchlocks, and
pistols.
I don't see how a dinner is to come out of
this, said Habbakkuk Viol, after gazing upon
the apparel a reasonable length of time,
unless
,
Bob, you propose to feed us, like ostriches,
on rags and iron. Jack Smally here has a
stomach, I doubt not, that would digest one of
those antediluvian matchlocks for a breakfast,
and despatch a pair of those odd-looking pistols
between meals. Otherwise, I see no meal nor
mutton in a case of old clothes.
Poh! retorted Bobbylink, with an air of
hearty disdain, Viol, you see nothing but that
which is plainly before your eyes; yea, and it
must come somewhat in contact with your nose
before you can thoroughly smell out its
meaning
.
I agree with Viol, interposed Mr. John
Smally; I see no purpose to which you can
put these fantastic dresses, unless it be to
peddle
them at the weaver's, a penny a pound, and
the works on the firearms for old iron, a penny
and a half.
You are a pretty fellow, Johnny Smally,
replied Bob Bobbylink, with an air of still
greater
superiority than he had adopted toward Viol,
a pretty fellow, indeed, to tell what use may
be made of these instruments. Your conceits,
Smally, are parcel of your brainpatchwork
and rusty. Your skull is quilted with the very
odds and ends of your grandmother's rag-box,
stuffed, like an old saddle, with tow and
feathers
Mr. Bobbylink would have prolonged his
reprimand
,
had he not at this moment cast his eye
upon John Smally, who hung his head, played
with the fragment of a jacket-button, and
exhibited
other indisputable signs of penitence and
contrition.
Now it should be understood that the
shirtless
Smally was the factotum, humble servant
and parasite of Robert Bobbylink; that he had
discovered, at a very early period of life, that
Mr. Bobbylink possessed the finest pair of
skirts of any gentleman of his acquaintance;
that he had attached himself to said skirts very
shortly after such discovery, and had clung to
the same up to the present period, with the te
nacity of a genuine mastiff. He accordingly
made it his special business to circulate Mr.
Bobbylink's jocose sayings far and wide; to
repeat
his stories, with the prefix, Mr.
Bobbylink
said, at all the convenient inns and public
places within a dozen miles' walk; and to
perform
similar other small duties which a vassal
should of right render unto his liege lord. He
was Bob Bobbylink's humble shadow. If Bob
expanded into importance, Mr. Smally felt it
his duty to dilate in a corresponding manner;
if Mr. Bobbylink at any time, from the force of
circumstances, or detection in some prank or
project, was made to look dwarfish, John Smally,
according to the charter by which he lived, was
forced to look as small as a grasshopper. From
all these causes, a rebuke from Mr. Bobbylink
was no less than a thunder-clap to the ears of
Mr. Smally, and he was profoundly hushed and
silent until it rumbled by; though he had wit
at will against any other antagonist than his
patron.
Gentlemen and good fellows, continued Bob
Bobbylink, east of this building, about five
miles, a wedding takes place this morning; the
wedding-dinner will be on the table at one
o'clock, precisely. I propose that
we
eat
that
dinner. We shall entitle ourselves to the
poultry, vegetables, boiled tongue, and
apple-sauce
,
which will figure there, by right of a
device that I will open to you, if you will be
quiet just three minutes and a quarter. At
this passage of his address, a solemn
tranquillity
rested over the apartment. I have
examined
this wardrobe carefully, aud with an eye
to our project. I find a suit of the little Jew's,
including the tall blue cap and long blue coat
in which he was so well known in these parts;
that I shall don myself: a ghost may do
something
for flesh and blood sometimes. Here also
is the dress of a Hessian horseman; and as old
aunt Anderson (who says she lost an ear by a
trooper's blade during the old war) will be at
the wedding, she will undoubtedly aid us a
little
with her owl's voice when we appear.
Habbakkuk, you have something of a ruffian
trooper's air; may you not browbeat a passage
to a dinner with the butt-end of this
blunderbuss
?
producing a rusty article of that
description
from a drawer of the clothes-press. Let
the others, he concluded, fall in our rear,
properly caparisoned, and all is safe. If clowns
and boors can withstand the ghost of a Jew,
and the blunderbuss of a mad Hessian, there is
more sustenance in beans and buttermilk than
I have dreamed of!
The old building echoed with a hearty shout
as Bob Bobbylink ended, and, under his
direction
,
they speedly doffed their ragged dresses,
and set about accoutering themselves in the
new equipments thus aptly and unexpectedly
furnished. The articles forming an entire and
complete suit, were luckily found carefully
pinned together, and this rendered the task
comparatively
easy and brief. Besides mere
garments
,
they discovered wigs, boots, firearms
swords, guns, &c., all of which might be
rendered
of service in the approaching exploit.
While I was rumaging a private corner of
the press, said Bobbylink, as he produced the
habiliments, I fell upon a history of the queer
little Jew, written by his own hand, in a
parchment-book
,
from which it appears that he was
originally an old-clothesman in England; after
a while, like a grub, he turned from that calling
into an anti'kary and dress-fancier, which, you
see, is only a better sort of an old-clothesman.
Following up this sort of a profession, he
gathered
wherever he travelled the rarest and most
curious kinds of dress and armorguns,
carbines
,
muskets, and dragons, as he calls 'em.
He says, at one time he was accused of having
stolen a couple of dresses from a nobleman's
collection; but this he stoutly denies, in the
name of Father Abram, Isaac, and Jacob.
Finally
,
he came over to this country about the
year seventeen thirty-five; lived in the city a
great many years; and at last came out to these
parts during the revolutionary war, and added
a little to his wardrobe;there his
parchment-book
breaks off: and I conclude about the year
eighteen hundred he turned from a dress-fancier
into a ghost.
In the course of two or three hours the party
was completely apparelled, and defiled from the
old bed-chamber in the following order: First,
Mr. Robert Bobbylink gravely stalked forth in
the guise of the defunct Israelite, which
consisted
of the tall blue cap and long blue coat
already mentioned, the latter being ornamented
with hieroglyphic buttons; beneath it a rich
white silk vest, with gay figures and devices;
black pantaloons, which, from their brevity,
seemed to exhibit a reluctance to join a pair of
low shoes, surmounted by two lively buckles of
brass. In his hand Mr. Bobbylink bore a
maple
cane, the property and customary travelling
companion of the deceased gentleman whom he
represented. It was with intense difficulty that
Bob Bobbylink forced himself into these
garments
,
which were about three sizes too small
for his person; and he was obliged to chalk his
face freely, to take down the color, and give it
something of the paleness which is proper and
decent for a ghost.
Next to him, in order, marched Habbakkuk
Viol, wearing upon his brow a ferocious helmet
of jacked leather, guarded by rusty steel hoops;
on his broad-shouldered back he bore a
long-waisted
fiery red coat, with fierce metal buttons;
his nether limbs were snugly encased in chamois
leather breeches, of an indescribable
complexion
,
the lower extremities of which disappeared
in a couple of heavy boots, enlivened at the rear
with a pair of jingling iron spurs. Over his
breast, in a leathern belt, an open-mouthed
blunderbuss swung, sustained at one end by his
right-hand, at its muzzle by his left.
Behind him slowly and thoughtfully waddled
along the redoubted John Smally; clad in a
broad-skirted Dutch coat, with awful cuffs;
legs buried in trunk hose, which swelled above
and beneath the knee into separate inflations,
ending in peaked shoes that cut the ground like
scythes; upon his head sat a jaunty
cocked-hat
,
from beneath which a brown queue
streamed
like the tail of a kite or a comet. In his
hand he sustained (terrible anachronism!) a
dragon pistol, as old as the age of Elizabeth
an old-fashioned weapon, with a long handle,
its works in the centre, and the ornament of a
dragon's head at its muzzle. Having three
dresses
underneath his outer one, Mr. Smally moved
with great solemnity and slowness, and indulged,
at times, in singular expressions of viznomy, and
strange gesticulations of the body.
Treading close upon the heels of Smally, came
Sam. Chisel. How can I (unless in truth
inspired
)
describe the jovial figure that now
sidled through the chamber door? Stuffed
monster
!
elephant in broadcloth! balloon that hast
taken two taper legs, dancing inflated on the
earth! Mr. Samuel Chisel was endued, on the
present occasion, in the habiliments of a famous
clown, who had cast his clothes in the city of
New York, during the war; thrown aside his
cap and bauble, and, in fine, sold out his
wardrobe
to the little Jew antiquary. Upon his brow,
then, Sam. Chisel wore a singularly
constructed
hat, having a towering steeple of felt for its
centre, with a small, white feather peeping
from its points, and two flaming angles of
painted
paste-board for its sides. The steeple was
garnished with innumerable glittering spangles,
and yards of gold cord coiling about to its very
spire, and from one angle hung a silken tassel
of considerable size, in peril, every moment, of
being
devoured by a monstrous painted lion,
rampant
on the neighboring pasteboard corner, with
his mouth agape. Around the base of this triple
hat a lively belt was fastened by an immense
pewter
buckle; and from beneath the whole a red wig
depended, under cover of a linen bag, which was
adorned with a portentous purple rose, or
swinging
cabbage-plant. The hump of Mr. Chisel
reposed
beneath a brilliant green jacket, adorned
down its whole front by vast wooden buttons,
painted white, which held it closely fastened to
the breast. This was stuffed out to portly
dimensions
by the aid of three goodly sheaves of
straw, that had been stowed into their place by
the united strength of Viol, Bobbylink, and
Harvest
.
The same favor had been likewise
conferred
on a pair of black silk breeches, whose
extremities, however, tapered off so
unexpectedly
at the bottom, as to make it seem that Mr.
Chisel had lost the best part of his legs in some
hot engagement, and was walking upon
segments
or slices of the same. Nevertheless,
immense
buckles denoted the place where knees
should have been, and a huge pair of jack boots,
that threatened to swallow Mr. Chisel's whole
person, monstrous as it was, were the only
positive
evidences of such members that could be
discovered. In the neighborhood of the
knee-buckles
,
long knots of yellow riband curled
about his person, like a nest of playful
garter-snakes
,
and at the heels of the huge jack-boots,
two spurs, with rowels somewhat less than
small coach-wheels, thrust themselves forth.
Under his right arm the valiant Chisel
sustained
an awful two-handed sword (fabricated
of lath and painted the color of steel), with a
green grip; and at his left side a gaping
scabbard
of calf-skin dangled as he walked.
After Mr. Chisel, at an humble distance, and
bearing about the same relation to him as a
lean, starveling sexton, following at the heels
of a round-bellied, well-kept rector, came a
withered little man, christened Tommy Snipe,
by his parents, but rebaptized by the vulgar,
Dried Snipe. This gentleman possessed a
paper
face, with a thin nose, that very unjustly
inclined to the right ear, and a person which
might be reasonably expected to correspond
with such promising upper-features. He took
upon himself the task and burden of
personating
the age of George II.; wearing a dark
brown pigtail, a wide-skirted coat, reaching to
the knees, with ruffles at the wrist; a long vest
with large pocket-flaps underneath, and snug
pantaloons ending in pumps, adorned with knots
of riband. But he was sadly out in his costume,
by mounting on his head a sugar-loaf hat, and
bearing in his hand a clumsy old pistol, managed
by a wheel-lock, with its works all at the
muzzle
,
like the brains of a garrulous fellow, all in
his tongue. I doubt whether the throats of those
old iron orators ever spoke to much purpose.
Into one of his coat-pockets he slyly insinuated
a half filled powder-flask and shot-pouch, for the
purpose, perhaps, of practising with his
resuscitated
pistol, upon a few of Mr. Joshua Jolton's
tame pigeons on the way home, if the
adventure
should chance to miscarry.
Behind Mr. Snipe, Harry Harvest strutted the
ambitious representative of a still earlier reign.
His head was covered with a low,
broad-brimmed
beaver, cocked on one side, one corner of
which had been knocked out by a roundhead
broadsword, with a dull, dirty feather winding
about its crown. The expressive countenance
of Mr. Harvest shone out from amid a fertile
perriwig that flowed in a complete torrent of
hair down his shoulders, like the man in the
moon in a cloudy night. In his left hand he
wore a smart sword, crossing a gay doublet,
reaching to the top of a pair of wide stockings,
tagged up with points: a set of petticoat
breeches, and a few yards of lutestring,
completed
the dress.
Thus accoutred, they glided noiselessly from
the old building, and stole around a ledge of
rocks, into a green lane, which was shaded by
trees and straggled along the margin of a brook
for something like a furlong. Here the
pleasant
by-way ended, and they found themselves
in the edge of an oak woods, pursuing an
obscure
footpath, which sometimes broadened into
an open space, and again narrowed to a track
scarcely sufficient for the passage of Mr. Samuel
Chisel.
As they travelled, the journey was lightened
by occasional extravagantly authentic stories,
narrated to the worthy just named, by Bob
Bobbylink
interspersed
now and then, with a
rough cudgel-play of wits between Dried Snipe
and Hank Harvest; enlivened still more at
intervals
,
by a series of mutual tricks, practised
upon each other all round. At times
Habbakkuk
Viol, the mad Hessian, would discover as
he stooped to drink of some passing stream, an
ominous goose-quill stuck in his jacked leather
helmet, vying with his more regular trooper's
feather. Again a rapid series of sudden and
invisible kicks would descend upon the
swelling
flank of Sam. Chisel, with such velocity and
fury, as to shake his physical commonwealth to
its centre. Dried Snipe being a tetchy little
fellow, was frequently set upon and sorely
badgered
by some one of the party.
I think, said the gentleman who
represented
the seventeenth century on this occasion,
addressing himself to Tommy Snipe, when I
undertook to rob a henroost, I wouldn't mistake
a patriarchal cock, for a maiden pullet; you are
so valiant, Snipe, you should have known him
by his spurs!
I knows what I know, retorted Mr. Snipe.
If it had been you, I might have known you to
be a tender bird by your soft coxcomb!
Well answered, Dried Snipe! quoth the
company halting in a cleared space, and
gathering
about the disputants (Bobbylink advancing
alone on a lookout). Quip and reply now
rapidly
passed between the contending parties,
until at length the tetchy Mr. Snipe was
exasperated
beyond endurance, by Harry Harvest's
alluding to his features, in connexion with the
appearance presented by the physiognomy of a
dried codfish suddenly animated. At this
unsavory
and pointed insinuation the gentleman
representing the middle of the eighteenth
century
,
in his style of dress, grew exceeding wroth,
and would have done terrible damage to the
person and habiliments of him of the
seventeenth
,
by drawing from his pocket his small
powder-flask, and proceeding to load his
venerable
pistol, had not fate interposed, and by the
hand of John Smally, forcibly plucked the
brown wig from the head of the valorous Snipe:
whereupon his sugar-loaf hat slid over his face,
very much like an enormous extinguisher. In
this tomb his valor was effectually buried for
the present. Meantime Mr. Harry Harvest had
drawn his trusty rapier, but was prevented
from a very dexterous employment of the same,
by the sudden descent of Sam. Chisel's trenchant
blade of lath upon his head, which caused his
eyes to emit sufficient sparks and flashes, to fire
a whole field of artillery.
And now the gentlemen of the seventeenth
and eighteenth centuries were completely at the
mercy of their more modern comrades, and
might have been speedily put to death by the
numerous ingenious tortures practised upon
them, while thus doing penance in the dark,
had not Bob Bobbylink at that moment
returned
,
exclaiming, with sparkling eyes, the
signal
is hove out! which being readily
understood
by the party, caused a supple adjustment
of all difficulties, a general and generous
forgiveness
of injuries, and they resumed the
march.
In a moment or two they had emerged from
the woods, and casting their eyes toward the
east, discovered a long stripe of red flannel
flying
at the head of a well-pole. The sight of
this signal inspired the freebooting varlets with
feelings similar to those which filled the breast
of the adventurous Vasco de Gama, on
obtaining
the first view of the Pacific from a peak of
the Andes; for to Viol, Bobbylink, & Co., it
opened visions of whole seas of cider, and
mountains of mutton and roast beef. They had
now arrived in an orchard in the rear of the
dwelling, whose roof covered the
wedding-dinner
,
which was the grand object of their
adventure
,
and the wedding-party had just seated
themselves at the table to do justice to its
various
excellence. While the dinner-hunters are
discussing the most expedient order of entrance
and assault, we will appropriate a few words
of description to the objects we have mentioned.
At the head of a long table, then, in a
comfortable
sitting-room, looking out upon a garden,
was seated a round-faced, short man, in a new
brown coat, with light brass buttons, and at his
side, a red-cheeked, dumpy girl, in a new pink
frock, and a pair of blue eyes, in capital order.
At the opposite extremity of the board sat two
aged females, old Aunt Anderson, the
grandmother
of the bridegroom, and at her left, Aunt
Frewell Tomkins, the corresponding relative
of the bride. Along the sides of the table were
seated Parson Hob, a Methodist clergyman, in
an ill-cut suit of black, in the centre, with the
mothers of the bride and groom, and two or
three rustic female cousins, as wings; opposite
the preacher sat the bride and bridegroom's
grandfathers, flanked in like manner on each
side with the male parents of the interesting
couple, whose individual interests had been
merged in a co-partnership for life, with a like
number of male cousins to tally with the
females
mentioned. This interesting company
had just arranged itself, as we have described,
about a well-filled board, when a loud knock
was heard at the door, and, without further
warning, a man with an iron-bound military
cap on his head, and a heavy blunderbuss in
his hand, stepped into the apartment.
He grounded his arms with a martial air,
and, leaning over the muzzle, looked around
upon the wedding-party with great coolness and
severity of countenance. The first one to speak
on the appearance of this unexpected figure
was Aunt Anderson. My God! said she,
I believe it's a Hessian! and suddenly
seizing
her spectacles from the table and placing
them to her eyes, she shrieked, It is! yes, it
is one of those wild war-fellows of the
revolution
!
and dropping her glasses upon the floor,
she rushed precipitately out of the room.
By this time, a second figure had made itself
visible. This was a pale, sepulchral person
age, in a blue cap and coat, who tottered feebly
into the apartment with a cane in his hand, and
took his station a little in advance of the
military
apparition. Good gracious! now shrieked
Hetty Steddle, a pretty servant-girl, who was in
waiting, Lor' bless me, if that ben't the ghost
of old Shekkels! and with a hideous noise she
followed the example of withered Aunt
Anderson
.
It must be the spirit of the old Jew
Shekkels! said the two old grandfathers
almost
in the same breath, rising from the table,
placing their hands upon the cloth, and peering
anxiously forward into the face of the man in
the blue coat and cap. A general panic had
now seized the company; the dumpy bride
succeeded
,
after two or three ineffectual attempts,
in fainting, and was borne in the arms of the
short man in the round face, aided by two or
three stout boors, into the fresh air. The
clergyman
had taken advantage of the open door,
and suddenly disappeared, none could tell (if
they cared) whither. The females in a body fled
the haunted table, followed by the bridegroom's
father between the two venerable grandsires,
dragging them out by the collar with main
force. Just as the last one of this fugitive
party of weddeners had vanished through one
door, their places were supplied at another by
our friends Sam Chisel, Harvest, Snipe, and
Smally, who were equally disposed, with them,
to do justice to the yet untasted meal before
them. First, the Merry-makers then indulged
in a sort of subdued horse-laugh all round.
Next, the door was secured by John Smally and
Sam Chisel with two short bayonets thrust an
inch deep or more in the lintels; and then they
arrayed themselves with all despatch about the
smoking board.
According to an ancient custom that prevails
in that region, the wedding-company had
established
themselves at the table before the
knives and forks were laid at the plates: that
being a service generally rendered by a negro
or maid-servant immediately after grace. Our
bold adventurers accordingly found themselves
sadly at a stand for lack of these
indispensables
:
all except Mr. Harry Harvest, who plied
his rapier, of the middle of the seventeeth
century
,
with great dexterity at the ribs of a
roasted
turkey, and Mr. Chisel, whose lath-sword
did serviceable execution upon pudding and
apple-sauceshovelling huge streams of the
latter down his throat, seasoned with draughts
from a neighboring cider-pitcher. But the
exploits
of these two trenchermen scarcely
satisfied
the clamorous bellies of Dried Snipe, Smally,
Habakkuk Viol, and Bob Bobbylink.
The latter worthy, therefore, rising, and
catching
a brace of fine broiled woodcocks by the
legs, and thrusting them into his coat-pocket,
exclaimed
,
Clear the deck, my lads!we'll
adjourn
the dinner to head-quarters! And saying
this, he seized upon two bottles of currant-wine
and a fat fowl, and thrust them into a long bag
that he had secretly brought with him, to show
them what he meant.
Thereupon a scene of awful and
indiscriminate
pillage ensued. Habakkuk Viol first filled
his blunderbuss with cider to the muzzle,
plugging
it in with a roll of hot bread, and
afterward
stuffed a duck into either pocket. Sam
Chisel next cast out two sheaves of straw from
his bosom, and basted his green jacket with a
monstrous chicken pie, a dish of apple-sauce,
and a leaden-covered pitcher of fresh-brewed
ale; filling the steeple of his hat with hot rolls
and other dainties, his jack-boots with radishes
and roasted apples, and his calf-skin scabbard
with pudding-sauce and drawn butter. An
enormous turkey was severed and shared with
Dried Snipe, who, besides this moiety, lined his
gaberdine with bread and cakes, and clapped a
blackberry pudding in his sugar-loaf hat, with a
small plate at bottom to sustain it. The
immense
vest-pockets of John Smally were
forthwith
freighted each with a comely loaf of
pot-cheese
,
and into the skirts of his Dutch coat he
slid a goodly tongue, whispering to Bobbylink,
This, you and I will secretly divide! As for
Harry Harvest, he was desperately fond of
greens, and took charge of the vegetable
department
;
and accordingly crammed his Charles
Second
doublet and petticoat-breeches between the
lining with beans, peas, asparagus, and ears of
early corn. Thus armed and provisioned, these
gallant cruisers cautiously undid the door, and
stole warily from harbor without being seen;
for the whole wedding-party had fled into the
crib, which was on the other side of the house,
and there they kept themselves in a state of
siegethe short bridegroom having ascended
into the loft of the same, and planted his round
face at a loophole in the end, maintaining a
brilliant and steady lookout, with all his eyes,
toward the front of the building.
The Merry-makers soon attained the woods,
and Bob Bobbylink, looking cautiously back,
saw the pretty serving-girl, Hetty Steddle,
standing under a cow-shed in the road, holding
her hips, and ready to burst with laughter, as
she gayly winked and waved her hand to him.
The next morning, the same shabbily-dressed
crew to which we introduced our readers might
have been seen lurking about the old out-house,
basking in the sun as before, but with improved
visages, sleek with the fruits of their
yesterday's
adventure.
THE GREAT CHARTER
CONTEST
IN GOTHAM.
ILLUSTRATING THE CONNEXION BETWEEN
PATBIOTISM
AND SILK STOCKINGS, AND
CACOGRAPHY
AND POPULAR RIGHTS.
There
is a particular season of the year in
the city of New York, when ragamuffins and
vagabonds take a sudden rise in respectability;
when a tarpaulin hat is viewed with the same
mysterious regard as the crown of an emperor,
and the uncombed locks of a wharf-rat or
river-vagrant
looked upon with as much veneration
as if they belonged to Apollo in his brightest
moments of inspiration. At this singular and
peculiar period in the calendar, all the higher
classes, by a wonderful readiness and felicity
of condescension, step down from their
pedestals
,
and smilingly meet the vulgar gentry, half
way up, in their progress to the beautiful
tableland
of refinement and civilization.
About this time gloves go out of repute, and
an astonishing shaking of dirty fists takes place
all over the metropolis. It is a sight to electrify
the heart of a philanthropist, to behold a whole
community in a state of such perfect Arcadian
innocence, that all meet on terms of familiar
affection, where smile responds to smile, with
equal warmththough one may dimple a clean
countenance, and the other force its pellucid
way through a fog of earthy particles. Happy,
golden time!
Reader, if you chance not to comprehend
philosophically this sweet condition of things,
be informed that a charter election comes on
next month!
The charter contest of the year eighteen
hundred
and , is perhaps the fiercest on
record
in the chronicles of New York. Several
minor skirmishes took place with regard to
aldermen
,
assessors, and constables; but the main
brunt and heat of the engagement fell upon the
election of a mayor to preside over the
portentous
destinies of the metropolis during a
twelvemonth
.
It seemed, from the grounds on which it was
fought, to be the old battle of patrician and
plebeian
.
On one side, the candidate was Herbert
Hickock, Esquire, a wholesale auctioneer, and
tolerably good Latin scholar: a gentleman who
sallied forth every morning at nine o'clock from
a fashionable residence in Broadway, dressed in
a neat and gentlemanly suit of black, an
immaculate
pair of gloves, large white ruffles in
his bosom, and a dapper cane in his hand.
Opposed to him, as a candidate for the
mayoralty
,
was a master shoemaker, affectionately
and familiarly known as Bill Snivel. He was
particularly celebrated for the amount of
unclean
garments he was able to arrange about
his persona rusty, swaggering hat, and a
rugged
style of English with which he garnished
his conversation. The great principles on
which the warfare was waged were, on the one
hand, that tidy apparel is an indisputable
evidence
of a foul and corrupt code of principles;
and on the other, that, to be poor and unclean,
denotes a total deprivation of the reasoning
faculties.
So that the leading object of the Bill Snivel
party seemed to be, to discover Mr. Hickock in
some act of personal uncleanliness or
cacography
;
while the Hickock party as strenuously
bent all their energies to the detection of Mr.
Bill Snivel in the use of good English or
unexceptionable
linen. The names with which they
mutually christened each other exhibit the depth
and strength of their feelings on this point. The
one was known as the Silk-stocking Gentry:
the other by the comprehensive appellation of
the Loafers.
At the approach of a New York charter
election
,
it is truly astonishing how great a
curiosity
springs up as to the personal habits of the
gentlemen presented on either side as
candidates
.
The most excruciating anxiety appears
to seize the community to learn certain little
biographical
incidents as to their birth, parentage,
morals, and the everyday details of their life. In
truth, on this occasion, the wardrobe of one of
the nominees had been so often and so
facetiously
alluded to by two or three of the
newspapers
,
that the Bill Snivel general vigilance
committee had felt it their duty to furnish one
of their members with a large double telescope
which he planted, by resolution of the
committee
,
every night and morning directly
opposite
the chamber-window of Herbert Hickock,
Esquire, with the laudable purpose of
discovering
,
in an authentic way, what were that
candidate's
habits of dress. A manuscript report
of his ingenious observations, it is said, was
circulated
freely among the members of the
committee
.
No copy, that I have learned, has ever
found its way to the press. As every one knows,
the advent of an election creates a general and
clamorous demand for full-grown young men of
twenty-one years of age. To meet this demand,
a surprising cultivation of beards took place
among the Hickock youth who happened to
want a few days or months of that golden
period
.
Furthermore, a large number of the Bill
Snivel
voters in the upper wards of the city, became
suddenly consumptive, and were forced to
repair
,
for the benefit of their health, to the more
southern and genial latitudes of the first,
second
,
and third wards; and the Hickock men
residing in those wards were seized as suddenly
with alarming bilious symptoms which compelled
them to emigrate abruptly to the more
vigorous
and bracing regions in the northern part of
the island. Pleasant aquatic excursions, too,
were undertaken by certain gentlemen of the
Bill Snivel tinge of politics (whose proper
domicils
were at Hartford and Haverstraw), and
they came sailing down the North and East
rivers, in all kinds of craft, on visits to their
metropolitan brethren, and dropped their
compliments
in the shape of small folded papers,
in square, green boxes with a slit in the top.
To keep up the spirit of the contest, several
hundreds of the silk-stocking men packed
themselves
regularly every night into a large, oblong
room, and presented a splendid collection of fine
coats and knowing faceslike a synod of grave
herrings in a firkinto the contemplation of
sundry
small men, with white pocket-handkerchiefs
and bad colds, who, in turn, came forward and
apostrophized a striped flag and balcony of boys
on the opposite wall.
Certain other hundreds of the Bill Snivel
men regaled themselves in a similar way, in
another large, oblong room, except that the
gentlemen
who came forward to them served
themselves
up in spotted silk handkerchiefsvoices
a key loudernoses a thought largerand
faces
a tinge redder than their rivals. The
former
occasionally quoted latin and the latter took
snuff. With regard to the noises which now
and then emanated from the lungs of the
respective
assemblagesthere was more music
in the shouts and vociferations of the Hickock
meetingsmore vigor and rough energy in the
Bill Snivel. If a zoological distinction might
be made, the Bill Snivel voice resembled that
of a cage-full of hungry young tigers, slightly
infuriated; while the Hickock seemed to be
modelled
on the clamor of an old lion after dinner.
Each meeting had some particular oratorical
favorite
.
In one, a slim man was in the habit of
exhibiting a long, sallow face at 8 o'clock every
evening, between a pair of tall sperm candles, and
solemnly declaring thatthe country was
ruined
,
and that he was obliged to pay twelve and
a half cents a pound for liver! At the Bill
Snivel, a short, stout man, with an immense
bony fist, was accustomed, about half an hour
later, to appear on a high platformand
announce
in a stentorian voice that the people
was on its own legs again, which was rather
surprising when we know how fond some
people
are of getting into other people's boots;
and that the democracy was carrying the
country before it, which was also a profound
postulate, meaningthe democracy was
carrying
the democracy before it they constituting
the country at all times, and the country at all
times constituting them!
In the meantime, committee-men of all sorts
and descriptions are at work in rooms of every
variety of wall and dimension. The whole city
is covered with hand-bills, caricatures,
manifestoes
,
exposures, pointed facts, neat little
scraps of personal history, and various other
pages of diverting political literature. Swarms
cluster about the polls; banners stream from
windows, cords, and housetops. A little man
rides about on the box of an enormous wagon,
blowing a large brass trumpet, and waving a
white linen flag with a catching inscription
and he labors at the trumpet till he blows his
face out of shape, and his hat off his head, and
waves the flag until it seems to be a signal of
distress thrown out by the poor little man with
the brass trumpet, just as he has broken his
wind and is sinking with exhaustion. Scouring
committees beat furiously through the wards in
every direction. Diving, like sharks, into
cellars
,
they bring up, as it were between their
teeth, wretched, scarecrow creatures, who stare
about when introduced to daylight as if it
were as great a novelty to them as roast-beef.
Ascending into garrets, like mounting hawks,
they bear down in their clutches trembling old
men, who had vegetated in those dry, airy
elevations
apparently during a whole century.
Prominent among the bustling busy-bodies of
the hour is Fahrenheit Flapdragon, member of
the Hickock general committee, the Hickock
vigilance ward committee, the advertising
committee
,
the wharf committee, the committee on
flags and decorations, the committee on
tar-barrels
and tinder-boxes, one of the grand general
committee on drinking gin-slings and
segar-smoking
,
and member of the committee on noise
and applause. By dint of energetic
manuvering
,
Flapdragon had likewise succeeded in
being appointed chairman of a single committee,
viz., that on chairs and benches. He attained
this enviable elevation (the performance of the
arduous duties of which drew upon him the
eyes of the whole ward and the carpenter who
furnished the benches!) through the votes of a
majority of the committee of fiveone of whom
was his brother-in-law and the other his business
partner. The casting vote he had himself
given
judiciously, in his own favor. Fahrenheit
Flapdragon bore a conspicuous part in the great
charter contest, now waging between Hickock
and Snivel. In fact, he was so embarrassed
with engagements during this hot-blooded
election
,
that he was compelled to furnish himself
with a long-legged gray horse early on the
morning of the second day, to carry him about
with sufficient rapidity from point to point to
meet them as they sprang up. The little man, of
a truth, was so tossed and driven about by his
various
self-imposed duties in the committee-rooms,
streets, and along the wharves, that he came well
nigh going stark mad. During the day he harried
up and down the streets, from poll to poll,
bearing
tidings from one to the otherdistributing
ticketscheering on the little boys to shout,
and placing big men in the passages to stop the
ingress of Bill Snivel voters; I say during the
day he posted from place to place on his lank,
gray nag with such fury that many sober
people
thought he had lost his wits and was
hunting
for them on horseback in this distracted
manner.
At night, what with drinking gin-slings and
brandy-and-water at the bar to encourage the
vagabonds that stood looking wistfully on
talking red-hot Hickock politics to groups of
four or five and sixand bawling applause at
the different public meetings he attendedhe
presented, at the close of the day's services,
such a personal appearance that any one might
supposed he had stayed in an oven till the
turning
point between red and brown arrived, and
then jumped out and walked home with the
utmost
possible velocity to keep up his color.
There are seventeen wards in the city, and
every
ward has its Fahrenheit Flapdragon.
While these busy little committee-men are
bustling and hurrying about, parties of voters
are constantly arriving on foot, in coaches,
barouches
,
open wagons, and omnibuses,
accompanied
by some electioneering friend who brings
them up to the polls. Every hour the knots
about the door swell until they fill the street.
In the interior of the building, meanwhile, a
somewhat different scene presents itself. Be
hind a counter, on three wooden stools, three
men are perched, with a green box planted in
front of the one in the centre, and an officer
with a staff at either end. The small piece of
green furniture thus guarded is the ballot-box,
and all sorts of humanity are every moment
arriving
and depositing their votes. Besides
the officers, two or three fierce-looking men
stand around the box on either side, and
challenge
,
in the most determined manner, every
suspicious person of the opposite politics. I
dispute that man's vote, says one, as a ragged
young fellow with a dirty face and strong odor
of brandy approaches; I don't believe he is
entitled to vote. Yes, he is, replies
another
,
I know himhe's a good citizen; but you
may swear him if you choose! At this the
vagabond is pushed up to the counter by one of
his political friendshis hat is knocked off by
an officerthe chief inspector presents an
open bibleat which the vagabond stares as if
it were a stale codfish instead of the gospels
a second friend raises his hand for him and
places
it on the book, and the chief inspector is
about to swear himwhen the Hickock
challenger
cries out, Ask him if he understands
the nature of an oath! What is an oath?
asks the inspector, solemnly. Dn your
eyes! hiccups the young Bill Snivel voter.
Take him out! shouts the inspector, and
the officers in attendance, each picking up
a portion of his coat-collar, hurry him away
with inconceivable rapidity through a back-door
into the street, and dismiss him with a hearty
punch with their staves in the small of his
back.
All over the city, wherever a square inch of
floor or pavement can be obtainedin
bar-rooms
,
hotels, streets, newspaper offices
animated
conversations are got up between the
Hickock gentry and the Bill Snivel men.
If dandy Hickock gets in, says a
squint-eyed
man with a twisted nose, I've got a
rooster
pigeonI'll pick his feathers barestick a
pipe-stem in his claw, friz his topknotand
offer
him as a stump candidate for next mayor.
Can your rooster-pigeon spell his own
name, Crossfire? asked a tall Hickock
street-inspector
if
he can't, you'd better put him a
quarter under Bill Snivel; it would be as good
as an infant school for him!
I think I'd better take my little
bantam-cock
,
retorted the squint-eyed man, he's got a
fine comb, which would answer for
shirt-ruffles
;
and the Bill Snivel auditors gave a
clamorous
shout.
If he's got a comb, said the tall inspector,
stooping toward the shouters, it's more than
what Bill Snivel's head has seen this two and
forty years! The Hickock gentry now sent
up, in turn, a vigorous hurrah; and a
couple
of ragamuffins in the mob, who had been
carrying on a little under-dialogue on their own
account, now pitched into each other in the
most lively manner, and after being allowed to
phlebotomize each other very freely, were drawn
apart by their respective coat-tails and carried
to a neighboring pump.
The battle by no means ceases at the going
down of the sun; for, besides the two large
assemblages
to which we have before alluded,
there is, in each ward, a nightly meeting in
some small room in the second story of a public
house, where about one hundred and fifty
miscellaneous
human beings are entertained by
sundry young attorneys and other spouters,
practising the English language and trying the
force of their lungs. At these meetings you
will be sure, whenever you attend them, to
meet with certain stereotyped faceswhich are
always there, always with the same smiling
expression
,
and looking as if they were a part of
the wainscoting, or lively pieces of furniture
fixed there by the landlord to please his guests.
The smiling gentlemen are office-seekers. In
the corner, sitting on a small table, you may
observe a large puffed-out man with red cheeks;
he is anxious to obtain the appointment of
beergauger
under the corporation. Standing up by
the fireplace is a man with a dingy face and
shivering person, who wishes to be weigher of
coal, talking to a tall fellow who stoops in the
shoulders like a buzzard, with a prying nose and
eye, and a face as hard and round as a
pavingstone
,
who is making interest for reappointment
as street inspector. There is also another, with a
brown-tanned countenance, patriotically
lamenting
the decline of the good old revolutionary
spiritwho wants the office of leather inspector.
The most prominent man at these meetings
is orator Bog, a personage whose reputation
shoots up into a wonderful growth during the
three days of election, while his declamation is
fresh, but which suddenly withers and wilts
away when the heat of the conflict has cooled.
His eloquence is the peculiar offspring of those
sunny little republican hotbeds, ward meetings.
He has just described the city as split like
a young eel, from nose to tail, by the diabolical
and cruel knife of those modern Catilines, the
aldermen of the city, they having recently run a
main street through it, north and south.
These are the men, he exclaimed with an
awful smile on his countenance, these are the
men that dare insult democracy by appearing
in publiclike goslingsyes, like goslings!
with such articles as these on their legs! and
thrusting a pair of tongsheretofore
dexterously
concealed under the skirts of his coatinto
his hat, which stood upon the table before him
he drew out a pair of fine silk stockings and
swung them triumphantly over the heads of the
mob, which screamed and clamored with huge
delight at the spectacle. And such articles as
these! he shouted, producing, from the same
receptacle, a shirt about small enough for a
yearling infant, with enormous green ruffles
about large enough for a Patagonian.
Look at it! cried Bog, throwing it to one
of the mob.
It's pine-shavin's, painted green, shouted
the mob.
Smell of it! cried Bog.
It's scented with assy-fetid-y! vociferated
the ecstatic Bill Snivel men, and a hearty burst
of laughter broke forth.
Several lusty vagabonds came near going
into
fits when Orator Bog facetiously, though
gravely, stopped his nose with his thumb and
linger and remarked, I think some one has
brought a skunk into the room!
The last hour of the last day of the great
charter contest has arrived. Every carman,
every merchant's clerk, every negro with a
freehold, every stevedore, every lamplighter,
every street-sweeper, every vagrant, every
vagabond
,
has cast his vote.
Garret, cellar, sailor's boarding-house, shed,
stable, sloop, steamboat, and dockyard, have
been ransacked, and not a human being on the
great island of Manhattan has escaped the
clutch of the scouring and district committees
of the two great contending parties. At this
critical moment, and as the sun began to look
horizontally over the chimney-tops with a broad
face as if he laughed at the quarrels of Hickock
gentry and Bill Snivel men, two personages were
prowling and prying along a wharf on the East
river, like a brace of inquisitive snipe.
At the self-same moment the eyes of both
alighted on an object floating in the water, at
the self-same moment both sprang forward with
a boat-hook in his hand, and fastened upon the
object of their mutual glances, one at the one
extremity, the other at the other. In a time far
less than it takes the north star to twinkle, the
object was dragged on shore and proved to be
the body of a man, enveloped in a fragmentary
blue coat, roofless hat, and corduroy pantaloons.
I claim him, said one of the boat-hook
gentlemen, a member of the seventh ward
Hickock
wharf committee; I saw him first! he's
our voter by all that's fair!
He wants a jugful of being yours, my lad,
retorted the other, a member of the Bill Snivel
wharf committee. He's too good a Christian
to be yoursfor don't you see he's just been
baptized?
He's mine! responded the Hickock
committee-man
,
for my hook fastened in his collar,
and thereby saved his headhe couldn't vote
without his head!
A timber-head he must have if he'd vote the
shirt-ruffle ticket, retorted the Bill Snivel
committee-man
.
By this time a mob had gathered about the
disputants, who stood holding the rescued body
each by the leg, with its head downward to let
the water drain from its windpipe.
Why, you land-lubbers, cried a medical
student, pushing his professional nose through
the throng, you'll give the man the apoplexy
if you hold him that way just half a minute
longer
.
In a trice after, a second medical student
arrived, and, hearing what the other had said,
exclaimed, It's the best thing you can do
hold him just as he is, or he's sure to get the
dropsy. The mob, however, interferedthe
man was laid on his backand one of the
medical
students (who was propitious to the
Hickock
code of politics) taking hold of one wrist
and the other (who advocated the Bill Snivel
system) seizing the other, they commenced
chafing
his temples, and rubbing the palms of his
hands.
The wharf committee-men, meantime, felt
inclined
to renew the dispute as to their claim on
the body of the half-drowned loafer, but, by
advice of the medical gentlemen, it was
deferred
to be settled by the man's own lips,
whenever he should recover the use of them.
The medical students chafed and rubbed, and
every minute leaned down to the ear of the
drowned body, as if to catch some favorable
gnosis
.
Hurrah for Hickock! shouted the man,
opening his eyes just as one of the medical
students
had withdrawn his mouth from his ear.
The Hickock portion of the mob gave three
cheers. Hurrah for Bill Snivel! shouted the
resuscitated loafer as the other medical student
applied his lips to his organ of hearing.
The loafer was now raised upon his legs,
and marshalled like some great hero between
the medical students and the two members
of the wharf committeesand borne toward
the pollshaving each hand alternately
supplied
by the Hickock people and the Bill
Snivvel
,
with the tickets of the respective
parties
.
They arrived at the door of the
election
room, with the body of this important and
disputed voter, just one minute after sundown,
and, finding him thus to be of no value,
the Hickock medical student and
committee-man
,
and the Bill Snivel student and
committee-man
,
united in applying their feet to his flanks
and kicking him out of the building!
In two or three days the votes of the city
were duly canvassed, and it was found that they
stood, for Bill Snivel, 13,000for Herbert
Hickock
,
13,303scattering, 20. Three hundred
and three learned Bill Snivel gentlemen
having
,
in consequence of their limited knowledge
of orthography and politics, voted for Bill
Snivel
for constable instead of mayor! Herbert
Hickock, Esq., was, therefore, declared duly
elected Mayor of the city and county of New
York.
THE WITCH AND THE DEACON.
A DEACON WITH A HEART LIKE A WHIRLPOOL,
AND A GOBLIN WITH A TAIL LIKE A FISH.
During
the close of the seventeenth century
the prince of darkness made several very hot
inroads into different quarters of the righteous
old colonies of New England. In truth, there
was so prodigious a descent of devils upon
divers places near the centre of this province,
[1]
[1]
Cotton Mather.
and it suddenly swarmed in every nook and
corner with such crowds of spectres and
goblins
,
that the good people were in a fair way
of being ejected to furnish them a settlement.
Never was the devil supplied with so great a
variety of recruits. The fierce incursions of
which I have spoken were sometimes headed
by one captain, sometimes by another. In one
quarter the troops were led on by a black man,
of a gunpowder aspect, and more than human
dimensions. This fellow generally skirmished
about the edges of woods and timber-lands,
clutching up straggling old beldames and tame
Indians. Then there was your tawny-colored
goblin, short of stature, who was sometimes
seen with a whole pack of spectres hovering at
his heels; your pugnacious devil, whose chief
sport it was to distribute dry blows liberally about
the ears of the poor wretches who came within
his jurisdiction; your high-flying devil, who
snatched people out of their chambers, and
horsed them away miles through the air, over
trees and hills, free of postage; beside a large
assortment of menial imps, who were drubbed
heartily by their employer if they failed to do
their vile work to his satisfaction. To these
were sometimes added a better-bred class of
goblins, who acted as secretaries and
book-keepers
(at a liberal salary I presume) to the
devil, and who had charge of the great red
muster-book to which new recruits were forced
to put their hands.
[2]
[2]
For authority as to these abstruse points, consult
More Wonders of the Invisible World (1700), tracts
pamphlets, and surviving aged females
Never was a campaign
of old Nick better arranged, or carried on with
more spirit.
It was on a night in the year sixteen
ninety-seven
,
and after the smoke and heat of the
main engagement at Salem had died away, that
a tall woman, about sixty years of age, was
crossing a stone fence in the choleric little
village
of Rye. It was a still, cheerful night, in
the close of August, and the moon shone down
into the field upon which the aged woman was
entering with a brightness so pure that it seemed
almost unnatural.
Before her lay an enclosed space of about
four acres, stretching up from the edge of a
quiet little brook to the brow of a hill, and
covered with bushes, shrubs, and herbs, of
every
description. Near the water's edge a whole
company of braggart bulrushes thrust up their
heads, and lorded it over the inoffensive and
unambitious little stream with an air of vast
superiority, while around these topping
pretenders
a few humble water-cresses gathered
themselves, and modestly vegetated and
blossomed
.
Farther on, and along the fence, a
testy crew of blackberry bushes had assembled,
and stood wagging their heads in every wind
that stirred, and near them a malignant
poisonvine
crept along the rails like a serpent.
As she old woman stepped into the field out
of a piece of woods that overhung it from the
west, she startled a garter-snake from the bank,
and the timid creature, with its light streaks
of yellow dashed with spots of blue, twinkled
away through the grass toward the brook,
leaving behind it, or seeming to leave behind
it, as it glided swiftly along, a trail of mixed
orange-colored light.
A better night heart could not wish,
muttered
the old woman, as she strided into the
field; but where Dick delays I can not guess.
He promised to be about through the village
with the basket before I could be here by the
woods. A slow foot gets a light supper, Dick.
Uttering this sententious saying, she bustled
about the ground, plucking here and there a
handful of some herb or other, and laying it
carefully in the lap of her gown. In a few
minutes she was joined by a low, strange
looking
young man, about twenty years old, who
had upon his head a hat which had been
perhaps
,
originally, of the shape of a bell, but
which was pinched by time and weather, at the
top, until it now resembled a withered
winter-pear
.
On his arm he bore a dilapidated oaken
basket.
Richard, wherefore didst thou tarry?
Thou knewest the business was pressing
hitherward
.
The ale you might have tippled at
another time!
I have not tarried, replied the
strange-looking
young man, to guzzle ale in the
village
,
nor to quaff of old Zickland's cider-casks;
nor has old Zickland's watch-dog held me, as
he did the other night, by the coat-tail.
What was it, then, that kept thee? asked
the old woman, peering into his face with a
look of considerable anxiety and interest.
No less than that church mastiff, Deacon
Brangle, and his yoke-fellow Fishtyke, the
elder
.
They fastened on me with tongue and
teeth as I passed the parsonageand
demanded
,
whither I was going? for what purpose that
basket was meant? and whether you was at
home to-night?
A curse be on the tribe! said his aged
companion lifting her head up until her bowed
form was almost crect, and striking a staff
which she bore in her hand sharply upon the
ground. An old woman's curse light on the
meddlesome interlopers, the children of Belial
that will not let the musty taper of an old body's
life go out without helping it with a devilish
whiff of their pious breath!
Curse not so loud, if you please, Aunt
Gatty
,
said the young man, the big-eared dogs
are not far off, I reckon; for I saw them sneak
up into the shadow of the fence, as I left 'em,
with their faces turned this way.
If the evil will hear, let them hear,
continued
Aunt Gatty in a still louder voice in
spite of her companion's remonstrance, I
have been hunted like a paynter from Salem to
Weathersfieldfrom Weathersfield to
Harford
through
every hole and corner of the
coloniesand now they would worry me out of
this abiding-place with their horns of Jericho
and false shoutings and clamors at my heels?
The wrath of Aunt Gatty now sunk into a sul
len silence and they proceeded quietly in their
labor.
It's strange, Dick, she said at length in a
calmer tone, that men who spend an hour,
morning and arternoon, one day out of seven to
tell how much they love their brethren, will
harass an old woman who spends her time in
doing the same thing without sayin' anything
about original sin or her pious intentions
curing bodies more nor they cure souls, I'll
warrant!
It's the cock that mounts the fence and
splits his throat with crowing that lays no eggs,
you know, Aunt Gatty, replied Dick, with a
subdued laugh.
Yes, returned Aunt Gatty, adopting the
same strain, and you know, Dick, how often
deacon crow in the woods, visits about, in his
black coat, among the birds to see that they're
all in a plump, healthy condition
Particularly
'bout killing-time! interposed Dick.
Another brief pause now ensued, which was
interrupted again by Aunt Gatty's remarking
I trow, Richard, here is the finest
plantain-leaf
I've found this many a day: it's broad
enough to kiver any galled horse's haunch that
ever smarted, or to cure the pinch of the worst
witch that ever rode a bean-pole!
This observation was followed up by a long
and elaborate lecture on the various uses to
which plantain might be judiciously applied.
What's this? asked Dick at the close of
her shrewd observations, presenting an herb
with a small crooked root, and a smooth green
leaf something in the shape of an Indian
arrowhead
.
Thou art a pretty fellow, Dick Snikkers, to
gather yerbs! said the old woman taking the
plant and giving it a hasty examination
Why, this is nothing more nor less than colt's
foot. It 'udn't take a witch to tell thee that,
Dick! Come this way, Richard, she
continued
,
sitting down upon a rock in the middle
of the field, laying her crutch across her lap,
and placing the basket at her side, it's time
that you know'd the properties of yerbs:
eighteen, last shearing time, and not able to tell
old colt's foot!
Dick Snikkers at this bidding took a seat at
her side, and culling from the basket, herb after
herb, the old woman expatiated on its qualities
with a learned spirit.
Here's wild yisup, Dick, she said, you
must be kerful to tell it from balsam; which is
shorter and more bunch-like at top. It has a
pleasant smell, and is a very nice yerb, Dick.
Well should I know thee, yisup! holding a
bunch of it up and contemplating it with a
fixed
and thoughtful eye, for they gave thee to
the poor girl, Maggy Rule, of Salem, that was
possest by evil angels. They said, Richard, I
was her evil spirit!poor thing, she's in Heaven
now, and can tell whether old Gartred
Heerabout
ever harmed her life, in thought, word, or
look! Hush! said Dick Snikkers, I heard
some one over there by the sassafras tree.
At that moment the shadow of a man glided
behind
the trunk of a monstrous black walnut,
which overhung the brook; but the shade of
the tree prevented his being discerned by either
of the parties.
Pooh! said the old woman, listening
anxiously
for a moment, It's nothing but a dead
nut that fell from a dry limb.
'Tis more than that, Aunt Gatty, I'm sure,
responded Dick, for I heard something cough
like a manandharkthere's some one
answering
him over here by the elder-bushes!
I hear no noise, Dick; the moon has put the
whim into your heador elseit's nothing more
than a couple of hoarse crickets playing under
a sorrel patch!
From some source of other, however, Aunt
Gatty had been impressed with the necessity of
quitting the spot as speedily as possible and
obtaining
the shelter of a good roof. She
therefore
hurriedly closed her lecture, hooked the
basket upon her arm, seized her crutch, and,
followed
by Dick Snikkers, hastened away.
The next morning the sun, at an early hour
as it shone or rather struggled through a single
dusky pane in the eastern side of the vestry room
of the old Rye church, fell upon three men
seated at a triangular table, each at a side.
The silver-mounted cane of one of them lay
obliquely across the table, and the hats of all
three hung upon wooden pins fixed about the
apartment. One of the party was a
middle-aged
man with a long, dry countenance and a
complexion like a mulberry. His coat was
buttoned
up, in a threatening manner, from
waistband
to chin, and about his whole person and
bearing there was an air of pompous authority.
This matter must be looked to, said he,
throwing his head back into his coat collar,
advancing
his respectable paunch, and placing his
hands knowingly under the tails of his coat.
The Lord will not suffer the evil to triumph
nor will I. Blessed be the name of God, he
hath given unto us his inspired statutes; and as
first deacon of the Congregational
meeting-house
in Rye, Philip Brangle, will enforce
them, even unto the hanging of witches and
sorcerers!
There I differ from thee, Brother Brangle:
I hold that witches should be exterminated by
fire and fagot, for thereby the evil angel or
spirit is conquered with his own element, yea,
even hell-fire!
This heroic suggestion proceeded from the
mouth of Mr. John Fishtyke, elder, and a most
singular mouth it was, and still more singular
was the whole countenance to which it
belonged
.
Nature, from some unaccountable whim or
other, had seen fit to group all the features of
Mr. John Fishtyke in the very centre of his
face: his nose, eyes, and mouth, were huddled
closely together, leaving a very extensive suburb
of unsettled visnomy to lie barren beyond.
The elder's head from a front view was thus
made to resemble the human lineaments
painted
in the bull's eye of a large target.
I fancy not, continued the owner of this
paradoxical countenance, being dragged twice
through the pond by the same cat. Hanging
hath been tried and found of none effect. Were
not sorcerers and witches strung up like onions,
at Weathersfield and Salem, Deacon Brangle
and what did it avail? Did not withcraft
increase? Did not the lions and bears of hell
abound greatly thereafter?This is
pulpitnews
!
I care not to argue the question at this
present season, replied the
mulberry-complexioned
deacon. Hung she shall beIf I am
Philip Brangle, Deaconlike a dead skunk!
If she be not burned, by the grace of God,
I will yield up my eldership: burned to a black
crust, the foul hag!
I have picked the gallows tree: therefore
disquiet thyself no further, Elder Fishtyke!
retorted Brangle.
And I have chosen the fagots for her
burning, and they are now cleft in my door
yardso be at ease!
Thou art in league with the wretches, I
verily fear, Mr. Fishtyke: thou so strongly
urgest fire, in which thou knowest (being their
natural element) they may live like
salamanders
!
Has it come to this! exclaimed John
Fishtyke, advancing one leg before the other
and dashing his fist furiously upon the
triangular
table, while a general conflagration raged
in the unsettled outskirts of his physiognomy,
which gradually extended inward kindling his
eyes, nose and cheeks until his whole
countenance
was fairly a-blaze. Ha! ha! has it
come to this, I am colleague of witchesam
I?As true as the Holy One of Israel liveth
he was proceeding to utter some terrible threat
when he was interrupted by the gentleman who
occupied the third side of the triangle, who
mildly remarked, Before we proceed to hang
or burn the accused, would it not be well to
have evidence of her guilt?
Here was common ground for Brangle and
Fishtyke, who were not to be cheated of their
victim by the mere want of proofs, and they
both broke out together. Did I not see her
last night with her familiar, in Lyon's black
meadow, said Brangle, Giving him hellish
instruction in drugs, continued Fishtyke,
confessing
that she was Margaret Rule's evil
angel, said Brangle, and that she was the
worst witch that ever rode a bean-pole,
continned
Fishtyke. What was it she averred
concerning the lameness of Lyon's colt's foot?
That she had a hand in it, answered
Fishtyke
.
Pause, if you please, my friends, said
the mild man who was the clergymen of the
cure or parishWhat look and person had
her familiar?
In reply to this question, Deacon and Elder
again broke forth in a common cryA huge
black man with hair like white wool, said
Fishtyke.
D
A small white man with black hair, said
Brangle.
He bore an enormous matchlock in his
hand, said Fishtyke.
It was a slim fishing-rod, said Brangle.
Horns like an ox, continued Fishtyke.
A sailor's cap close to his head, methought,
said Brangle.
A long tail behind him like a whale.
A round-about and tight breeches.
Hold, gentlemen, interposed the mild
clergymanBe seated, an it please you.
Your testimony differs so widely as to the
personal
appearance of the woman's familiar or
goblin, I doubt whether it would be possible
for you ever to identify the supposed sorceress
herself. We had better proceed to the business
of our cure.
If you please, said the mulberry-faced
Brangle, rising with much solemnity,
embedding
his head in his coat collar, advancing his
swag-belly and adjusting his hands beneath his
coat-tail as before,If you please: the Lord
in his righteous and inscrutable providences
hath made Philip Brangle a Deacon and head
of the Rye Congregational settlement. The
duties, the cares, the labors, the anxieties of
that station he intends to fulfil until `Philip
Brangle' is indorsed on a silver plate upon his
coffin. As to this witchthis vile bosom-friend
and ape of the devilif ocular proof be not
sufficient, is there not enoughyea, more than
enough of other evidences?
As brief as convenient, Deacon Brangle,
interposed the mild clergyman.
Was it longer ago than last Sabbath day,
continued Brangle, that I saw her, at a public
meetingleave the church in haste and
forcibly
put to the door as she passed out. The
devil had sent for her and she must come!
It might have been the colic, suggested
the mild clergyman.
On the twenty-second of June last,
resumed
the Deacon, referring to a gilt-edged
note-book that he held in his hand, did I
not hear the sound of a trumpet, from her hovel,
late in the evening, summoning a meeting of
witches and sorcerers at that place?
It was the horn of the stage-driver, said the
mild clergyman, for I received a letter by the
same mail. He was detained beyond his hour
by a break in the Harlm bridge.
Nettled by this summary disposal of his
charges, he at length exclaimed, as if he
expected
to settle the question beyond dispute in his
own favor, by so cogent an evidenceDo you
tell me, sir, that the fowls of Mr. Deliverance
Lyon have not been under diabolical possession
ever since this Gad Heerabout came into these
parts? Have not many of them gone off the
roost and disappeared, none could tell whither!
What hath become of that fine cock-turkey
the pride of his yard? Whither have gone his
fatted geese and his noble brood of short-legged
hens? Evil angels have made way with them, I
fear; they have suffered sorely from spectral
visitation.
More probably converted into chicken-pie
and roasted birds, by Mungo Park, his head
slave: with Richard Snikkers as an
accomplice
,
suggested the mild clergyman.
Will you have the woman examined in our
presence? cried Philip Brangle, as a last resort.
I saw her just pass the door.
To that there can be no reasonable
hindrance
,
answered the clergyman, if it be done
soberly.
Thereupon Messrs. Brangle and Fishtyke
prepared to sally forth, arrest Gatty Heerabout,
and bring her before the parochial court.
It may be as well to observe in this place,
that Dick Snikkers, before the session of the
court began, had found his way under the floor
of the churchlifted a board, and climbing over
the pulpit, landed himself in a little terra
incognita
of an attic or garret above the small
vestry-room, in which it was assembled. Here,
through a knot hole, he had listened to all their
proceedings and enjoyed the inexpressible
pleasure
of observing the combustible countenance
of Fishtyke, and the mulberry complexion of
Deacon Brangle, in their various striking
phases.
As soon as the apprehension of Dame
Heer-about
was named, he had made his way back
into the open airleaped two or three fences
stood in the road before Aunt Gattyand
announced
to her their purpose of questioning her
in person.
Let them question, she replied, in answer
to Dick's information, standing erect and
turning
her face toward the churchI fear no
man, face to face, to answer unto the deeds
done in the body; as far as man may rightly
question. On to the meetinghouse: they shall
not be leg-weary nor arm-weary in dragging
me to the trial! Mastering her crutch with a
strong hand, and adjusting her bonnet carefully
to her head, she marched with a haughty step
toward the vestry-room. She arrived at the
door just as Brangle had planted his cane upon
the ground to take his first step towards her
apprehension.
How is this, Jezebel! he exclaimed, taking
her violently by the wrist; hast thou the
effrontery to approach the sanctuary so nearly
as this after leaving it as thou didst last Lord's
day.
Take off that hand, she exclaimed in turn,
or an acquaintance will be gotten up
forth-with
betwixt my staff and thy head. And so
saying she raised her crutch in token of the
promised introduction; but Deacon Brangle,
unwilling to trespass on her kindness in that
particular, speedily dismissed her hand from his
grasp.
The whole party was now assembled in the
vestry-room.
Gartred Heerabout, said the mild
clergyman
,
you have been suspected of witchcraft
by Deacon Brangle and Elder Fishtyke.
Whatever
I may think of the charges which have
been made against you, I was willing that you
should be examined in vestry before you were
called to answer for your life to the civil
magistrate
.
Deacon Brangle, you may examine her
temperately, if you please!
Woman! began Brangle, mounting to his
feet and serewing his countenance into a hard,
inquisitorial expressionWoman! were you
not out last night culling drugs, for hellish
purposes
,
in the black meadow? and instructing
your familiar goblin in the art of applying those
drugs to purposes of sorcery and witchcraft?
Answer as you value your soul!
Oh God! God! exclaimed the woman in
reply clasping her hands and raising them above
her head in an attitude and with an expression
of intense supplicationMerciful God! the
very bread that a poor old woman eats, turns
bitter in her mouth! My masters, she
continued
,
dropping her hands heavily upon her breast,
and turning her gaze upon the party about the
table, My masters, I am nothing but a poor old
herb-gatherer. If to soothe the lonely hours of
some broken, sickman, with a simple medicine
a plantain-leaf, a bit of birch bark, or a drink of
wild yisup tea, makes Gartred Heerabout a witch,
be she a witch to time's end and yea, for aught
I care, to eternity's endif such might be!
A confession as to the drugs, cried
Deacon
Brangle.
Palpably, responded Elder Fishtyke
what says the woman, touching the familiar
goblin, with her in the meadow?
It was Dick Snikkers, please your
worship
,
replied aunt Gatty, with a smile that
betrayed
something of contempt, helping me
gather the yerbsand I was telling him the
yerbs' qualities.
A fine fable, thou old brass-jawed hag; her
soul is in a hopeful way, is it not, think you,
brother Fishtyke? said Brangle, turning to
the elder; she exhibits observable symptoms
of a new creature!Poor wretch, thou hadst
better recal what thou saidst last night about
the bewitching of Margaret Rule of Salem! out
with it!
May the gracious One pardon thee for this
mistreatment of an old, friendless woman. I
never harmed theewhy shouldst thou
persecute
me? I never laid hand's-weight on child
or chick of thinewhy wilt thou smite me with
hard words? I am no witch, God knows, but
a simple, sarviceful old body, with a soul like
yourself, Deacon Brangle, believe it or not as
you choose!
The old woman dropped her head upon her
bosom and sobbed audibly and heavily; and the
mild clergyman was so much affected by her
emotion, that he was forced to turn his head
away to conceal a tear.
A soul like Deacon Brangle! cried the
vestryman
,
horror-struck with the supposition. A
soul like Deacon Brangle!thou art fool as
well as witch. Begoneit is folly to waste
words in examining such as thee. The rope of
the hangman will settle the matter before
sundown
begone!
In spite of the remonstrance and entreaty of
the clergyman, he enforced his command by
seizing
the old woman and dragging her forcibly
toward the door. Her spirit was aroused by
this unexpected insult, and, exerting a strength
not supposed to belong to her, she threw off his
grasp, and, standing proudly erect, exclaimed,
Wo upon thee and thine!henceforth for
ever
wo
and wailing without end! Or ever
the sun sinks, Gatty Heerabout, mayhap, will
be beyond reach of judge or deacon. With
these words she strided calmly and haughtily
away.
As she gained the door, Deacon Brangle said,
in a hushed and trembling voice, She is aided
by devils, I do believe; Satan, I verily fear,
wrenched her arm away from my hold; and,
as she disappeared, he lifted his voice and cried
out after herAvoid, thou she-devil, in the
name of God the Father, the Son, and the
Holy
Ghost, avoid!
As Deacon Brangle wended homeward from
the vestry-room, after the close of the morning's
business, he discovered Dick Snikkers sitting
upon the fence of Rye bridge, whistling with
all his might.
He presented to the vision of the deacon a
very singular and novel spectacle, having on
the upper part of his person a gay white
roundabout
and pear-shaped hat, and, on his nether
extremities, a pair of tight pantaloons, and low,
red shoes; and possessing, withal, a nose
turned
up slightly at the end, which gave a
humorous
appearance to his visage, and a set of
twinkling
,
black eyes, that kept a bright lookout
upon
the little, hooked feature just mentioned.
Add to this, that he now had both hands forced
vehemently into his pockets, and that both
cheeks were inflated with the blasts of wind
which supplied the clamorous music that
reached
Deacon Brangle's ear, and, we may
honestly
say that he furnished a rare and original
object
of contemplation.
Good morrow, your worship, said Dick
Snikkers, pausing just long enough in his labor
to utter these words, and resuming his musical
vocation as soon as they were delivered.
Good morning, Mr. Snikkers, responded
the deacon, darkening his mulberry complexion
with an incipient frown, with the expectation
of awing Mr. Snikkers into silence or a
petrifaction
,
you seem to be in fine spirits this
morning!
Only whistling a little for the consumption,
replied Dick.
Whistling for the consumption! exclaimed
Mr. Brangle, moderating the severity of his
manner, considerably, for his curiosity equalled
his pompousness every day in the week, except
vestry-meeting days and Sundays, that's a very
singular remedy, Richard, said he familiarly.
Not at all, your worship, answered Dick,
charmed with his style of address, and throwing
a queer look out of the corner of his eyenot
at all, your worshipwe poor folk can't afford
to pay the doctorso we must needs make
natur'
our mediciner. Now, in the matter of a
cold, Deacon Brangle, you'll obsarve, if you
was ever passing through a lane in a mornin'
after a chill, rainy nightyou'll obsarve a bird
on the end of every stake blowing it out strong
through his throat, like a young harry-cane
and what's it for? Why, they've all cotcht colds
over night, and they're a whistling 'em away!
At this profound and philosophical
explanation
,
the mulberry countenance of Philip
Brangle
because amazingly thoughtfulhe cast his
eyes in meditative glances upon the ground
and his chin sank inquiringly upon the
silver-mounted
extremity of his walking-stick.
It's so, your worship, said Dick Snikkers,
there can be no doubt on it. I've heard aunt
Gatty tell what I've told your worship more than
fifty times!
A strange woman, that Dame Heerabout,
said Brangle, lifting his mulberry features,
through which an altogether new expression
had suddenly shot. She's always observing
nature, I suppose, Richard? Night and day,
are, no doubt, all the same to her in pursuit
of this useful knowledgeis it not so, Mr.
Snikkers?
Does your worship observe anything green
in my left orb? responded Mr. Snikkers,
employing
a very elegant species of interrogatory,
which is ignorantly supposed to have sprung up
in these latter days, whereas, it was a common
topic of conversation in sop's time, between
the currant-bush and the gooseberry.
This question seemed to be so peculiarly
pointed
and pertinent, as to awaken Mr Brangle's most
powerful feelings in reply; and, hastily
converting
his mulberry into a deep red, he exclaimed
Thou beggarly scamp! how darest thou
talk in this way to Philip Brangle, first Deacon
of the Rye Congregational church? I'll teach
thee what becomes such fellows:You are
hereby summoned to appear before the
parochial
vestry of our church on Thursday
afternoon
next, at ten o'clock in the morning, to
answer for contempt of one of its officers, and
he handed to Mr. Snikkers a printed summons,
regularly filled up, with his own name inserted.
Mr. Dick Snikkers received the document,
and immediately, tearing two circular holes in
it, placed it in a very expressive manner across
his nose to mimic spectacles, and commenced
whistling a psalm-tune. Deacon Brangle had
cast his eye back to see how his decisive
service
of a church-warrant had operated on the
nerves of Dick Snikkers, just as that young
gentleman
had opened his concerto in glasses.
The sight was too much for the pious
Brangle
,
and, striding swiftly back, he cried out
I'm the vestry myself; I'll settle the contempt
on the spot; boy, I will wring thy nose!
Saying
this, he darted upon that organ of Dick
Snikkers like a pike-fish upon a fresh bait.
And I'll wring yours! retorted Dick Snik
kers, darting upon the same feature of Mr.
Brangle
.
Of the two, Snikkers might be considered
the more successful, as he did fasten upon the
knob of Mr. Brangle's face, whereas, Mr.
Brangle
merely managed to pass his thumb and
finger
over the extremity of a smooth willow
whistle
,
which hung at one of Dick Snikkers'
button-holes
.
However, he performed the whole
ceremony on it with the same hearty honesty
as if it had been the genuine organ, Dick
Snikkers
,
meantime, pulling away at the real nose
in admirable and muscular style.
At length Snikkers drew off, and Brangle
drew off, carrying with him a nose as red as a
brick with pulling, and Dick Snikkers' willow
whistle between his fingers.
Egad! said the deacon, with a horrible
chuckle, as he drew out the latter article, which
he had unconsciously thrust into his
coat-pocket
I
believe I've pulled the fellow's nose off.
Ah! starting back with a monstrously
chopfallen
countenance, what have we herethe
fellow's baby-whistle. It can't be that I was
tugging at this all the time, and an awful
sensation
thrilled through his mind; it must be,
I thought the seamp had got a strange notch in
his nose! With this last observation he
abruptly
pitched the toy over a stone fence into
the bushes, and hurried away meditating
revenge
,
and still more resolved to push the
matter
against Gatty Heerabout, in whose plans
this irreverent dog seemed to be an accomplice.
It may be well, however, to observe, that in
carrying
his schemes into effect he was doomed to
lose the valuable aid and co-operation of Mr.
Fishtyke; for that exemplary gentleman had
refused to have anything further to do with the
affair, when he found it impossible to obtain a
compromise suggested by him, by which Gatty
Heerabout was to be first burned to a crispy
or roasted-pig brown, and then hung by the neck
till dead! He therefore broke off all
connexion
with Deacon Brangle, vaunting that he
would, before long, get a witch to prosecute on
his own account!
As the sun sloped toward the west on the
afternoon
of that same day, and as broad masses
of its light entered the open door of a crumbling
cottage, or rather hovel, which stood upon the
brow of a hill, overlooking Rye, they fell upon
the form of old Gartred Heerabout, sitting in
a rush-bottomed chair, with a bible spread open
on her knees. The excitement of
long-continued
persecution and the sense of insult attached
to the charge of witchcraft, together with a
strong natural sensibility of character, appear
to have at length affected her reason, and as
she sat lonely and unfriended in her hovel, her
mind poured itself out in reminiscences of an
earlier and happier period of life, mingled with
bitter denunciations and gloomy forebodings of
some dreaded event near at hand.
The Lord will deliver him that is spoiled
out of the hand of the oppressor! she
exclaimed
,
adopting the phraseology of scripture. He
is against thee, oh inhabitant of the valley!
Go up to Lebanon, and cry; and lift up thy
voice in Beshan. Wo be unto the pastors that
destroy and scatter the sheep of my pasture!
saith the Lord. Do no wrong, do no violence
to the stranger, the fatherlessand then she
broke abruptly into a different strain.
Ah Dick, Dick, would that Enoch
Heerabout
were now livinghe was a comely man,
Dick, and would have been a good father to
thee, and thou shouldst have borne his name,
witch's son or nothose were brave days when
Enoch came a-wooing:
Were he as poor as Job,
And I in a royal robe---
Made Lord of all the globe,
He should be mine!
It's a long day that has no sunsetthe sun
looks blood-redwhat can that mean? she
exclaimed, starting to the door and gazing with a
wild and fixed eye upon the declining luminary,
which was just wheeling its broad and lurid
orb into the bosom of an oak forest that
crowned
a distant height.
At that moment an ominous sound reached
her earthe long, shrill whistle of Dick
Snikkers
or more properly Dick Heerabout,
followed
by the tramp of horsemen and the hurtling,
confused noise of a multitude drawing near. In
an instant more, a large crowd of men, women,
and children, appeared at the foot of the hill
with fiery and eager faces turned towards her,
and foremost among them she described Philip
Brangle with two officers on horseback. The
old woman stood rooted and motionless on the
threshold, gazing down upon the populace with
a look where madness and a certain native
heroism of character mingled, partly in wrath,
partly in scorn. For a moment the undaunted
front and noble mien of the accused old woman
held them silent and immoveable, but this
feeling
soon vanished.
Seize the hag! cried Deacon Brangle,
tie her hand and footsee if she will beard
the vestry again!
At this order two muscular and fierce-looking
men dismounted and led the way up the hill,
followed by Brangle, who had cautiously thrown
himself under the protection of this advanced
body. As they approached the house Gatty
Heerabout withdrew into the interior and they
gained an entrance without opposition or
difficulty
.
When they were within the apartment
they discovered her standing erect in its
extreme
corner holding on high in one hand her
bible, while the other was concealed in the
folds of her garments; a fierce, supernatural
fire kindling in her eyes.
Execute your warrant on her person! For
a moment they paused again until Deacon
Brangle cried out, Have her in custody
forthwith
.
We must be before the justice ere sun
down or we will have no hearing to day!
Thus urged on, the officers approached the
supposed witch, and in an unguarded moment,
while her eyes were turned thoughtfully on the
setting sun, they sprang upon her and held her
in a firm and apparently invincible gripe.
Once more vouchsafe thy strength, she
exclaimed, after she had recovered from the
sudden shock, casting her eyes toward heaven.
Once more only!Away, ye devils! she
shouted, exerting a giant's strength, casting the
stout men from her like childrenI will
render
my account to God! And before they
could recover their hold she had plucked a
dagger from her girdle, plunged it hilt-deep
into her bosomso that its point pierced her
heartand she fell heavy and lifeless to the
floor!
Balked of this victim, thus unexpectedly,
Deacon Brangle, now gave orders for the
apprehension
of her accomplice, Richard
Heerabout
;
but he, who had disappeared during the
confusion, was nowhere to be found, nor was
he ever after seen or heard of in those bewitched
and bloody regions!
DINNER TO THE
HON. ABIMELECH BLOWER.
It
is a fact, I suspect by this time, pretty
generally
circulated throughout Christendom, that
when an American politician gets to be a great
statesman; when he has achieved fame for
himself
and everlasting glory for his country, and
when nothing more can be done to complete
his renown, he takes hisdinner! When
his constituents have heaped upon him every
honorelected him to the common council
the state legislatureand, finally, expanded
him into that full-blown flower of human
greatness
,
a member of Congressthey express their
incapacity for any further bestowal of dignities
their sense of the utter hopelessness of any
higher elevation of the man in the esteem and
admiration of the world, by furnishing him with
as much roast-beef and salad as he can eat.
Adroit rogues! they manage to be present with
the great man at this his public ordinary and
masticating exhibitionthough absent.
His heavy constituent is served up by proxy,
in a surloin; his loquacious one in a calf's head;
and his busy, little, young admirer, the clerk
or the jeweller's apprentice, in a dish of eels.
His mechanical friend comes there in the guise
of a stuffed, brown duck, with its back to the
plate, sticking up its rough, hard web-feet, as
if it would take him stoutly by the hand. Thus
do his countrymen incorporate themselves with
the mighty statesman, and enjoy the proximate
delight of forming the future substance and
bulk of their idol.
The dinner to a great man is generally got
up by two newspaper editors one lean man, with
a long, sagacious nose, and a small boy. The
editors announce that It is the intention of a
large number of the constituents of the
Honorable
Mr.  to give a public dinner to that
4
eman
, at the earliest opportunity. The
long-nosed
,
lean man hires the room, and the small
boy distributes circulars.
A long-nosed lean mantwo editorsand a
small boy had performed their part of the
business
,
and the Honorable Abilemech Blower
was expected hourly by the afternoon boat, to
partake of a public dinner.
The newspapers were in an agony of
announcement
and expectation; the sun was on
fire with impatience; the streets were literally
parched and thirsty with suspense. The
ticket-holders
assumed clean collars and
handkerchiefs
,
and a crowd of anxious expectants was
on the wharf straining their optic nerves and
exhausting their nautical knowledge in
deciphering
the craft that came up the bay, and
distinguishing butter-sloops from steamboats.
The study of river navigation seemed to have
become an epidemic.
Several times the crowd thought fit to throw
itself into a state of intense and unnecessary
excitement.
There she isthere's the Aurora
High-flyer
,
said a large vagabond, who was
bursting
from every part of his dress, like an
enormous
monthly rose.
It is the HighflyerBlower's in the
High-flyer
I
know the Highflyer by her pipe and
the way she cuts the waterthe committee
engaged the Aurora Highflyer to bring on Blower
and twelve baskets of Amboy oysters for the
dinner!
The great vagabond had concluded his
explanatory
comments; the mob stood with its
nose in the air and its mouth agape, stretching
forward to catch the first glimpse of the
distinguished
member: the Aurora Highflyer was
hidden from view by a brig which was sailing
in the same direction and which kept such
equal progress as to conceal it for more than
ten minutes.
When the brig had arrived nearly opposite
the wharf; the supposed steamboat dropped
behind her stern and a fellow in a har-rim
standing in her bows, bawled out, Dash my
vitals! them chaps has come down to see the
race! Moses and Melchizedec, who'd ha'
thought it, Bill? This facetions personage, in
the ardor of a very lively and agreeable fancy,
supposed the crowd had collected to witness a
match between his mud-scow and the brig
Caroline
,
which had been advertised in one of the
penny papers!
At length the Aurora Highflyer did make
herself apparent: the mob caught sight of a
small man with a mysterious head, who very
obligingly stood on the upper deck with his hat
off making the most singular and condescending
faces at a huge, wooden spile, and bowing
obliquely toward the mob.
The mob were of course, excessively
delighted
and expressed their feelings as every
well-trained
mob does, by an extraordinary shout
and a still more extraordinary exhibitions of hats
and caps. The great man landed.
The crowd grew more affectionate and
admiring
;
they pressed closer and closer.
The committee were obliged every minute
to exclaim, for Heaven's sake, gentlemen!
don'tyou'll crush Mr. Blower! The great
man was finally thrust into a hackby a
broad-handed
member of the committee in so forcible
a manner that he came very near going through
the coach-window at the other side.
A portion of the mob, apparently anticipating
this movement, had planted itself on the
opposite
side of the hack, and obtaining a view of
the countenance of the honorable M. C. as it
bobbed that way, successfully executed three
cheers in a masterly style; the committee
mounted inthe door closed, and the hack
dashed up the street. When they arrived at
the saloon, where the dinner was in waiting,
they found the doors surrounded by a dense
throng who had assembled to take measure of
Mr. Blower's person with their eye and greet
him with their most sweet voices. His foot
had no sooner struck the pavement than a
general
Hurrah for Blower! split the air, and
gave an old woman who was sitting in a
window across the way, a very vivid idea of a
small earthquake. Nine cheers and an onion,
for Blower! shouted a discordant gentleman
of the opposite politics.
Give him a smellin'-bottlethe little
gentleman's
a-fainting! bawled a second, as Mr.
Blower turned pale at the thought of forcing
his way to the door through the well-packed
mass of people.
Fan him with a chip! cried a third.
Loosen his corsets! shouted a forth.
By dint of the active exertions of twelve
police-officers
with heavy sticks, and four private
friends of Mr. Blower, who marched before
him kicking the mob on the shins, the
Honorable
Abimelech Blower was at length safely
landed in the room provided for his reception,
with the loss of only one gold key out of the
bunch at the end of his watch-chain, and one
committee-man, who swooned at the
presentation
of a butcher-boy's fist directly under his
nose, and was obliged to be carried home.
Meantime the ticket-holders had rushed into
the saloon, and organized themselves by calling
a man with a small voice to the chair, and
appointing
fourteen vice-presidents, each one of
the fourteen having a pair of bushy whiskers,
and a gold chain slung like a bandit's
carbinebelt
over his breast. Only a single difficulty
arose in arranging the meeting to the entire
satisfaction of every one in it, and that was
simply that the room was intended to hold one
hundred and fifty, and exactly three hundred
purchasers of tickets were present. If they
should attempt to foist off upon them the amount
of dinner they were accustomed to serve up to
the number which the room held alone, it was
quite clear that some one hundred and fifty
good manly voices would be raised to the tune
of Give me back my dollar! These three
hundred gentlemen being concentrated in so
moderate a space, it was rather difficult to
decide
by what process the Honorable Abimelech
Blower was to be established in the chair left
vacant for him at the right hand of the
President
.
In fact, this very question came up for
discussion in the reception-room.
A significant stamping, like that given at the
theatre for the performers to come on, was
heard from the saloon and considerably
accelerated
the deliberations of the committee.
Time was pressing. The dinner was spoiling.
The Hon. A. Blower began to grow black in
the face. A messenger was sent round to learn
whether a passage could be made or obtained
through the main entrance. He returned, and
almost breathless with haste and horror,
reported
that the fat twins (two celebrated and
eminent feeders) were at the door, clamoring
to be admitted with their tickets. The
committee
now began to despair, when a little
man timidly suggested that Mr. Blower might
be got in, if he would consent, under the stage
by the way which the waiters adopted to hand
up their wine to those on the platform. Two
of the most influential members of the
committee
ventured to break it to Mr. Blower.
At first he was staggered, but recovering
from the shock, and after a brief consultation
with his appetite, he agreed to practise the
device.
A rumor now reached the saloon that Mr.
Blower was approaching. The three hundred
hungry gentlemen were awed into silence,
and every eye was turned eagerly toward the
door of the committee-room, whenunexpected
visiona heada good sized Sphinx-like
oracular
head, was put out of a trap-door
immediately
behind the president's chair.
Astonishment
seized the three hundred
ticket-holders
.
The head smiled. It was conjectured,
by some half dozen among the meeting, to be
the head of the Honorable Abimelech Blower.
The meeting shouted: the head smiled again.
The meeting cheered; the head was followed
by a pair of spare withered legs, and the
Honorable
Abimelech Blower stood before them.
The committee under the platform hurraed
and thumped the boards with their canes, as if
they were overjoyed at its successful delivery
of so great a birth. The rumbling noise under
the stage and the sudden appearance of the
distinguished
M. C. made it seem as if the earth
had gaped like another whale, and cast up from
its bowels a second Jonah: a very prophet.
Now that Mr. Blower was duly installed in
his place of honor, the dinner commenced after
a vigorous fashion. Sundry gentlemen in the
body of the saloon, appeared to adopt Mr.
Blower's countenance as a sort of seasoning for
their dishes; for they stole a glance at his
expressive
features and then took a mouthful; a
second glance, a second mouthful, and so on to
the end of the course. It gave a relish to their
viands. Mr. Blower, himself, fed in gallant
style. About him in a semi-circlea kind of
reverential, Druid's stone-arrangementthe
choicest dishes were assembled. A private letter
had been addressed to him at Washington by a
confidential friend to learn whether he
preferred
fresh shad or trout; oysters pickled or
in the stew, red pepper or black; and also
conveying
a general inquiry as to the game, wines,
&c., which would be most agreeable. In reply
he returned a double epistle written twice
across giving full and explicit information.
With that important state document in their
hands, a committee of three had made a circuit
of the markets, and been guided by it as strictly
and peremptorily as its author professed to be
by the sacred charter of the constitution.
The tour of all these edibles Mr. Blower made
with the solemnity and thorough self-devotion
which befitted the occasion. In his victorious
progress he spared no dish; he entered into no
truce or compromise with fish, flesh, or fowl;
he refused, with a sturdy love of self-enjoyment,
to negotiate with anything that stood before
him whatever winning shape it might assume.
It was a glorious spectacle to behold
Abimelech
Blower at his dinner. No wonder, three
hundred human beings were willing to be
packed
,
like damaged dry goods, into a small saloon.
No wonder they volunteered a dollar a piece to
get in. No wonder, they patiently endured the
heat and suffocationin truth, almost
purgatorial
,
of a close, narrow room! Abimelech
Blower at his dinner was a sight Jupiter might
have left his thunder, and Bacchus his cups, to
look upon.
Extravagant and improbable as it may seem,
the Honorable Abimelech Blower
did
at length
finish his dinnerhe absolutely brought it to a
close! The wine was then introduced. The
President thereupon arose, and, in his
peculiarly
small voice, said that he felt himself highly
honoredLouder! shouted an impudent
fellow who had stolen an advance upon the
meeting, of three glasses, he felt himself
highly honored in being the instrument to
convey
to that respectable and intelligent audience,
a sentiment which he knew would meet a
cordial response in the bosom of every
gentleman
present. In presenting it, he should say
no more than to simply add that the subject of
it was a patriot, a scholar, an orator, and a
citizen
,
unrivalled in the four quarters of the
globe (cheers). As a patriot he had given
his time to his country for the last twenty-five
years, at the very moderate rate of eight
dollars
per day (enormous applause); as a scholar,
his pamphlet on the Tonawonda system of
cultivating
the prairies had gained him immortal
honor throughout the whole state of New York
(ecstatic vociferations); as an orator, his great
speeches on the Panama mission and on the
question of conducting the debates in both
houses of Congress in the Iroquois, have placed
him in an enviable position before the world,
beside Demosthenes and Cicero (hysterical
hurrahs
);
as a citizen, you all know him, and
love to know that his manly form is the growth
a true native plantof your own soil! At
the close of this catalogue of Mr. Blower's
excellences
irrepressible cheers broke out, like
an erysipelas, all over the meeting. The
native
plant, however, sat rooted to its chair,
very quiet and self-composed under this pleasant
irrigation; or rather his face seemed to bud
forth certain complacent smiles and twinklings
which shot about his eyes and the corners of
his mouth, like garden fire-works.
Gentlemen, continued the President in
his small, small voice, I have the honor to
offer you, THE
Honorable Abimelech Blower
.
The phnix of his party, he springs, louder!
shouted the impudent fellow again,The
phnix of his party he springs,louder!
cried the inexorable, impudent man, I can't,
exclaimed the President, pale with smothered
rage: nevertheless he proceeded, he springs
from the ashes of corruption which surround
him, and, like Hercules tears his (sh-i-r-t
suggested the impudent, drunken man as the
president paused in doubt over his paper) his
De-janeiras garment from him and springs into
the flame to save his country.
This admirable and explicit toast was
received
with unbounded demonstrations of
applause
,
and in about two minutes after they
had subsided, the meeting took to their bottles
and Mr. Blower to his legs.
Fellow-citizens, said he, calmly
withdrawing
a large bandanna from his left
coat-pocket
,
no event of my life is more gratifying
to me than this reception: it is the proudest
the very proudest moment of my existence.
The sentiment which you have had the
kindness
to receive so warmlyis only too
complimentary
,
too flattering. To be a phnix under
any circumstances, gentlemen, must be highly
gratifying to any man's feelings, but to be the
phnix of the party of which I am an humble
advocate, is an honor too greattoo
overwhelming
for
any human being. I thank you,
Mr. President and fellow-citizens, for the kind
compliment, I thank you with all my heart,
and from the bottom of my heartbut I feel
I fearI am not sure but that I am unworthy
of the eulogy. He then proceeded to handle
the allusion to Hercules in a similar manner,
and in due time came to his systemthe great
system of which he was the father and
promulgator
.
As to the system which I have had the
honor to advocate, for the last three yearsand
which I have at length succeeded in carrying
through both Houses of Congress by a triumphant
majority (cheers)I allude to the system of Short
Commons (continued cheering)the system
which has routed beershops from the capitol and
banished gingerbread establishments from the
halls of legislation (vociferous applause); as to
this system, gentlemen, which I victoriously
brought to a third reading, and pushed to a
successful
decision after a hard-fought and exciting
debate of two days and two nightsI shall not
enter into its amazing results and consequences
at the present time! Its moral bearing upon the
destiny of the worldits influence upon the
business of Congressand the support which it
indirectly and collaterally lends to the
constitution
of the United Statesare too obvious to
require explanation.
Here the fourteen vice-presidents sprang upon
their legs in a body and cheered in magnificent
stylea fat reporter in a small gallery behind
the speaker grinnedthe meeting clamorously
hurraedand an elderly gentleman who couldn't
get a seat and wanted exercise, put his hat
upon his cane and whirled it around in the air,
in a most fascinating manner.
Mr. President, in urging this great measure
upon Congress, I invoked the spirit of liberty
to come to my aidI felt it my duty to invoke
that spirit; I called upon the fathers of the
Revolution to appear before me, to stalk forth
in their grave-clothes upon the floor of the
House and animate me in the glorious cause.
At this moment a noise of cracked bells and
harsh voices from without volunteered to mingle
itself with the sound of the speaker's eloquence.
`Appear before me,' I exclaimed, continued
Mr. Blower, `ye heroes and sages, in your
funeral shrouds and ghastly visages, and infuse
the vigor of your presence into my bosom!'
A tumult was heard at the doora slight crash,
as if a panel or two were resigning their places
in the door-framean officer's voice was raised
in the uproarand a dozen or two hard-featured
fellows rushed infollowed by a miscellaneous
throng. They distributed themselves quietly
through the gallery, and the speaker, somewhat
astonished at this rough parenthesis in the
proceedings
continued,
suddenly abandoning the
track of apostrophe, which he perhaps thought
had been full speedily and promptly answered.
My learned friend, said he, smiling upon
the small-voiced President, has spoken of me,
in terms of kind commendation, as a patriot, a
statesman, and an orator. But, gentlemen,
whatever gratification it may afford me to know
that I have been able in my time and in the
course of my life to render some service to my
country in these capacities (Cut that man's
head off! shouted the impudent man, who
was in his fifth bottle); I feelI know that
my deepest source of satisfactionthat which
gives me most consolation and solace, is that,
amid all the corruptions and debaucheries of
party, I have been enabled to sustain my purity
and remain an honest man! An uproar of
applause
now burst from every quarter of the
room, slightly seasoned and qualified however
by the voice of a big, pale man in the gallery.
Pay me for them Wellingtons you've got
on, Blower, shouted the big, pale man, who
appeared
to be a cobbler, from his complexion and
the earnestness with which he demanded an
equivalent for the nether integuments of Mr.
Blower's person.
The character of our country,
fellow-citizens
,
continued Blower again rapidly
abandoning
his train of remark to get on less perilous
groundThe character of our country has
been to me a source of anxious attention.
I'd like to have you settle for those plushes
and silk vesting! modestly suggested a little
tailor who was leaning over the railing.
This principle I brought from my cradle
and shall carry to my gravesustaining it here
and everywhere while life is granted me.
Couldn't you arrange our small bill for
groceries, Mr. Blower, shouted the impudent
man, who proved to be the out-door partner of
the firm of Firkin & Muzzy, retail grocers
it's been running more than four years.
This was too much for the admirers of the
Hon. Abimelech BlowerTurn him out
hustle him! shouted fifty voices all at once.
Pass him down!
Now when it is considered that the doomed
man had established himself in the remote
upper
corner of the room, and that the door
through which he was destined to make his exit
was at the opposite extremity, it will be readily
perceived how pleasant a prospect of travel Mr.
Muzzy might reasonably indulge in.
An assemblage of human beings is often
compared
to a sea.
Boisterous and dreadful, indeed, was the
ocean on which the ill-fated Muzzy was now
embarking. God assoil thee, poor man! if
thou passest safe through yonder narrow straits,
yeleped the outer door.
Pass him down! shouted a dozen voices
at the lower end of the room.
In a trice, the call was answered by the
sudden
elevation of Mr. Muzzy some six feet in
the air. Being let down by this billow he fell
into a horrible vortex of stout-handed men, who
whirled him round and round, and then yielded
him to the current which set toward the door.
He next struck in a gulf-stream of muscular
fellows
,
who hurried him forward at something
like fifteen knots an hour. Thus he pitched
from one raging wave to another, sometimes
being borne toward the right wall and
sometimes
toward the left, as the fanciful humor of
the channel varied. Sometimes he landed
among a party of quiet, elderly gentlemen over
their wine, where he rested a moment, as it
were, between two breakers, and looking around
him with pallid visage, thought the tempest was
past. In a second, the gale would spring afresh,
and he would be clutched up, and vexed
dreadfully
between two tides which both set against
him with rapacious fury. At length he was
caught up by a mighty billow, in the shape of
two master bakers and a brewer, and dashed
through the dangerous gut toward which he
had been making such perilous progress. On
taking an observation, he discovered that he
was stranded on the curbstone, with his
timbers
considerably loosened and his rigging
damaged. In fact, he found himself in a round
jacket (instead of a long tail dress coat, in
which he had entered) and frightened half out
of his wits. Without stopping to fabricate any
moral reflections on the event or to calculate
the extent of his loss, he made a very rapid
pair of legs down the street.
The Honorable Mr. Blower resumed, and
continued
,
without further interruption, to entertain
the assemblage with an able and eloquent address
in which the wordsmy countrypatriotism
our free institutions(three cheers)down to
our posterityreceived from our ancestors
(applause)humble advocatepublic career
the constitutionthe glorious constitution(six
cheers)enemies of human freedom trampled
under foot(nine cheers)occurred at regular
intervals, variegated with allusions to the
personal
determination of the speaker to stand by
his principles, and all that. The honorable
gentleman sustained an even flight of this kind
for about two hours, during which the fat
reporter
in the small gallery took the liberty to
cultivate his somnolent powers, with no
despicable
degree of vigor and enthusiasm.
Mr. Blower was proceeding to introduce his
peroration, with nine apostrophes to liberty,
and four distinct and astounding
interrogatories
to the crowned heads of Europe, when
suddenly
,
and without notice, the gas-lights
extinguished
themselves in a body. Upon this,
several
clear and musical yells were raised by the
hard-featured gentlemen in the gallery, and
innumerable
missiles began to be distributed
pretty
freely through the saloon. From the
number
that reached the Honorable Abimelech
Blower, that gentleman formed a sudden
conception
that he was becoming the general
centre
of attack, and that the whole meeting had
risen to a man and was bestowing its favors
upon
his person.
The committee having likewise arrived at
a somewhat similar conclusion, they thought it
came within their powers to smuggle the
person
of Mr. Blower through the door in the
platform
,
and they accordingly did so, with such a
degree of precipitancy as to draw the
port-winecolored
coat which he had on, entirely over his
majestic features. The small-voiced president
they threw in to make sure that all was packed
snug below. The rioters not having learned
the abduction of the Honorable gentleman,
continued
to play their missiles toward the spot
which he was supposed to be occupying, until,
at length, a misdirected bottle struck the fat
reporter
directly upon the nape of the neck, and
sent him home to write out the speech he had
and had not heardto say that, everything
went off in capital stylethat the address
of the Hon. Mr. Blower was brilliant and
thrilling
;
and surpassed all his previous masterly
efforts
and
to have a mustard plaster applied
to his occiput! Champaigne-bottles,
wine-glasses
,
and broken noses, were meantime dealt
about with the most astonishing prodigality, in
the body of the saloon, till daylight looked in at
the windowswhen the survivors adjourned.
Two of the committee of reception, who had
become personally responsible for the bills, on
looking over the account which was handed in
the next morning, and in which to breakage
doz. champaigne-glasses; doz.
wine-bottles
(best green glass); fifty window-lights;
gas-fixtures; one large chandelier (entirely
destroyed
figured conspicuouslyand on
receiving
a note from the fat reporter, stating that he
should immediately commence an action of
damages
for the disablement of two arteries and
one spinal marrow, unless some satisfactory
arrangement was madeabsconded.
When it is suggested that they left behind
them two tailor's billsa running account with
a butcher and baker a-pieceand no chattels,
real or personal, save two or three
walking-sticks
and seven small children, it will be at
once conjectured how enchanting a prospect
there was of these new demands being met by
cash payments!
THE DRUGGIST'S WIFE.
Harvey Lamb
was a poor druggist in the
city. He was very poorhis life ebbed on in a
meager channel, with a scanty tide that barely
kept him from sinking. He was not born poor,
nor had he become poor through unthrift or
improvidence
,
but by one mischance and another
a misfortunea Ioss at seaan unexpected
turn of events, he had been gradually brought
down the fair mountain-side, into the low vale
of sorrowful and barren poverty where he now
dwelt. Whatever of flickering splendorof
past pomp or glory of condition had been left to
him after all this, sickness, like a hard creditor,
had stepped in, and with her pale, slow, but
inevitable hand, swept from the stage. The
lights were extinguishedthe curtain was torn
downthe scenery (which, in truth, had been
to him scarcely more than imaginary)the fairy
coloring and decoration of his boyhood, were
vanished from his view. He was very poor,
but not without consolation. His treasury of
mere money, it is true, was exhaustedbut
there was one that presided over the exchequer
whose resources scarce ever ran low. Fancy,
a true poet's fancy, made a noble mistress of
the mint. She was ever ready to meet his
demands
smilingly
to give him bills and drafts
(such as they were) upon the future. It was
sufficient luxury for Harvey Lamb to live
under
the bounty of this generous dispenser. Grant
him but lifelife in its poorest, frailest form
and the free indulgence of his fanciful humor,
and he was content. In the dungeon or the
prison he would have slept at casegive but
fancy, sweet, radiant creature, for his jailer!
He would ask no wider limits than she could
grant.
He was very poorbut he had a faithful,
fond wife. Mary Lamb was all that the wife
of such a man should be. She was not a copy
of her husband in every quality; her faculties
were not necessarily matched, head and head
with his. On the contrary, Mary Lamb, was,
as it were, a continuation of Harvey Lamb
a pleasant supplement, almost equalling in
value the original volume itselfin which,
whatever was dark in the first, was cleared up
whatever obscure, expoundedwhatever weak,
strengthened and sustained. She was just what
a wife should benot a rival to her husband
for that would be harsh and unmeeta source
of jarring discords and unfriendly soundsbut
a sweet possessor of other powerssome
lighter
,
some deeperby which the double joythe
twin being of wedded life, was made complete.
Oh! what a blessing is poverty, to spirits like
these! It wrought upon them its triumphant
miracles. It revealed to them the great secret
how all-in-all two beings may be to each other,
when they become nothing to the world, and
the world is nought to them; for poverty, like
fame, holds a trumpet in her hand, and with it
summons from the breast the noblest strength
and kindliest feeling of our nature. From
the deep places of the heart, great emotions
heaven-like attachments, come flocking to the
call of its sad music, like sea-nymphs from the
vast ocean, at the sound of Triton's wreathd
horn.
Harvey Lamb, with his wife, lived in an
obscure
street, in a single, small room, in the
front of which he kept his little shopa scanty
assortment of drugs and vials. This was their
only source of revenue. The business which
was there carried on was of the most trifling
sort; a fanciful old neighbor would now and
then send over for a pennyworth of saffron for
her canary-bird; or a dry, shrug-shouldered
Frenchman, up the street, would send down for
a little brimstone for his dogon, heaviest of
his professional undertakings, he would be
called upon to bleed an apoplectic alderman,
who lived round the corner, fronting the square.
Thus year after year passed away. Harvey
Lamb heard the din and tumult of the
money-making
world, but remained unmoved. Strange
man! he saw the rich merchant crash by in his
equipage, his face all wrinkled with care, and
erect with importanceand yet felt no
ambition
to take the road for wealth, to pant upon the
course for the prize of plate!
Poor fool! he sat behind his counter
scribbling
poetry or dreaming it.
At length Harvey Lamb was taken sick. At
first it was mere weakness; but in a short time
it assumed the pale-red guise of a decline. He
was brought to his bed and bound there by the
disease; and yet it was wonderful how fancy
still held her swaywearing her crown of
flowers
,
and waving her ivied sceptre with the same
galliard and daring air as in his hour of perfect
health. His thoughts ran more sparkling than
ever; his dreams were more populous with
golden
creatures; his visions came to him
freighted
more and more with the perfume of the
pleasant
world of faery.
Mary, said he, one morning to his wife,
who stood by his bedside, ministering to his
illness
Mary,
I shall leave you no child as a
legacy by which to remember me! When I
depart
,
you will be alone in the worldalone,
without friend or comforter!
Oh! talk not so, my dear husband! talk
not so; you are child and father to me now,
and I trust will remain so, ever and ever while
we are on earth. Tinge not your thoughts, my
dear Harvey, with these sad colors of death!
She sank upon his face, and, bestowing on his
lips a fervent kiss, she sat down in a chair and
wept.
This is folly, Mary, answered her
husband
,
utmost folly. I fear not death, why
should you? Nothing can be pleasanter and
sweeter than death. To lie down in a retired,
country grave-yard, in a cheerful sleep, like
that which the violets enjoy before they show
their glad, fragrant faces upon the earth; to
listen
with a calm earif the dead may listen
to the thousand busy sounds that nature makes
along the round surface of the globe; to
hearken
to thesethe faint, gentle whisper of the
spring grass, as it first shoots from the mould
(noise heard only by dead and immortal beings)
the rustling of the lark's wings as he takes
his morning farewell of the earththe snake's
gliding noise,the crickets chirpthe
fountain's
bubbling harmonythese are the
entertainments
provided for us in our last home!
Blessedthriee-blessed tenement!
Long, long may it be ere you remove from
this home to thatdingy though it be! sobbed
his wife, taking him by the hand, and gazing
earnestly and kindly in his face.
Oh, Mary, fear not, he replied, I shall
visit you again. When I have left the flesh,
nothing will please me more, as a disembodied
spirit, than to revisit my old haunts and my
old friends. I shall come back, you may be
sure, to see how you bear your widowhood. I
shall look into the money-drawer, and learn if
it has grown heavier or lighter since I left. You
must leave the old, dark sign, with my name on
the door, Mary, so that I can find the shop!
You are talking wildly, I fear, my dear
husband
!
said his wife, who, in spite of her
reason
,
was carried along on the stream of his
fastflowing
fancies.
It will be so, it will be so, he continned,
I shall come back to see whether you grow
old and sorrowful when I am awayto learn
how time passes with you. I shall visit you in
spring, for that is your cheerfullest season of
the year. You must be in a joyous mood, so
that I can tell how near like heaven a pleasant
face may make a little corner of the earth like
thislook!I shall return to find how our
little
neighbor improves with his violin; whether
Mrs. Pegg's canary has got well of his new,
everlasting coldand to learn whether the moss,
in the caves of the house, preserves its green
old youth as fresh as ever!
Thus, the sick man kept climbing an endless
Jacob's-ladder, building pile of fancies upon
pile, and deseending each time, as it were, with
a face glowing with the hues of one who had
for a while breathed a heavenlier climate, and
enjoyed a nearer access to the mysteries of the
life that is to come.
The next day after this, it was evident that
the disease was beginning to triumph over his
frame. He refused to allow a physician to be
summoned. He wished to die in peace, with
none to look upon his face but his fond wife,
and no face to mar the quiet scene of departure
but hers. When the discovery of the fatal
character of his illness first broke upon her
mind, she was overwhelmed. For a time she
was stunnedand then, almost frantic with
sorrow. But she was unwilling that one so
near and dear to her should leave the world
beholding
her agony and distress. She would not
disquiet his last moment (if she could) with a
single
uneasy or repining thought.
She restrained her grief and listened in
silence
,
as her dying husband spoke of the
parting
which he felt to be near at hand.
Mary, said he, looking fondly, and with a
melancholy smile upon his wifeMary, I hear
the bell tolling for the departure of a poor man.
For a day there will be a black thought upon
the memories of a few kindly neighborsmy
gravestone, as the newest in the yard, will be
read for a week or soand I shall have closed
all my account with the world!
As he spoke, a long, lean, spectral cat glided
in at the door, and the sound of children at play
upon the walk, came in through the opening
and the beat of a drum, rumbling in a far-off
street, was faintly heard.
I will close the door, said Mary, rising to
accomplish her purpose.
No, no, said he, let me hear the sound
of human voices. Let me have all the stir of
life without, in its most joyous noises, as I
leave; for where I go I shall find them all,
only
in purer and gayer shapes. Throw open the
door, and the casement too, my dear, I wish to
look upon the flowers in the window across the
way.
She stepped to the casement to gratify the
dying man's wishshe lifted the window
half-way
upheard a faint sighand turning, found
herself a lone widow in the desolate chamber!
That same day, toward the evening, Mrs.
Lamb had been seen leaving the shop, with her
bonnet and shawl. That night passed, and she
returned not. A poor boy, living in the
neighborhood
,
had closed the doors, and put up the
shutters of the shop windows. The next day
passed away, and the next, and no tidings were
heard of the absent woman. On the third day
it chanced that an uncle of Harvey Lamb had
come into town from the country, and calling
at his drug store was astonished to find it closed,
and an air of gloom hanging about it and the
whole street. When he learned that Harvey
Lamb was indeed dead, he was still more
astonished
,
no word of his illness having ever
reached
his ears before.
And now that the sad story was told, in all
its completeness, his duty was clear. He had
the body properly prepared and provided with
a coffin, and, departing, took it with him into
the country to lay it in his old, ancestral
grave-yard
,
beside his mother, his sister, and his little
brother, that had died many, many years ago.
On the Sunday of the next week, Mary Lamb
returned, her hair dishevelled, her dress soiled,
and her face haggard with fatigue, hunger, and
exposure. To many questions she answered
not a word; but entering the house, and finding
the corpse removed, she gave one loud, piercing
shriek, and with a small bundle of clothes in
her hand, again departed. Choosing a street
which led directly into the suburbs of the town,
she hurried forward as if some matter of life
and death hung upon her steps.
Crowds of people were on their way to church,
and as she mingled with the stream and passed
on, every eye was turned upon her in pity and
wonder. Some of the more thoughtful and
compassionate
would have stopped her, and inquired
into her trouble and suffering; but there was
that of wildness and mad resolve about her
look, which too plainly told that she would
not be questioned, or that questioning would
be fruitless.
The next morning she was seen crossing the
fields beyond the skirts of the city, having passed
the night God only knows where! Alas! how
many poor wretches are there who appear in the
morning and disappear at night-fall, whose hours
of rest and slumber go by in unknown and
pitiless
places! How many to whom the sun seems
to be their only friend, and who skulk away
when he has setcare-worn, heart-broken
and hide themselves in haunts which the wild
beast itself would shun!
Early spring was beginning to gladden the
earth, but the poor, desolate woman walked on,
taking no heed of the sweet-scented buds that
smiled forth along the road, upon which she
was now travelling.
She had left the beaten turnpike for a
moment
,
and taken the high bank which skirted
close to the fence, and was strolling along the
foot-path when she saw two or three boys in a
tree over the stone wall, fixing a bird-cage among
its branches. Getting over, she came under the
tree, and exclaimed, looking into the face of a
smiling little boythe youngest of the three
Can you tell me, child, where Harvey
Lamb was buried?
The little boy instantly came down, and going
up to the questioner, took her hand and said,
No, ma'am, but grandfather is buried over in
that orchard; and the child turned and
pointed
to a gravestone in the far part of the orchard,
a tear starting meanwhile into his sad little
blue eyes.
But Harvey Lamb's grave,child, I must
find that!
Grandfather's grave is the only one near
here, replied the boy. He died before mother
and sister and my two auntsso he lies all
alone over in the field.
The little boy's genuine kindliness had won
the poor widow's heart and drawing him to her
bosom, she gave him a fond embrace, and wept
warm tears to think that no such blessed pledge
had been ever granted to her.
There's a graveyard by the church, good
woman, said the boy, in answer to a second
question of Mary Lamb, come, I'll show you,
ma'am, it's only up the road a little ways.
Saying this, the child took her again by the
handled her through the bars (which he let
down) into the road, and up the road they
journeyed about half a mile, when they turned
down a lane, and in a moment more were in
sight of the tombstones of a country
church-yard
.
It stood upon a point of land around
which a calm current flowed, lending to the
neighboring graves a type of that rest which
none but the dead can know.
The little boy threw open the graveyard
gate, and exclaiming, The sexton's in there
now, digging a grave for old Billy! seampered
off back to his companions.
As Mary Lamb entered the burial-place, she
heard a voice, apparently issuing directly from
the bosom of the earth, singing
Care not I
How deep they lie
Five feet or five feet ten.
They've served their time upon the earth:
They've had their wedding and their birth;
Their frolie, holiday and mirth:
They'll serve their time below.
Care not I
How deep they lie.
On approaching the particular spot from
which it seemed to bubble up, and looking down
into a pit some four feet deep, she beheld a
little, bald-headed man, with his jacket off,
toiling away, like a mole, in the earth.
Can you tell me where Harvey Lamb is
buried? said the widow, asking her perpetual
question.
Not in my yard! answered the little
sexton
gruffly, not deigning to look up.
Pray, sir, can't you tell me where Harvey
Lamb's grave is? persevered the poor woman,
something betraying itself in her tone which
touched the little sexton's feelings.
There's no Lambs buried in my yard,
answered
he; nor there hasn't been a Lamb
laid in, since old Billy Hubbard's father's grave
was dug, and that was the first grave that was
ever made here. And now I am making a house
for old Billy No. 2old Billy's son. They was
very quarrelsome in their lives, but now they're
a-going to lay next to each other, as quiet as
young sparrows. Death's a mighty leveller,
madam, said the little sexton sententiously,
now, for the first time, looking up.
Gracious, my dear, exclaimed the
gravedigger
,
as his eye fell upon the trouble-worn
and mournful features of the poor widow, you
look very pale. Have you lost any dear friend?
Old Billy's no kin, I hope: if so, I beg your
pardon. By this time he had lifted himself
out of the unfinished grave. Come along
with me, whose grave was it you wanted to
find?
Harvey Lamb's.
Harvey Lamb'ssome old uncle or
ancestor's
,
I suppose, continued the garrulous and
really good-humored little sexton. Come
alongmy wife may be can help youshe's
kept a book of all the deaths and burials in
these parts for twenty-years, beginning with
old Daniel Hubbard (Billy's father), and
running
down to an unweaned babe that died this
morning of a small brain fever. Come along.
Across the disordered mind of Mary Lamb a
hope now gleamed, that she might be able to
find the object of her painful searchthe grave
of her husband. She was received very kindly
by the sexton's wife, who, when she learned
the melancholy nature of the poor woman's
visit, immediately produced a soiled old
blankbook
,
which she handed to her visiter.
Eagerly was it seized by the anxious woman,
and hastily was it examined. There's no
such name there! said she, giving it back to
the sexton's wife, with a tone and look as if
her very heart was breaking. It's not there
I must begone on my business. She would
have immediately gone forth and perilled the
exposures and the damp and the darkness of
another night spent in the cold air, had not
the good old couple entreated her, with almost
tears in their eyes, to stay with them until the
morning at least. She did at lengthtaking
her evening meal with themand enjoying a
slumber (broken indeed with strange images
and phantasies of the brain) under their roof
but when the morning came she was up and
had stolen away before any one was stirring of
the sexton's household.
Day after day did Mary Lamb ramble over
the country, putting to every one her constant
question. The death's bolt which had stricken
down her husband, had pierced her heart
beyond
all remedy. From the moment when she
had found herself a widow in the silent
chamber
,
thought, reason, and restraint, seemed to
have abandoned herdesolate as she was
before
.
The husband that she loved appeared to
be ever gliding before her, beckoning her
forward
with a shadowy hand, and with that pale,
sad look which was upon him when he died
upon the pilgrimage she had begun. Onward
she rambled with hasty stepsmaking herself
familiar with the names of the dead in every
village and country church-yard, and perusing
the silent pages on which their departure was
recorded with a mournful eagerness.
Sometimes, in the different parts of the
country
she had visited, a rumor prevailed that a
mad woman had broken into a church and
carried
off the sexton's register. At others, that a
wild female had been seen strolling about the
fields, or sitting under the trees, earnestly
perusing
papers which she held in her hand, or
tearing them piecemeal and scattering them
along the lanes and highways.
One day she came to a quaker place of burial,
and entering it through the gate, began her
customary examination of the head-stones,
sitting
upon the green graves and reading the
inscriptions
,
while her face was pale and flushed
by turns as hope or fear predominated.
She had at length grown weary and, for a
moment pausing from her task, sat down under
the fence and commenced chanting,
In the cold earth my love lies cold;
Oh tell me gently where he lies?
Is it beneath a flowerless turf
Or do the blue-bells' smiling eyes
Spread o'er his grave their cheerful dyes?
Where buttercups in golden colors glow
There lies my love asleep.
Lie still, my love! and till I come,
A calm, unbroken slumber keep!
It chanced, while she was singing, that there
was another person in the farther part of the
graveyarda venerable old quaker, who had
come there to visit the grave of an only
daughter
,
that had been buried the day before. The
plaintive voice of Mary Lamb reached his ear.
Daughter, why dost thou weep? said the
old man, approaching her. I have cause to
mourn, for I have lost my only childmy dear,
sweet Anna, the stay and comfort of my old
agebut wherefore dost thou, so young and so
lovely, weep?
Mary lifted her eyes, and answered him with
her customary old question, Can you tell me
where Harvey Lamb is buried?
It was of him, then, daughter, that thy
verses spake! LambHarvey Lambthere are
none of that name buried here; but, let me
considerthere was a Lamb buried somewhere
lately. Oh! it was over at Mount Pleasant! a
young man, I think, brought from the city
there was a strange story told of him.
It was my husbandmy dear, dear
husband
!
cried the widow. It was Harvey
he came from Mount Pleasantstrange that I
never thought of it before, was it not?
This was the first time that the idea of her
husband's being buried among his fathers had
crossed her bewildered mind, and she would
have set out for the spot at once, had not the
old quaker delayed her almost by force, and
insisted
upon her going home with him, and
taking
rest and food.
It was in the close of the afternoon, and the
sky began to be overcast. In a few moments,
Mary Lamb and her companion were within
his dwelling, just as the first drops of the
shower
pattered upon the door-steps. The
benevoolent
old quaker introduced her to his wife, and
they sat down to the evening meal. The meal
was finished, and Mary said that she felt
wearied
,
and wished to lie down. The old quaker's
wife thereupon conducted her up stairs, and led
her into a neat, clean room, furnished with a
bed, every appointment of which was as fresh
as April snow. Bidding her a kind good-night,
the quakeress withdrew. She had no sooner
left the apartment, than Mary Lamb slipped on
her bonnetcautiously opened the doorand,
gliding gently down stairs, stole out of a
sidedoor
which led into the garden, and hastily
surmounting
the garden fence, found her way into
the open fields.
The rain was falling in torrentsand a cold,
damp, dreary night was before the
wanderer
.
Broad flashes of lightning glared over the
whole western horizon, and the thunder boomed
and bellowed fearfully along the sky. Now and
then a peal would begin far off, and rolling
nearer and nearer with a heavy sound, as if a
great chariot were driven across the heavens,
burst with awful distinctness directly over the
head of the lonely woman. A deluge of rain
followed every discharge, and beat upon her
person with pitiless strength.
Nevertheless, she steadily pursued her course.
She had, at length, rambled into a portion of the
country with which her childhood had been
familiar
.
She knew every road, and turnpike, and
bypath, as well as if she had travelled them
but yesterday, and thus was enabled to make
rapid progress on her perilous adventure. Thus
for many hours she kept on, despite the rain,
the lightning, and the horrid thunder. Nothing
was before and around her but the darkness,
and yet a great, an animating, and liberal hope
lured her on. Friendless and storm-beaten,
she pursued her dangerous path, without fear,
without misgiving or doubt. She was not alone
though she seemed to befor that shadowy
form, which had been the guide of her
pilgrimage
,
was with her still, and with its sweet, sad
face, invited her forward and encouraged every
step. God bless thee, noble woman! for there
will be an end to the weary journeystrange
mournfulbut lovely and touching.
Morning at last broke upon her path. The
storm had passed away, and the cheerful face
of nature was before her. The sky sparkled
above her head with a clear brilliancy, as if it
had been purified by the flood that had
descended
.
Tree and verdure, bird and blossom, bathed
in the shower, assumed a new color of
vigorous
and pleasant spring-time youth.
The genial rays of the sun shot through the
air, and made the atmosphere soft and balmy,
operating like a well-tempered bath upon the
limbs, and bracing the traveller for her journey.
With the new aspect of the morning, a
brightness
had come over the spirit of the poor widow,
and she hastened on her way with a speed that
seemed every moment to increase. She reached
a road along which she had often trodden to
school in her girlish prime of life; she saw the
old school-house, and her heart beat with many
fond remembrances. She came in sight of her
own mother's house, where she had been wooed
and won by the lover of her youth; her
emotions
were almost too great to bear.
She flew past it! She reached the old
grave-yard
hastily
and tremblingly she entered its
sacred domain. Her eye fell upon a newly
erected gravestone bearing the name of Harvey
Lamb. It was hisher own dear husband's!
She fell down upon the earth and wept.
There, for a long time, she lay senseless.
At length a passer-by entered the graveyard,
and looking into her facefor she had raised
herself, by a convulsive effort, upon her knees,
and turned it toward the inscriptionwith her
hands firmly claspedhe found that she was,
in truth, dead! Her heart had broken in
delirious
joy at the fulfilment of her hope; and
she knelt before the plain, homely gravestone,
like a devotee at the shrine of his saint. With
many tears for her sorrow and her beauty, they
laid her beside the husband of her youth!
THE FIRST ANNIVERSARY OF
THE N. A. SOCIETY FOR THE
ENCOURAGEMENT OF
IMPOSTURE
.
The
friends of the N. A. Society for the
Encouragement
of Imposture mustered in strong
force at the Chapel gates at ten, on a fine
Monday
morning, in the month of April. It was
delightful
to see the number of sharp, shrewd
faces that pressed for the doors the moment
they were opened. There was a stamp on
almost
every countenance that proclaimed its
owner a stanch, true friend of the cause whose
first anniversary was about to be celebrated
within.
The chair was taken by our esteemed and
respected fellow-citizen Mr. Solomon Chalker,
whose long, saint-like visage is pretty
generally
familiar to the community, and, in fact,
impressed
upon the memories of many of them, so
thoroughly blended and associated with keen
bargains and certain sly tricks of trade, that it
might fairly be considered a stereotype. When
Mr. Chalker deposited his person in a chair
upon the platform, a murmur of applause arose
from the assembly. In a few brief words he
expressed his thanks for the distinguished honor
the board of managers of the N. A. E. I.
Society
had conferred upon him, in calling him to
preside over their deliberations.
Still deeper was his pleasure, still higher his
gratification, in occupying the chair in the
presence
of an audience so remarkable for their
intelligence, their integrity, and their
respectability
,
as he had no doubt was the one before him!
He should endeavor to conduct the
proceedings
of the day temperately, firmly, and in such
a manner as he hoped would meet the approval
of the audience, the members of the society, and
the board of managers.
During the delivery of this address (which
was received with flattering demonstrations),
the chairman kept his two hands sturdily thrust
into his side-pocketsapparently to be assured
that his finances were in due order and safety
and a very judicious disposition of his hands
it was, considering the company he was in.
He was surrounded by the board of managers
themselves. At times, too, a soft sound was
heard issuing from the mouth of his pocket, like
the noise of metals clashing and jingling
together
,
as if to keep the audience advised that the
speaker was a respectable man, and well-to-do
in the world! Mr. Chalker arose a second time
and stated that the first annual report would
be immediately read by the corresponding
secretary
,
Mr. Boerum. Mr. Boerum accordingly
dislodged himself from a high-backed chair, and
exhibited to the meeting a short man, with a
heavy, solemn countenance, and unrolling a
bundle of papers, satisfactorily established, the
moment he opened his lips that he had a voice,
whose tones could roll like low, distant
thunder
growling
and muttering over the heads of
the audience. The board of managers
instantly
cast themselves into attitudes of profound
attention
,
both hands griping their knees, and
their ears turned obliquely toward the
corresponding
secretaryas if they had not heard the
report read over by that identical pair of lips
twelve distinct times!
REPORT.
The
Board of Managers of the North
American
Society for the Encouragement of Imposture,
in presenting to you this, their first Annual
Report
,
can not but be devoutly thankful for the
degree of success which has attended their
labors
during the past year. The board of
managers
at a recent meeting resolved That the
prosperity which, notwithstanding contending
difficulties, has characterized the society, affords
encouragement to prosecute its objects with
increasing
energy. Before we proceed to speak
of the various efforts which have been made to
promote the cause, your board can not but
advert
with pleasure to the spirit of harmony that
has pervaded the different friends of imposture
in every quarter. The conduct of the retail
dry-goods dealers during the past twelve months
has been highly cheering and refreshing. They
have sold, as appears by statistics in the hands
of your recording secretary, during that
comparatively
brief space of time, no less than twelve
thousand common ten-dollar red shawls at
twenty-five
dollars a-piece, as actual merinoes! In
addition
to this, they have disposed of two hundred
and fifty pieces of sky-blue homespun as
sea-green
broadeloth, by the proper arrangement of
the light in the back part of their stores!
Furthermore, so thoroughly have they been
animated by the great principles of this society,
they have within the last three months, by
unanimous
consent, reduced the yard measure
another
inch, so that their customers are now
furnished
with thirty-four inches for a yard instead
of thirty-five, as had been the practice for
some years past! The consequences of this
measure, in the opinion of your board, can not
be too eagerly and enthusiastically anticipated.
It is destined to create an entire revolution in
the manners of the community! The male mem
bers of it, instead of walking about our streets
in those extravagant, long-tailed coats and
flowing
pantaloons, will now, by this dexterous
change of measurement, be reduced to
small-clothes
!
And the female portion, who have
been so long habituated to fifteen yards per
dress, will now be forced to exhibit their
well-turned
ankles and snow-white bosoms to the
gaze of the world in fourteen yards and a
quarter
,
short measure! Your board are very
happy
to be able to state, that this movement of the
retail dry-goods dealers has been cordially met
and responded to by the merchant-tailors and
mantuamakers. No resistance to this
wholesome
innovation has been made from that
quarter
;
on the contrary, they have given it their
hearty and emphatic co-operation. The former,
as soon as they learned this important
movement
on the part of their brethren, immediately
enlarged their cabbage-holes; and the latter,
the lady mantuamakers, such of them as were
single, wer instantly married, and made
preparation
for two girls a-piece, to be dressed in
such fashionable silks as their customers may
furnish during the next eighteen months!
The shoemakers throughout the city, and, as
far as has been heard from, throughout the
State, your board have been gratified to learn,
adhere with praiseworthy tenacity to their old
and established habit of delivering their fabrics
(such as boots and shoes) precisely two weeks
after the time promised! While these
particular
cases have afforded to your board subjects
of the most lively contemplation, they have been
pleased to observe that the cause of imposture
is going forward with rapid strides in every
part of our dearly-beloved country. Its
standard
is planted in every road and thoroughfare,
and flies from every house-top. Its drum-beat
is heard all over the land, summoning recruits,
and rallying together the friends of sharp trade
and large profit. Your board are deeply
penetrated
with heart-felt pleasure in being able to state
that several interesting cases, illustrating the
principles of this society, have occurred in the
intercourse
of the United States' government and
the red men, and in which the latter have been so
signally overreached and out witted, that it is
sincerely
feared by your board that they will never
again furnish an example of the superiority of
the white man over the Indian in natural
eunning
and profound roguery. The board have
had it under serious consideration for the past
six months, to establish agencies and branches
of this society among the Indian tribes for the
purpose of promoting the cause of imposture,
and supplying the aborigines with the elegant
amusements of trade and trickery which are of
so much more elevated a character than their
untutored pursuits in the forest. It is the
opinion
of your board that the Indians would make
very good milliners, deputy-sheriffs, and
auctioneers
.
Their taste in featherstheir
keenness
of scent, and their exquisite voices, would
amply qualify them for these employments.
From reports which have already reached
your board they have reason to believe that the
great cause in which we are engaged is making
rapid progress among the native tribes. The
Choctaws, writes a firm friend of the cause, in
April last, The Choctaws have established a
fashionable boarding-school among them for
Choctaw young gentlemen. In this school I
saw five Choctaw youths engaged in learning
the Greek languageand going into a
consumption
.
The cause is prospering; all that
is wanted is more brandy, more benevolence.
With these flattering prospects before them
your board can not but feel renewed zeal in the
great cause in which they have embarked. On
every side cheering and delightful evidences of
the rapid spread and success of our principles
present themselves to the eyes of your board.
One source of unmingled gratification your
board can not with justice omit to noticethe
vast increase of physicians and attorneys. From
this increase they augur the most favorable
results
to the cause. Whatever can be done to
promote its advancement by administering
wrong medicines and improper advice, by
purging
,
as it were, the system and the pocket, and
by fabricating respectable and not too moderate
bills of costs and charges, will, they are assured,
be done by the efficient and important
auxiliaries
to whom they have alluded. The number
of mortgages galloped into foreclosure, of
consumptive
patients to whom stiff catharties have
been administered and of children who have
been physicked indiscriminately without
reference
to the disease, is truly cheering and
encouraging
to your board.
The efficiency and activity with which the
master-builders have come up to the support of
the cause also requires some notice at our
hands. From an extensive and thorough
inquiry
set on foot by one of your board we have
learned that a method of building is now in
practice throughout this city by which one
whole side of the house is contrived to fall
down some morning about two months after its
erection, leaving the family pleasantly taking
their tea on the remnant of the ruins. This
system furnishes a very agreeable diversity in
the monotonous course of married life, and meets
the cordial and sincere approbation of your
board. The master-builders have humbly
inquired
of your board, whether the objects of
the N. A. Society for the Encouragement of
Imposture
would be best accomplished by having
the defect in the timber or the brick-work. To
enlighten your board they suggested that when
the timber shrinks, in nine cases out of ten, a
mere collapse takes place, a wall here and there
sundering and a floor giving way, but that when
the brick-work is laid with sufficient haste and
feebleness, there is a very good likelihood of the
roof falling in, as the foundations are pretty sure
of yielding. Your board, with due deference
to the objects of the Society and the wishes of
its members, after mature deliberation, decided
in favor of the latter plan, as it furnishes the oc
cupants of the building with a ready made
coffin and saves the expenses of a funeral.
Your board regret to state that, in the midst
of all this prosperity, a cloud has obtraded;
two of the members of your board having been
unfortunately hanged during the past year, in
consequence of miscarriage in two or three
innocent
schemes; one, a resident member,
having
been detected in an arson of a building
containing
a deed of a valuable piece of property,
given by him, but not on record. The other,
who was a respected corresponding member of
your board, in the great valley of the West, had
the misfortune to be lynched one morning
before
breakfast, having been detected with a
large bundle of the Impostor's Primer upon
his person, which he was preparing to
distribute
.
Brother Snufflight fell a martyr to the
cause, with the certificates of his zeal and his
character in his hands! Thus have two of our
associates been snatched from our midst, in the
very prime of their usefulness. Brother
Snufflight
was twenty-seven the very morning he
was subjected to martyrdom, as appears by an
entry in his journal: Twenty-seven this day;
Heaven willing, I shall consummate it by
circulating
the primer in large numbersand
distraining
on the widow for the rent of the small
brick-front in Scrabble street. Your board
have now brought their first annual report to a
conclusion. They think they see enough in the
results of the past year to animate you to
renewed
effort. The work truly is great; it is a
mighty and gigantic one. Contemplate it in all
its length and breadth, its depth and heightits
majesty and beauty. And now that we have
arrived at the commencement of another official
year, will we not resolve that our course shall
be marked by activityzealfurymadness!
yes, we repeat, madness and insanity in the
great cause of imposture! Will we not, in
the words of the lamented Snufflight, will we not
live, eat, drink, sleep, with the mighty cause of
imposture ever present to our minds? Will we
not give ourselves up, body, soul, and spirit,
nerves, marrow, and fingers, to the giant
business
in which we have embarked? Will we
not give our right hands to the altar whose
sunlight
has poured its torrents upon our benighted
mindsthat others may also see and be
blessed
?
Your board can not do better than
commend
these remarkable words of the dying
Snufflight to your understandings, and request
you to contribute liberally to the cause of which
he was so distinguished an ornament, as there
is a deficiency in last year's account (as
appears
by the treasurer's report) of one thousand
one hundred and eleven dollars and twenty-three
cents.
In behalf of the Board of Managers,
T.
Boerum
,
Cor. Sec.
The reading of the report was frequently
interrupted
by intense and enthusiastic applause,
and at its close the audience gave a fresh round
more vigorous and enthusiastic than ever. The
chairman now rose and stated that the
treasurer's
annual report would be read by Brother
Pawket, treasurer of the society, and, adjusting
his spectacles he looked about the platform for
the countenance of that excellent and skilful
financier. To his astonishment, the face of
Brother Pawket did not at once present itself to
his view. Several members of the board of
managers
now joined Mr. Chalker in the search,
and the eyes of the whole audience were
directed
,
with fearful anxiety, toward the spot from
which they expected the treasurer to emerge.
Brother Pawket was not in the house; a lad
was instantly despatched to his residence to tell
him that the audience were waiting for him
and his report. In the meantime, to occupy the
attention of the meeting, about fifty females in
bonnets, and half as many males in red, brown,
white, and auburn hair, stood up behind the
president's chair and began bellowing in
concert
the touching and effective melody All
round my hat, or something that sounded very
much like it. Just as they concluded, the boy
came running back, and rushing, breathless, up
to the meek Mr. Chalker, cried out, Mrs.
Pawket says as Mr. Pawket's gone to Halifax
and sends her compliments and hopes the
S'ciety'll make provision for 'er, as she's left a
destitute wider! Mr. Chalker was
thunderstruck
at this figurative announcement of the
fact that the treasurer had abscondedthe
board of managers turned pale with horror
and gloom pervaded the whole audience. The
meek and solemn chairman, however, soon
recovered
the tone of his mind, and, rising again,
notified the audience that Brother Bibby was
present and prepared to give them an
interesting
account of the state of imposture in foreign
lands. With this, a middle-sized gentleman,
with sable hair hanging over his back, like a
hank of black yarn on a spinning-wheel head,
and brushed back smartly from his forehead
stepped forward and smiled agreeably to the
meeting. He forthwith threw himself into the
proper attitude in front of the desk. Within
the past year he (Mr. Bibby) had visited
Kamschatka
the
northern part of Russia
Hindostan
,
and several of the Pelew islands. From
what he had seen, he was well satisfied the
cause was triumphing in those regions of the
earth. Dogs was horses, he was very happy
to state, in Kamschatka still; and in Hindostan
widows was firewood. As to Russia he (Mr.
Bibby) thought that Siberia was a delightful
place, and continued to have an uncommon
number
of visiters; Siberia was
so
solitary and
retired
like, that it was just the spot for
philosophers
and gentlemen who loved meditation and
spare diet. The Pelew islands continued to
maintain their well-established character for
native tact and a certain adroit style of
entering
ship's cabins and coat-pockets, which was
still epidemical in that quarter of the world.
But in Siam (continued Bibby, with great
enthusiasm
),
in Siam, it was that he had been
most profoundly astonished, gratified, and
overwhelmed
at the success of the great principles
of imposture. He (Mr Bibby) had seen, in that
favered country, elephants which would have
done honor to this society, to any society! He
had seen them apply their trunks in such a
manner
to the pilfering and purloining of fruit and
other articles, as to give him the highest
delight
,
and which he should remember to his
dying
day. He (Mr. B.) thought this interesting
animal might be introduced into different
human
employments with great advantage. They
were possessed of natural powers which would
fit them for many stations of trust and
importance
.
Why (Mr. Bibby would ask), why
could not several grown elephants be imported
and dressed in leather hats and petershams, and
substituted in the place of our city watchmen?
This was an age of improvement and he thought
they would be very effective. Two or three
large ones, placed on wheels and intoxicated
with cold water, might be carried to fires instead
of the corporation engines. He would not
suggest
,
at present, that any of them should be
converted
into hackney-coachmen, although he
thought they had a bullying air, which would
enable them to extort liberal fare from their
customers
,
and they were also furnished with large
ears to keep off the rain. He however, (Mr.
B.), before he took his seat, had one favor to ask,
which he trusted the board of managers would
grant. He hoped he would not be trespassing
upon their kindness in making this request. He
was sure that in making it he was actuated by
the best of feelings and the noblest of motives.
(Intense anxiety now manifested itself among the
audience.) He was confident that he had the
good of the society at heart in so doing. While
in the lower part of Siam he had seen a white
elephant, with a grave face, throw his trunk
gracefully over the shoulder of a missionary and
pick his pocket of two bibles, three small
testaments
,
a bundle of tracts, and a gin-flask! He
wished to have that elephant elected an
honorary
member. (Thunders of applause, for more
than ten minutes, in the midst of which Bibby
sat down.)
The chairman next introduced to the notice
of the meeting, Gustavus Cobb, Esq., one of
those tall, slim, high-shouldered young
gentlemen
in whose formation the necessity of a body
has been entirely overlooked, and who are,
consequently
,
described as beingall legs.
Gustavus
Cobb
was
all legs, and looked like a lean
ninepin in reduced circumstances. Judging
from the slow, drawling manner in which he
delivered himself, one might have sworn that
Mr. Cobb had been brought up in the
postoffice
.
He (Gustavus Cobb, Esq.) appeared
there as the representative of the
postmaster-general
.
He was the nephew of the
postmaster-general
.
He knew that his uncle was a
friend of this society. He himself was a
superintendent
of mail-routes. In the performance
of his duty he had often ridden with the drivers,
and, from what he had observed, he was mor
E
ally certain that his uncle, the
postmaster-general
,
was not hostile to the society. Attempts
had been made to turn the postmaster-general
from his track; they had proved fruitless. The
P. M. general, firmly convinced that a certain
calmness and solemnity should be observed in
transporting the mails, had not allowed himself
on any occasion to pass any one else on the
public roads. He (the speaker) had, however,
seen one alarming case where an attempt had
been made to fall behind the mail-stage in
coming
into a post town, and which proved
successful
.
It was a decrepid old woman, with a bag
on her shoulder, travelling at a snail's pace on
the Maysville turnpike.
`What are you carrying there, old lady?'
shouted our driver.
`The mail!' answered the old woman.
`
I
carry the mail!' answered the driver,
firmly, endeavoring to drop behind the old
creature
.
`Yes!' screeched the awful hag, `your's
the regular, mine's the express!' And, do all
we could, the driver was forced to get into the
town some ten minutes before the old female
opposition.
From a very extensive series of experiments,
the P. M. General is satisfied that spavined old
horses, between fourteen and fifteen years of
age, make the best kind of mails. The liberal
introduction of the use of this animal has had
a charming effect on the mail arangements
throughout the country. The only objection
that has arisen to them is, that they are
sometimes
too expeditious, and evince a disposition
to get through within the hour. I have heard
it hinted, I will not say by my uncle exactly,
that to obviate this objection, the P. M. G.
contemplates introducing donkeys throughout
the departmentsuperannuated donkeys. He
thinks a superannuated donkey mail (judging
from the comparative success of his old horse
mail) world become extremely popular.
The deliberation, the safety and
circumspection
with which letters might be carried by
a donkey mail, would recommend it to
merchants
and men of business; and the regular
tardiness of its arrival and the slow moderation
with which it would travel, would make a
superannuated
donkey mail an object of special
favor among young gentlemen and young ladies,
who are so fortunate as to be in love, and
corresponding
.
His voice (Gustavus Cobb's voice) was
decidedly
and peremptorily in favor of a donkey
mail! He was convinced that the whole
country
would rise to a man, in favor of a donkey
mail, in preference to the present post office
system!
At the conclusion of the address of Mr. Cobb,
a lively gentleman in a green silk vest and
nankeens, was brought forward by the
chairman
and announced as Brother Windboltthe
distinguished professor of all the arts and
sciences, and proprietor of the Universal
Institute
of Knowledge.
Sir, said the accomplished Windbolt,
throwing
back the right breast of his coat and delicately
inserting his thumb in the armhole of his green
silk vest, Sir, I challenge the world to
question
my attachment to the North American
Society
for the Encouragement of Imposture! My
fidelity to its great objects has, throughout my
life, been kept in view with a steadiness which
would make a bet of one thousand dollars (which
I hereby offer) a very unsafe one for him who
should doubt my devotion to its interests. Sir,
it is well known to you, and I presume to this
community, with what assiduity I have labored
for the last ten years, to lighten the pockets
to simplify the financial concerns of the
inhabitants
of this city. Heaven be thanked! the
startling announcements which I have made in
the public prints and by placards, of sciences to
be taught by me in an incredibly brief space of
time, have not been unattended with success.
The incredibility of those announcements has
been my salvation. The very impossibility of
communicating knowledge as expeditiously as
my advertisements promised, brought crowds to
my door.
Ringing the changes along the whole gamut
of imposturefrom the doubtfulthe absurd
the improbableup to the impossible and the
hideously monstrous and incredible, I have
found the number of my patrons to swell steadily
at each advance! Or rather, I should say, that
in running the higher keys of the scale, I
found my patronage to increase at an
enormously
accelerated ratio!
On looking over my accounts, sir, in July
last, I discovered that my profits during the
preceding
nine years had been so great, as to
justify
my signalizing the event by some public
celebration. Accordingly, on the tenth of
August
,
having provided ample and liberal
accommodations
,
I threw open the doors of my
house, and gave (I hope I am not exaggerating
in saying) the celebrated Windbolt Writing
Festival! Here the speaker was interrupted
by thunders of applause, which pealed from
every quarter of the building, and which
conclusively
testified that the audience there
present
,
considered the said W. W. Festival the
most triumphant imposture of the day.
Of that festival, sir, I feel it my duty on
this occasion to render some account. We all
have a common interest in it. It was given for
the benefit of our common principles. On the
evening of the tenth of August last, then, at
half-past seven, sir, four large roomsin the
Universal Institutetwo square and two
oblong
,
were thrown open for the Festival. In
one oblong room were stationed on stools at a
large counting-house desk, twenty elderly
gentlemen
,
in white inexpressibles and
swallowtails
,
prepared to exhibit in double entry,
daybook
,
and ledger practice: and an equal
number
of young gentlemen, in blue roundabouts,
actively engaged in algebra. In the square
room adjoining this, five-and-twenty elderly
ladies were seated at pianos, harps, and
harpsichords
.
The second oblong room was
occupied
by the three Miss Windbolts, in cottage
hats and yellow frocks, representing the three
graces, with their hair in curl: with a full bevy
of young ladies prepared to perform various
elaborate steps and figures which had been
communicated in two lessons of an hour each.
But the third room, sir, held the wonder of
wondersnineteen select youth who were to
play one hundred tunes, square the circle, solve
the longitude, and lunch twice in the singularly
brief space of twelve minutes, by the watch.
I will not conceal the fact, that there was
another
smaller room, sir, and, in that room that
Master Robert Windbolt (my youngest son)
was elevated on a music stool, prepared to eat
gingerbread held in his right hand and scribble
away with his left at a prodigious rate for any
given length of time!
The festivities of the evening commenced.
Twingle, twangle, thrum went the instruments:
away flew the twelve couple of young ladies
in a new highland reeldashlike so many
mad knight-errants scampered the goose-quills
of the twenty elderly gentlemen over their
ledgersfuriously the young gentlemen in azure
jackets flourished their pencilssquare the
circle
lunchsolve
the longitudelunch, went
the nineteen select youth to the sound of their
own flutes and French bugles. Round and
round, like a crazy planet, whirled Master
Windbolt, despatching small text by the sheet
and gingerbread by the square yard. Hilarity
and animation pervaded the rooms: everybody
was delighted. The great festival bid fair to
go off in glorious style, when suddenly sounds
of merriment, mingled with cries for mercy,
reached my ear. They proceeded from one of
the oblong apartments. I hastened to the spot
and there, sir, I discovered a spectacle at which
I was literally horrified. Solitary imprisonment
is nothing, siris a mere luxurycompared to
the awful visionoh, that it had been a mere
creation of the brain!which met my eyes.
SirI discovered the twenty elderly gentlemen,
on their hands and kneesrunning the gauntlet
in their white pantaloons, between the
wide-spread
legs of the twenty algebraic youth who
were bestowing inky ferules upon their
vertebral
extremities. Through the dreadful strait
they navigated and wriggled like so many cels
with their tails cut off; with my astronomical
eye I discovered dusky orbs floating through
clear skies of white jean, which skirted those
middle-aged flanks! Sir, there was something
captivating though still dreadful, in watching
those venerable serpentsthose respectable
milk-snakes, creeping in at one end of their
fated maze, and twinkling through, with
nimble
expedition, mapped all over with
pitch-black
rivers, torrents, and ink-falls! I had
scarcely recovered from the shock of this
fearful
spectacle, when I heard shrieks and shrill
voices pitched in a high key, and a confused
pother and tumult emanating from the remotest
square room. Rushing breathlessly to that
quarter, I found all the two-and-twenty of the
elderly ladies engaged in a promiscuous conflict
with each other, aided and abetted on both sides
by large numbers of the claborate dancing
misses. I was completely stunned, Mr.
President
,
I will candidly confess, by this horrible
uproar on all sides. I stood stock still between
the two apartments, where I could look upon
the progress of events in both, and dialogue and
observations like the following, fell upon my
ear.
`Go it Jehosaphat!Jehosaphat against the
course! There's a flank, there's bottom for
you, my boys!' from the oblong room.
`This is my third quarter, Kate Slocum, deny
it if you dare! Pa paid Windbolt thirty dollars,
in advance, in timber lands at Neversink!'
`My husband had some schooling, I guess,
afore he was forty! I didn't teach my man his
abs and babs, Mrs. Duncecombe! no I didn't
tho' some peopleyou know!'
`'Sicore Windbolt says you thought the
harpsicord
was a patent oven, when you first came
here; and told her what a big box of dominoes
she had there, when she opened the piano!'
These, elegant specimens of objurgatory
eloquence
issued from the square room, followed
in each case by a manual attack on the fair
physiognomy of the speaker, and the
involuntary
discharge of certain facial ducts and
arteries.
`Easy, easystriped bass! hard on, Darby
lay on the tiller Jackso, now we're through
the Narrows!' cried a nautical voice in the
oblong
room; and the separate directions were
accompanied with sharp, clicking sounds, as of
some thin, solid parallelogram of wood lighting
on a certain quarter of the human body encased
in tight smalls.
`Ten to one on the Leopard! Golly, Joe, he
goes it like a tiger through a jungle of lightnin'
rods!' shouted a second voice, which was
followed
by a scrambling noise like that of a body
in excessively rapid motion.
In this way the confusion and clamor was
every minute increased. The great Windbolt
Writing Festival assumed the exhilarating
aspect
of being metamorphosed into a Saturnalian
battle of elderlies and youngsters. It is but
fair to add, that three elderly ladies, who had
been taking music lessons at the Institute for
thirty-nine quarters, were serenely seated in a
corner of the square room during the affray,
assiduously strumming on a broken harpsichord
and two single-string harps, with the benevolent
purpose of calming the agitation of the parties
engaged. I was also highly gratified, sir, on
strolling into the small room where Master
Windbolt occupied a stool, to find his three
sisters, the Misses Windbolts, laboriously
engaged
in assuaging his grief; for, as he himself
informed me, his gingerbread was all out,he'd
got the cramp in his right hand, and the screw
had worked through the top of the stool, and
bored his hide and breeches ever so much!
After a while the tumult subsided; the young
gentlemen in azure jackets had tired of their
sport; two of the elderly gentlemen in
inkstriped
white jean had rushed headlong out of
the house (stop that span of zebras! I heard
shouted in the street shortly after their
disappearance
);
the old and young ladies had
gradually
subsided into that dead calm, into which
the high winds of female passion are accustomed
to fall after tempest. Thus concluded the
Windbolt
Writing Festival. I shall leave it with
you and with this intelligent auditory, to decide
my claims of fidelity and devotion to the
interests
of the N. A. Society for the
Encouragement
of Imposture, when I have stated, that of
these numerous performers, the elderly
gentlemen
had taken four quarters' instructions, one
hour and a half constituting a Windbolt
quarter
in
book-keeping; the select youth twelve
lessons a-piece (twenty minutes making a full
Windbolt lesson) in bugle-playing, lunching,
&c.; the young ladies as many in the reel, fling,
and gallopade; and the algebraic young
gentlemen
seven quarters a-piece in equations,
fluxions
,
and trigonometrical scienceall at the
unprecedented
rate, sir, of ten dollars the hundred
lessons, and five dollars for twenty quarters
payable in advance! I close, sir, by thanking
this audience for their kind attention, and
defying
any person present to produce man, woman,
or child, that has ever profited a single quaver
or fraction by attendance at the Windbolt
Universal
Institute of Knowledge!
The speaker that followed Mr. Windbolt was
a dark, heavy-browed, serious-looking individual
who had spent the last half-dozen years of his life
in the elegant amusement of passing people to
their graves through an agreeable process of
steam. He (Mr. Bludgett) had certificates
and affidavits by which he could show, to the
entire satisfaction of the board of Managers of
the N. A. Imposture Society, that he had been
in the habit, for a good number of years past, of
steaming to death, at the rate of one old woman
and two small children every week. It might
not always, remarked Mr. Bludgett, with an
amiable contortion of countenance that might
have been borrowed from the devil's
scrapbook
,
It might not always be a literal old
woman and two literal small children; but then
the vitality extinguished by him, each week,
would amount to about that. Sometimes it
would be two consumptive young men, with
tolerably good constitutions: sometimes three
sickly married females; and sometimes his
week's work would consist in disposing of a
stout, healthy-looking man laboring under the
delusion that he was deadly sick. He was
quite surehe was morally certain that, with a
sufficient share of public patronage, he (
Bludgett
)
could despatch three grown men and an
infant
,
or perhaps he might venture to say, three
grown men and a tailorper week. His baths
were now in such admirable orderthe steam
was let off, and the fresh air let onand the steam
was let on and the fresh air let off, with such
delightful
precision and promptness that the busi
ness could be done in no time! He would venture
to turn any number of patients the Society for
the Encouragement of Imposture might see fit
to place under his charge, out of this world into
the next, at the rate he had mentioned. If
there should happen to be a surplus in the board
of Managers itself, he would be very happy
to convince any gentlemen that chose to tender
themselves, of the efficacy of his system of
practice! Here Mr. Bludgett cast an awful
leer upon Mr. Solomon Chalker as if nothing
could be more perfectly captivating to his mind,
than the idea of submitting his person to the
steam process; the audience laughed; and Mr.
Bludgett sat down with applause.
The chairman now arose, and thanked the
audience for their attendance and attention to
the exercises of the occasion, and named the
day and place at which and on which the next
anniversary would be celebrated.
Then followed Anthem by the choir, and
collection in aid of the funds of the Society!
and the crowded audience dispersed. It is but
justice to the Society for the Encouragement
of Imposture to mention that a number of tin
sixpences and sanded half-dollars were found in
the plate, which were supposed to have been
put there by the honorary members and friends
of the cause who were distributed through the
house.
THE MERRY-MAKERS.
EXPLOIT
No. II.
CONTAINING A CRITICAL PASSAGE IN THE LIFE
OF MR. BOBBYLINK, AND A DELIGHTFUL
AQUATIC EXCURSION WHICH THAT GENTLEMAN
TOOK IN COMPANY WITH MISS HETTY STEDDLE.
Nature
furnishes, now and then, a genuine
comedy as full of love, bustle, and intrigue, as
one of Farquhar's or Congreve's. Seated by
the side of a babbling brook that pays tribute
to a delightful lake of sparkling water, with a
varied woodland sloping up from its banks, on
a fragrant morning in June, you may see
enacted
a gay drama, pregnant with lively scenes and
noisy dialogue. Near by, on some
neighboring
rail, two amorous catbirds chatter away in
animated discourse, hopping along the fence in
flight and pursuita precious pair of ill-dressed,
vagrant lovers: while, far off on the edge of
the lake, so that their puny heads are just
visible
,
bobbing up and down, two friendly little
snipes are paying their respects to each other
over a dead water-fly. In a thorn-bush a
sweet-tempered
brown thrasher hurries through his
joyous and flute-like song, as if he were afraid
the day would be over ere he could disburden
half his music. The love-lorn king-fisher hangs
on a dry bough over the stream, and brawls in
his harsh, startling voice, determined to outroar
the current, and keeping an eye fixed sharply
on its surface: the moment an unhappy fish
becomes visible this aquatic bailiff springs upon
him, fastens a talon on his shoulder, and hieing
to a required quarter consoles himself for the
absence of his mistress. Meantime, far up in
the depths of a wood in a green glade, a tall
crow, gloomy and self-absorbed, stalks about
the artful villain of the pastoral scene; and
midway, in the crumbling body of a dead ash
tree sits an old owl, with his broad, goggling
eyes, and the dry, white moss gathered about
his politic pate like a full-bottomed tie-wig,
looking as wise and grave as a judge
apparently
deliberating in his own fusty mind what
penalties to inflict on the cheerful creatures that
are flitting and chatting and making themselves
happy about him. If from his position, the
observer
could cast a glance towards a low fence
that runs along a flat meadow to his left, he
might discover a sleepy night-hawk dosing on
a rail, blinking out of one eye and striving, like
a conceited politician, to make it appear that
he sees more with his single optic than most
people with two. Over this profound thinker
a troop of piratical blackbirds are on the wing
hovering a little in their flight, perhaps to
watch the erudite Sir Hawk knocked in the
head by the first country boy that passes with a
gadwith a mill-pond hard by in view,
screaming
and babbling and uttering all kinds of
discordant
noises, for all the world like a band of
roving musicians twangling and sounding their
way to a fashionable watering-place. To
complete
this little rural entertainment, in a
buckwheat
field beyond the lake, a single
stouthearted
quail sits calling (as if giving the
prompter's cue for a favorite performer to come
on) loudly and enthusiastically for Bob
White! Of course Bob White, although thus
earnestly invoked, disdains to appear; but Bob
Bobbylink is reclining in the midst of the
many-colored
scene I have described, with Mistress
Hetty Steddle, the pretty serving-girl, at his side.
They were seated on the bank of an
impetuous
little torrent, with a light fishing-boat near
at hand, fastened with a cord to the stump of a
tree in a cluster of bushes, and straining on its
cable, with the heady current that rushed into
the lake, like a violent horse dragging at his
bridle. A pair of oars were lying on the bank.
Come now, Hetty, said the fascinating
Bobbylink seizing the young lady's hand, and
giving it a fervent pressure, while he arranged
his face in a melancholy, half-smiling oblong,
Come now, Hetty, don't refuse,say next
Thursday and make me as happy as a robin in
a cherry-tree.
But why not wait, Robert, till your
grandmother
is dead? responded the young lady
with an arch look, You know you'll have a
nice little property then, and that will make us
comfortable. What odds are a few days or a
few weeks?
Good heavens! how you talk, girl!my
grandmother's only seventy, and her mother,
my great-grandmotherlived till she was a
hundred and one, within a day. Why they're
a regular brood of she Methusalahs!
Old women can't live for ever, retorted
Hetty, and when you heard from her the other
day they thought an east wind would carry her
off.
You can't depend on that race of old
ladies a minute: to day they'll be looking thin
and ghastly, with a `good-by to you all,'
written
as plain as large text on their featuresand
a whole mob of cousins and grand-nevys and
nieces swarm round the old woman, peering into
her face like a parcel of farmers in harvest,
staring at a wet moon: every one thinking the
old lady's passport for the next world is made
out and filled up. The pretty nieces run over
in their mind how many yardsshe being a
long-limbed bodyit will take for her shroud,
and the charming grand-nevys and cousins are
busy putting out their legacies on compound
interest
.
Dreadful, inhuman wretches! interposed
Mistress Steddle, with a look or horror.
The next day, concluded Bobbylink, she
gets up from her dying bed and says, with a
smile, that she can't leave this world until she
has seen some of her great great grand-children
(that are now infants) grown up and married:
and 'gad I believe the old creature will keep
her word!so, Hetty, you
must
say next week,
or postpone it till we're both gray!
Now, Robert, said Hetty, I am going to
ask a great favor of you. Do you think you
can be liberal enough to grant it, mindit's a
very great favor, I give you warning!
Anything, my dear Hettyyou can have
anything of mine you askeven my life.
No, I don't want thatI shouldn't know
what to do with itmy own little wicked life is
as much as I can manage.
What is itask quick, and I grant at once!
What's the mighty favor you desire of Bob
Bobbylink
?
To tell the perfect truth without a joke,
answered Hetty smiling, isn't this entire story
about your Jersey grandmother made out of whole
clothspun on your own wheel, with your
head for the distaff and your tongue for the
spindle? And didn't you contrive it from fear
that young Jolton would carry off Hetty
Steddle
from you on the back of his propertyand
as you were pennyless, you matched him by
throwing in a snug piece of a farm in the
Jersies
?Out
with it, Robertdon't let the truth
choke you, although it isn't used to trav'ling
the Bobbylink turnpike.
Hetty, you're a shrewd girl, and you've
guessed right, answered Bob Bobbylink
laughing
.
If I have any grandmother in Jersey
she ha'n't much love for her kin, for she's never
notified me of her existence and I've had two
grandmothers buried already. That's as many
as I'm entitled to by law'specially as my
parents never married but once a-piece!
At the conclusion of this honest confession
the young gentleman and young lady burst into
4
a hearty fit of laughter, which having lasted
the proper time, Hetty Steddle exclaimed, with
an air of great seriousness, Bobbylink!
now what do you think you deserve for
deceiving
a poor girl in this way? Do you suppose
I'll have you without your property? in this
part of the country cows aren't bought for the
sake of their horns, but we're willing to take
the horns because we can't get the cows
without
'em.
Very well, said Mr. Bobbylink with a
rueful
aspect; if you can desert me now, Hetty
there's Polly Todd will take me without a
copper and bring me hard cash besides!
Robbert
Bobbylink, Esq., chief of the clan of
merry-makers
was, by reason of a tolerably
good-looking
person and a sprightly wit, a great
favorite among the rural young ladies, and the
one in question, Miss Polly Todd, had conceived
a desperate attachment to our worthy. She
was a professed rival of Hetty Steddle, and the
mention of her name produced a fluttering
sensation
in the bosom of the latter.
What if Pol. Todd can bring you a few
dollars
,
she said, perhaps others has got money
as well as her. There's old Hetty Pease is
worth twice Polly Todd and her whole
generation
.
What of that? asked Bobbylink.
Perhaps Hetty Pease didn't die last night
and didn't leave all her earnings, by will, to
her poor good-for-nothing name-sake and
foster-child
,
Het. Steddle!
You don't say so, Hetty?it can't beit's
too good to be true! exclaimed Bob Bobbylink
rapidly.
But it is so, answered the young lady
bursting into tears, throwing herself into the
arms of Bobbylink, the poor kind old woman
is gone! and it's all yours, Roberttake it all
and me with it!
Robert Bobbylink was not a little affected
by these marks of affectionate tenderness both
towards himself and the dead, on the part of
Hetty Steddle, and pressing her to his breast,
and imprinting several eager kisses on her fair
face, he said, Cheer up, my dear girlall will
be right, pennyless or richin health or in
sickness
I'll
take you, Hettyas to Mrs. Pease,
you needn't grieve about that`old women'
you know, according to a high authority `can't
live for ever!' At this unexpected quotation
of her own sagacious apothegm, Hetty could
not refrain from laughter, and in a few minutes
her pretty countenance entirely cleared up and
wreathed itself in its wonted smiles. After this
they conversed a long time earnestly together.
Hetty, at first, urged that respect to her deceased
friend demanded the solemnization of their
nuptials
should be postponed at least a twelvemonth.
To this Bob Bobbylink responded, that in her
present situation, immediate marriage would
be perfectly proper; she had come into the
possession
of considerable property, and could not,
he insisted, with any degree of self-respect, re
main longer at service. If she abandoned her
present home, where in the wide world could
she find anothernow that her last relation had
gone the way of death.
By arguments like these, Hetty's repugnance
was finally overruled.
Now, if you'll grant me a single favor,
Robert, said she, I'll consent that the here
Hetty blushed like the goddess of Liberty on a
village sign-board, painted by an artist, whose
palette lacks all the other colors of the rainbow
but red, that thetheit shall be next
Thursday
week.
Certainly, said Bob smiling and highly
delighted
;
I'll grant anything Mrs. Bobbylink
asks. What is it, my pretty yellow-bird?
Your pretty yellow-bird, Robert, how is
that? I hope I haven't the jaundice this
morning
!
said Hetty, laughing. But, here's the
pointyou must discard that clusmy fellow,
Sam. Chisel!
What that great dunce! why it's done
before
it's asked; a heavy, woodcock-pated lout,
that has attempted my life any time these past
three years by his infernal long stories and
stupid
jokes. Sam. Chisel! I'll make a
horse-block
of him, Hetty, if you want me to, and
cut his long ears into patterns for saddle-covers
if you ask it.
And Habakkuk Viol.
Let him go, too.
And Harvest.
Off with his headthey're a pair of barren
knaves, that for some mysterious purpose have
been born with mouths, without the wit to get
anything to put into 'em; and backs that would
go bare, begging your pardon, as a new-laid
egg, if they hadn't had a friend in Bob
Bobbylink
.
Let them shirk from this time forth, for
themselves!
Well, continued the inexorable and
victorious
Hetty Steddle, There's Tom Snipe. He
goes of coursethe poor wretch that he is.
Tommy, why Tommy's a harmless critter,
and might be useful in doing chores about the
house.
Don't mention him! exclaimed Hetty. I
can't bear the sight of him; he reminds me so
much, with his warped visage, of a lean kitten
in a fit. The scamp absolutely attempted to
kiss me once!
Away with him then! away with him!
cried Bobbylink with animation.
Discharge Smally, now, and you've done a
good morning's work.
Poor John! nevernever, said Bob
Bobbylink
with sudden enthusiasm, he has been
always true to me, and it's but fair that I should
be always true to him. You may strip every
branch and limb off of the old treeand
welcome
,
but that leaf hangs, and all the tempests
in the sky may blow, and the old tree may rock
and quiver to its very roots, but I tell you that
leaf shall cling to the last. John Smallymy
own right hand manit's impossible, Hetty!
He is always flinging his jokes at one; and
he has even snickered at you, before now,
continued
Hetty, hoping to touch Bob's personal
feeling.
I don't care for that, he answered firmly;
he has a rightfor many's the crack I've had
at his expense. Come, Hetty, spare me one!
You had better try to drive Burdock's brown
mare in single harness, or knit stockings out
of bulrushes, than get me to forego my old
friend, John!
Hetty had by this time discovered, from his
tone and manner, that Bob would not relinquish
this last of his merry comrades, and desisted
from the attempt, for the present, but not
without
a further request.
Now to finish the weeding and make a
clean garden of it, there's another promise to be
made: you must leave off Shekkels, the man in
the mask, the bull's horns, and all your other
mad capers and carryings-on. D'ye
understand
if
you don't I shall have you a'vertised
as a `stray,' the first thing. They both
laughed
heartily over the pleasant reminiscences
which Hetty's allusions conjured up, and Bob
Bobbylink (with a liberal mental reservation in
favor of stone-frolics, christmas shooting, and
black-fishing) granted her reasonable request,
that he should become a good, sober man
about the house.
But stop, my dear, said he, there's a
favor you must bestow on me in return for all
this.
What's that, Robert? said Hetty,
blushing
,
and supposing he hinted at a kiss.
You must let all these poor dogs come to
the wedding; it will be for the last time, and
it would break their hearts to shut them out!
Well, well, answered Hetty complacently,
I suppose it must be soalthough I think it
would be a slight waste of cheap crockery if
all their hearts were broken in a row.
Now, said Bobbylink, rapturous with the
unexpected success of his suit, capering about
the grass, and ever and anon kissing and
embracing
his fair mistress, now, Hetty, I think
we can take our sail down the lake with some
comfort; come, jump in!
Obeying his injunction, she sprang lightly
into the boat; at this moment the cable was
unloosed
by an unseen hand from its fastening and
Bob Bobbylink, gasping with astonishment and
surprise, beheld his ladye-love floating, alone,
down the rapid current. Hurrying along the
bank, and keeping even with the boat, he
reached
a rock that jutted into the water, and as the
vessel glided by, he succeeded in throwing
himself
on board. A violent eddy seized it and
hurried it out into the middle of the lake, and
bore it swiftly away towards the opposite shore.
In his trepidation and haste Bobbylink had
forgotten the oars, and they were in a light and
feeble craft without any means of directing its
course, or providing against accidents that were
likely to occur. To render their situation still
more dismal and perplexing they heard every
now and then, a hoarse laugh sounding in the
woods and echoed and re-echoed by the cliffs
along the shore of the lake. A superstition
prevailed in that quarter of the country, that a
spectral personage whom they styled the
Laughing
Devil, roamed constantly about these woods,
and gave token, by a harsh startling laugh or
chuckle, of danger impending over the
neighboring
inhabitants. Plough-boys on their way
home through the woods, after nightfall,
pretended
to have seen a short, burly creature, with
a grisly beard and stiff shock of jet-black hair,
standing in the shadow of a stunted ash-tree,
or dwarf-oak, holding both his sides, with his
face distorted by laughter which he seemed to
suppress by main force; and which, when they
reached the edge of the forest, would burst from
him with great violence and startle them like
a near peal of thunder.
An idle fellow, who spent much of his time
in wandering about the swamps and
lowgrounds
of this region with his gun, asserted
that more than once, when he had raised his
fowling-piece to his shoulder and was on the
point of levelling it at a wild-pigeon or a
gray-squirrel
,
he had been horribly alarmed by
seeing
the bird or animal suddenly moult its
feathers
or hide, which fell to the ground like the
cast-off slough of a copperhead, and, in the
twinkling of an eye, become transformed into a
robust goblin, who leered upon him from amid
the leaves with a countenance distended with
laughter, while tears of mirth flowed copiously
down his wrinkled cheeks. His gun, this
vagabond
sportsman added, would inevitably be
out of order in a day or two after the vision,
and miss fire a dozen times or more in
succession
,
if the powder was in the least damp!
However
this might be, it was a well-known fact,
that just after a thunder-storm this mysterious
sound was sure to be heard loudest, and they
often found immense trees riven to the very
roots, and lying maimed and prostrate upon the
earth, in the quarter of the woodland whence it
had issued. If the grain was blighted, or a foal
cast before its time, or a sheep missing, that
long, fiendish peal of laughter was heard
echoing
and ringing through the woods, and the
birds took to flight as if from some dreadful
object
of terror and alarm.
The sounds which reached the ears of Bob
Bobbylink and his companion at the present
time seemed, therefore, peculiarly awful and
ominous. To increase their anxiety, they
thought they saw faces, ever and anon, thrust
from among the bushes and grape-vines which
overhung the banks, grinning and moping with
aspects more like those of malicious spirits than
of men. This might have been phantasy, but they
swept straight onward, and were in the utmost
peril of being dashed headlong against a rock that
projected into the lake, when suddenly a boat
shot from within its shadow, and, making for
that in which Bobbylink was seated and
running
close by their side, one of the persons that
occupied it gave Bobbylink's boat a forcible
turn by the bows, and pushed her out into
mid-channel. Bobbylink now observed that the
strange boat was held by four men. On closer
inspection he discovered that they were persons
with whom he was acquainted, and with
regard
to whom he had been making sundry very
liberal promises during the morning, to Miss
Hetty Steddle.
The boat of the four new-comers now began
to play about Bobbylink's; and its occupants
threw out, as they flashed athwart her bows or
alongside, observations like the following
much in the same way as a frigate skirmishes
about a crippled seventy-four, firing a broadside
at each evolutionreloading, and coming up
on the other quarter with a fresh discharge.
Ha! ha! cried one of them, exhibiting a
broad countenance, distorted with laughter,
that stupid dunce, Sam. Chisel, sends his
compliments to you, Mr. Bobbylink, and hopes
it's a fine morning for sailing. He presents
you a brace of heavy woodcocks, giving
Bobbylink
a blow on either side of the head with
his open hand as they crossed the stern, and
sends you a tumbler of the fresh fluid to wash
'em down! He followed his last observation
with the discharge of a boat-horn full of water
from the lake; each one of the four being
supplied
with a short weapon of that kind, which,
as every one knows, consists of the horn of an
ox attached to the extremity of a wooden
handle
,
and is used in sloops and other river-craft,
to wet the sails.
Any word to send to your friend 'Bak
Viol
?
said another of them, he's in a famishing
and dreadful state, having a mouth, without
the wit to get anything to put in it. Do send
him a drop of water and a kind word, if no
more. And this gentleman playfully repeated
the baptismal ceremony performed by his friend
Chisel.
Take that, exclaimed a third, a little man
with a dry visage, punching Bobbylink with the
butt-end of his boat-horn in the back and ribs,
take that from that harmless critter, Tommy
Snipe! and this, mistress, dashing a hornful
of water into the face of Miss Steddle, there's
something to cool your kitten with, when she's
in a fit! ha! ha!
As for Harvest, let him shirk for himself,
said a fourth, he's a poor, barebacked
animal
,
and is of no more value than an old
rainspout
,
accompanying his words with a copious
commentary of an aquatic nature.
Wheeling the boat about, and discharging
small-shot like this, they at length seemed to
have wrought the sport to a climax, and at a
signal given by Habakkuk Viol, they prepared
for its consummation by each filling his
boat-horn
to the brim.
There, Bobby, cried Habakkuk,
discharging
his piece, put that in your pocket, and
keep it to sprinkle your firstborn with!
Young lady, shouted Sam. Chisel, them
nice, buddin' roses on your cheeks, wants wa
terin' a little, and he supplied the deficiency
forthwith.
Linkem! exclaimed Harvest, I don't
believe
your coat's ever been sponged, that,
throwing the contents of a boat-horn on the
collar and skirts of his upper-garment, that
does the business for you!and there's a little
of the rock-crystal to drink your tailor's health
in!
Miss, how's them colors on your gown
will they stand the water? said Tommy Snipe,
instantaneously applying the test to which he
alluded.
May-be your pockets is dry, suggested
Sam. Chisel, insinuating a couple of hornsful
adroitly into that quarter of Mr. Bobbylink's
dress, they're gapin' like oysters for a drop o'
drink.
What a nice water-proof Robert's got on,
this morning! exclaimed Viol, testing the
hatter's
assertion recorded in the lining, by a small
artificial shower. Warranted against
thunder
,
lightning, and rain!
Why, Bob, you look like a pond-duck in
the equinoctial! said Sam. Chisel, is that
your mate, Bobby?if so it be, her feathers
want purifying!
Judging by the crook of his nose,
continued
Hank Harvest, he looks more like a
fish-hawk
,
and again emptying his boat-horn, he
should get used to his adopted element.
Now, with a grand and general discharge of
their pieces, as they discovered that they were
nearing the opposite shore, and the idea flashed
across their minds that if Bobbylink and his
companion
were once landed, they might annoy them
pretty seriously from the banks, they altered their
boat's course, and, shooting athwart his bows,
plied their oars for the other end of the lake.
There, Mr. Bobbylink, exclaimed Viol,
as they parted company, tossing him a farewell
beaker of the fluid, I advise you to save that
to wash your face with the first time it's clawed
by Mrs. Hetty Bobbylink.
And don't forget to make me a pair of
saddle-covers
out of Sam. Chisel's earswhen you
catch him! shouted the proprietor of said ears,
grinning monstrously, and playfully projecting a
jet of water into the mouth of Bob Bobbylink,
which stood agape with astonishment and terror.
During all these manuvres, which had been
executed within a brief space of time and with
admirable dexterity, Bobbylink had retained his
seat, half inclined to kindle into a horrid
passion
,
and half determined to burst into a hearty
laugh, and take it all as a good joke. To be
sure, when he looked upon his fair mistress,
and saw her new figured-silk dress drenched
with water, he was sorely vexed and
discomforted
;
but he had brought, he well knew, the
whole catastrophe upon them by his hasty
promise to discard his old friends and cast them
loose, in the very first hour of his prosperity
and success.
He therefore felt bound, in conscience and
honor, to bear it cheerfully, and accordingly he
had no sooner handed Hetty from the boat than
his lungs exploded in a genuine and honest
cachination, in which he was instantly joined
by Miss Steddle, that young lady enjoying a
very pretty sense of the ludicrous, and feeling,
with her worthy associate, that she deserved
it all.
Pleasantly laughing over the whole scene,
they seated themselves on a wall in the sun,
and speedily drying their garments, started off
to gather blackberries instead of tempting, a
second time, the unlucky element.
DISASTERS OF OLD DRUDGE.
CONTAINING THE UNLAWFUL IMPRISONMENT
OF AN OLD GENTLEMAN; A POPULAR
BATTLE
BETWEEN TWO ATTORNEYS, AND A FEW
PRACTICAL SUGGESTIONS AS TO THE
IMPROPRIETY
OF OLD GENTLEMEN BEING OUT
AFTER
DARK.
The
village of Plumpitts stands at the head
of a vile little creek, which runs in and out
from the Sound with the tide. Unfortunately,
the tide has a propensity to be out oftener than
in, so that Plumpitts, for the better part of the
day, sits like a great duck stranded in the
middle
of the mud. The inhabitants of Plumpitts
are of two classes; those who belong to the
river interest, and those who belong to the
inland
interest. The former, consisting of two
rival sloop captains, half a score of vagabond
boys and idle-looking men, who assist the said
captains in navigating their craft to the city;
and the inland interest, consisting of
half-a-dozen
shopkeepers, and as many pestilent old
women
,
the former of whom spend their time in
retailing
sugar and starch to customers from the
interior, and the latter in wholesaling scandal
and small-talk to each otherand a very
thriving
trade they make of it. The standing
population
of the village is composed of about
twenty
blue-nosed topers, who hover about a place
called the Point, like so many noisy gulls,
during
the early part of the morning and toward
night, and pass the rest of the day in dirty
fishing
boats along the shore of the Sound,
solemnly
engaged in capturing black-fish and bass for
their present wants, and providing a stock of
cramps and rheumatisms for their old age.
About three miles back of Plumpitts, there
lay, once upon a time, an ill-conditioned piece
of land and a dilapidated old house, which,
altogether
,
was entitled the homestead; and in a
small room in the old house, a sharp-faced,
gray-eyed little woman, and a red-visaged man,
some two sizes larger, were seated at a
breakfast-table
.
The little woman sat erect and was
engaged with toast and coffee, and the man was
bent nearly double over a bowl of sour
buttermilk
,
and a white, earthen plate, holding a
single
small perch or sunfish, burnt to a crisp.
Drudge! cried the little woman, sharply.
Ma'am, answered the red-visaged man,
timidly.
You know I own this farm?
Yes.
And this house?
Yesand the span of horses and the
family
carriage!
Very welland all the ready moneydo
you know that?
Oh, yes, responded Mr Drudge, in a faint
voice.
And that you brought nothing but an old
saddle when I married you?
Yes, ma'am.
How dare you, then, eat fish and
buttermilk
together, contrary to my express orders?
Yeshow dare youyou miserable pauper!
shouted Mrs. Drudge, working herself into a
sublime phrensy.
Dear Tishy, I thought there was no harm
in it
Don't Tishy medon't dear meyou
object
.
You know I caught the perch myself,
humbly suggested her red-visaged victim.
I know you didyou poor creaturewhen
you ought to have been at home minding your
business. You hav'n't split your day's
ovenwood
yet, nor milked, nor brought water, nor
churnedyou've done nothing this morning,
Drudge, worse than nothingoh, you poor, lazy
thing! and she gave the poor man a glance,
which, if it had been half a degree fiercer, must
have inevitably scorched him to a cinder. At
this moment, a heavy-headed country boy thrust
his face in at the door, horribly distorted with
terror and bad news, and cried out, Buzbee's
red bull, missis, has just busted into the corn,
and our sheep has just busted out of the
long-lot
into Buzbee's woodsand the devil's to pay
all over the farm!
There's more work for you, Drudge!
Oh yes! rejoined that gentleman,
adopting
his customary reply when he had nothing
better to say.
Why didn't you look after that fence? I told
you Buzbee's bull would be over before a week's
time. And why hav'n't you penned the sheep,
as I ordered you a month ago?
The heavy-headed boy here returned and
interposed
.
I forgot to say, missis, that the storm last
night 'as washed away the little barnand
missis'
carriage is buried in Blind brook, half full
of mud, and two thirds o' water.
My God! cried Mrs. Drudge, in a sudden
paroxysm of anxiety, I thought it would be so,
Drudge, I thought it would be just so. You
wouldn't move that barn further up on the bank
no, you wouldn'tthough you might have
done it, if you'd strained yourself a little, with
Moe's help. Good heavens! I'm afraid the
carriage is ruined, and I wanted to use it this
very daygood Lord!
I think it might be got out, missis,
continued
the heavy-headed youth, if Mr. Drudge
would be so good as to give me a lift. The
heavy-headed youth smiled profoundly, as if he
thought it would be a very brilliant stretch of
fancy to suppose for a moment that Mr. Drudge
could escape the necessity of furnishing his
assistance
,
manual and bodily.
Drudge, do you hear! cried his
sweet-tempered
spouse, go along with Moses, and help
him get the carriage out, this instant!
Moses had left the room. Moses!
shouted
Mrs. Drudge, Moses!
Here, ma'am, here I be, responded the
youth, pushing a segment of his broad face over
a corner of the lintel.
You may help Drudge a little while, Moses,
only five minutes, be back here by that time. I
want you to cut some 'sparagus to put in the
front parlor, and a nosegay for the fireplace
I expect aunt and sister to tea, Moses, she
concluded, bestowing a bland smile upon the
heavy-headed juvenile.
Moses and Mr. Drudge thereupon departed,
the latter muttering, as he turned a corner of
the house, a fervent prayer for the immediate
demise and interment of the amiable lady whom
he had just left. As they crossed the fields on
their way to the scene of labor, Drudge was
the first to open a conversation with his
companion
.
Underhill, said he, have you got the
money by you for those muskrat skins?
No, I hav'n't just now, replied the boy,
Fields told me if I'd come over to the tanyard
to-morrow he'd settle with me.
And what have you done with the bag of
fresh feathers?
Themwhy, put them aboard the
marketwagon
.
I expect you'll have returns by next
Tuesday, or the day arter, responded the youth,
with a very intricate and complicated expression
of countenance, which might have been
construed
to mean half-a-dozen things at once.
I want that money very much, said
Drudge, partly to himself and partly to his
companion. There's Quimby's bill, on the
P'int, and John Merritt's account for clothing,
ought to be paid the first time I go to Plumpitts.
I think they ought, by all means, echoed
master Moses Underhill, with the same
ambidexter
look.
They had now reached Blind brook, and
discovered
the family carriage up to its waist in
the middle of the channel, the water dashing
over its dark top like that of some huge, black
monster which was struggling for its life up the
stream.
Moses, said Drudge, after surveying it for
a moment, you'll have to strip and go in.
Catch me! exclaimed master Moses,
retreating
backward up the bank, if you say
two words about that again, Drudge, I'll go
home and tell missis, and then you'll catch it I
reckon!
Mr. Underhill accompanied this tender threat
with a complacent grin, which had the singular
effect of throwing old Drudge into a violent
fever, which lasted some three minutes and a
quarter.
Well, Moses, said he at last, finding the
youth intractable, I suppose I must do it
myself
,
or else (lowering his voice) there'll be the
devil out of the pit to pay up at the house!
Directing his companion to bring a coil of
rope and a couple of lengths of rail, old Drudge
stripped stark naked and plunged in.
The first discovery he made was, that Blind
brook was some two feet deeper than he had
imagined, and, consequently, over his head.
His first movement after making this pleasant
discovery was to grasp the limb of a tree which
overhung the stream. This he succeeded in
doing, and sustained himself by it some five
minutes
,
bawling all the time to Moe Underhill for
help; and when, at length, that charming youth
came forward to his assistance, his zeal and
eagerness
to rescue Mr. Drudge were so overpowering
that he rushed headlong against the tree from
which that gentleman was suspended, with such
precipitancy as to shake Mr. Drudge directly
into
the water as if he had been a shrunken
russet-in-apple
,
in want of nothing but moisture. At
the very moment when he fell, a heavy swell
of the freshet came tumbling and raging down
the brook, and, striking Mr. Drudge obliquely
over the shoulder, carried him under; he rose
for a minute to the surface, and threw out his
hands convulsively toward the outstretched
limb, Mr. Moses Underhill ran up and down
the bank, shouting to him to dive for the
coach!when a second billow, heavier than
the first, rushed upon him and bore him from
the sight. The injunction of Moe Underhil (in
whatever spirit it was given) was not lost upon
the submerged Drudge, for, aiming with
considerable
skill, he succeeded in permitting
himself
to be borne in at the carriage-door, which
was swung open by the tide. Shortly after, a
long, melancholy-looking head was put out at
the top of the coach-door, and Moses discovered
that old Drudge stood upon the back seat of the
family carriage, and was safe.
After waiting something like an hour, until
the swollen torrent had subsided, Old Drudge
and his companion renewed their attempt, and,
with many struggles, by the aid of rope and
crowbar and bar-post, they succeeded in
rolling
the carriage upon the bankthe greater
share of the labor falling, of course (out of
deference
to his years), upon the patient Mr.
Drudge.
In the course of a couple of hours more, the
carriage was cleaned and partially dried, and
stood before the door awaiting Mrs. Drudge's
orders. The horses that were harnessed to it
were a notable couple, being sorrel twins,
having
long, ghastly necks, short tails, and punchy
bodies, with small mouths and mournful eyes;
and, to complete their character, lean and
feeble
,
with a look of over-work and ill-usage.
Drudge! screamed the amiable female
bearing that name, standing in the door and
directing
a withering glance towards Mr. Drudge,
who was slowly shambling up the lane
completely
exhausted and toil-worn. Drudge,
I want you to get in the carriage and go down
to Plumpitts at once!
Oh yes! said the poor man, meaning oh
no, a thousand times repeated with an
emphasis
.
Get in immediately, and I'll tell you what I
want. Drudge mounted in, almost
mechanically
,
under the talismanic influence of that
inexorable
voice. And now turn the key,
Moses: theresit still now, Drudge, and mind
me?
These words had been accompanied by the
closing of the carriage-door, the insertion of an
iron key in a lock attached to the same (which
Mrs. Drudge had placed there, knowing old
Drudge's propensity to indulge in potations and
forget his errands when he visited the thirsty
and drinking village of Plumpitts) and Mr.
Drudge's assuming a quiet, martyr-like
demeanor
,
as if he had been put in jail and expected
every minute to be brought out to instant
execution
.
In the first place, Drudge, you'll get me a
pound of Mr. Slimfink's best teabest young
hyson: try it yourself, Drudge, you're a good
judge of tea, Joel, though you don't get it but
once a week!
Oh yes! murmured Drudge, softly.
You needn't get out there; Slimfink will
bring a sample to the door, I gave him
directions
when I was there last about that. Next,
Drudge, you'll go over to Wringold's shop, and
purchase two yards of his small spotted calico
just in. Mind Drudgesmall spotted red
calicospots very small.
Can't he get me a new jacket, missis, while
he's there? suggested Moe Underhill from the
box seat, smiling pleasantly on his mistress.
You deserve a jacketdon't youyou
villain
,
for minding me so well this morning, and
coming back in just five minutes. You
good-for-nothing
,
you ought to have the jacket you've
got on well-trimmed, instead of a new one.
And Drudge, you can stop at Slimfink's as you
come back, and buy me seven pounds of Havana
sugar, and a quarter of starch; and, mark me
(raising her fist clenched in warlike fashion),
don't you venture to leave the carriage till
you've made every one of the purchases!
Purchase
by the sample, Drudge, and let 'em
understand
you pay in silver!
The sorrel twins, now, after repeated
admonitions
from a whip in the hand of Mr. Moses
Underhill, succeeded in getting themselves in
motion. The carriage wheels had scarcely
revolved
more than twice or three times, before
the voice of Mrs. Drudge was heard, calling
after them, and the person of Mrs. Drudge was
seen in pursuit of the vehicle. Moe Underhill,
allowed her to enjoy a delightful little trot on
the highway before he condescended to arrest
his promising span.
Stop, Moses, stop, stop, stop! cried Mrs.
Drudge, in an ascending musical voice. Here's
the key: you've forgotten the coach-door key!
At length she overtook the fugitive vehicle,
and handed the key up to the youthful worthy
on the driver's seat, Do you hurry back, Moses,
to cut that asparagus and make that nosegay.
Yes, misses, I'll make you a very nice
nosegay
when I come backa very nice one,
answered
Mr. Underhill. Whether he ever lived
to come back and make that nosegay is a matter
about which the reader's mind will be placed
perfectly at rest at the sequel.
Drudge! cried his amiable spouse once
more, conveying her little sharp face and vicious
gray eyes inside of the carriage window. You
may bring me a bunch of black-fish, if Tom
Haddock has any fresh from the water: and
don't you get out till you've brought the fish as
you value your life;and as for the starch
recollectit's for my own personal collars, and
not for yoursso you'll get first quality.
Hereupon Mrs. Drudge departed, Mr. Drudge
fell back in his seat from the awful state of
suspense
in which he had listened to the last
injunction
of his charming lady, and the carriage
trundled or crawled along the road.
They travelled on quietly at a moderate pace
for the first mile and a half of the distance to
Plumpitts, when suddenly, as they were turning
a corner of the road and driving close by the
side of a stone-wall, Moe Underhill was shot
softly from the carriage-box over the fence and
landed on his feet, in the neighboring field.
Old Drudge was slumbering at the moment, but
waking up a little while after and looking out
at the window, he discovered a heavy-headed
apparition bearing a marvellous general
resemblance
in outline and movement to Mr. Moses
Underhill, scudding rapidly across the fields.
It was, however, only the thought of a moment
with Drudgeand as the sorrel twins made no
such discovery, they journeyed forward at their
old pace the same as if nothing had happened.
At length, they reached the brow of Plumpitts'
hill, and feeling no restraining hand at the rein
they scampered down the declivity in lively
style, like a span of runaway spectres; and
rushed into the village with the old family
carriage
clattering at their back, at such speed as
to bring the best part of the population into the
road, and the remainder to their doors and
windows
.
The horses being without guidance aimed for
a public horse-trough, in the centre of the
village
,
at which they had a chance of obtaining
a few stray oat-grains, left there by more
fortunate
and better-fed quadrupeds that came to
water.
The eyes of every adult inhabitant of
Plumpitts
were levelled forthwith at the family
carriage
of Mrs. Drudge, which was well known in
the village; and on the discovery of Mr. Drudge
in one corner of the same, conversation like the
following arose:
Ah! ha!there's Tishy's private prison
again, and her poor-travelling jail-bird! said
an idle tailor, who had abandoned his
shopboard
and gathered with a group of men and
women in front of the post-office.
How old Drudge is beginning to look!
rejoined the post-master's wife, with her hands
under her apron. Upon my word he looks
ten years older than uncle Si Purdyand he's
sixty last Christmas, ten o'clock at night!
Enough to make a man look old, madam,
said the tailor, who was a consequential little
personage with a figurative turn of mind and a
firm expression of mouth, to be riding about like
a lobster in a stew-pan with the lid on, in that
horrid box of Tishy Drudge's. If I was Joel
Drudge I'd kill heryes! I'd maul her to death:
I'd hold her up to the sun on a three-pronged
pitchfork, and toast her to a cinder and go into
a regular state-prison at once as an incendiary!
I'd commit some dreadful crimethat would I
rather than be confined in that close crib. It
breaks a man's spirits like pie-crust, such a
thing does! He can't workhe can't do
anything
he
can't pay his debts! it incapaci'ates
him!
The name of this tailor happened to be John
Merritt, and the reader will at a thought,
discover
the happy pertinency and deep feeling
with which these remarks must have been
delivered
.
Why, said Tom Haddock, the fisherman,
who had paused with his wagon in front of the
post-office, to join in the conversation, he's
just as silly in thereOld Drudge isas a
consumptive
mackerel, in my big fish-car. But
where, in the name of the great Striped Bass
that Bill Horley caught last week, where is Moe
Und'rill? I saw the carriage come rattlin' in,
without pilot or helmsman, or a man at the
sculls, as I was crossin' the P'int. `There
must be something the matter,' says I to Harry
Shaddle, `or, you may depend on it, the boy
would have hold of the tiller!'
You say truly, Thomas, said the tailor,
something must be the matter, or Moses
Underhill
would
be in his place on the carriage
seat. Joel Drudge couldn't have driven the
horses down, sitting inside the vehicle, unless
his neck was as long as a crane's and he had
arms to match! Underhill is a wild youth and
may have pitched himself headlong from the
seat out of despair!
What the devil would he do that for?
asked
Tom Haddock.
Because his master can't pay his honest
debts? answered Mr. Merritt.
That's more than likely, said a small,
thinshouldered
old man, with a pair of smart,
sparkling
eyes that constantly gave the lie to the rest
of his countenance, which was dull, heavy and
devoid of meaning. That's more than likely,
for didn't Dolly Hiedlebrook's cat hang herself
in a boot-jack, because her mistress got too
poor to keep a cow?
Cats love cream, and Moses Underhill loves
money, and I shouldn't be surprised if he had
got off and drowned himself out of mere
respectability
,
added Mr. Merritt. It isn't
respectable
for a man to owe a tailor's bill.
It isn't, Mr. Merrittby no means it isn't,
and Tishy Drudge ought to be ashamed of
herself
for not keeping her husband in good clothes
and them paid forher owning as she doesthe
Hum'steadand ready moneys out at interest
too! asserted the postmaster's lady, with an
air of virtuous indignation.
He shall pay mine, I know! cried the
little
tailor, in as towering a passion as a little
tailor can be supposed, by the liveliest stretch
of imagination, capable of elevating himself to.
If it costs me all the thread and thimbles in
my shopand a year's beeswax tooI'll bring
him up to the mark. John Merritt won't be
trifled with any longer.
You're right, Merritt, said the
thin-shouldered
man. I wouldn't submit to it!
Merritt! Merritt! who are you talking
to? asked the little tailor, ferociously, looking
down from the eminence to which the tempest
of passion had whirled him. My name is Mr.
MerrittMr. John Merritt!
While this dialogue was passing, a new
personage
was approaching the grand centre of
attraction
Mrs.
Drudge's family carriage. This
was a broad-built, heavy gentlemen on
horseback
,
with a marvellously well-developed
person
,
presenting about the same breadth of
surface
to the eye, from whatever point he might
be viewed: whether from the north, the south,
the east, or the west. In a word it was Harry
Shaddle, the fat landlord of the tavern on the
Point. He rode up to the window of the carriage
and looking in, exclaimed, What, Joel, in the
old squirrel cage again!Why ar'n't you out, and
trotting down to the P'int to take a cup with us?
eh! solitary confinement's dry work as the gad-fly
thought when he was corked in an ounce vial!
With this the portly landlord gave a hearty
laugh, which shook not only his own wide
domain
of flesh but even reached the nag upon
which he was riding, and nearly shook the
little
animal off his legs. This self-same laugh
had made his fortune. Where's Moe?
Where
is the boy? cried Drudge, after
thrusting his head out of the carriage, and now,
for the first time, investigating the driver's seat.
I heard that you come in without a driver,
Joel, or else the Old One was setting up there
unsight, unseenfor your horses did come down
the hill, as if they had the very devil at their
heels!
I'm afraid the boy's thrown off and killed
my God! what will Tishy say? exclaimed
Drudge, elevating his hands and eyebrows and
speaking from the very bottom of his ventricle.
I thought I saw him pitched from the seat,
but it's like a dream.
Oh, don't disturb yourself, my old boy, I
don't believe Moe's deador like to be: he
knows too much for that. But have you heard
the news, Joel?
Nowhat news? nothing dreadful I hope.
Nothing very dreadful: only Quimby's
broke and blown up on the P'int, as I
prophesied
.
I knew he couldn't last long again' the
Old Stand with Harry Shaddle behind the
counter
though
a few of his friends flew off to the
new perchand you among the rest, Joel, I'm
sorry to say!Quimby's blown up like a smack
with a pound of gunpowder in the hold, and a
dropsical vagabond on deck: a limb of the poor
devil is scattered here and a limb there. Here
his rotten liver and lights; there, a decayed leg
and for his brainsthe harbor-master may
find them if he can and lay a duty on 'em!
He has made a sad time of it!
Yes; he's exploded entire, and made an
assignment out and out; whereby he assigns
and sets over to Smith Plevinassignee,
attorney
and creditor in chieffive live topers, a
row of broken-necked brandy bottles, an
uncollected
account against Joel Drudge, Esq., a pair
of musty boots, two odd slippers, a tap-room
without a customer, and a fishing boat without
a bottom!
Smith Plevin's the assignee, is he? asked
Drudge, with a pretty thorough knowledge of
the character of that same Smith Plevin.
Yes, Smith is the assigneeand devilish
tight work he'll make of some of you!You'd
better fight shy of Plumpitts, for he'll be sure
to snap you up the first time he catches you in
the county!
With this friendly caution Harry Shaddle
touched his whip to his horseand rode off,
sitting erect in his stirrups, and trying to make
a spectacle of himself, as every fat man does,
andto the credit of their efforts be it spoken
they generally succeed! Old Drudge threw
himself
back in the carriage, and began to
cogitate
with all his power of mind (which was by
no means unlimited) over Quimby's unsettled
billand the fate of Moses Underhillstriving
to devise some plan to pay the one and imagine
what had become of the other, when he
suddenly
descried a man and a boy approaching
by one of the cross roads that led into the
village
,
and, at the same moment, two other men
advancing on the other side, from the opposite
extremity of the same road.
He soon discovered that the former were Mr.
Smith Plevin, the attorney, and Moe Underhill;
and the latter, John Merritt, in company with
a man, whose person was unknown to Drudge.
Smith Plevin, was a middle-sized man, with a
hard livid countenance, without a drop of blood,
and a low, bony forehead, made to look still more
villanous by having his stiff black hair combed
down over it.
You are my prisoner! said this personage,
stepping up to the carriage with a heavy
bundle
of papers in his left hand, thrusting his
right hand in at the coach window and
grasping
old Drudge rudely by the collar.
You lie, sir, he's mine! shouted a voice
from the opposite side of the vehicle, and another
hand was placed at the same instant upon the
collar of Drudge's coat.
Haul him out, law or no law! cried a
second voice from the same quarter. Drag
him out, Mr. Skinningsdrag him outlike a
weasel from an egg-basket!he has owed
my
bill long enough, and I will have satisfaction,
cost what it may.
At this peremptory direction, which proceeded
from Merritt the tailor, his companion gave
Drudge a violent jerk, and attempted to pull
his person through the window of the vehicle.
Hold there, Skinnings, or you'll get in
trouble
!
bawled Smith Plevin. You've been
breaking the man's close
frangit clausum
.
Stir an inch further and I'll bring an action for
him myself! He's our prisoner! and Mr.
Smith Plevin twitched the body of old Drudge
with great energy towards himself. You're a
malefactor
, a
plagiendo
, and dd fool, Smith
Plevin! shouted Skinnings, and you may
take that as your counsel-fee in this case! and
he passed a pound weight of hard knuckles to
the account of the small ribs of Attorney Plevin.
See that, Moses! cried Plevin, with
quivering
lip and knees that quaked with apprehension.
An assault, with intent to kill! mark that,
Underhill
!
you're good evidenceover fourteen, I
believe, Moses?understand the nature of an
oath?
Yes, sir! answered master Moses, readily,
yes, sir!
All right, said the attorney, withdrawing
his hold from Drudge's collar, that's the
second
case I've picked up to-day: now get your
prisoner out, if you can, Skinnings!
In accordance with Plevin's ironical advice,
Skinnings first tried the carriage door; finding
that impregnable, he next attempted to draw
Drudge's body out at the carriage window, but,
after several strenous trials, he discovered that
it was impossible to get more than the head of
the terrified debtor through, and, as his writ
required
and authorized him to take his body,
he was obliged to abandon the attempt.
Meantime, Smith Plevin stood by, indulging a
sarcastic laugh, punching Moe Underhill with
the end of his law-papers, and inviting him to
observe the smart practice of Sim Skinnings,
the best lawyer in the county! When
Skinnings
withdrew from the carriage, muttering it
wouldn't be safe to break the cursed old door!
let's see what this bright young attorney has
got to do. Plevin stepped forward with a
complacent
smirk on his countenance, and placing
his hand upon the coach-door, turned toward
Moe Underhill, and, smiling, said, Moe,
advance
with your iron argument, in other words,
bring the key. I think we'll introduce a
document
here that will effectually remove this
stupid plea in bar.
At this summons, Mr. Moe Underhill inserted
his right hand in his right breeches-pocket; and
it is singular what a wonderful effect that
simple
insertion produced on the whole expression
of the boy's broad face; his lower-jaw fell, his
cheeks were monstrously elongated, and he, all
at once, looked strikingly like a Shaker in a
brown study.
His hands immediately and swiftly penetrated
into every conceivable pocket about his person;
he cross-questioned every nook and corner of
his clothing, and subjected his hat and boots to
a series of most searching interrogatories.
The universal and stunning return from
every
quarter was an unmitigated
non inventus
,
so that Master Moses Underhill had enjoyed
a beautiful travel on foot, of some
half-dozen
miles in the bracing country-air, over to
, the capital of the county, and
notified
Smith Plevin that Now old Drudge was to
be caught out of his own countyall to no
purpose
.
The horrid reflection crossed his mind,
that he might have lost the key in jumping from
the carriage, or in his scamper over the fields.
That this enterprising young gentleman might
not be alone in his peculiar style of face, Mr.
Plevin obligingly drew out his countenance to
the requisite length, and stood opposite Moe
Underhill with a responsive extent and sadness
of feature. At this moment, to increase the
joys of the worthy couple, Drudge suddenly
assumed a scruple of courage, and, thrusting
his red visage out of the coach, familiarly
charged Moe Underhill with being a thief
and a runaway!
To which the boy familiarly returned, Hush
your jaw, you old victim! I'll have my pay
out of you yet, for the beatin' you guv me last
Thanksgivin'-day!
That no single incident might be wanting to
complete the overwhelming catastrophe, Mr. Sim
Skinnings, at this juncture, marched up to Mr.
Smith Plevin, and with a determined manner said,
Sir, you were insolent, just now! and,
without
further parley, Mr. Skinnings commenced
an active assault on the person of the aforesaid
Mr. Plevin. Now, Skinnings was a tall man,
with an immoveable face, which looked as if it
had been carved out of seasoned pine-timber, or,
rather, as if all his features had been tied up,
very early in life, in a hard knot, and he had
found it impossible, ever since, to disentangle
them. He therefore formed no very pleasant or
playful belligerent, and, accordingly, began to
drub his little antagonist horrible at
arm's-length
.
Plevin, who, although not framed
exactly
on the heroic model, had some sparks of
manhood in him, thought the game altogether
too much on one side, and hastily imagining that
the bargain would be vastly improved by
introducing
a second party into it, plunged his head
directly into the waistcoat of Mr. Skinnings,
and commenced plying his arms up and down
into the face of that eminent gentleman, in a
parallel line like the pistons of an engine; and
Mr. Skinnings began to batter the dorsal
possessions
of Mr. Plevin, with a high, long sweep
of his arms, after the manner of a smith's largest
sledge-hammer.
Mr. Skinnings would have inevitably
succeeded
in breaking in sundry ribs of his
antagonist
,
had it not been for a fortunate bill in
chancery, of a monstrous solidity and
thickness
,
which was slumbering in the little
lawyer's
hind coat-pocket; and Plevin would have
undoubtedly disfigured the face of Skinnings
had he not, in an early stage of the attempt
made his knuckles sore by knocking against
the hard bronze thereof. While this
professional
battle was proceeding, and general
attention
was attracted to its progress, Drudge
thought it afforded a good opportunity for him
to attempt a release from his imprisonment.
With this purpose, he cautiously put his head
out of one of the openings of the windows, and,
shrinking his body to its smallest dimensions,
endeavored to coax it through. He succeeded
in passing it as far as his third rib, by forcible
struggles, and there, for some time, he hung,
neither
able to advance nor recede, like a rash
pickerel that has been caught in a net, and,
plunging into one of the meshes, imagines it
may glide throughfixed midway, its glassy
eyes looking out upon a glorious prospect of
escape
,
while its tail and the better part of its
body quiver and wriggle with all the horror of
confinement and fruitless toil! At length, by
a sudden wrench, Old Drudge succeeded in
restoring
himself to his former position on the
back seat of the carriageand there he sat,
shaking with the dampness of his prisonand
shaking as if his only remaining chance of
enfranchisement
lay in bursting his prison to
pieces by the violence of his tremors.
During all this time the combatants kept
steadily at their businessgrowing more
heated
and furious every minute. Suddenly a cry
of fire! fire! was heard in the upper part
of the village, and the village engine was seen
rattling along the main street, and bearing down
directly upon the mob, gathered about Plevin
and Skinnings, and, without a moment's delay,
it began playing, under the direction of Tom
Haddock, upon the belligerent attorneys. The
thumping of the engine-arms, the clamors of the
mob, and the shouts of the brawny fishermen,
alarmed the hitherto quiet sorrel twins of Mr.
Drudge, and thinking, perhaps, they had tarried
long enough in the disagreeable village of
Plumpitts
,
they wheeled about, and clattering past
the mob, just in time for Old Drudge to receive
a discharge of the engine-pipe upon his person,
they scampered off up Plumpitts' hill, on the
road to the Homestead.
Through these various events, the day had
glided
nearly to its close. Large, heavy shadows
began to fall from the trees by the roadside,
and, crowding nearer together, and dilating
more and more every moment as the sun
rapidly
declined, they darkened the track upon which
the driverless horses were travelling. Now and
then the shadow of a locust or wild-cherry-tree,
that stood solitary in the centre of a field would
blink in, like some monstrous goblin, at the
window of the carriage, and remind its
occupant
that night was swiftly approaching. A
tree-toad or cricket would repeat the tidings in
a doleful voice, and Old Drudge, trembling with
the chilliness of his prison and apprehension of
some peril or other, chattered in reply.
They passed a swampand the wind came
sighing and roaring through it like a mad devil,
and a swollen stream rushed dismally through
the tufts of dark grass and bog-weeds. Just as
he had fairly passed this gloomy spot, he heard a
rattling noise upon the roof of the coach, as if the
branches of some overhanging tree were raking
over it. He put out his head, timidly, to
discover
what it wasand received a violent stroke
from some unseen object obliquely over the face.
Thinking it might have been a straggling
limb, as soon as he recovered from the shock,
he thrust his face out of the opposite window.
Again he received a stroke, heavier than the
first, and a gruff voice exclaimed, Now out of
the other! Poor Drudge, terrified and
trembling
,
and not daring to disregard the behest of
the invisible, fearfully exhibited his head from
the other window. A third blow made his sconce
ring againand the voice bawled, Now the
other! He obeyed againthwack!thwack!
thwack! and a shower of violent blows rained
about his ears and face until they brought blood.
This game was kept up for a quarter of an hour
when the voice dismounted, and, thrusting
into the carriage, whispered grimly, Moe
Und'rill's compliments to Mrs. Tishy Drudge,
and tell her she can roast you for Thanksgivin',
as you've been pounded tender! A smart
succession
of sharp, quick strokes lit upon the
backs and flanks of the sorrel brethren, and
they hurried away as if they thought Mrs.
Drudge herself was at their heels.
This unusual speed soon brought them to the
door of the Homestead, and, in attempting to
turn rapidly into the large gate that led to the
corn-crib, they overturned the disastrous and
ill-fated vehicle. At the point which they had
selected for its overthrow, there was a huge,
sharp-cornered rock, planted there to guard the
gate-posts, and the overturn was accompanied
with a loud crash. The work of the moment
accomplished the grand purpose of the day; it
shivered one of the carriage-doors, and left Old
Drudge sprawling at the opening, with one leg
sticking out of the opposite window in mid air.
The sudden display of a light at the door of the
house startled the animals, which had stopped
and stood stock-still when the catastrophe
occurred
;
they moved forward a few steps, and
Old Drudge was detected crawling forth.
Bruised, frightened, and hungry as he was,
he was glad to hobble up stairs and sneak
supperless
to bed, rather than encounter one of
those domestic tempests which had so often
rattled about his head, and given him, although
not an aged man, the aspect of a
weather-beaten
sea-captain, and the familiar title of Old
Drudge.
THE UNBURIED BONES.
Lost Beauty, I will die,
But I will thee recover.
Sir R. Fanshaw's
Querer Por Solo Querer
.
About
midway between Long island sound
and the Hudson, there is a gloomy ravine called
Dark Hollow, which ploughs, as it were, a broad
and deep furrow between two high ridges of
land. The Hollow itself is filled with sombre
woods, and constitutes a sort of legendary womb
of earth, in which tradition has for many years
bred its monsters; supplying the neighborhood
with a brood of as lusty and good-for-nothing
fables, as gossip could wish to chirp over at a
winter's fireside. Among others, there is the
story of the spectre of the stranger that was
drowned in the neighboring pond (whose body
was never discovered), walking in this dim
valley
in his sleeves, with his yellow vest thrown
open, with one short boot and one long one, and
without a hat, just as he appeared before his
fishing-boat was overturnedthe very costume
in which he went to the bottom.
Then there was the Yankee that hung
himself
on the great black walnut-tree, by the brook,
with an empty cider flask in his pocket, and whose
ghost has so unquenchable a thirst, that it has
been heard, any time the last twenty years,
crying
(in a thick voice, and apparently half-over
seas) for more cider! and another pull at
the jugonly one more! and to the thirsty
propensities of which ghost, the owners of the
land below the Hollow attribute the frequent
dryness that afflicts the channel of the brook.
Then, on the side of the Hollow, and under
the shelter of rugged and sturdy oaks, that
clamber
up in the dim light, as if eager to breathe
a purer air, lies nestling, away from the
observation
of the keenest eye, Gaby's Hole; a
mysterious
nook, in which, the story goes, a gang
of hardy counterfeiters, many years ago,
established
a mint, and spouted forth thence, as
from a fountain, their streams of impure
coinage.
It is said that ruffian forms are even now
sometimes seen flitting about the mouth of the
Hole, and that the glare of lawless fires lit
up so long since, is in cloudy nights reflected
against the sky. The noise of hammers, too,
often mingles with the puffing of a huge
bellows
,
and, combined, they startle the damp
cricket from his low pallet on the earth, and
the fire-bug from his light-house elevation in
the mountain pine.
It was near this haunted region, and reclining
on a slope of the opposite ridge, that Francis
Whortle gazed into the Hollow. It was a
summer's
afternoon and he had lingered on that
particular
spot, thus questioning the depths of the
mysterious realm, he knew not why, for several
hours.
There was something in his past history that
might explain this brooding habit, which was
wont to seize and bind him as with a spell by
the side of running streams, in the twilight of
thoughtful sunsets, or beneath the melancholy
boughs of mighty trees.
Francis Whortle was a youth in the very
prime and spring-time of life, and yet clouds
came and passed across his brow as if it had been
that of an aged man, or one on the remotest
verge of suffering and care-stricken manhood.
The story of his sorrow was simple enough,
though with a touch of almost romantic
singularity
.
He had loved a beautiful girland, as
he thought, had won her affection in return;
when, suddenly, and without any hint or token
of such an event, she had vanished from the
neighborhoodvanished like a spirit, none
could tell at what precise moment, from what
spot, nor whiter. Hope exhausted itself in
hoping, and dreaming visions of her return, and
Invention fell dead at the anxious feet of the
bereaved man's friendsbut she never more
came back. At night a light form, beautiful
with the hue and the grace of youth, stood often
at his bedside, and smiled upon him with a
delicate
finger on its dewy lipsand vanished
silent
and smoothly as the air. Spring came, the
bright season of expectation and promise, and
still she tarried. Summer perished in the
deep-green
woods and was buried beneath the
Autumn
leaves, yet the lost one was not found.
Thus time chased hour on hour, and the skies
smiled and threatened, and after long lingering,
the swallow and the pigeon returned them their
strange absence far away, but the sweet girl
came not in their track, returned not to haunt
her own familiar dwelling nor to build her
bower under the calm old eaves of her
childhood's
home. From the hour of that sad
disappearance
,
Whortle had yielded himself to an
unseen influence which led him about from
place to place, as in a dream. From that
moment
he had rambled hither and thither, through
wood and field, and placing himself on some
chosen spot, with the soft meadow-brook's
murmur
in his ear, or the gentle sound of waving
branches, he would strain forward with an
eager gaze and anxious look, as if he awaited
the sudden presence of the vanished Creature
from earth or air.
So busy was his brain with the image of the
lost one, so nimble and restless his fancy in
forging comfort for his poor, lone heart, that
every object in nature at times assumed the
fairy shape and seemed to walk forth from amid
surrounding things, palpable to the eye, fresh
and lovely as in the moment before she had
gone for ever. That young man's single grief
brought back for a time all the fair humanities
of old religion, and often in the deep wood he
started at a gentle form gliding swiftly, like a
dryad, before his view; or gazed wildly on a
sweet face smiling responsive to his own from
the untroubled fountain, a nymph-like
countenance
,
perishing with the first breath of the
gazer. It had become his sole employment to
people all the fields, and meadows, and mar
gins, and woodland glades, with the spiritual
likeness of his vanished mistress.
With this hope warm at his heart he peered
earnestly into the deepening shadows of the
Hollow. In a few moments an airy and
graceful
shape sprang, as if from the covert of a
wild vine; it was the accustomed gentle form;
it turned its face upon the lover; it smiled
andas the young man livesit beckons him
from his lofty seat. He doubtsit pausesa
sorrowful look darkens its fair countenance
again it smiles and renews the token. This
time he will not doubt nor waver. He gains
his feet, and with unusual speed hurries after
the fair apparition. Within a few paces of
her, however, he slackens his steps, and follows
in awe and wonder. Straight through the
Counterfeiters' dark defile she takes her way,
without hindrance from stone, bush, or tree:
following, as he may, he pursues her till she
winds through a clump of tall, gloomy trees,
and steps out upon an open space. He has
stumbled but once, and that was a little way
back, upon a rusted spade, standing against the
remains of an old forge or rural fire-place. The
gentle apparition crosses the glade; she reaches
a white object that stands out boldly against
the dark earth, and turning once more upon him
with a sad smile, she melts, like a dew or a
snow-flake into the earth. For a moment he
pauses like one who has seen some strange
object
in sleep; but quickly surmounting fear and
wonder, he hastens to the spot where the
visionary
Creature was lost to his gaze, with a
high hope beating at his heart, and rising up
and looking out at his gleaming and eager eyes.
He discovered a mouldering heap of bones, and
as his eye wandered about here and there, they
fell upon something that glimmered in the grass:
a quick, faint splendor, as of some
lightningbug
or cricket trailing about his little lantern
from one blade or one green hillock to another.
But it shone too steadily for their transitory
light, and as his thoughts were fixed upon it as
if it had been the lurking eye of a serpent, he
stooped and took it in his hand. It was a plain
gold ring, soiled slightly by the weather, and,
with the inscription
Ruth Greenleaf
.
Holding
the relic in his hand, he stood like one lost
in revery, gazing by turns on it and on the
mouldering bones at his feet.
Where he had found the ring the fragment
of an arm-bone lay, but the hand to which it
had belonged was crumbled and gone. He now
felt that he was standing by the mortal remains
of the fair creature who had disappeared so
long ago, and borne with her his heart into the
deep forest. It too had mouldered like the
bones before him; though it had a living tomb,
his own breast. The apparition had guided
him kindly to this spot to fulfil a sweet and
sacred duty: the burial of these fair, white
relics. How she had perished there, in that
strange, lone place, he could not guess; whether
by swift stroke of lightning, by serpent's poison
tooth, by the sharp pointed pain of sudden
malady
,
or by a deadly hand. The last seemed
probable, and he thought at once that she had
been murdered by the ruffian counterfeiters,
upon whose guilty labor she may have come in
some one of her girlish rambles through the
gloomy hollow. They had slain her lest she
should disclose their hiding-place, and had fled.
The disordered condition in which he had
observed
Gaby's Hole, as he passed rapidly
through it, strengthened and justified this dim
conjecture. But though she had lain long in
the chill air, while the green trees were looking
down upon her and shaking their green glories
in vain as a shroud over her, the hour of her
sepulture had come. Kneeling at the foot of
the relics, and breathing forth a brief prayer,
Whortle stepped back a little, and returned with
a rusty spade in his hand. Selecting a spot on
which the sunlight fell in the pleasant hours of
the day, and where no gloomy nor ill-boding
tree cast its shadow, he struck his spade into
the mould. As he delved the earth, many
thoughts swelled into his heart and moistened
his eyes.
Here have you lain and crumbled, thought
he, while I have lived framing idle fables,
dreaming vainly over the past, and questioning
the future. The soft spring-shower descends,
and the wild-rose takes off its infant mask in
the meadow, and discloses its blushing face to
the sun, and air, but in vain have those gentle
drops fallen on you, pale, passionless relics.
The Winds and the Elements have swept the
earth, and the air, and the waters quickening
all things into life; but you, even the loud
thunder has passed by, and left dull, slumbrous,
and motionless as ever. Here the fresh dawn
has poured its ray, and kindled voices and
harmonies
without number in the breast of this
wild wood; silent, mournful, and dismantled it
has found, and left you, once the glorious
residence
of speech and music. Shrunken from a
fair and fruit-like beauty, where all eyes once
dwelt, you have rested herevisited by all
things in naturethe wind, the sunbeam, the
shower and the evening glory, unknown,
honorless
,
and unadored. With emotions and
fancies
like these he shaped the grave.
Simple as was the whole scene, it was a
subject
for the painter's finest pencilfor it was
tinged with many colors of the true sublime.
A spade, a youth, and a few crumbling bones.
What is there in these to awaken deep feeling
or reverential thought? It is a spiritual
picture
in the midst of busy life. On the high
ridge they are gathered with the setting sun
streaming full upon them, while on one side
husbandmen, joyous with the spirit of plenty,
are turning their winrows; on another, nearer
by, on the margin of the pond, a boisterous
group are dragging their well-laden fish-net
ashore, blessing Fortune and the favoring tide.
Beyond the hollow, up on the by-road that
passes
through the woods, a country school is just
let loose, and Childhood tumbles with its
satchel and sportive face into the open air, and
looks up laughingly to the clear sky. And
there into that neat farm-house, with its
newly-painted
front, a troop of weddeners is hastening.
On Whortle delves, and the grave is finished.
Gently he lays the relics in its bosom, and ere
he casts back the damp earth on its kindred
earth, he stands, leaning on his simple
companion
in the labor, and gazes long and
earnestly
down into the hollow mould.
He has buried the hallowed bones, and
planted
an evergreen at their head, and as the
mellow
light of the dying day streams through the
trees, borrowing a new hue, to add to its
thousand
colors, from them, he turns his steps
mournfully
away, as if he had laid his own heart there
with his mistress' dust.
PARSON HUCKINS'S FIRST
APPEARANCE.
At
the close of a day in the early part of
autumn, a small-built gentleman, in a black
suit and snowy neckerchief, was sitting in the
desk of Chatham chapel, with his head resting
upon his folded hands. From the tall
side-windows
,
the purple shadows of evening fell upon
his person, and thronged about his elevated
place of repose, as if they would bury him
entirely
from the gaze. The whole vast body of
the building began to be filled with darkness
and gloom, and the different objectsthe pews
the galleries and aisles, were blended
together
,
and assumed whatever shapes the fancy
chose to give them. The black-clad
gentleman
,
the sole tenant of this realm of shadows
and confusion, was the Rev. John Huckins, a
righteous man of God, who was born with the
happiest possession that one who intends to
make piety the business of his life can fall heir
to, and that was, an indescribably meek and
evangelical length of feature. He was, at the
present time, the clergyman of a Christian
congregation
that worshipped in the chapel, and
at the particular moment when he is introduced
to the reader, was reposing after the fatigues
of the afternoon Wednesday service, and at the
same time awaiting the attendance of a few
professors on a prayer-meeting, which was to
be held there preparatory to an evening
discourse
.
In the slumber which he was enjoying,
images of past scenesof times long bygone
vanished away, far away in the dim regions of
youth, mingled with the events and things and
creatures of yesterday, and at length he dreamed
that the very chapel, in which he was seated,
was touched by the strange magic of sleep, and
was passing through one of those wild and
wizard
changes which occur only in dreams. He
beheld before him two beings, with something
mortal in their garments and bearing, mixed
with more that was unearthly and spectral in
their look and the tones of their voice.
One was short and round-shouldered, with a
F
long-waisted roundabout on, and the other a
pale meager figure, with sweat upon his brow,
which seemed as if it might be the death-damp,
which he had neglected to wipe away in his
hurried emergence into light. They both busied
themselves in unhinging the pew-doors, and
with huge piles of them upon their shoulders
far greater, it seemed, than mere mortals could
stagger underthey tottered down the aisles,
and, disappearing at the preacher's feet,
returned
in a few minutes empty-handed, and bore
away a second load. While they were engaged
in this singular task, they now and then
interchanged
a word with each other.
What do we have to-night? asked the
round-shouldered man.
The `Devil's Due Bill,' answered his
companion.
What! `The Devil's Due Bill Honored'
in which old Roberts is so capital in Wiggle?
The same, the very same! returned the
meager figure, and I thank Heaven we've got
possession again. It was a shame to let these
canting dogs bark so long in old Chatham; and
I could not lay easy in my grave till I helped
get up another good old piece in her walls!
You're right, Billprompter snuff me out
if you a'n't! assented the round-shouldered
personage. I wonder if they'll all be here
to-night?
The whole company, in full force, you may
depend upon it, and we'll go through it in less
time than we ever did beforemusic and all
take my word for it.
When they had completely disposed of the
doors, they commenced sacking the pews
themselves
,
and carried off the red and brown
cushions
,
muttering, Bare benches is good enough
for the half-price bottoms of the pit! After
this they swept the hymn-books, testaments,
&c., which they found on the pew-shelves,
into
a green-baize, and hurried them away with
the same eagerness, grumbling forth something
or other about the saints in the playhouse!
While these two personages were engaged
in this way, as many as half-a-dozen
sallow-looking
men were perched about the floor of
the building, on ladders, with painters' jackets
on, and employed in swiftly executing miniature
scenes from Shakspere and other dramatists,
on the naked panel-work of the galleries. In
the meanwhile, hammers were plying in every
quarter of the house; nails were drawn and
driven, parts of the building taken down and
parts renewed, with all the dexterity and
despatch
of jugglery. Presently, all the artisans
disappeared, whither, no one could guess; and
Huckins, astonished at what he saw, and every
moment expecting some greater wonder, now
discovered men and women in gay dresses,
laughing, and full of frolic, entering the first
gallery, while instead of the humble believers
and penitents whom he had expected to detect
creeping up the aisle to prayer-meeting, whole
hosts of robust sinners, and boisterous boys and
'prentices poured in upon the floor of the house,
and took possession of the seats directly before
his face. In a moment more he heard the faint
tinkling of a bell, and, turning round, discovered
an immense curtain, with the picture of a huge
woman, with flowing robes and a yellow crown
on her head, rolling gradually toward the
ceiling
;
and now, for the first time, as he took his
seat among the spectators, the conviction
entered
his mind that he was in Chatham theatre,
a wild, wicked boy, yet with some germes of
childish innocence and purity blossoming about
his heart, and not the hard, hypocritical man,
seemingly holy and pure in outward act, while
all within was barrenness, guile, and a dull,
gloomy heathendom. The first scene that
opened upon the audience, exhibited what
seemed to be the committee-room of a church,
in which were assembled some seven or eight
men, transacting business connected with their
office of trustees or deacons. In dress and
demeanor
they resembled men with whom
Huckins
was familiar, although their size and
lineaments
in some respects were different. The
prominent personage of the group was a
turtle-shaped
,
middle-sized man, with a brown wig
and wrinkled countenance, expressive of a
dogmatical
temper and sturdy self-will.
It shall be so! cried this magnate, striding
up and down the stage, and flourishing a heavy
walking-stick. I have made up my mind to
that point, gentlemen. He has the genuine
evangelical spirit, I am confident, and that's
enough for me.
And for me, added a second
committee-man
.
He's not a bad speaker, too, for I sat
beneath the back gallery, and heard distinctly
every word that he uttered.
I stationed myself behind a post, said a
third, and took the exact gauge of his voice.
It is a high tenor, and suits an oblong,
lowroofed
building like ours, exactly. He has my
vote.
The spirit is all that is needed, rejoined
a fourth, the pious, Bible spirit. This is
arms, legs, and voice, to a godly preacher.
You are right, my friends, resumed the
first speaker, smiling complacently upon his
supporters, very right, and if he had a voice
as rough as the Rocky mountains
But consider, Mr. Huff, interposed a tall,
lantern-faced man, we have learned from his
confidential servant, Wiggle, that he writes his
sermons in an overcoat, with his hat on, and a
small bundle always packed up and lying on
his table. He isn't in the missionary service
and liable to be summoned away to
Burampooter
or Burmah at a moment's notice, and what
do all these travelling preparations mean? Eh?
Genius! answered Mr. Huff,
peremptorily
.
Genius and the Holy Ghost! Look
what a face he has, too. Why the exhibition
of that face alone at the gate of heaven would
obtain his instant admission. It's the face of
a cherub, Higgs!
As Higgs, my senior partner, says, began
a timid little man, who was rather short of
wind, and, consequently, always cut short in
his attempted observation, as in the present
case. Wiggle, his confidential
Vexation take Wiggle! cried Mr. Huff.
Gentlemen, shall we put it to vote? Are
you ready? In a few minutes, after the
circulation
of a respectable black beaver hat
among the members of the committee, the
Rev. John Huckins was announced as duly
elected pastor of theChurch.
The previous astonishment and wonder of
the parson was not a little increased at
beholding
his own election thus passing before his
eyes, very much in the same manner as it must
have passed in private, when he was a
candidate
before these self-same gentlemen, who
were thus mysteriously presented to him in the
full possession of their official functions.
The scene now shifted, and in the place of
the deacons in their committee-room, Huckins
beheld the parlor of a respectable private
dwelling in which were assembled about twenty
females, of all ages, old, young, and many in
the middle period of life.
What a powerful discourse! exclaimed
one of them, a large woman, with an ugly
expression
of countenance.
So earnest, too! said a young lady.
Brother George counted the strokes of his
arm upon the cushion, and thinks he rose a
hundred in the course of his sermon: besides
the two prayers. He is a divine preacher!
This fiery zeal of his will keep us busy
furnishing
pulpit covers it is true, said an aged
female, but the Lord be blessed! my eyesight
continues good, and my right hand hath not
yet forgot its cunning: I can be serviceable to
the church even in my old age in this matter.
Smite the sinner like a strong man, and we'll
supply the red damask, or plush of good
quality
,
as long as the Lord continues our brother
in the ministry.
I propose, said the large lady, that we
make the Reverend John Huckins a life
member
of the `Pottawatomy Society,' and that a
committee be named to wait upon the
distinguished
gentleman to notify him of his election,
and request him to deliver a series of
discourses
,
on the importance of clothing juvenile
Indians
in slops and dickies, in aid of the funds
of the Pottawatomy Association! This motion
was unanimously carried, and the large lady
was named as said committee. Much further
general conversation occurred, followed by a
scriptural banquet of hot rolls and preserves,
and the Society dispersed to their respective
residences.
To his utter astonishment, the next scene
represented a room, in every respect
corresponding
with his own study; and to his great
horror
,
he felt himself suddenly lifted from his
seat in the pit, and by some unseen agency
placed by the side of a small table upon the
stage and fronting the gaze of an immense
audience
.
In a moment after his abrupt
metempsychosis
from the pit, a little man in a buff com
plexion and buff-colored pantaloons to match a
bob-tailed coat and skull-cap, with a brown loaf
under one arm, and a bowl in his hand, entered,
with a comic salutation to the audience and an
irresistible grin on his visnomy, and was greeted
on his appearance, as if he were a favorite
performer
.
It was Roberts, Old Roberts, the droll
and comedian of Old Chatham theatre, and
Huckins at once recognised in him one of the
actors whom he had seen on that same stage
many long years ago when a boy. The
character
which this quaint performer at present
personated, was that of the confidential servant
of the Rev. John Huckins, over whom he
seems to have possessed a singular mastery,
which he had an equally singular mode of
exhibiting
.
Well, Wiggle, said Huckins, constrained
by some mysterious influence to take part in the
play that was, or seemed to be, performing:
Salary, three thousandhouse-rent free,
besides
an open account with every member of
the congregation. That's a handsome
business
!
Rather handsome, I should say! replied
Wiggle. Summ'at better than looking through
a noose, like a starved steer through an ox-yoke,
in this fashion. And running a rapid noose
in his pocket-handkerchief, he threw it over
the head of the Reverend gentleman, and drew
it up till his face reddened like an autumnal
sunset, while the audience encouraged the
manuvre by the most clamorous applause.
There, continued Wiggle, loosening his
halter, I'll let you off this time, but mind, I'm
to have twenty per cent, and marriage fees!
I thought, returned Huckins, it was to
be the naked twenty per cent. Nothing was
said about the fees before.
Oh, the feesI must have the fees, or do
you see, said Wiggle, knocking the parson's
broad-brimmed hat over his eyes, you'll be
furnished with a night-cap that admits no
waking, and when it's drawn on you, go to sleep
for good and all.
Well, well, said the parson, take your
own way, but be careful and not a word about
the
Ar
Hush, said Huckins, don't breathe the
word in this hemisphere, or we're done for!
You must pay me the fees too, continued
the remorseless Wiggle, as you receive them.
They're generally paid in gold, and there's a
premium you know. D'ye understand?
And to awaken Mr. Huckins to a lively
perception
of what he meant, he punched him
playfully in different parts of the person, and
concluded by placing his hand gathered like a
trumpet at his ear, and uttering, in a
portentous
whisper, the word Arson!
Now whether the terror and paleness which
invariably afflicted Hackins at the mention of
this dissyllable arose from the retrospect and
reminiscence of some past conflagration in
which he had participated, or from his looking
forward, with prophetic eye, to the great
burning, in which he might, perhaps,
reasonably
expect to participate more deeply, it would
not be wise, to conjecture at this early stage of
the business.
Do you think there's the slightestthe
faintest chance of detection? gasped Huckins.
None at all, not as much as would convict
a grasshopper of wearing pumps, I warrant
you, if you'll keep your face stretched out to the
right length. Do you practise as I told you?
Yes twice a day.
Mornin' and evenin' I suppose, before a
glass. You'd better stretch it in a boot-jack
than let it dry and shrink upfor you'd look
like the very devil if it wasn't for that smooth
face of yours, Jack.
You haven't said anything of the overcoat
and so forthhave you? asked Huckins.
Only hinted a little of it to Higgs, one of
the committeewho was rather unfavourable to
your electionthinking it might give him an
idea of what a great preacher you was, and
what wonderful talent you had to write your
sermons in a box-coat!
Be careful, Wigglefor Higgs is a sharp,
keen man, and already suspects something:
and it's safest to be ready for travel at short
notice, isn't it?
By all means. Be prudent, and we'll feather
our nests and fill our pockets out of these
innocents
yet. Preach stanch sermonsstrong
flavor of brimstonemake long prayers and
loud ones, and live on vegetables in public
and our fortunes are made!
Ay, ay, said the parson, don't fear me;
and hark, Wiggle, be particularly careful not
to have anything to say to that fellow Morfit.
I believe he knew me when I was here before.
What, the lean affidavit-maker?I wouldn't
speak to the starveling, if we two were on a
desert island famishingif he had a broiled
woodcock in his hand, basted in its own
drippings
,
and would divide it for the asking.
Here the facetious Wiggle slipped his
scullcap
into his coat pocket, perched the bowl upon
the crown of his head, took a huge mouthful
from the brown loaf under his right arm, lifted
his coat-tails in a playful manner toward the
audience with his left, and amid a tempest of
huzzas and shouts of Old Roberts for ever!
made his exit. The tall woman with her
flowing
robes and yellow crown, gradually emerged
from the eanvass as the curtain fell, and Parson
Huckins seated, he could not tell where, in the
confusion of his dream, heard the free comments
of the audience on what had passed.
He's a desperate villain, said a young
man in a pea-jacket, crushing a play-bill in his
hand as he spoke. But Wiggle's too much
for him!
I've seen many just such weasel-faced
fellows
as this parson! said a dry, little old
man, And I wouldn't trust one of 'em with
my finger parings.
What do you think will become of Huc
kins? asked a sharp-nosed man, with eyes that
projected like a lobster's; leaning forward into
the face of the dry old man.
Why, he'll be hung, answered the little
old man, emphatically, or turn politician,
which will amount to the same thing in the
end!
I think he'll marry the old lady of the
Pottawatomy
Association, suggested the young
gentleman in the pea-jacket.
We shall see! said the old man:the bell
tinkledthe curtain rose, and exhibited the
same seene as the last, with Huckins at the
small table, and Mr. Huff seated opposite.
If it could be made out scripturally, it
would afford me great satisfaction, said Mr.
Huff.
It can be, sir, I assure you; I shall be able
to show beyond doubt or controversy, that every
human being now on the face of the earth must
suffer the flames, except my humble self, and
the majority of the deacons of  church; in
which number, Mr. Thomas Huff, I am happy
to say, holds no mean position.
Thank you, sir, thank you; but have you
sufficient texts and apposite passages?
Ample, my good sir, ample, answered
Parson Huckins. Excerpts and quotations
from Isaiah and the Revelation, as long and
heavy as the weaver's beam, wherewith Golias
went forth against the children of Israel.
Really, continued the pharisaical little Mr.
Huff, rubbing his hands and clucking quietly
like a henReally, this will be the happiest
event of my life since my election as deacon.
What a pleasant time WE will have in heaven,
Brother Huckins! a little select company of
saints, feeding on the pleasant pastures of the
skies, like the remnant of a countless flock of
ewes and sheep, scattered hither and thither by
a storm; while hundreds of thousands of poor
wretches will be groaning and burning and
crying out in Tophet: provided you get them
there scripturally.
It shall be done, sir! said Huckins,
confidently
.
Mark me, I deny the doctrinethough I
must confess it looks reasonableunless you
support it stoutly by texts and bandages of Holy
Writ!
Fear not, again answered the parson, I
will bring the Bible to bear directly upon the
point, as if it had been shot from the mouth of
a cannon: and many will be the poor sinner
that would like to come under our blanket,
when the tempest and lightning, and bombs
and hand-grenades of Almighty wrath are
falling
about his ears!
We are safe? asked Mr. Huff, with an
anxious wrinkle on his brow. You are sure
of that?
Beyond peradventureas secure from hell
as if we were insured in a fire company,
answered Parson Huckins, somewhat profancly;
but it was in a dream, and perhaps the poor
man knew not what he spake. Anyhow, the
two grave and pious gentlemen here sat quiet
about the space of a minute, casting their eyes
toward the roof, and indulging in inward
laughter, which at length overflowed, and ran
out at their eyes and over their faces like tears.
After this, the parson produced a Bible and
a map of the world: and proceeded to illustrate
his views.
This, said he, pointing out one text, this
carries off all the heathenall these lands
around which I have drawn a black line:
African
,
Patagonian, Indian, Bedouin Arab, dwarf
Laplanderand the whole brood. This,
selecting
a second, despatches the Catholic
countriesmarked red in the mapand this
undoubted passage, taking a third, deals the
fire upon Protestant Europe and Botany Bay.
Botany Bay! exclaimed Huff, in
astonishment
.
Yesthere's a special clause for New
South Wales in this text. Nothing else could
be intended. As for America, there's no need
of scriptural denunciation, for we know from
our own eyes' testimony that it deserves no
less. The state of moral destitution in this
country, Mr. Huff, is absolutely awful! Sodom
and Gomorrah!Sodom and Gomorrah!
Will the town of Greenwich, Connecticut,
be saved, think you? asked Huff.
Not a soul, from the town clerk to the
county judge! answered the parson, who knew
that said town of Greenwich was Huff's
birthplace
,
and that he had been handled rather
severely there by the county court, in a little
affair of apportioning money from his pocket
for the support of a hedge-born child.
Thank God! thereupon cried the deacon,
when Huckins had uttered this verdict, and
showed him where he had entirely blotted out
the irreligious borough with a huge ink spot.
I feel grateful to you, Parson Huckins, for
these comforting doctrines, said Huff, taking
the parson warmly by the hand. Continue
steadfast in preaching and upholding them
and that matter of the increase of salary
you understand? And with this broken
suggestion
he departed.
The curtain dropped, and the next scene
discovered
Mr. Higgs, solus, striding up and down
the stage, apparently laboring under high
excitement
.
This is not to be borne, said he. Here
comes a fellow, the Lord knows whence, and
exhibits a furlong of feature one day over the
pulpit top, and consigns the whole audience
peremptorily to the pit, as if they were a basket
of spoiled salmon, and the next day, as the Lord
liveth, he is chosen paster of the congregation.
Why I would rather hear a fire-bell ring in
midsummer than his voice: his tones are those
of a radish-girl, and his gestures the contortions
of a rheumatic sailor undergoing the bastinado.
I hate such fellows worse than a stone-mason
hates a rat about his foundations. He deals his
brimstone about as freely as if the whole audience
were infected with the bilious fever, or were a
parcel of scoundrel dogs with the distemper.
He seems to have constituted himself a sort of
eternal watchman to cry in the great burning.
His discourse is stuck full of pitch and cinders,
and one could not be reasonably surprised to
see him spit flame. But somehow he hath
obtained
strange mastery over Huff (a eredulous,
ignorant old man, who believes everything he
hears, and a self-willed one, who strives to
impose
his novel discoveries on every one he
meets) and other of our people. The
Pottawatomy
Association is again in motionand
Heaven knows what absurdity these cackling
old women will give birth to!
Mr. Higgs now made his exit, and the next
scene displayed a cobbler's stall, in which a
long lean man was seated on a bench at work,
and standing by his side our old friend Wiggle.
So you find this a profitable business, said
Wiggle, this affidavit making?
It helps a little in hard times, answered
the cobbler. I can turn off at the rate of
three affidavits and two pairs of boots a week,
and that pays pretty well.
But Mr. Morfit, I should think there would
be no limit to the amount of business you might
drive in the former line. If I understand it, all
you have to do is to sign your name and kiss
the book.
Ah! you know very little of the profession,
said Morfit, with a sigh; I have found, from
considerable experience, that I can't stand more
than one affidavit a day. I tried for a little
while after I commenced, but I found the oaths
lay heavy on my conscience at night, and I put
it on regimen, one a day.
Who are your chief employers, Mr.
Morfit
?
The quack doctors: I supply them with
sworn certificates. A politician now and then
engages me just before an election; and I
occasionally
go into court, in important cases, to
help out the evidence.
What are your terms? So much a folio,
or such a per centage on the profits?
I see, Mr. Wiggle, you are entirely ignorant
of this branch of business, said Morfit, with a
ghastly grin. A gentleman wants something
in my line, he comes in, `Morfit,' says he, `an
affidavit on the virtues of the Buffalo
Embrocation
,
and a pair of light boots, both ready by
Saturday.' Very well, say I. `In Court,' says
an attorneyI have an extensive acquaintance
among attorneys`In court, Morfit, Saturday
morning, case of Borrowe
vs.
Bustard, action
of libel, swear bad character for Bustardand
two pairs of best made French slippers for
plaintiff.'
Well, said Wiggle, when will you have
this affidavit of mine done, about Huckins?
Let me see, this is Wednesday; two
certificates
for Dr. Spike, that his pills are valuable
in clarifying ciderswear to two barrels cleared
of sediment by a single box; affidavit for the
politician, that Quirks, opposition candidate,
knocked his cartman in the head with a cart
ng
, and destroyed four square inches of skull,
because said cartman refused to vote his
employer's
ticket!This is a busy week, Wiggle,
just before the fall election, but as you're an
old friend, I'll have this of yours for you
to-morrow
noon.
Do you understand what its contents are
to be?
That deponent was acquainted with said
Huckins in Massachusetts, while he was
studying
theology; knew him to be pious, correct in
deportment, highly esteemed, &c.
That's it, Morfit, said Wiggle; it's only
to satisfy the private scruples of one of the
deacons, who says he never heard of Huckins
before. To-morrow noon.
True as a heel-tap! answered the cobbler.
What's the number of the parson's dwelling.
Oh, I'll call for it, said Wiggle; but
our number's street.
Very good. Good day, Wiggle.
Good day to your honor! and Wiggle
departed
,
with an entirely original grin, which
drew his whole countenance into a single
wrinkle
,
by some mysterious motion of the muscles,
in the same manner as an old lady's work-bag
is drawn into a snug ball of silk, by aid of the
string.
The audience encored; he returned, and
renewed
the wonderful face, again departedthe
scene shiftsand enter the ugly old lady of the
Pottawatomy Association, and Mr. Higgins.
As I was saying, Mr. Higgins, said the old
lady. I am to wait upon Parson Huckins
tomorrow
,
and notify him of his life-membership
in the Pottawatomy, and solicit him to deliver
a course of lectures, or a single lecture, on the
present indelicate style of Indian dress, and the
propriety of substituting trousers and body-coats
in its stead. You will accompany me, will you,
Mr. Higgins?
Higgs, my senior partner, says
proceeded
Mr. Higgins.
Oh, yes, I understand, interposed the old
lady. If the medal was ready we might call
upon him to-day. Whether to present it to him
standing or kneeling
I should think, again said the unfortunate
Higgins, who seemed destined never to finish a
sentence, as Higgs
Or with my hat on or off, continued the
old lady, not heeding her companion; in my
new calico, or my cloth habit. I
must
consult
the society. I never would have undertaken this
task if I had known how many difficulties and
perplexities would attend it. Anyhow, we must
elect Parson Huckins a member of our `
Short-stitch
and Long-stitch Benevolent Union;' and
then I shall resign!
Mrs. Furbelowe! exclaimed Higgins.
He's a sweet mana pious, sweet man; I
could almost worship himOh, Huckins, it's
too good for my soul!
Mrs. Furbelowe! again cried Higgins,
at what hour
To-morrow noonto-morrow noon! ex
claimed Mrs. Furbelowe, waving him away;
meet me at the parson'ssweet Parson
Huckins!
The act curtain fell, and as the music (which
had a wild, unearthly tone in that building,
where it had been so long silent) played its full
tide of melody upon the audience from its airy
tubes, the groundling critics again indulged in
strictures on the performance.
The marriage will surely come on in the
last act! said the young man in the
pea-jacket
.
Mrs. Furbelowe sighs like a
broken-winded
bellows, and means to trap the parson.
There'll be a riot yet, said the sharp-nosed
man with the lobster eyes, don't you think
there will?
No such thing! answered the dry, little,
old man. Huckins will be made a bishop or
secretary of state before the play's done.
Wiggle
wasn't as good in this act.
He'll brighten up in the next! timidly
suggested
the young man in the pea-jacket.
He will! answered the dry, little, old man,
sententiously.
A shrill whistle was heard, the bell tinkled,
the curtain rose, and disclosed the worthy Mr.
Morfit, in an open street, eagerly eyeing a
respectable
two-story house, with the name of
John Huckins on a broad silver door-plate.
This is the house, said the
affidavit-maker
,
and I must get a sight of the reverend
gentlemanso as to know his person if I should
be confronted with him. That must be him,
casting his eye down the street, towards a
person
approaching in that directionblack suit
of broadclothauburn hair (making entries in
a note-book)a slow, cautious gaitlimps a
littleabout the middle height; now for his
facelong featured, piousgood heavens! it's
my old friendhush! I won't mention it in the
street, or we'll have a hanging on the nearest
lamp-postho! here comes Wiggle, tooI must
tell him some lie about my being here, though I
needn't swear to it. How are you, Wiggle?
Ah! my man of oaths and French slippers,
my pink of swearing and sole-leatherhow are
you, and what are you doing in this quarter of the
town? said Wiggle, striking the open palm of
his broad hand upon his back, like the fluke
of a Norwegian sperm-whale of the largest
class.
Merely looking out for a few subjects for
affidavits, answered Morfit. Two of the
aldermen
,
opposed to our party, live in those two
double-houses.
Well, what can you swear of them? asked
Wiggle; that they are four feet about the
girth, and split the seams of their coats open
with fat, like a full peascod in the month of
August?
No; but one of them has purple embossed
paper in his fanlightsand the other, a span
of high-headed light bay horses.
Suppose you could swear one of them
kept a stud of wild tigers, and had a polar-bear
for a coachmanwould it help you any?
To be sure, I'd give any amount of money
if I could swear to that effect, without being
set down by the whole city for as great a liar
as the town-clock!
How so, my worthy fellow?
Why, you see, responded Morfit, with a
sly leer, quadrupeds and villains is intimately
connected; if a man rides on horseback, he's a
rogue; in a one-horsed vehicle, he's a scamp;
and if he ventures in a coach or barouche of
his ownGod save us!he's a desperate
rascal
.
Let him trudge on foot, and wear out
sole-leatherand, Heaven bless him! he's an
honest man; poor, but honest. That's our
creed!
Well, I must in, in spite of your
wonderful
new discovery in ethics, said Wiggle,
working
his eyeballs with his thumbs, so as to
impress
Morfit with the conviction that it was all
therenamely, in his eye. We're to have grand
times at our house, this morning. Two of the
trustees is to callthe Botherwhatamy Society
presents a pewter dining-set to the parson, and
I'm to serve up a basket of the `pure juice of
the grape'good day, Morfitanother time
happy to see yougood daygood day!
And he glided in at the hall-door, with both
hands extended, as if in the act of swimming
out of reach of further dialogue with the
affidavit-maker
.
Well, said Morfit, when left alone, I
may as well disappear too, and I'm afraid I
shall be obliged to adulterate your `pure juice'
with a few drops of that unpleasant elixir called
justice. Here's for the police. Stretching his
neck, like some meager bird of prey, bringing
his coat close together, and knocking his hat
over his brows, he put off at full speed, down
the street.
In a few minutes the stage was occupied by
the ugly old lady of the Pottawatomy
Association
,
who came in puffing and blowing, and
looking
like Vesuvius on the eve of an eruption,
with Higgins running at her side.
A sultry day, Mr. Higgins, said she,
pausing
and unfurling a white pocket-handkerchief,
wherewith she wiped her picturesque face. A
very sultry daybe careful, or that medal will
meltsee that it's snug in the basket, if you
please, Mr. Higgins.
Yes, ma'am, answered the little
gentleman
,
uttering the first sentence that he had
been allowed to finish since his appearance in
the performance.
I wish I had thought to pack it in ice!
said Mrs. Furbelowe, looking wise, it would
be so cooling and grateful to John's hands.
What John? gasped Higgins, in
amazement
.
What John are you speaking
Oh, the parsonI meant the parson,
answered
the old lady, blushing slightly, I was
too scriptural, that was all. In the New
Testament
,
the apostles and disciples are so familiar,
it's really a picture to the mind, Mr. Higgins.
I wish Mr. Huckins would allow me to call him
John; it would be delightful, wouldn't it?
Before Higgins could furnish an answer,
they were within Parson Huckins's hall, and
the door had closed.
In a moment or two more, the two deacons,
Messrs. Huff and Higgs, were discovered
passing
through the street, in the same direction.
What think you of our new parson, now?
said Huff, with a smile on his wrinkled visage.
Worse and worse, answered Higgs; I
have not seen the certificates he promised, yet,
and, from the violent language of condemnation
that he uses in the pulpit, toward others, I doubt,
more and more, his own Christian character.
Anyhow, I should like to have some evidence
of it.
You are on your road to it, said Huff. If
certain proofs that he is to lay before me, are
not sufficient, you must be, in truth, hard of
belief
strong,
overwhelming, gospel proofs!
Some, such, I need, said Higgs, firmly, and
nothing less will serve my purpose. Christian
churches, Mr. Huff, are getting too much in the
habit of selecting their pastors as showmen
choose their lions, for the loudness of their roar,
or, like jugglers, for the quantity of false fire
they can spit from their lips.
Ah! interposed Huff, there you are,
Brother Higgs, on your old heresy. You were
always in favor of packing away Christians
coolly and comfortably, and despatching them
from this world as if the journey to heaven were
no more than a pleasant excursion by water, to
a country-town, in September. But nothing, in
my mind, can supply the Lord's household with
purified and holy occupants but firefirefire;
the beginning, the middle, and the end of
Scripture
!
Why men, Mr. Huff, are surely something
more than mere vessels of potter's clay, whose
bad qualities are to be burat out by the
flame.
Never mind, come in, come in, and your
scruples will melt the moment Parson Huckins
opens his mouth, said Huff; and at that
moment
they were ushered into the same building
that had received Mrs. Furbelowe and her
companion
.
The next scene disclosed the parlor of Parson
Huckins's dwelling, with the parson, the two
deacons, Mrs. Furbelowe, of the Pottawatomy
Association, and Mr. Higgins assembled therein.
Well, how stands our case? said Mr.
Huff.
All as I told you, answered Huckins.
Our brother Higgs's condition is desperate
is it? asked Huff, with a sweet sardonical
smile.
What's that you say of me? roared Higgs.
Pray what is it, Mr. Huckins?
I'd rather not, answered the parson, I
have too much regard for your feelings.
Out with it, sir, if you please, again cried
Higgs; I must know what matter concerns
me, that you and Mr. Huff are so secret with.
Will you be so good as to inform me?
If you will know, then, answered Huckins,
prefacing his remarks with a long-drawn and
meek expression of countenance, it is my
unpleasant
duty to inform you, that it is your
inevitable
destiny to go to hell!
To go where? exclaimed Higgs, in an
incipient
rage.
Be not agitated, my good sir! said the
parson soothingly, I merely said to hell. Be
calmfor my sakebe calm. I regret itI
sincerely regret it, and wish to alleviate your
misfortune as much as possible. Is there
anything
I can do for you in a secular sense: are
you in want of meat? clothing? coal? I truly
commiserate with you, my fellow-mortal!
No more of this, if you please, cried Higgs;
I will look at your certificates.
Here, sir, is onewhich must satisfy you
fully, said the parson, and he handed him
Morfit's
document, with which Higgs immediately
busied himself.
Mrs. Furbelowe took advantage of the pause
to gain her feet, and advanced within a yard of
the parson, with a very solemn smile on her
countenance, and the basket on her left arm;
she there stopped short, and began to hold
forth. Sir, said she, the `Pottawatomy
Association' highly appreciating your numerous
Christian virtues
How is this, broke out Higgs,
remorselessly
cutting short the proffered harangue.
This affidavit is sworn to by my own
shoemaker
!
At that moment, and before the parson could
reply to this pertinent query, Morfit himself
entered with a little grim man with a staff.
Ah! cried the little grim man, the instant
his eye fell upon the reverend gentleman, Ah,
my good old friend!how are you, Peterhow
are you? he continued, grasping the parson's
reluctant hand, and wringing it with a hard
gripe.
Gentlemen, he added, seizing Huckins by
the collar, and turning to the company, allow
me to introduce you to my worthy friendPeter
Williamsthe notorious incendiary!
Peter Williams! gasped Huff. Fire and
flames!
A house-burner! said Higgs. I thought
as much from the combustible character of his
sermons!
Take me home! shouted Mrs. Furbelowe,
I'm fainting, I shan't survive this long! it's
too much for my constitution! And she let fall
the basket, from which the Pottawatomy medal
rolled upon the floor. Wiggle availed himself
of the confusion to slip from the room, with a
most voluminous and expressive grin on his
queer features.
As Higgs, my senior partner, says
proceeded
Higgins.
Come, said the officer, interrupting him,
come, Peter, you must go to prison. You'll
die yet like an old horse at the rack, with your
head through a halter.
If I do, cried the parson, I'll be He
struck his hand forcibly upon the desk frame,
to give emphasis to his asseveration: the shock
awakened him. The whole scene had
vanished
,
and instead of the pit audience, his eyes
rested upon the up-turned faces of two or three
humble Christians on the front benches of the
chapel, gazing upon him with dilating eyes.
He convulsively grasped his hat, rushed madly
up the middle aisle, out of the buildingand,
like all heroes of this humbler kind of romance,
has never been seen or heard of since.
THE END OF THE MOTLEY BOOK.Greenwich
, Conn.,
6th Month, 2d Day
, 18.
Friend Solomon:
It
grieveth me much to communicate by this,
tidings that thine uncle is deceased. He
departed
this life on first day morning, of a malignant
fever, as I am informed by Dr. Slanter, who
attended
him during his last sickness. His
malady
wrought much change in thine uncle's
looks, as I can state from personal observance,
having inspected them with great care
immediately
after his lamented decease. The funeral
takes place third day morning, but too early
for thee to come up; thou hadst better not
undertake
the journey, as it may overweary thee,
thou being of a feeble constitution (as I know),
from a boy. Thine uncle hath left no heir, as
thou knowest he was never in wedlock;
consequently
thou art his successor in the
homestead
,
and whatsoever cash, moveables, and
stock, he hath left. I would advise thee to
plough the meadow behind the house, and to
sow timothy in the blue grass meadow. The
garden needs to be looked after, and the
fruit-trees
,
as they are at present well-stocked, should
be thinned out. Perhaps I had better use the
kitchen herbs and early apples for my own
family use, until thou comest hither. My spouse
Deborah says they make exceeding good pies.
Zekiel can pluck them, and it will be no great
trouble; if it be, a small commission will make
all right between me and thee. Zekiel proposes
to gather the vegetables and fruit for us in
consideration
of thy letting him have a little of the
live stock; a pair or two of the fowls, and a
well-looking calf that is just cast by the spotted
cow. I regret to add that Gideon Barley's fine
red heifer hath strained her off shoulder, and he
may lose the crittur. I recommended salt and
water for the animal; whether Gideon will use
it yet is not decided. The old people are well
and ask the stagedriver daily (as I have
observed
from the kitchen window) questions
concerning
thy welfare. I would bring this news
to thee in person, and be enabled to satisfy thy
grandfather and grandmother touching thy
progress
and behavior in the Babylon where thou
art, but there is much ploughing to be done, and
I am deprived of Zephaniah's aid, he being sore
of a foot with a seythe wound. Leonard hath
gone over to tend the mill for Miller Kirby, and
Zekiel will be busy running to and fro betwixt
us and thy garden and orchard. Advising thee
to keep from the snares that beset the feet of
youth in the ungodly city, and recommending
thee to pay thy tailor's bill, and avoid the night
air:
Thine,
Uriah Bloom
.
It is thought that Doublet, the old-fangled
tory lawyer, will not last the summer out. I
have called upon him a score or so of times in a
neighborly way, and do verily believe that the
old man hath lost his wits, for he ceases not to
cry out for one Mand Hamus, a king's counsel
I judge, from such words as he delivers with the
name. However on this point I will inform
thee further in a short time, as I intend to watch
with him to-night, to see what further hints he
may drop in his fever, touching this and other
matters.
U. B.BEHEMOTH:
A LEGEND
OF
THE MOUND-BUILDERS.
PREFACE.
It
was the main design of the author in the
following
work, to make the gigantic relics which
are found scattered throughout this continent,
subservient
to the purposes of imagination. He has,
therefore, dared to evoke a Mighty Creature from
the earth, and striven to endow it with life and
motion. Coeval with this, the great race that
preceded
the red men as the possessors of our
continent
,
have been called into being. With whatever
success the author may have accomplished this
portion of his task, the venerable race which
struggled
and endured in these fair fields, ere they
became
our home and dwelling place, must be
allowed
to awaken our feelings and share our generous
regards. In describing the Mound-builders, no
effort has been made to paint their costume, their
modes of life, or their system of government. They
are presented to the reader almost exclusively
under
a single aspect, and under the influence of a
single emotion. It matters not to us whether they
dwelt under a monarchical or popular form of
polity
;
whether king or council ruled their realms;
nor, in fine, what was their exact outward
condition
.
It is enough for us to know, and enough for
our humanity to inquire, that they existed, toiled,
felt, and suffered; that to them fell, in these
pleasant
regions, their portion of the common heritage
of our race, and that around those ancient
hearth-stones
,
washed to light on the banks of the
far-western
rivers, once gossiped and enjoyed life, a
nation that has utterly faded away. We are moved
deeply in looking upon their mortuary remains
those disinterred and stately skeletonsfor we
know that they once were men, and moved among
men with hearts full of human impulses, and heads
warm with mortal schemes and fancies. Of this,
history could make us no surer. Over the earth
where they repose, purple flowers spring up, and
with the brilliancy of their hues, and the sweetness
of their breath, give a splendor and fragrance to
the air. This touches him as deeply, the author
must confess, and seems to his untravelled eyes as
beautiful as anything he can read of Athens, of
cloudless Italy, or the sunny France. Humanity and
nature are all with which the heart wishes to deal,
and we have them here in their naked outlines and
grandeur. There is enough here for author and
reader, if they be of strong minds and true hearts.
A green forest or a swelling mound is to them as
glorious as a Grecian temple; and they may be so
simple as to be well nigh as much affected by the
sight of a proud old oak in decay near at home, as
by the story of a baronial castle tottering to its fall,
three thousand miles off.
The author is a ware of the difficulty and
magnitude
of his undertaking. He knows as well as
any one can know, the obstacles to vanquish and
remove; and he also knows the obstacles that will
not
be vanquished nor removed. Notwithstanding
all this, he feels assured, if he has contended in any
degree successfully with the greatness and majesty
of the subject, he will have accomplished some
slight service for the literature of his country, and
something, he ventures to hope, for his own good
name.
New York
,
January
, 1839.
PART I.
Upon
the summit of a mountain which beetled
in the remote west over the dwellings and
defences
of a race long since vanished, stood, at
the close of a midsummer's day, a gigantic
shape whose vastness darkened the whole vale
beneath. The sunset purpled the
mountain-top
,
and crimsoned with its deep, gorgeous tints
the broad occident; and as the huge figure
leaned against it, it seemed like a mighty
image
cut from the solid peak itself, and framed
against the sky. Below, in a thousand groups
were gathered, in their usual evening worship,
a strange people, who have left upon hills and
prairies so many monuments of their power,
and who yet, by some mighty accident, have
taken the trumpet out of the hand of Fame,
and closed for ever, as regards their historical
and domestic character, the busy lips of
tradition
.
Still we can gather vaguely, that the
Mound-builders accomplished a career in the
west, corresponding, though less severe and
imposing, with that which the Greeks and
Romans
accomplished, in what is styled by
courtesy
the old world. The hour has been when
our own west was thronged with empires.
Over that archipelago of nations the Dead sea
of time has swept obliviously, and subsiding,
has left their graves only the greener for a new
people in this after age to build their homes
thereon. But at the present time, living
thousands
and ten thousands of the ancient people
were paying homage to their deity; and as they
turned their eyes together to bid their customary
solemn adieu to the departing sun, they beheld
the huge shape blotting it from sight. The
first feeling which sprang in their bosoms as
they looked upon the vision was, that this was
some monstrous prodigy, exhibited by the
powers
of the air or the powers of darkness, to
astonish
and awe them.
But as they gazed, they soon learned that it
had a fixed and symmetrical form, and
possessed
the faculty of life.
When they discovered that the huge
apparition
was animate indeed, a new terror sprang
up in their soul. They gathered about their
mounds, their places of worship, and on the
plain, in various and fearful groups.
In one spot were collected a company of
priests and sages, the learned and prophetic of
the race, who with straining eyes watched the
mighty spectre; and to gain a clearer
conception
of its proportions, scanned its broad and
far-cast shadow, and marked the altitude of the
sun. Each one searched his thoughts for some
knowledge applicable to the sudden and vast
appearance.
Not far from these was drawn together a
group of women, who still retained their
devotional
posture and aspect, but yet casting
sidelong
and timid glances toward each other's
countenances, as if hoping to discover there an
interpretation of the spectacle. Children clung
to their garments, and looking up piteously,
seemed to ask if that was not the God whom
they were taught to fear and worship? Each
moment the awe increased and spread; from
lip to lip the story ran across the plain and
through the walled villages, until the spectre
embraced in its fearful dominion a circuit of
many leagues.
Each moment conjecture grew more rife and
question more anxious and frequent.
In the opinion of many of the wisestfor
even from their souls superstitious misgivings
were not wholly banishedthe apparition which
crowned the mountain was the deity of the
nation
,
who had chosen to assume this form as the
most expressive of infinite power and terrific
majesty.
Other nobler spirits, and who drew their
knowledge rather from the intellect than the
feelings, believed it was the reappearance of
a great brute, which, by its singular strength,
in an age long past and dimly remembered, had
wasted the fields of their fathers and made
desolate
their ancient dwellings.
A tradition still lingered among them, that of
that giant race, which had been swept from the
earth by some fearful catastrophe, one still lived
and might, from a remote and obscure lair, once
more come forth, to shake the hills with his
trampling, and with the shadow of his coming,
darken the households of nations.
In the more thoughtful minds of these
theorists
,
the vivid and traditionary descriptions of
the mighty herd of brutes which had once
tyrannized
over the earth, had left an impression
deep, abiding, and darkly colored. The
memories
of their progenitors had handed them
down as a Titanie tribe of beings, who in their
day excited a terror which kindled human fear,
and with it, the best growth of fear, human
ingenuity
.
They remembered that in that distant
age, as the history ran, a new and majestic race
of heroes, moulded of nature's noblest clay, had
sprung into life, to battle with and finally
vanquish
these brute oppressors of their country.
Day faded fast. Its last streaks died away
in the west, and yet the solemn shape stood
there in its vast, unmoving stillness. And still
the people retained their postures of wonder
and fear, while in hushed voices they spoke of
the occupant of the mountain. Gray, cold
twilight
at length cast its mantle upon the vision,
and they scattered in anxious parties toward
their homes. But with them they bore the
image
of the huge visitant. They could not shake
it from them. A general and deep awe had
fallen on the multitude; and even when they
sought their slumbers, that giant shape passed
before their sealed lids in a thousand forms,
assuming
as many attitudes of assault and de
fence; for from the first, by a strange instinct,
they had looked upon it as their foe. To watch
its movements, for it could be yet seen, in the
clear distinctness of its immense stature, calm,
majestic, silent; to sound the alarm; if need
be to meet it face to face, should it descend
from its pinnacle, the chieftains of the
Mound-builders
thought fit to station armed sentries at
various corners of the streets and highways of
their towns and cities, on the walls of their
fortresses, and, as a more commanding position,
on the summit of their mounds, and in the
square stone observatories which crowned a
portion of them.
The relics of the fortresses and observatories
that night manned by the sentinels of that
peculiar
people, still stand and moulder on the
soil of the far west. They are constructed on
principles of military science now lost or
inexplicable
.
But, whatever the code of tactics on which
they were fashioned, we can not but admire, in
the midst of our conjectures, their peculiar
symmetry
,
their number, and their duration.
Parallel
with the foundations of Rome these walls
went up, far back in the calendar of time, and
time-defying, they seem destined to pass down,
as far from the present into a misty and
pregnant
future, as the actual history of a populous
and mighty race. Like the lost decades of the
writer, some passages are wanting to their
completeness
,
but in what stands we may read the
power, the strength, the decay, and the
downfall
of our own American ancients. They were
men of war and those ramparts first built
against a human enemy were now occupied to
keep at bay a new and untried foe. From
time to time, along the line of guardsmen went
the watchword; the sentries of different posts
occasionally whispering to each other that the
apparition was still visible on the mountain.
Not a few, overwearied with their fears,
slumbered
.
The middle watch of the night had come.
The air was dark and still. Not a breath nor
voice broke the universal quiet: when, clear
and sharp, there fell upon the ears of the
sleeping
populace, a sound like the crash of sudden
thunder. The earth shook as if trodden by
heavy footsteps, and through the air came a
noise like the rushing of some mighty bulk in
violence and haste. Ponderous hoofs trampled
the earth and drew nigh. It was hethe
traditionary
bruteBehemothand before his
irresistible
force fell whatever strove to gainsay
his advance. The whole region trembled as
when a vast body of waters bursts its way and
rolls over the earth, ocean-like, wave shouting
to wave, and all crowding onward with
thunderous
tumult. In vain was the solid breast-work;
the piled wall was in vain; in the armed
and watchful sentry. Like some stupendous
engine of war, he bore down on them,
rendering
human strength a mockery and human
defences
worse than useless, for as wall, bastion
and tower fell, they redoubled death and ruin
on their builders. With a speed of which no
common celerity can give us a conception he
swept through the towns and villages, the
tilled
fields and pleasure gardens of the
Mound-builders
desolating
and desolatenone daring
to stand before his feet thus dreadfully
advanced
.
The trepidation of the day grew a
hundredfold
;
from the dark, dim light which the stars
forced through drifting and solid clouds, they
could but guess vaguely at his bulk, yet out of
their fears and the darkness they wrought an
awful image of vastness and strength. Night
banded with the monster, and terror walked in
their train.
The morning dawned, and its light fell upon
the face of an early-wakened and fear-stricken
people. On every countenance was graven the
clear and visible imprint of terror; but the
expression
was by no means that of ordinary
alarm, such as is engendered by siege, or battle,
or death; nor did it stamp the countenance
with the characters of a daily and familiar fear.
A dread which changed the whole aspect,
such as distorts the features and takes from
them their old, household look, was upon all.
In the consternation and imbecility of the
moment
messengers were speeded forth and
hurried
to and fro through the many villages of the
Mound-builders bearing tidings to which as
answer, they receivedthe same tidings in
return
!
The visitation had been universal; in
each one of their five thousand villages were
left like marks of brute ravage and strength!
Behemoth had been with them all; and his
large footsteps were traced wide over the plain
until they broke off abruptly at its extreme
bounds, and wheeled heavily into the
mountains
.
When their dismay had subsided from
its first flood-tide, they began to compare
observations
and consult with each other. The
memories of most were bewildered in
endeavoring
to recall the occurrences of the past night;
but from what with their confused faculties,
they could grasp, they were well assured that
the whole circuit of desolation had been
accomplished
within the passage of a single hour.
And now the time was come for them to look
forth and measure that desolationto what
side shall they first turn? Everywhere is some
monument of that irresistible force. In one
brief hour he has overthrown what Time, with
his centuries, could not touch. There at the
track of his first foot-prints is a crushed wall
driven through by some powerful, and to them
as yet unknown, weapon of strength, which has
left its dints upon the shattered fragments.
Massive portions of it have fallen to powder
beneath his weight. Across the path which he
seems to have chosen out to stalk in rude
triumph
,
through the very heart of their dwellings,
lies a dead guardsman whom his might must have
first dashed to the earth by some other
unconjectured
instrument of power, and then trampled
upon, for at every pore the blood issues in
torrents
.
Against a dwelling, pinned to its wall,
is the corpse of a second sentinel which seems to
have been hurled with scorn by the brute invader
into its present abiding-place. On the threshold
of her own home lies a mother with her child
closely clinging to her neck, its little lips pressed
to its parentsboth smitten into death by a
single blow.
Look forth from this narrow scene and read
the map of a broader ruinthe traces of a more
fearful mastery! Yonder mound, consecrated
by the entombed dust of a generation of sages
and heroes is embowelled, and its holy ashes
laid open to the vulgar air and the strumpet
wind. And yonder gardens, once the resort of
blooming beauty and gentle childhoodits walls
strew the ground and its flowers, broken and
withered, are sunken by the massy weight which
has spoiled them, deep into the earth. And
lo! that trodden and miry field, shut in by the
standing fragments of two oblong walls
yesterday
,
it was a fair greensward where strength
wrestled kindly with strength and age looked on
approvingly. In another quarter behold a tall
tower of stone is cast down before the same
incomprehensible
might! The enclosure which
surrounded and guarded it is battered to the earth,
and about it is collected at this morning hour not
a few of the chiefs of the Mound-builders, deeply
lamenting the overthrow of so scientific and
regular
a muniment. Sad words pass from each to
each and they look despondingly into each other's
faces, and find no hope, but rather a triumphant
despair. From among the group which hung
thus powerless and complaining over the
shattered
battlement boldly stood forth Bokulla, the
most fearless and energetic chieftain of the
nation
Bokullaa
man of singular and prompt
courage, greatly earnest and energetic in
purpose
:
yet calm and self involved.
In every enterprise keeping himself aloof
until the resources of all others were exhausted,
and then, when every eye was turned toward
him as the last sustainer of hope, springing
with alacrity to the front, prepared to match
the emergency with some new and vigorous
suggestion. Bokulla was a thinker no less
than a soldier; not artificially framed by filling
his mind with learned apothegms and pithy
instances
,
but with a philosophy, the growth of a
meditative spirit that brooded over all things
and created wisdom from most. He possessed,
nevertheless, a thoroughly martial and
energetic
mind, and found in every path of life, an
accessory to strengthen and adorn that
character
.
Unlike, however, the majority of
professed
militants, he rarely exhibited the gay
buoyancy which is so generally considered in
them an essential. On the contrary, even
in the maddest onset and in the high flush of
triumph, his brow was saddened, oftentimes
with a passing cloud of gloom; the mark which
distinguishes too often those who are born to
be the leaders and benefactors of their race.
The mind of Bokulla partook of another
peculiarity
,
in common with many men of
masterly
genius. Defeated, or foiled in any attempt,
his heart plunged, awhile, in the profoundest
and most torturing despairbut only for the
instantand then, reassuming its lofty strength,
an eagle, unchained, or slipped from its
darkened
cage, he rose into the clear, broad
sunshine
of a worthier condition.
Such was Bokulla; and, when those grouped
around him had each offered his several
remark
,
and they had mutually mourned over the
present desolation, he stood forth from their
midst and said, Men! the day is spent with
repining, and the night comes, and with it,
perchance
,
our dread enemy. Let us rebuild the
wall, and show, at least, that we can oppose
our
old
strength to his inroads. He has but the
instinct of a brute, we have the reason of men.
Let him not, he cried, let him not find us,
for our souls' sake, let him not find us greater
cravens than yesternight!
With these words, and with the consent of
the chieftains who stood about him, he ordered
the rebuilding of the rampart, and the crection
of an inner one to flank it. Before the passages,
which had been previously left free of egress
and ingress, he directed the construction of
short and solid walls, which should suffice to
arrest access, if made in full front, leaving,
however
,
side-passages between the extremities of
the main and those of the newly-erected
ramparts
.
Under the authoritative and cheering
voice of Bokulla, the building-tool and the
trenching-iron ply busily. Parties of
laborers
hurry from quarter to quarter of the work,
and something like a manly and worthy spirit
seems again to fire their bosoms and lighten
their toil. While some gather together the
broken
portions of earth, and remould them to their
purpose, others bring from the distance new
supplies, and still others quarry and shape the
stone to crown their summits. Under his quick
and commanding eye, the tower of observation
goes up and its defences are restored.
But, while Bokulla and his aids build up the
strong wall to guard the living, is there no
duty
and service due to the dead? There is; and,
under other guidance, the manly forms which
were laid in the recent encounter, are stretched
for their last repose.
Devoted hands compose their discolored limbs,
and bathe them with embalming drugs, while
their kindred, those nearest and dearest in life,
collectto accompany them in this, their last
journeywhatever can consecrate or dignify
their sepulture. Those who have fallen, fell in
the defence of the nation, and are, therefore,
worthy of the nation's honors. Let them be
buried, then, as becomes heroes of the
Mound-builders
bearing
away with them, into the
unknown
land, tokens of merit and badges of high
desert. Their bodies are swathed in fine
raiment
;
at their right hand are placed the
weapons
of war, grasping which they fell; at their
sides are arrayed mirrors of glass or metal (
according
to their rank) in which they were wont
to look for the reflection of their own martial
features, when set for the stern service of war.
At their heads are disposed the helms which
covered them in the day of battle, and on their
now pulseless breasts lie polished pieces of
copper
,
in the form of the cross.
Can it be that those antique warriors were
Christian men?that, among them, they thus
cherished trophies of the crucifixion, and
upheld
the ark of that reverend creed?or, at
least, some stray fragments of the holy
structure
,
obscurely delivered over to them by
paternal
or patriarchal hands? I know not; but
this is the language which their discovered
relics
speak to us of the present generation.
Slowly, from each dead hero's dwelling,
winds forth the solemn procession, with its
weeping-troop
and its religious mourners.
Gathering
at a central spot, they unite into one body,
and, thus collected, take their way toward the
funeral-mounds. Attendants send forth, from
marble instruments, shaped like crescents and
highly polished, a slow and mournful music.
Beside the bier of each fallen soldier, walk his
wife and children, while, at its head, marches
solemnly the priest, who, in life, was his
spiritual
father.
Winding through the villages, over the
meadows
,
and along the stream-side, they reach the
bank, right opposite the mounds in which the
dead are to find their final slumber.
Descending
into the limpid and shallow stream, the
bearers
gently dip each corpse beneath the waters,
thus purifying it, by a natural sort of baptism,
from every earthly grossness, and then they
resume
their wayall following, with bared
ankles
,
through the placid rivulet. At length they
reach the sacred mound. At its side, toward
the east, the earth is removed, and, turning
their faces to the sun, while the marble breathes
forth a higher strain, the bearers of the dead
enter the hollowed mound.
As they enter, the throng chant together a
simple ballad, reciting the virtues and the valor
of the departed, and, at its close,
recommending
them to the Giver of life and the God of the
seasons. The bier-bearers place the mortal
remains
of the heroes whom they have borne,
within the cavity, upon the earth, with their
faces upward, their feet pointing to the
northeast
(perhaps the home of their progenitors) and
their heads toward the more genial southwest.
Thus were the common-soldiers, among those
who had fallen, buried; but one of that number
he who had been captain of the guard, and a
man of note among the people, received
separate
and more especial rites.
His remains were borne apart, to a distinct
mound, and there, when they were laid out with
the honors of a chief who had lost his life in
battle, martial music, breathing from the
instruments
,
and the whole multitude joining in a
chant, commemorative (like those recited over
the common soldier) of his valor and character,
they proceeded to burn his body and gather his
ashes into their separate tomb. They then
closed the mouths of all the mounds, and, when
the priests had offered a prayer for the
peaceful
repose of their dust, the multitude turned
toward their homes.
All was hushed and silent save the gentle
tread of the homeward-tending people. The
mourning relatives of the dead had lulled into
a temporary calm their troublous feelings, and
wept with composure. The spirit of peace was
over all. Suddenly a shrill voice was heard to
cry, He comes! he comes! It proceeded
from a child, who, unobserved, had climbed to
the upper window of one of the stone
observatories
.
The multitude were arrested by the
voice, and, turning to the quarter from which it
issued, saw the finger of the alarmist pointing
to a body of woods which lay a short distance
west from the path which they were taking
to their homes. As at the bidding of a god,
the whole people, with one accord, swerved
round and gazed toward the forest, and there
they beheldBehemoth. Fixed in an attitude
of astonishment and dread, they stood gazing
and still gazing upon the spectaclea
boundless
and motionless gallery of faces. It was
near the sunset. Overhead, in its level light,
a grey bald eagle, just flown from its
neighboring
eyry, hung poised in wonder, as if turned
to stone by the novel sight of so vast a creature.
In its motionless suspension, it seemed as if
sculptured from the air, while its wings were
gilded, like some remains of the old statuaries,
by the golden touch of the sun.
Visible above the woods, moving heavily
through the sea of green leaves, like leviathan
in the deep, appeared the dark and prodigious
form of the Mastodon; an awful ridge rolling
like a billow, along the tops of the pine and
cedar which grew beneath him. The
boundless
bulk moved through the trembling verdure,
like an island which, in some convulsion of
nature
,
shifts itself along the surface of the sea.
The forest shook as he advanced, while its
scared and barbarous denizens, the prairie
wolf, the gopher, and the panther, skulked
silently
away.
As yet his whole mighty frame was not
visible
.
Even amid the trepidation and fear of the
Mound-builders a curiosity sprang up to behold
the sum of his vast proportions: to see at once
before them and near at hand the actual
dimensions
of that shape whose shadowy outlines
had, when first seen, wrought in them effects
so boundless and disastrous.
Occasionally as the Mastodon glided along, a
green tree-top wavered for a moment in the
wind, leaned forward into the airand fell to
the earth as if pushed from its hold by the
chance-exerted strength of the great brute.
Again, they heard a crash, and a giant oak
which had just now lorded it over its fellows
was snapped from its stem and cast far forth
over the tops of the forest. His very breath
stirred the leaves till they trembled, and every
step of his march denoted, by some natural
appearance
,
the possession of monstrous and
fearful
power.
After stalking through a large tract of
woodland
without allowing any greater portion of
his bulk to become apparent, he wheeled through
the forest and descending into a wooded valley
disappeared, each step reverberating along the
earth with a deep and hollow sound. It was a
long time ere the Mound-builders resumed their
old, homeward progress, and when they did it
was with alarmed and cheerless spirits. The
awe of the great shadow was upon them.
Now more than every they felt the folly of
gainsaying
or attempting to withstand a power
which shrouded itself in a form so vast and
inaccessible
.
From that day forth a gloom settled upon the
minds of the Mound-buildersdeep, rayless
and full of fearful omens; for though personal
energy may rescue individuals from that
desperate
condition, it is a hopeless and a dreadful
thing when nations become the victims of
despair
.
All the mighty wheels of life are
stopped
;
all the channels through which the soul
of the people once coursed are now closed, and,
in most cases, closed for ever. The arteries
through which the life-blood gushed are
deadened, and the warm current is arrested as
if the winter had descended upon it in its very
spring-tide. The Mound-builders were now
fallen into that sad estate. Neither the
spirit-stirring
voice of Bokulla, nor the trump of
war, nor the memory of their fathers' fields or
their fathers' valor, could awaken them to a
sense of what was due to their manhood or
their duty. The Mastodon seemed resolved to
preserve the spell by an almost perpetual
presence
.
Day after day in the same gray
twilight
did Behemoth cast his shadow from the
summit of some near elevation; and midnight
after midnight, at the same cold and sullen
hour, did he descend and force his huge bulk
through the villages of the Mound-builders:
breaking their walls in pieces, rending their
dwellings, disclosing their mounds and
despoiling
their pleasure gardens from end to end.
He had become the spectral visitant of the
nation
;the
monstrous and inexorable tyrant
who, apparently gliding from the land of
shadows, presented himself eternally to them,
the destroyer of their race. He seemed, in
these terrible incursions, to be fired with a
mighty revenge for some unforgiven injury
inflicted
on his dead and extinct tribe by the
human
family. In the calm and solemn quiet of
night, when fretted labor sought repose and
anxious thought craved slumber, he burst down
from the mountains like thunder and bade them
Awaken! awaken!
The internal and external influence of an
harassment like this could not be otherwise
than large and disastrous. First came the dire
change in the mind itself: when this terrible
shadow glided among its quiet emotions, its
familiar
habits, and its household and national
thoughts. All objects that had hitherto
occupied
a place in the mind of the people now
assumed
a new color and complexion as this
portent fell upon them, in the same manner as
everything in nature catches a portion of the
gloom of twilight when it suddenly approaches.
No angle of the wide realm of the
Mound-builders
escaped from the darkness of fear, and
everywhere the fountains of social life became
stagnant and ceased to issue in healthy currents,
like streams that are silent and still when light
has departed from their surface.
The voice of joy died away into a timid and
feeble smiling; proud and stately ambition fell
humbled to the earth, and love and beauty
trembled
and fled before the gloomy shadow of the
general adversary. Men shunned each other as
if from a consciousness of their abasement, and
skulled away from the face of day, unwilling
that the heavens should look in upon their
desolation
and shame.
Some abandoned their homes and took refuge
in cliffs and inaccessible precipices, preferring
poverty and exposure to wind and tempest and
hostile weather, rather than encounter with a
foe so dreadful and triumphant. The great
mass, however, lingered in their customary
dwellings; but so thoroughly was every
motive
to action numbed and paralyzed, they
neglected
to repair the roof that had fallen, the
beam that had decayed, or the foundation that
had yielded to the summer's rain, and
innumerable
buildings, throughout the whole realm,
tumbled into ruin, and many that stood on the
borders of rivers, undermined by the motion of
their currents, tottered and fell into the stream,
while their terror-stricken inmates, in many
cases, perished without a struggle.
The ordinary occupations and duties of life
were performed with feeble hands and vague
thoughts, or entirely deserted.
This mighty and puissant nation, whose
strength was that of a giant, and whose glory
rivalled the sun, was stricken by terror into a
feeble and child-like old age. All its
proportions
were diminished; its heart was shrunk,
and it dragged on a slothful and decrepid
existence
amid the cold and monumental ruins of
what had once been its beautiful domain, and
its house of honor and joy. That salient and
almost motiveless energy which drives a nation
on through toils, battles, and discomfitures, to
prosperity and triumph; that hazardous and
all-adventurous
daring which pushes doubt aside,
and which, while it questions nothing, strives
at everything, was utterly departed.
From the silence and quiet of his studied
retirement
,
Bokulla beheld the shadow as it
slowly
and fearfully crossed the national mind.
From the first he saw the change which was
coming over it, and knew that human wisdom
was too weak to arrest or avert it, unless the
great first cause could be removed. And yet,
while others yielded thus submissively to a
meek despair, he, keeping himself invisible to
the general eye, tasked his bold and liberal
mind for some remedy for the evil. In the calm
and dead quiet of his private chamber he sat,
from day to day, brooding over plans and
enterprises
whereby to rescue the nation.
Bokulla entertained a deep-founded
confidence
in the human character. Himself
equipped
with an indomitable will, and faculties stout
and resolute as iron, he was assured that by
similar
qualities the nation was to be redeemed
from thraldom. Amid a thousand changes of
nature, man had endured; mountains had been
cleft asunder; seas had leaped upon continents,
and marched triumphantly over every barrier
and obstacle; great orbs had been extinguished,
like tapers of an evening, in the skies, yet man
stood, steadfast amid the shock and the mutation.
Along the bleak coasts of inhospitable time, he
had voyaged in a secure and upright vessel; on
this ridge of earth he still stood, while the
visible
universe passed through changes of season,
through increase or diminution of splendors, and
through worlds created or worlds destroyed.
Was man, who thus outlasted seas, and stars,
and mountains, to be crushed at last by mere
brutal
enginery and corporal strength?
Reflections like these wrought the mind of
Bokulla to a condition of fearless and manly
daring, and he brought his whole soul to the
labor of discovering or contriving the means of
triumph or resistance. It may well be supposed
that, tower as his thought might, it strove in
vain to overtop the stature or master the bulk
of the Mastodon; what were fosses, and
bastions
,
and battlements, to him that moved like
a mountain against opposition? No wall could
shut him out; seas might interpose in vain to
cut off his fearful pursuit of a fugitive people.
Resting or in motion, that terrible and
far-reaching
strength would overtake them, and
accomplish
its purposes of desolation and ruin.
With this stupendous and inevitable image
the whole might of Bokulla's soul wrestled for
a long time. An untiring invention, that kept
steadily on the wing, started suggestion on
suggestion
,
but all unequal to the mighty necessity
of the occasion. He gathered facts on which
to build the fabric of opposition, huge enough
to countervail a superhuman foree, but they
tottered and fell to the earth before the ideal
presence of Behemoth. He surveyed mountains,
and, in imagination, linked them together, with
G
wide arches and empyreal bridges, and
compassed
the people round about with rock-built
circumvallations and ramparts of
insurmountable
altitude and strength. But it would have
required ages to complete the defences,
suggested
by a swift imagination, which would have
been equal to their object; and others, which
great labor might have more readily erected,
would have been swept away in a single night
by the barbaric invader.
When this conclusion forced itself upon him,
Bokulla felt, for a moment, the pangs of a
hopeless
and overwhelming despair. A midnight
darkness came over his mind, and it was, for a
time, as if the sun and the heavens were
obliterated
from his view, and as if he were doomed
to travel, henceforth, a gloomy turnpike, where
all was sorrow, and wailing, and terror without
end. But the light gradually broke in upon his
soul, and his palsied faculties began to awaken
and cast off the slumber and the delusion. His
reflections, it is true, had taught him that his
countrymen could act in defence against their
vast oppressor with but frail chance of success.
He was satisfied that a weight and bulk as
monstrous
as that of Behemoth would burst their
way, by their mere impetuous motion, through
any barier or redoubt they might erect. There
was another thought, however, worthy of all
considerationcould not the Mound-builders,
a naturally adventurous and valiant people, act
on the offensive? Abandoning passive and
barbarous
suffering, was not battle to be waged,
and waged with hope against the despoiler?
This question Bokulla had put anxiously to
himself
,
and he watched, with an eager eye, for
some favorable phase of the national feeling,
ere he addressed it to the people.
From one crisis of fear to another, the
Mound-builders
passed rapidly, and, as the shades
of night thicken one upon the other, each
aspect of their condition was gloomier than
the former. At length, as darkness deepened
and strengthened itself, light began to dawn
in the opposite quarter. Hardened by
custom
,
and familiar, in a measure, with the
object
of their dread, they now ventured to lift
their pale, white countenances, and gaze with
some steadiness of vision upon the foe.
Naturally of a noble character and
constitution
,
the Mound-builders needed only that the
original elements of their temper should be
stirred by some powerful conviction to excite
them to action. A new spirit, or rather the
ghost of the old and exiled one, had returned to
the nation, and they now saw before them,
unless
they resumed their manhood and generously
exerted strength and council, ages of desolation
and fear for themselves and their children.
Were they men, and should no hazard be dared,
no toil or peril endured, to break the massive
despotism that held them to the earth? Were
they the possessors of a land of sublime and
wonderful aspects, the dwellers amid
interminable
woods and lakes of living water, and were
no glorious nor resolute energies matured by
these, capable to cope with that which was
mighty and awful?
At this fortunate stage of feeling Bokulla
appeared
.
He clothed the thoughts of the people
in an eloquence of his own. He painted the
portrait of their past condition in life-like and
startling colors. He told them that from the
apparent size and solidity of the Mastodon, and
the uniform analogy of nature, he might endure
for centuries, yea, even beyond the duration of
mankind itself, unless his endless desolation
could be arrested. If they suffered now under
his irresistible sway, they might suffer for a
thousand years to come. That vast frame, he
feared, decay could not touch. And in a stature
so tremendous must reside an energy and
stubbornness
of purpose, endurable and unchanging.
Next, addressing them from the summit of a
mound, around which many of the people were
grouped in their old worship (some faint image
of which they had kept up through all their
terror) he appealed to them by the sacred and
inviolate ashes that rested underneath his feet.
If old warriors and generous champions, never
dishonored, could awaken from the slumbers of
death, and breathe again the pure air of that
glorious clime, what voice of denunciation or
anger would they utter!
Are these men, that creep along the earth
like the pale shadows of autumn,
Mound-builders
and children of our loins? What hath
affrighted them? Look to the mountains, and
lo! an inferior creature, one of the servants
and hirelings of man, hath the mastery. Arouse!
arouse our sons! Place in our old,
death-withered
hands the swords we once wieldedcrown
us with our familiar helms, and we will wage
the battle for you. Victory to the builders of
the mounds! victory to the lords and masters
of the earth!
The national pulse beat true again, and
Bokulla
hastened from village to village,
quickening
and firing it. Everywhere the hour of
renovation
seemed to have come. Everywhere
ascending their high places, he appealed to
them by memories to which they could not but
hearken. Everywhere an immense populace
gathered about him and listened to his words,
as if they were the inspired language of hope.
And when their souls were fired, as it were,
under the fervent heat of his eloquence, he
skilfully moulded them to his own plan and
purpose. He recounted to them the mode, the
time and course he thought fit for them to adopt
in seeking battle with Behemoth.
After consultation with their chieftains, the
levy expected and demanded of each was soon
settled.
They were to venture forth with an army
(easily collected in that populous nation) of one
hundred thousand strong. Bokulla was to be
the leader-in-chief. Approved men were to be
his counsel and aids. The day of setting forth
on the great campaign was fixed; not far distant.
In the meantime, all diligence and labor were
to be employed in disciplining, equipping, and
inspiriting the troops: in burnishing and
framing
the necessary armor, and in constructing
certain new engines of war, which Bokulla had
invented, and which might be of use in the
encounter
with the terrible foe.
Every village now presented a picture of
busy preparation and warlike bustle. The
forges, whose fires had smouldered in long
disuse
,
were again rekindled, and their anvils rang
with the noise of a thousand hammers rivalling
each other in the skill with which they moulded
the metals into heroic shapes. While one
wrought out with ready dexterity the
breastplate
,
with its large, circular bosses of silver,
another, with equal, but less costly felicity,
framed the brazen hatchet, and the steel
arrowhead
.
In every workshop there were employed
artisans in sufficient number to not only begin
with the rude ore and shape it into form, but
also to carry it through every stage of labor
tipping it with silverburnishing
ornamenting
completing
them,affixing leathern
handles
to the bosses by which to grasp and hold
the shield, and arranging them in due order for
inspection by the appointed officers.
At another and higher class of laboratories
they were employed in framing and fashioning
weapons for chieftains and warriors of note;
swords of tempered steel and scabbards of silver,
capped with points of other and less penetrable
material: and helmets of copper and shields,
with ornamental and heraldic devices. Some
busied themselves in furnishing large shields of
brass, which they polished with care until they
glittered againwhile still farther on, they
wrought out large bows of steel, from which to
speed the barbed arrows prepared by their
fellow-workmen
.
Farther up, near the
mountainside
,
there lay a range of shops, in which a
thousand operatives constructed military wagons
and other vehicles for the expedition; for they
knew not how far it might extend, nor through
what variety of hill and dale.
To the right of these were gathered artisans
under the immediate superintendence of the
commander-in-chief, who labored at certain vast
and new engines of battle, more especially
contrived
for conflict with the vast brute. These
were large and ponderous wooden structures,
something like the towers known in Roman
warfare, but, as the strength and stature of
the foe required, of far greater height and
stiffness
.
They were to be planted on heavy wheels
and of great circumferenceplaced far apart,
so as to furnish for the whole edifice a broad
and immoveable base. On the outer side, they
were armed with every sort of sharp-edged
weapon
,
cutlass, falchion, and spearhead, so as to
be, if possible, unassailable by Behemoth.
Internally
,
they were furnished with great store
of vast bows and poisoned shafts, with which, if
such thing might be, to pierce him in some
vulnerable
point, or at least to gall him sorely and
drive him at a distance. Besides these, there
were suspended in copious abundance, divers
ingenious implements, each contrived for some
emergency of battle, to strike, to ward, to
wound, and to destroy.
Others were building, taller and stronger, at
the summits of which were suspended great
masses of metal and ponderous hammers, tons
in weight, with which to wage a dreadful
battery
against the mighty foe. By some internal
machinery, it was so contrived, that these solid
weights of metal could be swung to and fro with
fearful swiftness and violence, by the application
of a small and apparently inadequate power.
Another structure, like these, was prepared,
from which to cast, by means of capacious
instruments
,
large quantities of molten metals,
kept in fusion by mighty furnaces, to be hurled
upon the enemy from afar, and to descend upon
him in sulphurous and deadly showers, like
those which fell on Sodom and Gomorrah of
old.
Day and night, night even to its middle
watches, were devoted to the construction and
fabrication of engines and implements like
these; for their minds were now so anchored
on this great enterprise, that all other ties were
cast loose, and in this alone they embarked
every thought and purpose. The hours hitherto
given to repose and sleep, were now made
vassals
to the new adventure.
It was a magnificent spectacle to see a whole
nation thus gathered under the dark wing of
the midnight, working out battle for their dread
adversary. Athwart the solid darkness which
pressed upon their dwellings, the gleams of
swarthy labor shot long and frequent. Far
through the hills echoed the clangor of armorers,
and the sharp sounds of multitudinous toil,
laboring
,
each in its kind, toward the redemption
of a people.
Grouped thus about their forges, and
hurrying
from one task to another with rapid and
quiet tread, they might have seemed to the eye
of imagination, looking down from the
neighboring
heights, to be employed in infernal
labor
,
and vexing the noon of night with unearthly
and Satanic cares.
But over the wide scene there rested a
blessing
;
for Heaven always shines upon the
oppressed
who nobly yearn and vigorously strive
to break their chains. The long and bright
hours of day, too, were crowded with their
peculiar duties. The gardens and the enclosed
plains, again restored to their old symmetry
and beauty, were now filled with a soldiery
which, under the eye of dexterous leaders,
were drilled, deployed, marshalled, and schooled
into new manuvres, before this unknown
in the wars of the Mound-builders, and
adapted
to the character of their unwonted
antagonist
.
They were taught to wheel with
novel evolutions, to retreat in less orderly but
more evasive movements and marches than of
old, and to attack with a wariness and caution
hitherto unpractised in their encounters with
mortal enemies. Over all the eye of Bokulla
glanced, giving system to the orders of the
chieftains, and confidence to the obedience of
their legions. Apparently performing duty
nowhere
,
he fulfilled it everywhere, with a calm
and masterly skill, which, while it was
unobserved
by the populace, was an object of
admiration
to another order of men, who were
made the immediate channels of his influence,
and who were therefore brought more directly
under the spell.
Upon my soul, cried one of two officers,
who stood near the trunk of a withered cedar,
which overshadowed a wide and deep sunken
well, looking upon one of these novel parades,
upon my soul, Bokulla hath the power and
the knowledge of a God. Out of these men,
but yesterday dumb and torpid with fear, he
has struck the spirit of life, and that with the
same ease as my sword-blade strikes from this
dull stone at my foot, sparks of fire.
Who can withstand the giant machines
which tower yonder, like mountains, above our
dwellings? cried his companion. The Spirit
of Evil himself, if imbodied in the frame of the
Brute, must fall before those whirlwind
hammers
of brass and tempests of molten copper!
While he spake, one of the vast oaken
structures
had been wheeled out, and his ponderous
enginery set in motion, and brought to bear
upon a crag that projected from the mountain
near which it rested. To and fro they swung
with fearful force and velocity, at each blow
shattering vast masses from the rock, and
bringing
them headlong down the mountain. At the
same time, not far distant, tons of crude ore
were cast into the furnaces, affixed to the other
towers, and hurled forth upon the prairie in
clouds of fire, which, as they fell upon the
earth, scathed and withered everything before
them.
Although the multitude entertained hearts of
favor and hope toward the project of meeting
Behemoth in battle, there were a few who
doubted its wisdom and foreboded a gloomy
result
.
The dinging of those anvils, said an aged
man who sat at the sunset in the front of his
dwelling, to his spouse (no less stricken in
years), who leaned out at the window, the
dinging of you anvils is to my ears a mere
death-dirge. Wherefore are the youth of our
land to be led forth on this vain pilgrimage?
They are fore-doomed by the hooting of the
owl, which has been ceaseless in our woods
since first it was planned. The dismal bat and
the brown vulture flap their wings over our
bright day-marshallings in expectancy of a
banquet
.
And as for the chieftain, Bokulla,
continued
his wife, prolonging the dolorous strain of
conversation, his defeat, if not death, is
already
doomed in heaven. The star which fell
but yesternight luridly athwart his dwelling,
foretold that sequel too well. And his spouse,
stumbled she not essaying but this morning to
cross its threshold and greet the home-return
of Bokulla from the distant villages?
This army, five score thousand in
numbers
,
reiterated the old man, will be but as
the snow in the whirlwind before the breath of
Behemoth. They have forgotten, senseless
men! the story of our fathers. They recollect
not how in ancient days the fellow of this vast
Brute (perchance this living one himself) was
met by our hunters in the mountain gorge:
that his roar was like thunder near at hand,
and his tread like the invasion of waters! that
they shrunk before him into the hollows of the
rocks as the white cloud scatters before the
sun!
I pray Heaven the wife of Bokulla be not
widowed, echoed his spouse. The chieftain
is a bold man, and submits but poorly to the
lording of any, be it man or brute.
I fear this spirit pricks him on too far in
this adventure; I have warned him secretly,
concluded the old mound-builder, in a deep and
solemn tone of voice; I have warned him, but
he scorns my warning. He will not be stayed
in his purpose. I will warn him yet once more,
for he dreams not that he goes out to war with
one who is a giant in instinct as well as in
strength!
The eventful morning of going forth against
the Mastodon came: it was a morning bright
with beautiful auspices. The sky overhead
glittered with its fresh and airy splendors: no
cloud dimmed the world of indescribable blue
which hung calm and motionless like heaven
itself on high. Occasionally against its clear
canvass a passing troop of wild-fowl painted
their forms, and vanished; or, a tree-top here
and there stood out, pencilled upon it, with its
branches and foliage all distinct. The sun
rode just over the horizon, and through the
innumerable
villages of the Mound-builders the
martial trumpet sounded the spirit-stirring
alarum
.
At the call, one hundred thousand
right-good
men of battle seized their arms and
marched
through the territory of their brethren in
solid array.
At the head of the van, drawn in a
two-wheeled
chariot of wood, studded with iron and
ornamented with an eagle at each of its four
points, front and rear, and drawn by a single
powerful and jet-black bison, came Bokulla
himself. He stood erect in the vehicle, while
his burnished armor and towring helm flung
their splendor far and wide. In his hand he
held no rein, but guided the noble beast by his
mere intonations of voice.
Behind Bokulla followed a company of
menat-arms
,
each bearing a long and stalwart club,
armed, at its heavier extremity, with a
four-edged
sword or falchion, to the point of which
was affixed a spear-like weapon, stiff and keen.
Of these there were one hundred each cased in
a mail of elk-skin, which, while it was flexible
and yielded to every gesture of the body, was
yet a sufficient defence against any ordinary
assault
.
These were expected, beside guarding
and sustaining Bokulla, to close with Behemoth,
and, taking advantage of the unwieldy motions
of his frame, to wound his legs, or otherwise
annoy and disable him. Behind these followed
an equal phalanx of spearmen, whose allotted
duty it was, with a longer weapon, to gird the
brute at a distance, and draw his attention from
any quarter to which it might appear directed
with too much vigor and chance of danger. In the
rear of the company of spearmen marched a
strong body of common soldiers, bearing the
customary Mound-builders' instruments of war,
namely, vast steel bows, six feet or more in
length, and quivers filled with corresponding
shafts, tipped with poisons, and on their left
arms bearing the usual shield of copper, with
bosses of silver. In the rear of these heavily
rolled on two of those newly-invented machines,
which rose like pyramids above the array.
These were drawn by scores of yoked bisons,
and driven forward by private soldiers, who
walked at their sides. The earth shook under
their lumbering weight. Their bowels were
filled with captains and privates, who had
charge, each in his station, of their implements
of death. Following these, in order, marched
a numerous squadron, sustaining, over their
sinewy shoulders, heavy axes of steel with edges
sharp as death, and handles of immoveable oak.
Drawn by a thousand beasts of burden, behind
these, came innumerable provision and baggage
wagons, provided for the emergency of a
protracted
search for the enemy, and a long delay in
vanquishing and destroying him. These were
accompanied with troops and officers. Behind
these walked countless varieties of battle;
soldiers
,
the very conception of whose armor and
weapons is lost in the oblivious and
mouldering
past. Rearmost came six other towers,
bearing
their immense hammers and fiery furnaces,
with ten thousand troops to guard, to guide
them; to select even roads for their progress,
and, lastly, to wield their vast forces in the hour
of conflict.
Over the whole floated a hundred bright and
emblematic pennons, while the sonorous metal
kept time to their waving folds as the morning
wind dallied them to and fro. It was a glorious
thing to see ten times ten thousand, thus
equipped
and embattled, going forth, on that gay
morning, to the war.
Wherever their course lay, it was thronged
with the multitude pushing to gain a sight of
Bokulla and his compeers, the solid soldiery and
the stupendous structures. Every window was
filled, every elevation seized on, every
house-top
covered by spectators straining their vision
to gather in every appointment and device,
banner
and sword, bison, chieftain, and all. Ah!
well might their eyes ache to look upon that
numerous chivalry! Well might they hang with
lingering gaze upon the fair cheeks of that
youthful array! Well might their hearts keep
time with the onward steps of that glorious
host! Happy is it for mortals that they can enjoy
the pageant of the present, and have no power
to prefigure in it the funeral-procession and the
mournful company into which the future may
change it!
As the foot of the last soldier left the
territory
of the Mound-builders, the drums and
trumpets
sounded a farewell, and the army, taking
the right bank of a rapid stream which ran due
west, pursued its march. The ground over
which their course lay, was a smooth and
pleasant
green-sward, the verdure of which was still
wet with the dews of the night. Occasionally
it rose into a gentle elevation, which, for the
first few miles, brought the advancing army
once again in sight of the expectant gazers,
who still kept their posts upon housetop, tower,
and mound. At length, from one of these
eminences
,
they descended into a valley which bore
them altogether from the view of the most
favorably-stationed
looker-out; and yet, even when
their banners and tall structures had passed
wholly from the sight, gushes of music, fainter
and fainter at each note, reached their ears,
and reverberated from the neighboring cliffs
and hill-sides.
Onward they passed, through the long vale
which stretched before them, choosing out the
clearest paths, and still keeping their march
toward the occident. In selecting this route they
were guided by large tracks which appeared
at remote strides in the earth, and by frequent
signs of devastationfallen trees and crushed
underwood.
Once they came to a river of great width,
on the near margin of which, at the water's
edge, appeared two large footprints, while on
the opposite bank were discovered indentations
equally vast but impressed deeper in the soil,
as if the monstrous beast had reared on his
hindermost feet, and, with supernatural strength
and agility, thrown himself across the
intervening
breadth of waters. As there were no
bridges near at hand, they were forced to
compass
the river by a circuitous route, to regain
the tracks which had been espied on the other
bank.
After attaining the utter extremity of the
vale through which the stream poured its
tide, they pursued their chosen way into a
thick wood, the path of the Mastodon through
which seemed to have been created by
sweeping
before him, with a flexible power,
whatever
obstructed his progress. On every side of
the huge gap into which the army now entered,
lay prostrate trees of greatest magnitudeoak,
pine, and sycamore. Some, apparently, had
been cast on high, and, descending into the
neighboring forest, left their roots naked in the
air, unnaturally inverted and exposed. And yet,
save in the immediate path of the desolator,
nature smiled, unalarmed and innocent in its
primeval and virgin beauty. Here and there
shone out, in the forest, bright green patches,
rising often into gentle slopes, or softening
away into vales as gentle. Frequently the
upland
was crowned with groups of small trees,
and the vales were tesselated with sweet wild
7
flowers. Then they crossed babbling brooks
and rivulets, which ran across their march with
a melodious murmur, eloquent with reproaches
on the warlike task they were at present
pursuing
.
Again, a large stream, which had
gathered
volume from the neighboring mountains,
came rushing down the declivities, and seemed
to shout them on to battle.
At times, in the course of this variegated
march, they fell upon open spaces where, for a
small circuit, no tree was to be seen; rich
meadows
,
the chosen pastures of the wild beings of
the prairies, pranked with red and white
clover
,
and fragrant as the rose, in their unmown
freshness.
Sometimes they passed through sudden and
narrow defiles, overhung by frowning cliffs, and
clothed with a dank verdure which seemed to
be the growth of a century. One gorge, in
particular
,
of this kind, they encountered, whose
beetling rocks in their dark and regular
grandeur
,
looked as if they might have been wrought
out by the hands of the old Cyclops or
Pelasgians
strange. They seemed to be the solemn
halls of a great race which had its seat of
empire
there (beyond even the age of the
Mound-builders
),
and chambered in its tabernacles of
everlasting stone. But Nature alone built these
halls for herself, and through them, toward the
west, she walks at the twilight and morning
hour in pomp and majesty. I see her, her skirts
purpled with evening, and flowing forth in the
fresh breezes of that untainted clime, now
pacing those mighty avenues, and recalling, in
their awful stillness, the nations which slumber
at her fect. Her face brightens like a sun, as
she meditates over the empires which have
faded from earth into the dust beneath her;
she thinks and kindles in knowing and
remembering
that, while man is mortal and perisheth,
she is eternal and thrones with God.
The glittering and long-extended host of the
Mound-builders marched on through this
cliffwalled
passage, and passed next from all glimpse
of the sun, into dense and almost impervious
woods; impervious but for the way hewn out
by the mighty pioneer, in whose tracks they
continued to tread. Gloom, with its midnight
wings, sat on high and brooded over the
boundless
thicket.
The very leaves seemed dipped in a deeper
hue of green, and the grass was thick and
matted
underneath, as if, in that desolate region, it
clung closer to the earth. Above, stood in their
ancient stillness, apparently unvoiced for ages,
the tall, sombre trees, while about their trunks
venerable ivies and mosses clung desperately,
and mounted far up toward their topmost
branches
.
Athwart the solid darkness no wing, save
that of a melancholy owl or bat, clove and
furnished
to the tenebrous realm the sign of life
or motion. On the earth no living thing was
to be seen, unless, amid the dank grass, an
occasional
toad or serpent, sitting or coiled on the
cold stone. And yet, though life seemed ex
tinct, or exhibited itself only in reptile and
hateful forms, the Mound-builders, as they
marched on through the gloomy quiet, in
pursuit
of their mighty prey, saw, in the dimly
discovered
foot-marks which they still followed, a
token of vast and inexplicable power which
deepened the darkness about them, and infused
a portion of its weird influence into their souls:
and yet, with purpose unshaken, they advanced.
Again the blessed sunshine greeted them, and
the low mist rolled heavily from their minds
and again their purpose stood out to their
inward
eye, clear and determinate.
Emerging from the awful woods they came
to a broad prairie, across which the large
footsteps
were deeply visible. On every side, as
far as the eye could reach, the ample plain was
desert and unoccupied. The innumerable herds
of bison which had once been its tenantry, had
now, before the terror of Behemoth, fled away;
and the wild wolf, which once lurked amid the
rank grass, skulked from a power which
seemed
to overshadow the earth. Still there was a
province of animated nature into which the
alarm scarcely ascended: for on high, as in the
quiet and fearless hours of earlier times, the
brown vulture and the bald eagle flew, silently
sailing on, or sending through the air their
shrill notes of ecstacy and rapture. The
boundlessness
of those mighty mendows was in itself
calculated to strike an awe through the bosom
of the advancing army; before it they lay, a
vast table, on which, as on the tables of stone,
the fingers of an Omnipotent had written
majesty
,
power, and eternity. Contemplations
like these were sufficient in themselves to fill
the mind of the armed host with feelings of awe
and humility; but when, over the immense
prairie, they saw evidences that something had
passed which for the moment rivalled Deity;
more palpable in its manifestations, nearer in
its visible strength, and less merciful in its
might; when the tracks about them and the
desert solitude which Behemoth had created,
became thus clearly apparent, they shrunk
within
themselves and doubted the wisdom of their
present enterprise.
This feeling however reigned but for a
moment
.
More manly and martial thoughts soon
took their place, and they pressed on in the
path pointed out with alacrity and courage.
The verge of the plain, which they had now
reached, bordered on a long and high ridge of
mountains, which stretched from the margin
of the prairie far west. Upon these summits
they now advanced. Arrayed in broad and
solid columns the army moved on over the
mighty causeway, their trumpets filling the air
with novel music; while the echo of their
martial steps, sounding through the wildern,
affrighted Silence from his ancient throne.
Against the clear sky their bright banners
flaunted, and high up into the heaven aspired
the warlike tower flashing death from every
point. The gleam of ten thousand swords
streamed from those broad heights far into the
depths of airabove, around, belowlighting
the solitude like new-risen morning-stars.
The pride of war now truly kindled their
breastsfear skulked aside from their heroic
way, and Death, could he have come forth a
personal being, on those clear summits, as their
pulses freshened in treading them, would have
been no phantom.
Through the ranks a soldierly joy prevailed,
and with the rousing drum their spirits beat
high.
They had reached the extreme limit of the
mountain ridge, and were preparing to descend
into the plain broadening at its foot, when,
afar off, they espied, slowly heaving itself to
and fro in the ocean, which sparkled in the
mid-day sun beyond the plain, a vast body
which soon shaped itself to their vision into
the form of Behemoth.
The army halted and stood gazing. The
giant beast seemed to be sporting with the
ocean. For a moment he plunged into it, and
swimming out a league with his head and lithe
proboscis reared above the waters, spouted
forth a sea of clear, blue fluid toward the sky,
ascending to the very cloud, which, returning,
brightened into innumerable rainbows, large
and small, and spanned the ocean. Again he
cast his huge bulk along the main, and lay,
island-like, floating in the soft middle sun,
basking in its ray, and presenting, in the
grandeur
and vastness of his repose, a monumental
image of Eternal Quiet. Bronze nor marble
have ever been wrought into sculpture as grand
and sublime as the motionless shape of that
mighty Brute resting on the sea.
Even at the remote distance from which they
viewed him they could catch at times through
the ocean-spray, the sparkle of his small and
burning eye. Once, it seemed for a moment
steadily fixed upon their host as it stood out
conspicuously on the height, and, abandoning his
gambols, Behemoth urged his bulky frame toward
the land. Breasting the mighty surges which
his own motion ereated, he sought the shore,
and as he came up majestically from the water,
a chasm ensued as if the Pacific shrunk from
its limits. With a gurgling tumult the
subsiding
waves rushed into the broad hollow, and
continued to eddy about its vortex.
Meantime Behemoth stood upon the earth,
and rearing on his hindmost feet his foremost
were lifted high in the air, and with a roar
loud and fearful (like the gathering of an
earthquake with its powers of desolation in the
bowels of the earth) he brought them to the
plain with a weight and energy which made it
tremble to its utmost verge. He moved on;
making straight toward the army of the
Mound-builders
.
To the eyes of the astonished host,
as he shouted with his fearful voice, he seemed
like a dread thunder-cloud which gathers tone
and volume as it rolls on assaulting with its
hollow peals the very walls of heaven. Bokul
la was undismayed and calm. He saw that the
hour for action had arrived, and marshalling
his troops in proper order, he led them down a
winding and gentle slope which descended to
the plain. A short time sufficed and they
reached the level ground. Disposing
themselves
in the preconcerted order, they awaited
the on-coming of Behemoth. The towers were
planted firm on the earth; the pioneers put
forth and the instrumental sounds began. As
an additional thought a battalion of troops was
placed on a level ledge of rocks, on the side of
the mountain, and in advance of the main army,
to gall him as he passed.
On his part there was no delay: with strides,
like those of gods, he stalked forward. And
still he seemed, to the Moung-builders, to grow
with his advance. His bulk dilated, till it came
between them and heaven, and filled the whole
circuit of the sky. The firmament seemed to
rest upon his wide shoulders as a mantle. As
he neared upon their view, they saw more of
his structure and properties. His face was
like a vast countenance cut in stone, hewn
from the hard granite of the mountain-side,
with features large as those of the Egyptian
sphinx. Before him he boreterrible
instrument
of power! a mighty and lithe trunk,
which, with swift skill, he coiled and darted
through the air, like a monstrous serpent,
arteried
with poison and death. Guarding the
trunk were two far extending tusks, which
curved and flashed in the sun like scimitars.
Over his huger proportions fear cast its shadow,
and they saw them as through a cloud darkly.
He moved forward, nevertheless, a vast machine
of war, containing in himself all the muniments
and defences of a well-appointed host. To the
cool and courageous sagacity of the leader he
seemed to join the strength and force of an
embattled
soldiery: to sharp and ready weapons
of offence he added the defence of a huge and
impenetrable frame. Through his small and
flaming orbs, his soul shot forth in flashes dark
and desperate. His neck was ridged with a
short and stiff mane, which lent an additional
terror to his bulk.
On he came. He neared the host of the
Mound-builders. His fearful trunk was
uplifted
,
and his tusks glanced in the broad beam of
day over the heads of the army. Not a sword
left its seabbard. Not an arrow was pointed.
The brazen hammers and vessels of molten
copper
,
which had alone been raised, fell back to
their places, powerless and ineffective. The
palsy of fear was upon the whole host. The
near and unexpected vastness of Behemoth
awed their souls. Bokulla alone retained his
self-possession, and shouted to the affrighted
squadrons: Onward! Mound-builderscheer
up, and onward! the battle may yet be with
us! It was in vain. The vast proboscis
descended
,
and crushed with its descent a whole
phalanx. A second sweep, and the mighty
wooden towers, with their hammers of brass,
their molten copper, and their indwelling
defenders
,
were hurled on high, and, rushing to
the earth, strewed the plain with their wreck.
Ten thousand perished under his feet as he
trampled onward. Ten thousand fell stricken
to the earth by the mere icy bolt of fear. The
legion, stationed on the level ledge, were swept
from their post, as the whirlwind sweeps the
dust from the autumn leaf. Twice ten
thousand
and more fled up the mountain; across
the prairies; and some, in their extreme of
trepidation, sought shelter in the sea. With
infinite ruin the main host lay scattered upon
the prairie, shield, sword, bow, wagon,
wagoner
,
spearsman, and pioneer. Over the plain,
maddened by terror, the bisons, with their
vehicles
,
following in clattering haste, galloped,
they knew not whither. Of a body of about
fifteen thousand men, Bokulla, collected as
ever, took command, and marshalling them
through a narrow defile, led them up the
mountain
,
from which the whole army had a few
hours before descended in pomp and glory.
Guiding them along the ridge by new and
well-chosen
paths, he hurried them forward. In the
meantime Behemoth had accomplished his work
upon the squadrons which were left. When
the task of death and ruin was completed, he
stood in the middle of the wreck, and, gazing
about, seemed to seek for some portion of the
host on whom desolation was yet to be wrought.
With sagacious instinct he soon discovered the
path which the missing legions had taken.
Instantly
abandoning the plain, he pressed
toward
the gap through which the retreating
troops had fled.
Rushing through the defile, he was soon
standing on the steps of Bokulla and his flying
troops. Through each narrow pass of rocks
the chieftain skilfully guided them, taking
advantage
of every object that might be an
obstacle
to the monstrous frame of their pursuer.
Sometimes they mounted a sudden ascent,
sometimes
hastened through a narrow vale, or
around a clump of mighty sycamores and
cottonwoods
.
Nevertheless Behemoth pressed on.
Behind them, terrible as the voice of death,
they heard his resounding roar, and turned
pale with affright. They had reached the
crown of a hill, and were compassing a tall
rock, which stood in their way, to descend,
when they heard heavy, trampling steps behind
them, and looking back, they beheld the
ponderous
bulk of the Mastodon urging rapidly up
the ascent. Trepidation fastened on the ranks.
Their knees smote together, and many, in the
weakness of sudden fear, fell quaking to the
earth. Some, in their alarms, cast themselves
headlong from the height; some escaped into
the neighboring woods, and two or three, bereft
of sense by terror, fled into the very jaws of
the huge beast himself. A small band only
kept on their way with Bokulla.
Surging up the steep, and down the opposite
descent, Behemoth pushed forward, trampling
to the earth those who stood rooted in his path
statues of despairand was soon at the rear of
the small flying troop.
He was at the very heels of the pale
fugitives
,
and Bokulla, placing a trumpet at his lips,
blew a long, loud, and what, in the hour of
battle
and under other auspices, would have been
an inspiriting blast, and endeavored to arouse in
them sufficient sprit and strength to bear them
to the shelter of a gigantic crag which stood in
their path. Past this the velocity and impetus
of the brute would inevitably force him, and
they might rest for a moment, while he rushed
down and reascended (if reascend he should)
the declivity. The attempt was successless;
the trumpet-blast, vainly blown, was borne far
away into the forest, and, echoing from cliff to
cliff, seemed only to vex the idle air.
From Bokulla, one by one, his followers fell
off and perished by Behemoth, or crept into the
grass and underwood to die a more lingering
death. At length the chieftain was alone
before
his mighty pursuer; and yet he bated not
a jot of heart or hope, but still bore up and
steered right onward. With the emergency his
courage, resolution, and forethought, arose.
He kept his way steadily, and the bison which
drew him nobly seconded his purpose, and
exhibited
,
as if inspired by the greatness of the
occasion, the power of reason in
comprehending
,
and a giant's strength in carrying out, the
most expedient means for the rescue of his
master
.
He seemed to apprehend every direction
ef Bokulla's at a thought. To the right,
between
yon stout oaks! to the leftonward
Bokulla is at your mercy! shouted the rider,
and they swept along like the prophet and his
chariot of fire. The night had gradually come
on. Palpable twilight now overspread the
scene, and, in a moment, the moon glided to
her station in the zenith.
The woods through which Bokulla passed
were now filled with shadows, which, crossing
and blending with each other, would have
confused
mere human skill in selecting a path, but
the bison dexterously steered on. With
cumbrous
but swift steps Behemoth still pursued,
over hills, vales, mountains.
At length Bokulla reached that very summit
where first the gigantic phantom had appeared,
and where the impress of his steps was yet
clearly left. He had just commenced his
descent
toward the villages of the
mound-builders
(thousands of whom looked toward his
chariot
as he sounded another call) and Behemoth
stood behind him. The mighty brute, from some
unconjecturable motive, paused. He saw the
chariot of Bokulla rapidly verging toward
its home. He abandoned the pursuit, but yet
yielded not his purpose of destroying the last
of the army of the Mound-builders; for,
loosening
from its base a massy rock, which hung,
threatening, over the village, he lifted it with
his tusks, and, pushing it forward, urged it
with tremendous force directly in the career of
the chieftain. Thundering it followed him. It
neared his chariot. Another turn and Bokulla
is crushed; but the Mound-builders shout in
one voice, To the right, Bokulla! to the
right! and, turning his chariot in that
direction
,
he escapes the descending ruin, though
enveloped in the dust of its track. Emerging
quickly from the cloud, and avoiding the rocky
mass, which rushed past him with terrible fury,
Bokulla now reached the bottom of the
mountain
,
and was surrounded instantly by
innumerable
Mound-builders, each with a fearful question
on his lips, and the dread of a yet more fearful
answer written in his countenance. Bokulla,
alone and in flight, was a reply to all their
thoughts could imagine or dread of what was
terrible. Gazing upon him for a while in
motionless
silence, they at length burst the stupor
which made them dumb, and each one asked for
husband, brother, son, who had gone forth, a
few days since, full of life and vigor, against
Behemoth. Death, defeat, and flight! were
all that escaped from Bokulla, and, breaking
his way through the multitude, he sought his
own home. Gathering about the house of the
chieftain, men, women, and children, in large
crowds, they cried out through the live-long
night, while their tears fell, for their relatives
who had ventured to the battle, and asked
wherefore they came not back?
The next day, about noon, there rushed into
the village, covered with foam and quaking
with fear, troops of bison, followed by the
frame-work
on which the towers and machines of war
had been raised, and, clattering through the
streets with their enormous and lumbering
wheels till they reached their stalls, they fell dead.
To some of them a handful of men clung
tenaciously
,
though pale and terror-stricken; and
to the rear of one, hung by his feet, which were
entangled in the leathern strap that had bound
the frame together, a lifeless body, the scull of
which was broken by rude and hasty contact
with the earth, while the tufts of hair which
remained were matted with grass, thorns, and
mire, gathered as it was drawn swiftly along
through the different varieties of verdure, marsh,
and brambles.
The next day after that, at about night-fall,
there came down the mountains which Bokulla
had descended under circumstances of so much
peril, a lean and tattered company, marshalled
forward by the ghostlike figure of a chieftain,
with a broken helm, husky voice, and swordless
scabbard. They were a portion of the army
which had gone forth with Bokulla, and had
been reduced to their present pale and ragged
condition partly by fear and partly by the want
of food for the two days during which they had
wandered in search of home. Many a wife and
mother shed tears of mingled gratitude and pity
as she looked upon the shattered wreck of her
son or husband, thus cast up from the waves of
war. Two or three days after this, and day by
day, for some week or two, came into the
villages
of the Mound-builders, single fugitives or
in pairs, when they had coupled themselves
together
,
that, in this sorrowful fellowship, they
might aid each other in bearing up against
terror
,
hunger, and death.
And even after a month had rolled round,
and tears had been shed and rites performed for
the absentees, two or three strayed home
lunatic
poor
idiots, whose brains had been crazed
by the triple assault of fear, famine, and the
dread of instant death under the hoofs of the
enemy. From the account that could be
gathered
from their own wandering and confused
wits, they had fled every inch of the way from
the battle-ground under the terrible
apprehension
that Behemoth was at their heels. Through
brake and through briar they hastened. They
had scrambled over rocks and waded wide
ponds; they had climbed trees and rested a
little
,
and then, swinging themselves from the
branches, had run miles over hot and
streamless
prairies, until they had reached their native
villages, sad, witless idiots!
The catastrophe now stood out before the
Mound-builders, drawn in bold, strong, and
fearful strokes; painted in colors borrowed
from the midnight, and dashed upon the
canvass
,
it almost seemed, by the hand of destiny
itself. The malignant planet, which had so long
lowered in the atmosphere, had now burst, and
poured from its womb all that was dreadful,
pernicious, and enduring. The earth was now
to them a cold, comfortless prison, into which
they were plunged by an inexorable power, and
where they were doomed to drag through their
allotted portion of life under the eye of an
eternal and terrible foe, joyless, hopeless, and
prostrate. The multitude gave themselves to a
quiet and passionless despair, Bokulla was
silent
or invisible.
Great occasions beget great men, while
they have also a tendency to nurse into life
petty spirits, which take the opportunity,
uninvited
,
to push themselves into prominent
posts. Thus the same emergency which elicited
the resources of Bokulla's large and fruitful
mind, also drew out the vagaries and
absurdities
of a puny intellect, Kluckhatch by name.
On account of his dwarfish size and an unlucky
curvature in the legs, this valorous gentleman
had been rejected from the military companies.
Nevertheless he kept a drum on his own
account
,
with which he was wont to regale a
rabble
crowd of urchins and maidens; making a
monthly tour through the villages and
refreshing
them with the dulcet sounds. He also
wore in this itinerant and volunteer soldiery of
his a small sword; a bright pyramidal blade of
steel with a handle of elk's horn, the tip of
which was surmounted with a clasp or circlet
of silver and ornamented with the device of an
owl hooting. The person of Kluckhatch was,
as I have hinted, pigmean rather than
otherwise
.
He had a low forehead with prominent
cheek bones, and a broad full-moon face with
large eyes, in which idiocy and self-conceit
predominated
,
though they were occasionally
enlivened
with an expression of mirth and
good-fellowship
,
and sometimes even brightened with
a humorous conception. On the crown of his
head, to complete his garniture, Kluckhatch
bore a cap of conical figure, with a flattened
circular summit, ending at the apex with a
round button of copper. Attached to the sides
of the cap were two large ear-flaps of
deer-skin
,
or that of some other indigenous animal,
made to cover ears as large.
I believe, said this self-constituted
champion
,
when every plan suggested and acted
upon had proved fruitless, I believe, said he,
I must take this huge blusterer in hand. I
look for a mound of the largest size at least for
my memory if I lay him at length, and a patent
of nobility for my family. Kluckhatch is no
foolis he? asked the vainglorious militant,
turning with a cocked eye to a shock-headed
youth who stood gaping at his elbow. The
boy replied with a similar squint, and
Kluckhatch
ran on, detailing at length, like a crafty
plotter, the whole course of strategy he
intended
to put in practice against Behemoth, naming
the time when, and the place where, he
expected
to achieve his capture at least, if not
his death.
In accordance with this carefully matured
plot, one bright and cold autumn morning
Kluckhatch sallied forth accoutred to a point
with dagger, hat and sword-belt, to which was
attached, special ministrant in the anticipated
capture, his little drum, with the melodious
sounds of which he expected to quell and
mollify
the mighty rage of Behemoth. Over his
right shoulder he bore a light ladder of pine of
great length, with which he intended to mount
to Behemoth's neck and inflict the fatal wound
with his trenchant blade.
Thus armed and accoutred Kluckhatch set
forth. Fortunately on the morning which he
chose for his adventure, the Mastodon was not
far off but pastured in a broad open meadow
within sight of the Mound-builders' villages.
When Kluckhatch first beheld him opening and
closing his mighty jaws as he cropped the tall
verdure, his soul trembled within him and
vibrated
to and fro, like a mariner's needle,
between
the determination to retreat and that to
advance. At length however it settled down
true to its purpose. He marched forward
beating a reveill on his dwarfish drum, while
he whistled faintly as an accompaniment. He
was now within stone's throw of the monster.
He had lowered the ladder from his shoulder,
that he might be better prepared to scale the
sides of the Beast. Behemoth ceased from the
labor of feeding; a moment his eye twinkled
on the puissant Kluckhatch, and the next,
unrolling
his trunk, he coiled it about the slender
body of the adventurer, and lifting him gently
from the earth, as gently tossed him some
score of yards into a neighboring pond, which
was about five feet deep, and mantled with a
covering of stagnant water. Into this
Kluckhatch
descended and fell amid a noisy company
of large green bull-frogs who were holding a
meeting for general consultation and the ex
pression of opinion. Amid the blustering
assembly
the valiant little hero fell. For a time,
as he hung balanced in the air, it was doubtful
which portion of his person would first
penetrate
the water.
The levity of his head and the weight of his
splay-feet, at length brought the latter first to
the pool, and dividing the stagnant surface, they
sank through and reached a bottom of mud;
still they sank and continued to settle down
deeper and deeper. Kluckhatch knew not
where his descent would stop, nor where in the
end he might arrive. His feet at last found
support just as his chin reached the waters'
edge, and, looking up, the first object that
fell upon his vision was a household of
venerable
and contemplative crows who, seated on a
dry tree at the edge of the pool, seemed to be
philosophizing over his mishaps, in their most
doleful discords. One, an old rake, with only
an eye left in his head, appeared to Kluckhatch,
as he leered knowingly upon him, to be a
desperate
quiz. When, after many vain efforts, he
had brought his scattered senses into something
like order, reaching forth one hand he grasped
his drum, which floated at a distance on the
pool, and held it up tremblingly, while with the
other he drew from his belt a drum-stick which
survived his fall. Stretching out the hand that
held the stick, he struck up a faint tatoo on the
parchment, with the double purpose of driving
off those accursed and hard-hearted crows, and
also to draw help from the nearest village.
To the instrumental sounds thus elicited he
added an humble vocal effort. Here was a scene
for a painter: Kluckhatch, the drum, and the
crows, all in unison, running down the scale
from lofty bass to shrill treble.
The hero soon tired of his toilsome essays at
the two kinds of music under his charge, and
putting forth all his strength in a desperate
venture, he succeeded, scrambling, floundering,
and paddling, in reaching the shore endued in a
coat-of-mail, composed of black slime and green
ooze, with long locks of eel-grass dangling at
his heels, as trophies of his exploit. Satisfied
with this valorous attempt at the capture
of the huge blusterer, Kluckhatch skulked
home.
PART SECOND.
It was two hours before sunrise. Through
the wide realm of the populous west not a soul
was stirring, save a single human figure, which
threaded its way through the streets of one of
the great cities of the Mound-builders. This
solitary object moved at a slow, measured pace,
as if its progress was actually retarded by the
weight of the thoughts with which it labored.
The eyes gleamed as if they beheld, afar off,
some enterprise of magnitude and obstinacy
sufficient to call up the whole soul of the man,
and the lines of the countenance worked, and
the hands were clenched, as if he was already
employed in the struggle. If one could have
looked into his bosom, he might have seen all
his faculties mustering to the encounter; and,
among other passions, aroused and assembling
there, he might have noted discomfiture and
mortification thrusting in their hated visages,
and lending a keener stimulous and quicker
motion
to the current of his thoughts. He might
have also discovered an heroic resolution,
almost
epic in its proportions and strength,
towering
up from amid the ruins of many cast-down
and desolated projects, and assuming to contend
with unconquerable might.
The solitary figure was that of Bokulla, who
was thus venturing forth, self-exiled and alone,
to discover, in the broad wilderness toward the
sea, whatever means of triumph he might, over
a power that had hitherto proved itself more
than a match for human strength or cunning.
A great spirit had taken possession of the
chieftain
,
and the shame of an inglorious defeat
aided
to kindle the energy of his passions. Over
that defeat he had already pondered, long, and
anxiously. He confessed to himself that he had
formed but a vague opinion of the hugeness and
strength of Behemoth when he had proposed
the battle. But he dwelt in the midst of a
terrified
and perishing people. As a man he was
touched by the sufferings and alarms of his
nation
.
Danger and death were before them, and
no gate of safety or mercy opened. He saw
this people, not only in the present time, but
through a long futurity, scourged and suffering;
the old tottering into a hasty grave, pursued by
a hideous phantom that increased its terrors;
the young growing up with images and thoughts
of fear interwoven with their tender and pliant
elements of being.
Was there no one man, in this whole nation,
who would go forth, in the spirit of martyrdom
and self-sacrifice, and seek, even in the desert
itself, the knowledge that would bring strength
and safety in its wings? It was he that was
now passing away from his country, for a while,
and launching himself in the boundless
wilderness
of the west. Championed by doubt and
solitude, he was plunging into a region which
stretched, he knew not whither, and to a fate,
perchance, his heart dared not whisper to itself.
What fruit might spring from this hardy
enterprise
,
it was vain to conjecture; but he was
determined to gather some knowledge of the
habits, and some information as to the
lodgment
of this terrible scourge of his people.
With rapid and firm step, he therefore
proceeded
on his way. By secret paths, and through
dark woods, he advanced, and midday brought
him to a spot which overlooked the whole of
the wide territory of the Mound-builders.
He stood upon a cliff which pushed out
boldly
from the wooded region that lay behind it,
and hung, like a platform, over a valley and
river that wound round its base. It was
covered
in patches with verdure and earth, from
which a few stately trees threw up their
branches
,
and underneath these Bokulla now stood.
Casting his eye abroad, he beheld a scene
which the boldest fancy of our time can
scarcely
conceive, accustomed as we are to think of
the prairies as tenantless and houseless deserts,
and the whole broad west as a wild, unpeopled
region, never disturbed unless by bands of
straggling
Indian hunters, or a mad herd of buffalo,
sweeping, like a tornado, over their bosom.
From his lofty stand the self-exiled chieftain
looked down upon a country belting a hundred
leagues, swelling or declining through a glorious
variety of hill, and vale, and meadow, with a
thousand streams intersecting the whole,
sometimes
mingling with each other, occasionally
ploughing their way through a genial valley,
or cutting deep into the heart of a mountain,
whose slope was covered with forests. A
numerous
population lined their banks, or hovered
on their eminences, whose dwellings and
national
edifices reared themselves in the air and
darkened the land with their number. Over
those vast, verdant deeps, the prairies, were
scattered, like islands, countless cities, in whose
suburbs tall towers of granite and marble sprang
to the sky, and resembled the masts of ships of
war just putting out from the shore. In another
direction, a mighty bastion of earth, with its
round, green summit, heaved itself into view,
like the back of some huge sea-monster; and
the long grass of the prairies, swept by
occasional
winds, rolled to and fro and furnished
the ocean-like surges on which all these objects
rode triumphant.
Upon this scene Bokulla gazed long and
earnestly, while many dark thoughts, and sad
emotions followed each other like the clouds of
summer through his mind, and darkened his
countenance as they passed. Beneath him he
saw a hundred cities devoted to ruin; tower,
and temple, and dwelling, crumbled to the earth,
and no hand lifted to arrest their fall. A wide
populace was wasting away from a robust and
manly vigor, into a pale and shadow-like
decrepitude
.
Day by day the august majesty of
a prosperous and ambitious nation dwindled
into a shrunken and counterfeit image of itself.
To them there was now no alternation of
sunshine
or shadow; seasons passed without their
fruits; the golden summer no longer smiled in
their midst, and generous autumn departed
without
a blessing and unheeded.
To these miserable and suffering realms
Bokulla
now bade farewell. His present
enterprise
might be without fruit, or fraught with
disastrous and fatal results to himself; yet, in
the strength of nature, he would once more
presume
to cope with the dreaded enemy, for he
still believed that man must be triumphant, in
the end, over this bestial domination. To man
the earth was given as his kingdom, and all
tribes and classes of creatures were made his
subjects and vassals. In this faith he turned
away from a scene which suggested so many
fearful topics of thought, and bent his course
toward the west, guided by such knowledge as
he already enjoyed, and such marks as occurred
to his observation, determined to avoid the face
of man, and to be familiar only with solitude and
danger, until some new means of triumph were
clearly discovered. Pursuing this resolve, he
pushed forward with speed and energy;
plucking
,
by the way, wild berries and other natural
fruits as food, and drinking of the cool, shaded
rivulet, his only beverage; for, from the first
moment that he had conceived the thought of
this venturous self-exile, he vowed to cast
himself
on nature, and to be received and sustained
by her as her worthy child, or to perish as an
alien and an outcast on her bosom. He had,
therefore, come forth unprovided with food, and
trusting entirely to her bounty for supply.
Hand in hand thus with liberal Nature,
Bokulla
pressed onward until night-fall, when he
halted, and, sheltering himself safely within the
hollow of a rock, he gathered himself for
repose
.
Thus for many days did this solitary pilgrim
journey on, seeking no other couch but the
overhanging cliff or the sheltering bank, and
finding no other canopy but the broad, open
sky and the green roof of the branching tree.
A constant grandeur of soul sustained him in
the midst of many pressing hardships, and a
noble purpose bore him forward as the winds
propel the eagle that trusts to their strength.
Guided by apparent tracks and obvious
landmarks
,
about the middle of the afternoon of
the second day he reached a solemn wood, into
the heart of which he made his way.
He was wearied with travel, and seeing the
remains of a large old oak thrusting themselves
up from the tangled and chequered shade, he
seated himself upon them. The wild
underwood
and smaller foliage were twisted into a
thousand fantastic shapes, which wreathed
themselves round, and the prodigal
forest-flowers
had scattered their colors here and there
so profusely over the seat which the self-exile
had chosen, as to furnish somewhat the
appearance
of a cushioned throne. What wonder
if the resemblance struck the excited
imagination
of Bokulla, and his eye glanced about the
forest as if in search of attendants that should
hedge this seat of honor round. Am I alone
here! half-muttered the chieftain. Is all
this pleasant realm of air, and this verdurous
spot of earth void and barren! No, no; I am
not in an unpopulous solitude even here. Airy
citizens throng about me in this remote and
unfrequented
wood. Busy hopes, immortal
desires
,
passions, longings, and aspirations that
lengthen like shadows the nearer we approach
the sunset of life. Mighty and tumultuous
wishes and emotions gather around me in this
pathless and woodland region, and tell me I am
not, that I can not be, alone. Shadowy
creatures
!
which sway us beyond all corporal
powers
and instrumentsye swarm now in these
shaded walksand foremost Ambition and
Fame, glorious twins! stand forth and tower
in cludy stature, grasping at impossible objects
and plucking at the heavens themselves!
Immortal
powers and faculties! in these retired
and natural chambers, I know you as the
internal
and silent agencies which are to guide
and sustain me through this hardy and
venturous
pilgrimage.
In this wood he found a suitable shelter and
stretched himself for sleep. Notwithstanding
the great cares with which he was oppressed,
the mind of the chieftain was visited by
pleasant
dreams; and he was borne far back from
the gloomy and troubled present, into an old
and cheerful time, where everything wore a
countenance of joy, and a golden atmosphere
floated about all. He wandered along the
banks of mighty streams, watching the careless
flight of birds, or the idle motions of their
currents
,
on which many vessels of gallant trim,
with every sail set, were hastening toward the
sea. Around him a thousand familiar sounds
made the common music of day; trumpets
were sounded in the distance; citizens were
hurrying forth or home on errands of business,
or pleasure, or tender sorrow; and all was
human and delightful. The chieftain himself
seemed to have the heart of youth, and to
ramble
onward amid these pleasant scenes of life
as if no morrow was coming, as if the sun that
was now in mid-heaven would never set.
Near the close of the night, this pageant
passed away, and the slumbers of the champion
were interrupted by a loud sound, like that of
a storm gathering in the distance, and which
drew nearer by, increasing every moment
Presently it seemed to cross the western
quarter
of the wood with a clashing and
tumultuous
noise, resembling that of a great cataract,
and then it passed far to the northwest, and
died away after a long time, like rattling
thunder
,
among the distant peaks of the mountains.
Nothing could be more alarming to the
imagination
than this midnight tumult, and
Bokulla
felt that his situation was like that of the
wretched mariner, whose bark is dashed on
the rocks of some inhospitable shore, where
night and the raging winds press on him
behind
,
and darkness and the wild beast prepare
to fasten on his weather-beaten body as he
strikes the land. But no sound that Bokulla
had ever known could represent the character
of that which rebellowed, and thundered, and
died away. The stormy shouts of a warlike
assault
,
the furious outcry of popular rage, the
howling of winter winds, all commixed, would be
an imperfect image of its depth, and strength, and
varying loudness. In the morning, disturbed and
perplexed, he girded himself again to his task, and
shaped his course toward that region of the
forest
by which the indescribable tumult had
swept. An hour's swift travel brought him to
a large wooded slope, which presented to his
view, in the uncertain light of a sun obscured
by the gray mist of morning, an astonishing
spectacle. A thousand vast old trees, each
large enough for the main column of a temple,
were dashed against the upland and lay there,
leaning half-way down, as if they had
contested
against overthrow, like mighty ships, blown
over in the harbor of some great city, when the
north has burst upon them and commanded
that they should veil their pennons and
high-aspiring
standards.
From obvious footmarks he easily discovered
the course which the strength that caused this
desolation had taken, and pursuing the
indications
thus furnished, he was soon out upon an
open plain. The region that now spread
before
him was a wide and trackless waste,
barren
,
void of vegetation, and apparently deserted
of nature. Such herbage as lingered about its
borders, was small, scanty, and withered, and
crept gloomily along the dusty banks of
dried-up
brooks and rivolets. Over this arid desert,
as Bokulla slowly plodded, he discovered the
same large foot-prints as he had followed all
along, crossing and re-crossing each other,
sometimes diverging and again keeping straight
on, in a manner so irregular and wandering, as
to bewilder him and set any attempt to pursue
them entirely at nought.
In some places the earth was ploughed up
and rent with seams recently made, and in
others it was scattered far and wide, in
irregular
and broken heaps. The whole wilderness
presented an appearance as if it had been
recently
trampled by some angry and barbaric
puissance, that had swept it from end to end,
like a storm.
What now rendered his situation still
more perplexing, was that which would seem
at first a source of self-gratulation and
comfort
,
after the fearful sounds of the preceding
night. A dead silence hung all around him,
which was, if possible, more dreary and
depressing
than the unearthly noises of midnight.
A soundless and voiceless quiet filled the air,
the sky, and brooded over the inanimate sea of
sand slumbering at his feet.
Through this confused and desolate region,
the chieftain resolved to make his way to the
summit of some one of the mountains that
dominated
this arid plain at its farthest extremity,
and thence, as from a citadel, look abroad and
make such discoveries as he might.
Bokulla at length reached the summit of a
high mountain, and looking forth toward the
east, he beheld a mighty region of hill and
valley
,
whose immensity astonished and
overwhelmed
him. In one direction, a hundred
peaks towered one above the other, until the
farthest was lost, it seemed, on the very
threshold
of the sky. In another, torrents dashed
through numerous declivities, tearing down
mountains, it almost seemed, in their rage, and
threatening to wash away the very foundations
of the earth, as they leaped over rocks, and
crags, and rugged precipices. Huge passes
and defiles that ploughed their way through the
bosoms of solid mountains, and led down, as it
were, to the central fires, were visible in other
quarters, and exhibited more or less of their
dreary turnpikes, as the sunlight fell upon one
or the other. As Bokulla looked forth, he
descried
a dark object moving slowly along a distant
peak. Sometimes it paused, and then again
advanced; at length it plunged down the
mountain-side
into a deep and dark valley, but still
some portion of it was apparent; and at
intervals
,
as it crossed a seam or gap that
intersected
the valley, the whole figure came into view.
Thus it wound through the immense region,
almost
the whole time conspicuous to the eye of
the gazer, who, however, was unable to
discover
its character, so remote was the distance
at which it moved. At length it emerged from
the many defiles and declivities, among which
it had passed, and came out upon the open
plain.
As a numerous fleet of war-ships, all their
canvass spread, double some one of the
Atlantic
capes, and come within the ken of the
anxious watcher on shore, so did this vast
object
steer round the mountain-base and stand
before the eye of Bokulla. Like a huge fog
that has settled in autumn upon the ground,
and creeps along until it has mastered the earth
with its broad dimensions, so did the stature
and bulk of the Mastodon tower and enlarge as
it drew nigh. Among those mighty peaks, and
along that immeasurable plain, he seemed to
move the suitable and sole inhabitant. Rocks
piled on rocks, and rivers, the parents of
oceans, calling unto rivers as large, and
dreadful
summits that hung over the earth and
threatened to crush it, were not its massy plains
and platforms broad enough to uphold
mountains
a hundred fold vaster, this was the proper
birth-place and dwelling of the mightiest
creature
of the earth.
Amid these great elements of nature, Bokulla
beheld the motions of the Mastodon as he trode
the earth in gigantic sway; and thought swelled
upon tumultuous thought, as waves that break
over each other in the middle ocean, at each
step of that unparalleled and majestic progress.
What wonder, if at that moment he deemed the
great creature before him unassailable and
immortal
?
Behemoth passed onward, and for the
first time in many hours was lost to the gaze
of the chieftain, as he entered a dark gap in a
great mountain-range far to the east. Intent
on the daring and venturous purpose which
had drawn him forth into the wilderness, he
descended from his lofty station, and shaped his
course to the barriers within which the
unconquered
brute had passed. With incredible
labor
he toiled over a thousand obstacles;
clambering
high mountains, plodding through gloomy
valleys, and compassing, by contrivance
sometimes
,
sometimes by sheer strength, broad
streams, he found himself at length, as the
night approached, fixed on a lofty ridge, whence
his eye fell upon a spacious amphitheatre of
meadow, completely shut in by rocks and
mountains
,
save at a single narrow cut or opening.
In the centre of this he beheld Behemoth
couchant
(his head turned toward the chieftain
himself) like a sublime image of stone in the
middle of a silent lake. Bokulla exhibited no
symptoms of terror or trepidation, and the beast
lay motionless and quiet. Great emotions filled
the breast of the chieftain as he looked upon
the Mastodon reposing in this fortified solitude.
He closely scrutinized the whole circle of
mountains
,
and took an accurate survey of the gate
which led out into the open country beyond.
Among other circumstances, he observed large
hollows, here and there, in different quarters of
the plain, as if worn there by the constant
habitation
of Behemoth; and also, that as the
wind sighed through the branches of trees that
stood in its centre and along its border, the
Mastodon moved up and down the
amphitheatre
with a slow and gentle motion, as if
soothed by the sound.
While he was thus engaged, night descended
upon the scene; and the dark hours were to be
passed by Bokulla alone in that far-off
wilderness
,
and within reach of the mighty and
terrible
foe. As well as he might he addressed
himself to sleep; but it was almost in vain, for
it seemed as if the fearful strength beneath was
slumbering at his side, and as if its tall, cold
shadow fell upon him and froze the very blood
in his veins. Armed beings of an
inconceivable
and superhuman stature passed and
repassed
before his mind; and the vision of a
conflict mightier than any that his mortal eyes
had ever witnessed, in which huge trumpets
brayed and enormous shields clashed against
each other, swept along. Then it changed,
and it seemed as if the mountains rocked to and
fro, and pent winds strove to topple down peaks
and pinnacles, while in their midst one mighty
Figure, neither of man nor of angel, stood
chained, and, in a deep and fearful voice, cried
to the heavens for succor. Perplexed by
images
and visions like these, Bokulla wakened
before the dawn, and turned his steps, with
scarce any guide or landmark, toward his own
home.
And now an appalling fate was before the
champion, for he was without food in the very
centre of the desert. The liberal fare upon
which he had at first subsisted, was gone long
ago, and the scanty supply which nature had
lately furnished from hedges and meadows, had
entirely ceased. Barrenness, barrenness,
barrenness
,
spread all around. After toil and
exertion
of body and mind, almost beyond mortal
strength, he seemed likely to perish in the
wastes with the great project that his soul had
conceived unknown to living man.
Interminable
and gloomy disasters lowered over his
country if he should perish in the wilderness.
He struggled onward with anguish and hunger
at his heart.
At last, when his strength was fast ebbing,
he came at night-fall upon a vast open plain,
and dragged himself, with a pang in every step,
to a crag that jutted, like a great fang, in its
very centre. Upon this he raised himself, and
with features sternly set against the darkness,
awaited his fate. Narrower and narrower the
great circle of the horizon closed upon him,
binding him where he sat in an inexorable
grasp. A black universe pressed upon him on
every side, and seemed eager to smother him
up in gloom. Against hunger and terrible
darkness
and death, he folded his arms. Even then
he strained his gaze through the thick night,
toward the quarter of the sky under which lay
the homes of the Mound-builders, as if to learn
by some light that flickered up in the distance,
whether any, the faintest hope, kindled a
fire-side
among them yet. Blackness and infinite
gloom alone swelled about him, and filled the
whole heaven.
No sleep came to his eyes that night, nor
was he altogether wakeful, but lingered in a
middle world, where the images of the new
being and the old held him fast, or yielded him
for a time to the other. At one time, a voice
was at his ear, whispering peace and tranquil
hours henceforth for ever; a voice that came
he knew from a shining face. At another, a
cry, as of one shrieking in excess of pain,
came booming through the dark, and cut all
his human sense of suffering to the quick.
At length the slow morning dawned again,
and looking forward, where he thought he had
discerned a dull marsh stretching to bar his
way, he found instead a long green line of
verdure, smiling freshly in the eye of the light.
In its very midst there stood a calm, brown
bird, reposing with an infinite quietude, with
an eye obliquely turned upward,
contemplatively
regarding the sun, and stretching its wings
to catch the warm breeze that rippled past.
A new pleasure shot into the soul of the
champion, beholding this easy mirth of nature
this so-great repose: the bird heaving itself
sluggishly on the wing, crept lazily off through
the air; and, regarding it, while his mind was
thus gently moved, a sound, as of a beautiful
hoof set upon the earth, struck upon his ear.
He turned back, and at the spot from which
the bird had taken flight, there stood a steed,
so young, so smooth, so shapely in every limb,
and so like a happy creature of darkness in
every line of its glossy black, that Bokulla
mused upon it as upon a vision.
Tranquil as the air it stood, its head uplifted
only and drinking in the sky, with its neck
stretched far away toward the home of the
champion. Bokulla knew the omen, and with
a spirit fresh and unbroken he stood beside the
steed, and at a bound was his master.
Away they flewthe crag, the plain, the
sky dying behind them at a thought. Gently
through fair green gladesat a bound over vales
and rugged steepsswiftly past stupendous
peaks, that held aloft their dazzling snow-sheets,
as with a mighty tented staffalong a heavy
river that strove to run an even race with
them,past cataracts that burst on the
wilderness
in crashing peelsthey speeded on. Over
hills, through forests, and along stream-sides,
the wondrous flight kept on all that day and all
that night too (Heaven in its deep providences
knew how), when, at the next day's dawn,
upon
a mountain-brow the steed stayed his steps,
and a populous city burst upon the gaze of
Bokulla
,
directly at his feet. The steed stood
still in the immoveable quiet in which the
chieftain
first beheld himsilent, gentle, beautiful,
the calm counter-image to Behemoth. Wide
upon the plain below the scattered
Mound-builders
stood about, striving to worship as of
old; and as their lifted look fell upon the new
vision, they clapped their hands for joy, and
shouted like men before whose shipwrecked
gaze land suddenly springs to view. It showed
to them fair, beautiful indeed, but when,
breaking the spell of silence and quietude that
held him, the steed hastened down the
mountain-side
,
and galloped through their streets,
they beheld the riderhis features gaunt and
unearthly, his hair streaming wildly to the
windthey fled from his steps with a new
fear.
Some sought refuge in their dwellings,
while others rushed out to gaze upon him
as he scampered, wild and spectre-like, along
the distance; and others gathered together,
and, in subdued voices, conjectured or
canvassed
the character of the sudden apparition.
Many wild guesses and shrewd suggestions
were ventured.
This is a fiend of the prairie, said one, he
that rambles up and down the big meadow,
blowing his horn, and who calls the wolves and
goblins together when a carcass is thrown out
or a traveller perishes in crossing them.
It is a lunatic, escaped from his friends,
said a second, who has been out, seeking his
wits in the mountains.
You are wide of the mark, my good sirs,
said another, a sharp-eyed little man, glaring
about and looking up at the windows, as if
afraid of being overheard; and the group
pressed more closely about him, as if expecting
a communication of great weight and
shrewdness
a
whole bowshot wide of the markit
is the keeper of Behemoth!
At this they all turned pale and lifted up their
eyes in astonishment, and admitted that nothing
could be nearer the truth.
By this time Bokulla had reached his own
door, and, throwing himself from his steed of
the desert, prepared to enter in; but, ere he
could effect this object, several stout citizens
pressed before him and arrested his steps.
Wherefore is this? said the foremost,
will you rush into a house of mourning in
this guise? Know you not that this is the
mansion of Bokulla the championand that his
widow is in sackcloth and tears within?
Begone
elsewhere, madman!
This remonstrance was seconded by another,
and a third, until it swelled so high that the
crowd would have seized him, and wreaked
some injury upon his person, had he not
succeeded
in obtaining a moment's pause; and,
standing on an elevation, he shouted out,
Peace, Mound-builders, it is Bokulla before
you!
At this declaration many began to recognise
in the shrunken features and toil-worn frame
before them, their great champion and
chieftain
,
and a shout was raised, Life and health
to Bokulla, the father of his country!
Pleasant
dew fall upon him! Long may he tread
the green earth under his feet! and many
national
invocations and blessings.
The rumor now spread rapidly abroad, and
the cry was taken up, wherever it reached, and
renewed with hearty goodwill, for all were
rejoiced
at the return of their great leader, whom
some had considered lost for ever, and who all
admitted was the only one that could contend,
with any chance of success, against their
barbaric
foe. Even the little group of gossips that
had construed him into a fiend, a lunatic, and
the keeper of Behemoth, but a moment before,
now rushed eagerly forward, and were among
the first to welcome him back, the sharp-eyed
little man invoking a special blessing on his
pleasant countenance, which looked, he said,
like that of a saving angel! Escaping from
these numerous tokens of admiration and
regard
,
Bokulla withdrew into his dwelling, and
the crowd, after lingering about for many hours
to glean such information as they might of his
absence and to catch a view of his person, at
length dispersed, each, he knew not why, with
a lighter heart, and more joyous look, than
had fallen to his lot for many long and weary
months.
From the dwelling of Bokulla let us turn our
steps, for a while, toward the suburbs of the
city, and enter the sick-chamber of Kluckhatch,
the blusterer. The adventure of that valiant
pretender against Behemoth had been
accompanied
with serious, and, from the aspect they
at present assumed, perhaps fatal
consequences
.
The alarm of spirits which he had
suffered, together with the dreary submersion
in the pool, had thrown the adventurer into a
violent ague. Day by day the malady became
more tyrannical, and the mind of Kluckhatch
more fretful and restless. His soul seemed,
like the sun, to expand as it approached its
final
eclipse, and nature, who, at his birth, had
exhibited the art and skill of a bottle-conjurer
in crowding so puissant a spirit into so narrow
a body, now seemed at a loss to drive the
obstinate
tenant from its residence. The little man
clung more desperately to life the more
forcible
the attempt made to wrest it from him. The
pale ague assailed him with its whole band of
forces; throttling him by the throat, as it were,
it essayed, by rough and uncourteous usage, to
shake the vital spirit from him, but it adhered
closer and closer, and the attempt of nature to
cast off the pigmy militant, resembled that of
a horse, in whose flank, on a midsummer's day,
a burr has chanced to fix itself; he feels
annoyed
and irritatedhe whisks the hairy brush
to and frohe runshe gallopshe rearshe
plunges, but all in vain, the barbarous
annoyance
clings to him with the more zeal, until, at
some quiet moment, it drops gently from its
hold, and disturbs him no more. Thus stood
the account between nature and Kluckhatch.
In his bed he lay, trembling like an earthquake
or an ocean, under the coverlid. After a while
the ague relaxed, and the fever came on; and
then he sat up in his couch, and grasping a
wooden sword, which had been made to amuse
his sick and distempered fancy, he made airy
thrusts and lounges, and called out as if he
were plunging it deep in invisible ribs, or
hacking
at the head of some monstrous chimera.
Then, again, he would appear to seize the end
of some palpable object, and, drawing it along,
would measure and cut off pieces of a yard in
length at a time. It was evident, from the whole
tenor of his strange action, that the Mastodon
was in his phantasy; and this was amply
confirmed
by his breaking out, after the fever had
partially subsided, into the following wild
invectives
,
with a gasp between each, into which
his soul seems to have thrown its whole
collected
powers.
This huge bully; this fleshly continent;
this vagabond traveller; this beast mountain;
this tornado in leather; this bristly goblin;
Pray be calm, Kluckhatch, whispered the
shock-headed youth, who stood at his bedside,
terrified and quaking.
This huge, moving show; this two-horned
wonder; this tempest of bull's-beef; this
land-leviathan
;
fiend; wood-elf; this devil's
ambassador
;
this territory of calves'-hide, stretched
on a mountain; this untanned libel on
leather-dressers
;
this unhung homicide;
Uncle Kluckhatch, again interrupted his
attendant, Uncle Kluckhatch, wherefore do
you rail after this fashion? you but madden
your fever.
This empire of bones and sinew; this
monstrous
government on legs; this tyrant with a
tail; this rake-helly; this night-brawler; this
measureless disgust; this lusty thresher, with
his endless flail; this magnified ox; this
walking
abomination; this enormous discord,
sounding
in base; this huge, tuneless trombone;
The sick dwarf fell back on his pillow,
exhausted
,
his lips still moving as if laden with
other bitter epithets of denunciation. His hour
now rapidly drew nigh; his strength
gradually
ebbed away, and, at length, the conviction
that he must die forced its way into the heavy
brain of Kluckhatch. In a few words he made
his humble, and, of course, lean will. I leave,
said he, to his gaping companion, I leave to
you my fame, my virtues, and my drum! He
then gave directions for his burial, which, if
obeyed, would make it a spectacle rare and
unexampled
;
and, rising once more in his bed,
he said he wished to expire in a sitting attitude.
The last sinking wave of life was dying
upon
the shore. His simple attendant had taken
in his hand, to survey its fashion and its prop
erties, the testamentary bequest of his
departing
friend.
Strike up! strike up, once more!
exclaimed
Kluckhatch, as his eye kindled with the
gleam of death, and as the first sounds rolled
from the drum under the obedient hand of its
new possessor, the spirit of the pretender,
mingling
with them, left the earth.
The second morning after his death, at an
early hour, the funeral procession set out from
the domicil of Kluckhatch for the tomb of his
forefathers, a snug family vault, just beyond the
skirts of the town. Under the direction of the
shock-headed youth, who enacted the master of
ceremonies, the solemn cavalcade was drawn
up, and proceeded in the following order:
First, led on by the legatee himself, in front
of whose person hung suspended the
testamentary
drum, hobbled slowly along a sorry and
cadaverous jade, which had been the
pack-saddle
of Kluckhatch in his strolling tours. One
eye of the sad creature was wholly closed and
useless, but the other, as if to make amends,
was a sea-green orb of twice the ordinary
dimension
,
and, with its ample circle of white,
blazed like the moon crossing the milky-way
in the sky. His lank, hollow body bore clear
evidence of the neglected meadows and scant
mangers of the Mound-builders; for he had
been on fast, broken by occasional spare
morsels
,
for more than a month, and glided along
in the procession like a spectre. Behind this
monkish-looking beast followed a low wagon
or four-wheeled cart, drawn by a pair of
venerable
and spiritless bisons, in which sat the
blusterer himself, erect and in the costume of
every-day life, his strange red coat shining like
a meteor, conspicuous from afar, while his
conical
cap nodded gayly to the one side or the
other, as the wind swayed it. The strange
whipster held the reins firmly between his
skeleton
fingers, and exhibited on his countenance
a broad, ghastly grin, which, at the first view,
startled the beholders, but after they had
recovered
from the shock, caused them to burst into
a hearty laugh. On each side of the vehicle
thus strangely driven, marched, in serious
order
,
six sturdy men, each bearing a huge
rustic
pipe or whistle, wrought of reed, on which
they blew soft and melancholy music. Behind
the wagon, the favorite dog of Kluckhatch,
crestfallen and whining, was led in a string.
In the rear of this faithful mourner followed the
friends and admirers of the deceased, and after
these scrambled a promiscuous rout of his
town's-people
,
of every variety, age, sex, and hue.
Creation itself, both overhead and on the
earth, was something in unison with the
grotesque
obsequies. In one quarter of the sky,
which resembled the bottom of a rich sea,
suddenly
disclosed, a vast cloud, like a whale,
floundered and tumbled over the azure depths.
In another, the clouds lay piled in heaps of
shining silver; here they assumed the form of
a shattered wreck, fleecy vapors standing out
as mast or bowsprit, with evanescent bars for
rigging, and there a black and jagged mass of
them, stretched along like a reef of dangerous
and stubborn rocks. Lower down, a small,
dismantled
fragment, mottled with white, sunlit
scales, represented a mackerel, at full length,
opening his mouth and biting at the tail of a
cloudy grampus that stood rampant just
over-head
.
In the midair, drawn thither by the
strangely
exposed remains of Kluckhatch, a sable-coated
troop of ravens kept the procession company,
occasionally demanding, in coarse, rude
clamors
,
their reversionary right in the deceased.
Now and then a timid bird put forth his head
from the trees and bushes at the roadside, and
twittering for a moment, and seeming to smile
at the defunct rider, hopped back into its cool
hiding-place.
In a little while they reached the place of
burial, a small, suburban vault, the passage to
which, through a wooden door, led down to a
score of cells or apartments, all of which, save
one, were occupied. Over the entrance to the
vault stood the weather-bleached skeleton of a
robustious ancestor of Kluckhatch, balancing
on one of his short, stout legs, flourishing
the other as if in the act of going through a
pirouette, and holding, in his outstretched right
hand, the effigies of an owl, the favorite
family
bird and device.
For what reason, or whether for any, the
little
,
queer skeleton occupied this position, it
would be now difficult to decide. Perhaps, in
his lifetime, he had been a hard,
weather-beaten
hunter, who preferred to be left thus in the
free, naked air, and under the open sky, which
during life he had enjoyed without stint or
circumscription
.
Passing underneath the figure
of this portentous guardian, and through the
passage, they bore the mortal remains of the
last of the Kluckhatches, and placed them in
their upright posture in the only cell which
remained
untenanted. The moment it was known
that the corse was deposited in its final place
of rest, the twelve stout whistlers let off four
successive volleys of their peculiar music; the
dog came forward and howled, and the
shock-headed
youth stood at the entrance of the vault
sobbing and weeping, while the beast, whose
halter he held in his hand, silently devoured
the drumhead and looked inside for further
viands
.
A few moments more and the door was
closed for ever between the world and
Kluckhatch
.
The unexpected departure of Bokulla from
their midst had been a source of fruitful and
anxious speculation to the Mound-builders.
They were conscious of his absence, as if the
great orb itself had left the skies and deprived
the earth of its light and influence. His
presence
diffused among them the only cheerful ray
that enlightened their gloomy condition; and
although his recent enterprise had proved
disastrous
,
they were satisfied that the great
chieftain
would promptly grasp the first favoring cir
cumstance, and energetically use it against the
fearful foe.
Of the causes of his absence none were
advised
,
nor as to the direction his steps had
taken
.
Some dreaded lest he had gone forth to
perish by his own hand in the wilderness; and,
by these, scouts had been dismissed in every
quarter, to bring back the fugitive warrior, or
his body, for honorable sepulture, if he had
perished
.
The agitation and fear, excited by the
causeless and unexplained absence of Bokulla,
were only less than those occasioned by the
terrible
presence of the Mastodon. His return,
therefore, was welcomed with every
demonstration
of rejoicing. Lights were displayed,
as glad signals, from every tower; processions
and cavalcades were formed to make triumphal
marches through the realm, and bodies of
citizens
constantly gathered under the window of
the chieftain, to express their delight at his
return
.
During a whole week this universal
festivity
was sustained, and it seemed as if the
flower of national hope once more blossomed
in their midst. Merry games were celebrated
in their gardens; religious worship again
assumed
its robe, and walked forth with serene
and placid features in the traces of its early
duty.
What gave additional animation to this
unwonted
scene was, that Behemoth, during its
continuance, ceased to sadden or alarm them
with his presence; it may have been that the
dazzling splendor of the illumination, and the
loud sound of innumerable instruments all
playing together, kept him back.
About two weeks after the return of the
self-exiled
chieftain, and at the close of their joyous
celebrations, he appeared before the
Mound-builders
,
and declared that his strange and
unexplained absence had not been without its
uses. Nature, he said, had put forth her
mighty hand and generously furnished the
means of deliverance. Liberty was now before
them, but it must be attained through many
perils and through toil, sanctified, perchance,
with blood. Like the swimmer that nears the
shore, they must now buffet the wave of hostile
fortune with their sternest strength. It might
be that once more the firm and smiling
continent
of joy, of honor, and peace, could be
reached. If so, Heaven should be praised with
a deep sense of gratitude, and the realm should
ring through all its borders with sounds of
glorious
triumph!
He then stated that he had discovered in his
wanderings a mighty meadow where Behemoth
was wont to pasture; and that if they would
choose a delegation to visit it in company with
himself, he would endeavor to point them to a
sure and safe method of subduing the enemy.
At this suggestion the populace shouted
loudly, and echoed the name of Bokulla with
the most eager and fervent expressions of
admiration
.
They readily appointed three
eminent
citizens to accompany him. The next
H
morning they set out, and having in due course
of time reached the locality, they selected an
elevation which commanded the whole prospect
at once.
All admitted, as they looked upon the high
walls that girt the broad and spacious meadow,
and on the single narrow opening which led
from the enclosure, that nature had furnished
an extraordinary aid toward the capture of the
invincible brute. Far around on both sides
from the central position which they occupied,
the stupendous upright battlement of
mountains
stretcheda peak here and there shooting
up an immense tower, and a crag occasionally
thrusting itself forth from the general mass of
perpendicular rocks, like the quaint head of a
beast, or the rugged and ugly features of a
human
being, as the fancy chose to give it shape
and likeness. The whole hedged in a meadow
covered with a fertile growth of tall, rich
verdure
dotted
by a few scattered treesand
intersected
by a stream of considerable breadth
and depth, which flowed through its centre,
and formed an outlet in a narrow passage
underneath
the mountains. The natural opening
leading from this broad enclosure, was about
five hundred feet wide, and walled on either
side by gigantic fragments of stone, from whose
huge posterns it seemed as if in an earlier age
of the world an immense gate may have swung
and shut in captives of mighty size and fearful
guilt. Nothing could be conceived a more
secure
and dreadful prison than these vast walls
of rock: and no solitude could be more dreary
than one thus fortified as it were by nature,
and made sublimely desolate by barriers and
enclosures like these.
All felt, thus gazing, the grandeur of the
thought presented to their mind by Bokulla,
and they turned and looked upon the
countenance
of the chieftain, as if they expected to
discover there features more than human.
Bokulla
stood silent.
The thought is mighty and worthy of
Bokulla
!
at length, exclaimed one of his
companions
,
a man of generous and ardent heart;
here we triumph or the story of our life closes
in endless defeat, and our fate makes us and
ours perpetual bondmen.
Who is it, interposed a second of less
sanguine
temper, who is it that dare visit the
panther in his den? or grasp the thunder from
its cloud on the mountain-top?It were as safe
to climb into the eagle's nest as disturb this
monstrous creature in his lair!
Terrible as the north when it lightens and
is full of stormsinexorable as death, will be
the encounter! cried a supporter of the second
speakerI would sooner plunge headlong
from a tower, than venture within this guarded
enclosure!
What say you, my friends! cried Bokulla,
springing to his feet, what say you to an
embassy
to the brute on bended knee? I doubt
not if we came as humble worshippers and
suppliants
,
and consented to choose him as our na
tional idol, he would abate something of his
fierceness!
Now heaven and all good planets forbid!
cried his companions with one accord.
Nothing better and nothing nobler, then,
may be tried, than the great suggestion of
Bokulla
!
said the first speaker. Here let us
wrestle with fate and die, then, if die we must,
in this broad and open arena, where the heavens
themselves, and the inexorable stars, shall be
witnesses of our struggle!
Taking up their position on an elevated rock,
shaded by trees which overlooked the whole
scene, they consulted as to the most proper and
speedy method of accomplishing their purpose.
After a consultation of several hours, during
which the sun had fallen far in the west, and
after weighing anxiously every circumstance
that could have bearing or influence on the
event, they determined in their open
council-chamber
,
amid the solemn silence of the
wilderness
,
that an attempt must be made to
imprison
Behemoth in the vast, natural dungeon
at their feet, by building a stout wall across its
present opening.
And furthermore, that it would be matter of
afterthought to decide, if successful in the first,
by what means his death was to be wrought.
Their resolves had scarcely taken this shape,
when a heavy shadow fell suddenly in their
midst, as if a thick cloud had covered the sun;
and looking forth for its source, they beheld
Behemoth walking silently and ponderously
along the ridge of the opposite mountains.
They arrested their deliberations, and rising in
a body, watched the progress and actions of the
brute. In a short time he descended from the
summit, and attaining its foot by a sloping and
broad path, in a moment presented himself at
the gap, which conducted into the mountainous
amphitheatre. Stalking through, he advanced
to its far extremity, and stretching himself on
the bank of the stream, and in the cool shadow
of the mountains, he prepared for repose.
His companions had already learned from
Bokulla, that the Mastodon was in the habit of
paying long periodical visits to this place, and
of feeding, for considerable periods of time, on
its abundant and savory verdure. Nothing
could have been more opportune to their
consulation
than the arrival of Behemoth. His
sudden coming was an argument for activity
and despatch.
The fifth day from this, the Mound-builders
arrived in considerable numbers, in a wood
near the amphitheatre, bringing with them in
wagons the tools and implements required in
the proposed labor. They immediately set
about the task, and commenced hewing large
blocks of stone and dragging them to the mouth
of the gap, but not so near as to obstruct it.
The whole body of workmen that had come
from the Mound-builders' villages had labored
at this task for a week, and they found that in
that time sufficient stone had been hewn to
build the wall from base to summit. Each
block was more than twelve feet square, and
through its centre was drilled a hole of some
six inches diameter, in which to insert bars of
metal, to bind them more firmly together.
As soon as they were prepared to commence
the erection of the wall, which was the most
critical part of their labors, four or five separate
bands of musicians were stationed at the
farther
end of the enclosure, and near to
Behemoth
:
for they knew, from Bokulla's report,
that the Mastodon, mighty and terrible as he
was, could be soothed by the influence of music,
adroitly managed.
The moment the work of heaving the vast
square blocks one upon the other began, the
musicians, at a given signal, commenced
playing
,
and during the progress of the labor, ran
through all the variety of gentle tunes: so that
the wall, like that of Amphion, sprang up
under
the spell of music. So cunningly did the
different bands master their instruments, that,
at three different times, when the Mastodon
had turned his step toward the gap at which
the Mound-builders labored, they lured him
back, and held him spell-bound and motionless.
The blocks were hoisted to their places by
cranes, and the utmost silence was observed in
every movement; not even a voice was lifted
to command, but every direction was given
with the pointed finger. No one moved from
his station during the hours of toil, but each
stood on his post and executed his portion of
the task like a part of the machinery. And yet
there was no lack of spirit; every one labored
as if for his own individual redemption, and
one who beheld them plying amid the massive
fragments of granite, silent and busy, might
have thought that they were some rebellious
crew of beings brought into the wilderness by
a genius or necromancer, and there compelled,
speechless and uncomplaining, to do his bidding.
They labored in this way for more than a
month, and at the end of that time, Bokulla
proclaimed from its summit that the wall was
completed. At the announcement, the whole
host of artisans and laborers, and innumerable
women and children, who had come from the
villages, sent up a shout that rent the air.
Behemoth
heard it, and, listening only for a
moment
,
browsed on among the tall grass as if
regardless of its source and its object. In a
few days, however, after the music had ceased
its gentle influence, and the supply of
pasturage
began to be less luxuriant, the Mastodon
made progress toward the old outlet, with the
determination of seeking food elsewhere.
He, of course, sought an outlet in vain, and
found himself standing at the base of an
immense
rampart, which shot sheer up two
hundred
and fifty feet in air. He surveyed the
structure, and soon discovered that it was no
trifling barrier, but a mighty pile of rocks, that
showed themselves almost as massive and firm
as the mountains which they bound together.
At first, Behemoth thought, although it would
be idle to attempt to shake the whole mass at
once, that yet the separate parts might be
removed
block by block. With this purpose he
endeavored
to force his white tusks between them,
but it was in vain; they were knit too firmly
together to be sundered. At length, the great
brute was maddened by these fruitless efforts,
and retreating several hundred rods, he rushed
against the wall with tremendous strength and
fury.
The Mound-builders, who overlooked the
structure, trembled for its safety, but it stood
stiff, and the shock caused Behemoth to
recoil
discomfited, while the earth shook with
the weight and violence of the motion. Over
and over again these assaults were repeated,
always with the same result. Wearied with
the attempt, the Mastodon desisted, and
returned
to feed upon the diminished pasturage,
which he had before deserted. He had soon
browsed on it to its very roots, and began to feed
on the commoner grass and weeds, scarcely
palatable
.
In a day these had all vanished, and he
turned to the trees which were here and there
scattered over the meadow. These he
devoured
,
foliage, limb, and trunk.In a few
days they were wholly exhausted, and the
enclosed
plain was reduced to a desert
pastureless
,
herbless, and treeless.
The impatience and wrath of Behemoth now
knew no bounds. He saw no possible mode of
escape from this dreary and foodless waste.
Around and around the firm colosseum which
enclosed him, he rushed, maddened, bellowing,
and foaming.
At times, in his fury, he pushed up the
almost
perpendicular sides of the mountains and
recoiled, bringing with him shattered fragments
of rock and large masses of earth, with fearful
force and swiftness. Around and around he
again galloped and trampled, shaking the very
mountains with his ponderous motions, and
filling
their whole circuit with his terrible
howlings
and cries. The Mound-builders who stood
upon the wall, and on different parts of the
mountains, shrunk back affrighted and
awe-stricken
before the deadly glare of his eye, and
the fearful and agonizing sound of his voice.
Day by day he became more furious, and his
roar assumed a more touching and dreadful
sharpness. All sustenance was gone from the
plain; the whole space within his reach
furnished
nothing but rocks and earth, for he had
already drunk the stream dry to its channel.
The mighty brute was perishing of hunger in
the centre of his prison.
His strength was now too far wasted to
admit
of the violent and gigantic efforts which he
had at first made to escape from the
famine-stricken
enclosure, and he now stalked up and
down its barren plain, uttering awful and
heart-rending
cries. Some of the Mound-builders
who heard them, and who saw the agonies and
sufferings of Behemoth, although he had been
their most cruel enemy, could not refrain from
tears. So universal is humanity in its scope,
that it can feel for everything that has life.
Howling and stalking like a shadow,
momently
diminishing, he walked to and fro in this
way for many days. Hunger hourly extended
its mastery through his immense frame. At
about midday in the third week of his
imprisonment
,
he cast his eye upon the cavernous
and dusty opening through which the river
that watered the plain had been accustomed
to find its way. It was broad and open and of
considerable height. Into this Behemoth now
turned his steps. Its mouth was larger than the
inner passage, for time and tempest had worn
away the rocks which once guarded it.
As he advanced it diminished, and ere his
whole bulk had entered the channel, it became
so narrow and confined that he was forced to
sink on his knees, in order to make further
progress
.
This labor soon proved vexatious and
toilsome, and the Mastodon, willing to force
a way where one was not to be found, or to
perish in the endeavour, raised himself slowly
toward an upright position.
The remnant of his strength proved to be
fearful, for, as his broad shoulders pressed upon
the rocks above him, the incumbent mountain
trembled, and when he had attained his full
stature
by a last powerful effort, the impending
rocks rolled back and forth, and fell with a
resounding
crash and in great fragments to the
earth. The whole cone of the mountain had
been loosened from its base, and, leaning for a
moment, like a lurid cloud in midair, fell into
the plain with terrible ruin, bearing down a
whole forest of trees and the earth in which
they had taken root.
Fortunately for Behemothunfortunately for
the object of the Mound-buildersthe rocks
which immediately overhung Behemoth, though
rent in several places, did not give way, but so
interlocked and pressed against each other as
to form a solid arch over his head and leave
him unharmed amid the ruins. Passage through
the channel was, however, wholly arrested by
the large masses of earth that had fallen into
it, and Behemoth, finding it vain to attempt to
pass farther onward, withdrew.
The fatal time drew nearer and nearer.
Hundreds
and thousands of the Mound-builders
gathered
from every quarter of the empire to look
upon
the last hour of the mighty creature which lay
extended, in his whole vast length, in the plain.
A catastrophe and show like that was not to be
foregone, for it might never (and so they prayed)
come again. Death and the Mastodon held a
fearful encounter in the arena below. Nations
looked down from the wall and the mountains,
on the strange and terrible spectacle.
To and fro the whole famished bulk moved
with the convulsions, and spasms, and
devouring
agonies of hunger. At times the brute
raised his large countenance toward heaven,
and howled forth a cry which, it seemed, might
bring down the gods to his succor.
On the fortieth day Behemoth died, and left
his huge bones extended on the plain, like the
wreck of some mighty ship, stranded there by a
deluge, to moulder, century after century, to be
scattered through a continent by a later
convulsion
,
and, finally, to become the wonder of
the present time!
THE END OF BEHEMOTH.THE POLITICIANS:
A COMEDY.
IN FIVE ACTS.
PREFACE.
It
scarcely befits the author of a comedy to meet
his readers with a rueful visage, and to give them
a prologue seasoned with as many hardships as
there are pebbles in a pudding served at a country
inn.
Were this his privilege, the present entertainer
might spread one of the most delicate and delicious
banquets of mishap that it has ever been the
dolorous
fortune of the reader to sit down to. First, we
should have a little railing at the managers, the
sworn foes to dramatic writers, who lie in wait, as
is well known, behind the door of the green room,
to knock the poor gentleman's brains out, without
paying, as gentlemen should, for their sport. It
would be impossible in this place too, to pass over
a dissertation on the impertinence of producing, at
an American theatre, a constant succession of
farces with Sir Harry Humdrum, my Lord Noddy,
and my Lady Highdiddlediddle, attended by flying
squads of waiters in livery and coachmen in
top-boots
to
the entire exclusion of a single scene or
personage that has the recommendation of fitness,
either in respect to time, place, or audience. In
fact, the author might safely dilate on the manifest
injustice of not allowing a solitary devil of a poor
republican to show his visnomy on the stage more
than once in a quarter, and then, only with an
English
playwright at his back. That the Americans
are a stolid, melancholy, long-visaged people, is
quite evident from thisthat they have not, up to
this moment, furnished, as far as the present
author
is advised, material for the concoction of a
single genuine and legitimate comedy.
The citizen who is employed in the manufacture
of constables and aldermen by the year, governors
bi-yearly, and presidents quadrennially, may be
readily supposed to be too much engaged in this
weighty business to find time for the contrivance
of idle plays and poems; although he may be all
the while furnishing very admirable material to
such lookers-on as have leisure for sketching his
worship in his hour of bustle and glory.
Besides this, a word should be said on the
evident
absurdity, on the part of our legislature, of
enacting a law by which remuneration should be
secured to such idle persons as spend their time in
the writing of plays The builder of a cotton
umbrella
,
or the creator of a four-hooped tub, are
objects
sufficiently dignified for the regards of a
senator
or representative, because the one may secure
the said senator or representative a dry sconce in
a shower, and the other a supply of jerked beef in
an emergency:but what claim, we beseech you,
has a vagabond dramatist, who works in feelings,
affections, mirths, and melancholies, upon these
pluvious and hungry legislators?They would as
soon think of incorporating a guild of eagles to
gaze upon the sun, as of bestowing a charter to
think and write, upon the fraternity of dramatic
authors. Tariffs and immunities were invented
by some fool of a man of genius for the benefit of
clowns and calico-mongers, and not for his own
kindred. To the red-coated invader of his
country
,
the heroic statesman presents a
gloomy-looking
gun, and says, One stepand you are a dead
man! Such is his respect for the land he lives
in. To the foreign merchant, the prudent
statesman
extends a formidable, codified document, and
exclaims, Come this side of high-water mark,
and it shall cost you twenty per cent,
ad valorem!
Such is his affection for the native-born
gentleman
who clothes his back in homespun. To the
invading grain-dealer, the voracious statesman sends
a furious inspector to say, None of your musty
wheat enters this marketwe pray you mercy!
Such is his reverence for the home-constructed
flour-mill that satisfies his belly. Thrice-honored
LycurgusHis back, his belly, and his birthplace,
he nobly provides for; but his mind, the immortal,
far-seeing, capacious soulthat's sheer stuff,
impalpable
,
intangible, and invisibleand if it can't
take care of itself, a week, feeble, rickety
intellect
it must be. A law to protect the mind from
foreign corruptions, to secure to the homeborn
offspring of that mind rights of remuneration and
inheritance!The sagacious and enlightened M. C.
scorns such props and protections, as laws and
enactments
for the efforts of his own noble intellect.
His speeches are spread over the face of the
country
in extra Globes and Intelligencers, and he
receives
eight dollars
per diem:
so what cares he for
remuneration and copyright! Is not this sound,
wholesome, and safe logic for a politician? For a
politician, it is.
Having thus suggested what, in a certain mood,
he might have said, the author can not part from
the reader without giving utterance to a few
present
feelings of a somewhat deeper cast.
In the present condition of things, a manager
looks upon a manuscript American play, with, I
imagine, about the same favor as he would peruse
the wash-book of one of his supernumeraries, and
would as soon think, under ordinary circumstances,
of putting the last year's almanac into action, with
the twelve signs of the zodiac as
dramatis person
(which would in fact make a very pretty
spectacle
),
as of producing a comedy by a dramatic
writer born this side of Cape Lookout. An
American dramatist is at once confronted and
frowned back by a cheap array of sturdy strangers,
in the guise of farce, burlesque, and comedy, from
abroad, that have usurped exclusive authority even
in his chosen places of amusement. A spirit alien
to anything that may be found in his homeborn
compositions, starts up and warns him from the
spot, with maledictions on the unlucky head that
has ventured to conceive scenes of native humor,
or to delineate Five Acts of the life which his
simple-witted
countrymen are content to live.
The author of the following work, in the spirit
of a liberal self-reliance, has at all times
entertained
the belief that America contains within itself
material quite adequate for any class of literary
productions which might be demanded by the
public
taste. Auspicious nature has, in this land,
denied
us no product that is necessary to sustain,
cheer, and embellish human life: her foundations
here are broad, and deeply set, and her airy
summits
are gilded with the lighter graces and
ornaments
of natural architecture. Rolling rivers,
green dark woods, boundless meadows, and
majestic
peaks, labor together to complete the beauty
and nobleness of its outward aspect. Within the
mind of man there is, there must be, unless
humanity
is false to its trust, something that replies to
these. Some spirit of beauty and truth must haunt
us in our walks through scenes like these, and
awaken the soul to action and utterance not
unworthy
,
at least, of its great inspiration. This is
the divine origin, the Delian birthplace of poetic
thought, and the poetic progeny can not fail to
attain
its true growth, if the atmosphere it is allowed
to breathe be not chilled or rendered impure by an
ungenial or unhealthy national taste. From this
grand external world, co-operating with and
inspiring
an equally grand and elevated human spirit,
must spring the loftier creations of dramatic art.
From another phase of things, the crowded life
of cities, the customs, habitudes, and actions of
men dwelling in contact, or falling off into peculiar
and individual modes of conduct, amalgamated
together
into a close but motley society, with
religions
,
trades, politics, professions, and pursuits,
shooting athwart the whole living mass, and
forming
a web infinitely diversified; from this
wonderful
world of life and opinion, must grow the genial
and brilliant representative of life and opinion,
Comedy itself.
Comedy, it is true, requires something of
costume
,
something of age and reverence to be laughed
at, some settled and canonized absurdities to mock,
in order to accomplish a portion of its labor. But,
rooted and fixed in the very elements of human
nature, are to be found the materials with which
genuine comic genius seeks to deal; making use,
however, of external aids of face, figure, dress, and
action, as the exponents and betrayers of the spirit
of folly or humor that lurks within. To say that
there are no proper materials for comedy in our
country and among ourselves, is to assert that so
great a revolution has been wrought in human
nature
,
that it has ceased to be itself.
In truth, with high and generous qualities which
have carried us nobly through all past struggles of
action, we have proved ourselves, I fear, greatly
wanting in lofty and manly self-dependence, in all
that relates to the nobler intellectual duties. A
resolution
to repudiate, without respect to foreign
authority, whatever is really hostile to the true
national
spirit, and to give a welcome to whatever
embodies or appeals to it (I mean in no false or
grovelling sense), would go far toward achieving
many of the benefits proposed by legislation and
restriction. If we are but true to ourselves, no
law, no state of things, can be false to us. We are
first traitors to ourselves, and the law, as a matter
of course, follows us as a deserter. We establish
a league of disastrous amity with folly and
injustice
,
and we soon find the camp in which we have
taken shelter, though seemingly our country, a
place in truth of alien and unhappy servitude. Let
us have free thoughts and home thoughts, or let us
ecase to live!
It only remains for the author to dismiss the
reader to the perusal of the following workhe
could have hoped with a more cheerful and less
earnest welcome, but the full heart will have its
waywith the declaration, that it will be a
life-long
pleasure to him, if this humble dramatic
attempt
shall furnish the least countenance to the
cause of a true National Literature!
New York
,
July
, 1840.
CHARACTERS
Brisk
Candidate for Alderman
.
Crowder
.
Gudgeon
The rival Candidate
.
Botch
.
Glib
.
Old Crumb
.
Blanding
.
Bill Baffin
.
Tom Lug
.
Joe Surge
.
Mrs. Gudgeon
.
Kate Brisk
.
Citizens and others
.
Scene
New York
.
ACT I.
SCENE I.
The open street
.
Enter
Brisk
and
Crowder
.
BRISK.
Now for a capital stroke of policy, Crowder
we must get the use of the church bell.
CROWDER.
The very thought I had; we must be of the
same sect of thinkers:the very thought.
BRISK.
Yes, you can look through the thing. Many
of the more quiet voters, being accustomed to
its Sunday summons, would be brought out and
would readily aid our ticket, if they understood
the steeple, for the time, to be in the hands of
our party. You see?
CROWDER.
Exactly so; and, with a banner displayed and
our ticket spread on the weathercock, they
could not fail to comprehend our views at a
glance.
BRISK.
Particularly as the weathercock's a
silverside
,
with a gold ball in its mouth! But you
mentioned the porter-houses at the upper end
of the ward?
CROWDER.
You must make a tour of them immediately,
The best arrangement will be to brandy with
those in Scammel street, and take your supper
of cutlets and pale ale at Works's with his
boarderswho, you know, are chiefly retired
ragamuffins disbanded street-sweepers, and
almshouse candidates generally; a powerful
class at the poll.
BRISK.
If that must be done, couldn't you get Tom
Lug out of the way while I'm there? Pah!
the thought of him makes me sick; a
doubledistilled
scamp.
CROWDER.
With great influence, however, greater than
the best citizen we have. I would not insure
your election if Mr. Lug's feelings are ruffled
in the slightest.
BRISK.
I must digest him then, with the coarse
steaks, as if they were both as savory as grilled
woodcocksthat's all. I only ask Heaven for
a dry night, for he comes staggering in from a
shower, with his drippings, soaked through and
steaming like a swamp.
CROWDER.
But there are others whom you must know,
and take by the hand, or they'll call you an
aristocrat.
BRISK.
Oh! I must be spared that title. They may
name me toad, snake, dog, monkeybut not
aristocrat. If the popular nose snuff an
aristocrat
nine miles off, its delicacy is offended, and
it veers instantly the other wayto catch the
odor, more grateful to its organ, of gentle
loaferism
.
Who are your other vagabonds?
CROWDER.
There's a short man with a large mouth and
a scar on his cheek.
BRISK.
That's Joe Surge, by the token; as rough a
Christian as ever came into the world, and
whose character is as offensive as Tom Lug's
person.
CROWDER.
But Joe carries a whole block with him,
besides
his river influence among the
hard-drinking
fishermen and ship-joiners.
BRISK.
Well, we must be charitable in our
constructions
;
that gives me a different opinion of the
manthere are worse fellows than Joe Surge,
I am satisfied. How about the revolutionary
veteran? that's capital too good to be wasted.
CROWDER.
He deposites the first vote on our side, and
we think of bandaging one of his legs and
placing a patch over his eye, to make the
spectacle
more imposing.
BRISK.
If we could fix it to have his vote challenged
by the other party it would tell amazingly in
our favor, and we would get out a placard at
onceDisgraceful! an old soldier
dishonored
!
and so forth.
CROWDER.
It would afford a good opportunity to call
our opponents ruffians, libellers, and
miscreants
which
should not be lost.
BRISK.
Couldn't we attach two or three cases of
suicide
to their neglect to clear the river?
whereby
,
for example, many are prematurely
smothered
in the mud, that might otherwise have
been saved by a drag-net!
CROWDER.
This would hardly do, simply, because no
such case of devotion to water has occurred
within the memory of man; but we might
plausibly charge them with the death of the
watchman that was moonstruck the other night,
sleeping on Gudgeon's stoop. If Gudgeon had
exercised ordinary benevolence and taken him
in, in the early part of the evening, and kept
him by the warm fire, and nourished him with
hot toddy, it couldn't have happenedthat
every
one must see.
BRISK.
Excellentvery excellentbut recollect, we
must follow them up with charge on charge,
accusation on accusation, till they are stunned
like cattle, and drop astonished to the ground.
You will be at my house in an hour, and
examine
my dress, to see if it's sufficiently rusty and
plebeian to make me presentable at this court
of loafers at Works's.
[
Retiring
.
And, I say, Crowder, if you have a coat out
at the elbow a little, bring it around; my worst,
I am afraid, is a month or so too much this side
of shabbiness to be popular.
[
Returns
.
Bring your iron snuff-box, too, filled with
Lorillard, and, hark you again, I must borrow
that catskin cap of yours, that's moth-eaten
meantime, I'll let my beard grow.
[
Exit
Brisk
.
Enter
Glib.
GLIB.
Well, Crowder, we are going to try another
wrestling match with you, and if you achieve
a fall I hope there will not be an earthquake.
CROWDER.
Oh, we promise there shall be no such thing
provided you will pledge yourself to raise no
hurricane harangues during the election; nor
to strike down our tallest men with your
tornadoes
of speech and tempests of windy
declamation
.
No noise, no corruptionthat's our
motto.
GLIB.
Sly, deep, and dangerous, like a wily river;
that is the way you undermine what you wish
to overthrow.
CROWDER.
You think that we manage it so, do you? we
that are behind the scenes and in the secrets.
GLIB.
You behind the scenes! you in the secrets!
Why, Crowder, you are one of those fellows, in
every party, who are allowed to make a noise
in proportion to their real want of confidence
and information; in the same way as poor Bill
Baffin, the stevedore, thumps and whistles and
plies his mallet on the outside of the ship on
the stocks, without getting so much as a peep
in at the cabin-window.
CROWDER.
We are not hoodwinked so easily, my kind
Gudgeonite! We don't allow ourselves to be
mystified like your money-ridden citizens.
GLIB.
Oh no, you prefer to be mystified more after
the manner of a cartman's horse, with his head
in a feed-bag, who, if he can get a sufficiency
of oats, doesn't mind how much he's in the dark.
CROWDER.
Darkness and light are the same to us, if we
can but serve the interests of the people, and
protect them from the fangs of knaves and
intriguers
.
We could pass our lives in dens,
dungeons, yea, even in stalls and stables.
GLIB.
With well-filled mangers and perpetual
drippings
from the public reservoir, to keep you in
mind of your dear friendsthe people! Roast
beef is the altar on which you swear to sustain
that cause; and, at whatever sacrifice of bread
and beer, you will uphold itwhile the
supplies
last! Eh!
CROWDER.
Glib, you loathe a poor manI know you do
as if he were a monster. We love paupers
we have an affection for them, and mean to
establish the city government on a pauper
basis
,
as solid as the graywacke foundations of
the island, for it is our honest belief that the
deeper
you go in the scale of society, the richer
grows the soil.
GLIB.
And you poor gentlemen in office are the
husbandmen
that cultivate it; the tillers of this
arable land of salary, perquisite and plunder.
CROWDER.
Sir, I'd have you know, with us no man's
integrity
is tampered with.
GLIB.
Who ever dreamed such an absurdity? You
disdain a resort to such petty meannessand,
what with dinners, and contracts at high rates,
and a privilege to dip fifty per cent. deep into
the public pocket, a worthy man's virtue is no
more exposed with you, than a sea captain's
wife whose husband has gone the Canton
voyage
.
CROWDER.
Mr. Glib, I must leave youyou are
growing
offensive. We will finish this discussion
at the polls.
[
Exit
CROWDER.
GLIB.
Ha! ha! upon my soul I forgot that his own
aunt had been tempted in this way, and that
our little alderman would-be, Mr. Brisk, was
the supposed serpent in the garden. Hereafter
I must avoid such subjectsfor to make virtue
a topic with a professed politician is sure to
give offence; and if one of these fellows gets
by chance among the saints in the next world,
he will be as much out of place as a painter in
a mob.
SCENE II.
A room in Gudgeon's house
.
GUDGEON.
What a glorious thing it is to be a candidate
for alderman! One wakes up in the morning,
and the first thing he hears is some little
politician
under his window, shouting, hurrah for
Gudgeon! and the young rascal, in his
enthusiasm
,
throws his cap so high, the shadow in
the dressing-glass almost makes me cut
myself
.
Every spile becomes a speaker of his
praises; every shutter swings open with a
proclamation
of his virtues; and there's not a dead
wall in the ward that does not announce his
glory in the largest capitalsnor a dumb
hogshead
that is not vocal in approval of his
nomination
.
I shall have another seal put to the
bunch at the end of my watch-chain, that's flat,
and I think I will have my calves padded.
Robert Gudgeon, Esquire, Alderman! I'll get
me a stamp cut, with a flock of goslings in the
centre, to show that I was reared in the
country
and am not ashamed of my origin; and with
this I'll mark all the corporation documents I
can lay hold of!
Enter
Botch.
BOTCH.
Have you heard this rumor, sir?
GUDGEON.
What rumor, for Heaven's sake? They
haven't bought up all the large flags in the
ward?
BOTCH.
No, sir.
GUDGEON.
Have they got in a new barrel of beer? or
hired Blaster, the popular trumpeter? I spoke
to him myself last night. They haven't
engaged
Murphy's two starved horses, that always
operate so on the popular sympathies and bring
up so many voters?
BOTCH.
None of these, sir!
GUDGEON.
What then, Botch? Be quickwhat then?
BOTCH.
Why, sir, the Brisk party is going to use the
belfry of the church to distribute tickets from,
and they intend to employ the sexton to read
prayers every morning of the election from the
small window in the steeple.
GUDGEON.
This must be counteracted: it will have an
overwhelming effect. We shall have the whole
religious community moving against us in
platoons
,
pew by pew!
BOTCH.
Something must be done, sir; I see clearly
something must be done. What shall it be,
sir?
GUDGEON.
Yes; something must be done.
BOTCH.
Certainlysomething must be done.
GUDGEON.
What then, in the name of Heaven, shall it
be?Couldn't we get Glib to climb the steeple
above the window and deliver an harangue?
It might do away with the evil influence of the
proceedings below, and give us a tremendous
ascendency at once.
BOTCH.
I doubt whether Mr. Glib would undertake
it, even if he could snatch a notary's
commission
from the weathercock, as the chances of
being made a martyr of by stoning would be
considerable.
GUDGEON.
Can't you think of anything else, then, Botch?
BOTCH.
Why, yes, sira little suggestion strikes me.
How would it do, if you were to be seen
walking
down the street by the poll, between two
men drunk?
GUDGEON.
Arm-in-arm with two drunkards! What do
you propose to gain by that?
BOTCH.
The finest series of popular effects ever
produced
.
See, sir, how it operates! You in your
new blue coat, sir, with bright buttons, clean
ruffles, and well-polished bootslooking as
handsome as Adam the day he was born
march along, with Adze the tippling cooper
hanging on one arm, and Ike Luff, for instance,
pulling at the other, and pitching about like a
scow straining at her moorings. Everybody's
attention is immediately directed to you.
Gudgeon is friendly to tavern-licensewe'll
vote for him, says a dealer in Hollands,
obvious
from his respect for our customers.
GUDGEON.
That fixes the tavern-keepers and the
tipplers
;
very well.
BOTCH.
What a big-souled man Gudgeon is! says
a tailor. He'll need a new coat every other
week, when he's made aldermanHe knows
how to use a coat, as Ike Luff wipes his
mouth on your shoulder.
GUDGEON.
That gives us the tailors and their
journeymen
,
I suppose, and might have its effect with
the cloth-dealers.
BOTCH.
Then the temperance people are yours to a
man; for if you put your mouth cunningly to
the ear of your side-champions, and lift up your
fingers in a solemn manner, they will suppose
you are warning the poor wretches to refrain
from their cups; while the common mob will
laugh, taking the whole spectacle for a very
tolerable joke.
GUDGEON.
It shall be done, Botch; and to aid the effect,
I'll have some tracts against drunkenness
sticking
from my coat pockets, while you can have
a few large handbills, setting forth that I am
in favor of retail liquor shops, posted against
the opposite fence.
BOTCH.
In favor of retail liquor shops and the new
water works?
GUDGEON.
No, not the new water worksyou had
better
put that in a separate handbill by itself.
[Exeunt severally.
SCENE III.
An ante-chamber at Blading's lodgings
.
OLD CRUMB.
Somehow this young man has touched me
strangely. Ever since I heard him play those
plaintive tunes, my heart has been with him:
he is poora mere flute-player at the theatre
but I love him, for he reminds me of my own
youth and of days long, long gone by. His
musical and pathetic breath gives me back
delicious
moments, that are otherwise vanished
for ever; sweet evenings, tranquil noonday
hours, and long, long afternoons, when the sun
set with a light that can never rise again. Child
and changeling of poverty as he is, he can do
more for this old wearied soul of mine, than any
one beneath the degree of my Creator.I hear
him nowhis door is ajar, and I will listen
before
I enter.
BLANDING.
(
From within
.)
A city life, a city life for me
Far, far from the shade of the greenwood tree!
The sights and sounds that stir the nimble
brain
Beyond the speaking streamthe golden grain.
The thundering shout of the gathering rout
When the town goes mad and its wrath is out
Has more that fires the true red blood in me
Than the crash of a forest in every tree.
The glorious light of the city night
When the stars are quenched and the lamps
burn bright
Is better far, is better far to me
Than the pale round moon and all her
company
.
CRUMB.
A lover, and not a word of his mistress in
twelve lines of poetry!I am afraid this is not
the true lunacy.
BLANDING.
(
From within
.)
Fol-la
my heart
andino
has gently
sa
felt
allegroallegro
sweet Kate
piano
the
sharp and sure revenge of fate
La-mi-fol-sa.
CRUMB.
The fit is coming upon him.
BLANDING.
Oh smile upon the gloomy wave
That bears me to a gloomier grave
.
That goes badly in andanteso-fa-me-fi-so.
CRUMB.
Its rising.
(
Tapping his forehead
.)
BLANDING.
If sire or shackle bind your hand
Break, break, oh break the cursed band!
CRUMB.
He suggests elopement, on my word.
BLANDING.
And fly
too slow
and fly
allegroallegro,
And fly with me
. Prestissimo.
CRUMB.
(
Breaking in
.)
Heigh-ho! how is this, sirare you trying to
set a runaway match to music?
BLANDING.
I beg your pardon sirbut
CRUMB.
You may well do that, and the pardon of
the whole city council, if you please.
Meditating
a rhym'd elopement with Miss Brisk,
daughter of John Brisk, candidate for alderman
of the ward! Why this is an audacious breach
of ordinance.
BLANDING.
IIbeg to he excused, sirbut her name
was not mentioned by me; it was a fancy piece
that I was preparing for an opera.
CRUMB.
Yes, very pretty, and very fanciful, and would
answer as well as another for an operaif there
were such a thing as an opera of real life.
(
Mimics him
.)
Oh fate, sweet Kate
your hand, and break the cursed band.
I thought you had promised me you would not
think of marriage, much less marriage with the
heiress of an alderman, without my consent;
and the first news I hear is, that that young
scapegrace, Blanding, hath a snare set at the
house of goodwife Gudgeon, for Miss Kate
Brisk.
BLANDING.
To tell the truth, my kind friend, my
calculations
have been thwarted by an impudent,
meddling, presumptuous hussy, who took the
liberty to blot out all my resolves and put her
own handwriting in their place.
CRUMB.
Now I'll warrant you will say this busybody
was Nature, for we father on her all the
children
of our fancy, that good-sense, the rugged
overseer, refuses to provide for. If a lawyer
cozen a young orphan of his patrimony, people
never think to lift their hands for a curse upon
the dark rascalfor it's nature, nature! If a
stout young fellow knock down a weak old
man, and filch his purse and papers, the shrewd
world exclaimswhat could be more natural?
Or if a sly young dog, like yourself, play the
incendiary with a pretty girl's heart, and set it
all-a-blazeoh! it's nature; if you have any
fault to find, blame her.
BLANDING.
And if a kind old man takes an undeserving,
thriftless young knave to his heart, as if he
were his own childwhose folly is that?
CRUMB.
Mere whimmere whimthe world says.
But I thought you were not to be a rich man,
that I might take my seat in the pit for this
many a long year, and always hear you play
those touching old tunes, which I am sure you
will never play as well when you become rich.
BLANDING.
I shall lose none of my success on that score,
for not a penny comes with Miss Brisk, unless
she marries with her father's consent, and that
never will come to me.
CRUMB.
Well, sir, I consider this a high misdemeanor
this falling in love against my willa serious
ground of displeasure; butmark meyou
shall have them both, the girl and the fortune,
or I'm an old fool. Now play me Oh, live
again, sweet time of youth
(
Sits in an
armchair
,
and weeps while Blanding plays:
)
I am an old fool, after allan old fool!
[Exit CRUMB.
BLANDING.
God bless the kind old man! His promise is
as sure of ripening into performance (in this
case I know not how) as the dawn of day into
a true and glorious meridian. Of all the
thousands
that have heard me play, he is the single
one in whom music, as far as I can learn, has
performed its real office, of begetting generous
thoughts and kindly actions. Kate! Kate!
thou art mine, for in this good man's promise I
am no infidel.
[
Exit
.
END OF ACT I.
ACT II.
SCENE I.
A room in Gudgeon's house
.
Kate Brisk
and
Blanding
.
KATE.
You say you love the city, and would always
live within its bounds?
BLANDING.
I do, Kate, as dearly as a brown-thrasher
loves the green tree that sheltered its young!
Enter
Mrs. Gudgeon.
MRS. GUDGEON.
Come, come, children, you have been long
enough in the orchardthe paradise orchard,
as I call it. When Robert courted me by the
well, or the big walnut-tree in the lane, it was
always Margery, Margery, you are a while
foddering
the turkeysis the Muscovy gander got
among them agin, and troubling you? from
father's
house. Or it would be, Where are
you? RobertRobert, I wish you'd pen that
ewe, or stop that cackling hen! or something
of that sort from the stone house across the
road, where Mr. Gudgeon's grandfather lived
(he was a sad old wag!) and then we'd flutter!
Come, come, your hourglass is fairly out, and
I'm looking for Mr. Gudgeon home from the
meeting every minute. But what's that you
were saying about sheltering your young?
Your pin-feathers grow fast!
BLANDING.
Not our own progeny, Mrs. Gudgeonit
was of young brown-thrashers, and not young
Charleses or Kates. Our fancies are not quite
so rapid travellers, are they, Kate?
KATE.
But, Blanding, there is no beauty and
freshness
in a city, I am sure, like that of the
branching tree and the cloudless airthe
spotted
flower, and the sweet, silent nook, where
the mower sits at noontide, belong not to the
angry Babel that you love. What is there in
a dull city to please the eye, brighten the
fancy
,
or mend the heart?
MRS. GUDGEON.
Ah! I see, you are disputing the old question,
whether you shall live in town or out of town;
and, if you'll allow me to answer, Miss Kate,
there's the parson and the moral reformto
mend the heart; the City hall and the old
Bridewell
,
to please the eye; and, as to kindling up
the fancy, I defy flesh to go beyond a
hundred-dollar
Cashmere shawlin that particular.
Besides
,
there's the privilege of having the street
sprinkled twice a-week, that keeps the dust out
of the parlor!
BLANDING.
Yes, and there are the fops, Mrs. Gudgeon,
and rogues, sharpers, and money-lendersall
the proper children of the city.
MRS. GUDGEON.
And a very precious family it makes!
BLANDING.
Here I take my seat quietly by the wayside,
under the shelter of fresh and pleasant thoughts,
and look forth upon the little, busy, knavish
world, and see it bustling and hurrying and
fretting itself like a great schoolboy behind his
time, and filling its huge green satchel with all
kinds of fruitless rubbish, and teasing its heart
with thoughts of yesterday, to-day, and
to-morrow
.
KATE.
But these thoughts may be had in green
fields as well as in crowded streets.
BLANDING.
They maybut there they come to us only
like the sound of far-off bells, at intervals;
here the mighty hum of life continually tolls
us on to musings and meditations like these.
Here every man's face is the frontispiece to a
history.
KATE.
Yes, and to a very dull one, often.
BLANDING.
The features I speak of need no interpreter,
but are of themselves loud as an organ, in
expounding their own significance or
insignificance
,
as it may happen. There is, for example
Botch, Mr. Gudgeon's assistant in the present
electiona character as impossible, in the
country
,
as a three-story house or a roaring
demagogue
.
He must have a hand in everything that
happens in the city. If a murder occurs, he runs
and takes minutes for his own satisfaction; he
writes paragraphs for the newspapers, about
street-nuisances, the navy-yard, and city
finances
;
and signs the Old Tar, Argus, and
One that knows. If he hears a call to organize
a new party, he is on the spot to act as secretary.
In a word, he's everywhere and everything, and
yet he remains the same credulous little
creature
that the Lord made him at firstin spite
of his scribblings, juntos, and secretaryships.
KATE.
And I think he is the person that got an
innocent
butcher hanged, by introducing at court
a memorandum which he had taken from the
hat of the accused, at the time of the fray, of a
method of slaughtering a bullock, instead of
his proper notes of the homicide.
BLANDING.
Although he was a bosom-friend of the
prisoner
,
and had boasted out of doors he could
and would save his life with a word, as easily
as hem-stitch a navy-jacket!
KATE.
That's a city character, and no other place
on the earth could confuse a man's brains to
such a pass as to have his friend hanged, by
way of saving his life.
BLANDING.
Then we have politicians quarrelling who
shall be crowned with most dust and honor;
packet-captains contending which shall run the
closest chance of shipwreck, that he may
soonest
make a jeweller's shop of his parlor with
presentation-pitchers, mugs, and goblets; men,
monkeys, and monsters, sent as representatives
from the four quarters of the globe; a snug
berth in a belfry, with the power to enjoy all
these, makes an illustrated book of life, where
joy and sorrow, power, pomp, death, and
laughter, pass us in a perpetual pageant. Oh!
how dullhow tomb-like dull, are your fields
and turnpikes, compared with this!dull, Kate,
as the very inhabitants themselves, that talk
from October to August of the last
camp-meeting
or the next new-moon.
KATE.
Well, Blanding, you are the better pleader,
and all I can say is, that your cause requires
your ingenuity, but the country still has charms,
honest hearts, cheerful faces, simple manners.
BLANDING.
Faces uniform as sheep, and one everlasting
pair of linsey-woolsey pantaloons. The
manners
are simple enough, for there the three acts
of man's life are, to cut hay in summer, fodder
his cattle in winter, and attend a town-meeting
in spring, to elect overseers of the poor. The
poor!they are all poor in spirit, if not in
pocket, and deserve nothing better to look out
upon than one huge, green page, with a
half-dozen
dreary-looking trees, by way of
interjections
!
MRS. GUDGEON.
There, gogo, childrenI hear Mr.
Gudgeon's
hem down the street; I'm sure it's his,
for he has a hem of his own, like our preacher.
Kate, this wayMr. Blanding, that, if you
please, for you mustn't be seen in the street
any nearer together than the two sides of a pond,
or my character's ruined, and Mr. Gudgeon
would, as like as not, lose his election.
[Exeunt, BLANDING and KATE, severally.
Enter
Mr. Gudgeon.
GUDGEON.
WellwellI am satisfied, this is certainly
the proudest hour of my life.
MRS. GUDGEON.
What now! what now!
GUDGEON.
You may well ask what nowit will
astonish
you, woman. Go up stairs and get your
best cap on, and I'll tell you.
[Mrs. Gudgeon retires and returns.
MRS. GUDGEON.
Well, now, Mr. Gudgeon, (I'm afraid to call
him Robert, he looks so grand
aside
,) don't
overwhelm a body.
GUDGEON.
NoI'll not overwhelm you, but I'll
astonish
you furiously.they have appointed a
committee
to have my portrait taken!
MRS. GUDGEON.
Your own portrait?
GUDGEON.
Yes, my own portrait, of my individual self
Robert Gudgeon.
MRS. GUDGEON.
And what's to be done with it?
GUDGEON.
What do you suppose is to be done with it
give it to you for a fire-screen, or use it to wrap
cheese in? Eh! No, it goes into the great
hall, where we hold our meetings, and it only
costs me fifty dollars.
MRS. GUDGEON.
Dog-cheapbut do you pay for it yourself?
GUDGEON.
Not altogetherbut I headed the
subscription-list
in gallant style, and they were all so
well-pleased with my promptness, they laughed
outright with joy. That must be a thorn in Brisk's
side. How do you think the election's going now,
Mag? Am I safe, do you thinkquite safe
MRS. GUDGEON.
I hope soI truly hope so; and, to make a
short matter of it, I have felt a sort of
presentiment
that it must be.
GUDGEON.
And so have I. Some great event is clearly
at hand. We have had a meteor the other
night, that whizzed round the sky like a large
Catherine-wheelthen there has been a school
of sixty whale cast ashore off Barnegatand
the rain-king, only last week, caught a storm
on a lightning-rod, and held it there two days,
notwithstanding the entreaties of the
neighboring
county that was suffering sorely under a
drought.What do these things mean? what
do they refer to? The approach of the comet,
foretold in the Farmer's almanacorit may
be so(for I recollect the birth of my father's
five-legged calf, in Danbury, was brought on by
an early sunrise)the election of Robert
Gudgeon
as alderman. I think I shall sleep sound
to-night, unless disturbed by that vexatious
dream again.
MRS. GUDGEON.
That dream, if it's the same you told me of,
is lucky. If it comes to you again, encourage
itgive it welcome, and, in order to provide a
substantial welcome for it, you had better
finish
the cold turkey and the other half of the
goose-pie before you retire.
[
Exeunt
.
SCENE II.
An apartment in
Brisk's
house
.
Old Crumb
and
Brisk
.
OLD CRUMB.
Perhaps the young man is my equal or yours,
sir!
BRISK.
My equal! Sir, he is a paltry flute-player at
the theatrea twelve shilling a-week whistler
and inspirer of dead wood!
CRUMB.
But he is a man.
(
In an under-tone
.)
I will
strive to restrain myself, although human
patience
is a frail thing.
BRISK.
A man, not he; I will warrant, now, though
I have never seen his person, he is a tall, lank,
thin-chopped fellow, that hath blown his brains
out with his flageolet, as effectually as if he had
applied a pistol to his scull.
CRUMB.
You are exceedingly happy in your
illustrations
.
(
Under-tone
.)
I rise fastI am already
at blood-heat.
BRISK.
That he goes simpering about like a feeble
oysterman, sliding out his quavers and
crotchets
,
and tapping on tables and hat-crowns with
his fingers by way of rehearsing his next new
part, and saving the wear and tear of
instruments
.
CRUMB.
Well, sir!
(
Under-tone
.)
Summer is coming
upon me swiftly.
BRISK.
And when he talks to you, he drops his breath
and sighs, as if it were a pity to rob his
dog's-pipe
,
the flute, of so much good inspiration.
Now of what use can such a fellow make
himself
as my son-in-law? Can he control twelve
votes? Would a bill-sticker, or even the
distributor
of a quack-doctor's puffs, change his
mind to please this upstart?
CRUMB.
Now hear me, sir!
(
Under-tone
.)
I am in
the torrid zone; I burn.
BRISK.
You show me no consideration:
CRUMB.
You deserve none
BRISK.
No equivalent:
CRUMB.
As for that, I'll furnish you forthwith. This
abused young gentleman, then, sir, is an
honester
man, in my poor judgment, than your
vile office-seeker, who glides about before he
has been
rewarded
, from porter-house to
porter-house
,
like a collector of tavern-rates; haunts
barbers' shops, as if he were a wig-block; plants
himself on corners and kerbstones, as if he were
fixed there to supply citizens with light at
noonday
and
at length
BRISK.
Yes, at length! What at length?
CRUMB.
When he is berthed in an office, the poor
rascal's heaven, he fattens like a dull young
bullock on grass wet with the precious
night-dew
;
rents a whole pew on Sunday; allows
his wife to keep two servants and to wear
three-shilling
calico. Pah! the fellow smells odious
of tobacco!
BRISK.
With all this, sir, your Mr. Blanding, I
repeat
,
is not my equal nor a proper suiter for my
daughter. He is not in the same rankin the
same station with me.
CRUMB.
Nono. His station is at the zenith, where
there is shining virtue, truth, integrity, honor;
yours, in the nadir of the earththe base, dull
nadir, where knavery, fraud, cozenage, and
double-dealing abide. He is a zodiac, a living
zodiac of many manly qualities; you a mere
wooden imitation, a hollow mockery of these
true planets that govern man's life. He has
not a mercenary particle of earth about him
BRISK.
No, for I doubt if he is worth a shilling in the
world.
CRUMB.
You, sir, since you have forced me to the
truth, if coach-wheels were but spoked with
gold, would be an active running-footman all
your life, for the sake of enjoying the glitter.
BRISK.
A noble object, sir, in my view, a coach with
pure golden wheels; at mid-day it could be seen
a league off.
CRUMB.
He, sir, looks upon nature and society with
the eye of truth and fancygathering out of
them the true purposes of life, and food to feed
those purposes; you, my most sagacious and
supple sir, make a traffic in the credulity of the
world, set your follies out for sale, call about
you gaping chapmen, who are in the market
for a ranting demagogue, in sound mouthing
condition and warranted kind in harness! In
a word, he has a soulbecause he is a man;
you have none, because the cost of keeping is
too high in these trying times!So good-day to
your aldermanship!
[
Exit
CRUMB.
BRISK.
Well, although I am somewhat astonished
this old Whirlwind may blow as much as he
pleases, but he can not blow me out of my
present
opinion of this fellow, Blanding.
Presumption
!
Brazen-faced hardihood! A paltry
musician
,
without rank, fortune, or title, to lift
his eyes upon my daughter! Why, if it were
uttered
in the open air at night, it would make
the very man in the moon, who has outstared
a thousand generations, blush deep scarlet.
My equal! my superior!I am, at least, good
Master Crumb, the proprietor of my own house
and controller of my daughter's motions; and
if he crosses the threshold of the one, or gets
within eyeshot of the other, why he's welcome
to her hand, I'll assure him, and I'll lend him
my ears to make a nice satchel of to carry his
flute in! This is disposed of, and now I must
dress for the supper.
[
Exit
.
SCENE III.
The kitchen of
Work's
hotel
.
A table spread, lights, &c
.
Landlord, Tom Lug
,
and others. To them
enters
Brisk
.
LANDLORD.
Gentlemen, here's Mr. Brisk!
TOM LUG.
Where? where?Three cheers for his
excellency
!
BRISK.
Ah, Thomas, it does me good to take you by
the hand, you hearty old fellowWilliam
JamesSurge, are you here, too? On my soul,
it's as fine for the eye as a visit to the museum,
to see so many honest friends gathered
together
.
(
Aside
)
Kangaroos, monkeys, and
odorous
mummies are as pleasant!
TOM LUG.
How's Mrs. Brisk?
BRISK.
Dead these ten years, Tom.
TOM LUG.
Beg your pardonthen she's as dead as old
Adam himself; but how's your daughter?
BRISK.
Well, I thank you, Thomas. How is your
family, Mr. Surge?
I
SURGE.
(
Laughing
.)
Your honor's jokin' with me nownow
confess
your honorplaying the crab, eh!
comin'
the blind eel over us?How's your family?
now that's too good!
BRISK.
Well,
how
is your family?
LANDLORD.
You must excuse him from answering that
questionany other, I have no doubt, he would
with pleasurebut
(
whispers
)
he's been in the
penitentiary ever since he was of marriageable
age.
BRISK.
Oh!
(
Aside
)
I thought as much; it's a
disgrace
to be born in the same century and on
the same continent with such a fellow. He is
enough to infect an entire hemisphere, like the
plague.
LANDLORD.
Mr. Brisk, will you be good enough to take
the head of the table, with the respects of the
company?
BRISK.
Nonoyou must excuse me, if you will;
let one of these worthy gentlemen preside, if
you please.
(
Aside
)
And save me from
neighborhood
to Mr. Surge.
LANDLORD.
Well, Tom Lug, come this way. Here, put
your face between these two bottles of porter,
and keep your eye steadily on the water-cresses,
and you may hold sober till we are through.
[They take their places at the table.]
TOM LUG.
Alderman, what do you think of this
alistockincy
that's agin us at the Polls?They
say I aint fit to be governor of the state,
because
I'm out at elbows, and have had a little
quarrel with the haberdasher and his second
cousin, the hosier. Haven't I seen figureheads
of Romans and other gentlemen in the bows of
as big ships as ever floated out of this port?
and wasn't they naked, excepting a little roll
of linen over their breasts, and a sprig of
poplar
in their hand?
BRISK.
You not fit for governor! that's a pretty
joke. You are fit for anything.
(
Aside
)
Among others, from a peculiar conformation of
neck, for the gallows.The man that says a
pauperyea, a vagabond, Tomis not
suitable
to hold the highest dignities in the gift of
the people, is a traitor and a scoundrel.
TOM LUG.
That's a noble sentimenta high-minded
sentiment. Let's have his healthGem'men,
the health of our next alderman, Mr. John
Brisk. Drunk standing, boys.
[
They drink it
.
BRISK.
(
Rising
.)
In return, gentlemen, for this flattering toast,
let me offer you, The regamuffins and
paupers
of the ward: they conceal more genuine
honor and virtue beneath their rags, than King
Solomon in his Sunday clothes, or a
Fourth-of-July
orator in his new-bought ruffle and
wristbands
!
SURGE.
(
Maudlin drunk
.)
They call me names, aldermanthey abuse
poor Joe Surgeand one of the Gudgeon
gentry
called me a tadpole.
[
Weeps
.
BRISK.
Why did he call you tadpole, Joseph?
SURGE.
Becausebecauseyour honor, I haven't
hada clean shirt on these three year. Tad
poles lives in mud, your honor knows.
BRISK.
And what do they call you, Tom?
TOM LUG.
Why, your honor, one of the canvassers
returns
me as a resident turkle!
BRISK.
How is that?
TOM LUG.
'Cause I never comes out of this old
corduroy
jacket of mine.
BRISK.
What name have these worthy gentlemen?
I suppose you are all christened.
TOM LUG.
These are the men in the moon, because
they always have dirty faces.Now, alderman,
give us a song for answering all these
questions
.
BRISK.
One moreHas your worthy landlord no
title?
COOK.
(
Speaks up
.)
Yes, an it please Alderman Brisk, your honor
we call him the chimbly-swallow, for he's
for everlasting poking about the hearth and
smelling the smoke and the dishes.
TOM LUG
Now for the song!
ALL.
Yes, now for the song!
BRISK.
How many stevedores and wharfingers do
you know, Tom?
TOM LUG.
Let me see, there's Zeke Oakum, tarpaulin
Tomtwo; Bill Baffin; but poor Bill's deadly
sickI doubt whether he'll get up to vote; say
a score and a half. But give us the song, if
you please.
(
Aside
)
Hark'e, my boys, if he
doesn't come down with his song, we'll pitch
our votes on the other sidethat's all.
BRISK.
(
Aside
.)
I hear that, and although I would as lief sing
in a musty fish-keg, I must try it.
The Song
.
Were mine a head as high as is the highest
steeple,
A tongue as loud as its far-sounding bell,
The one I would raise to the sky for the
people
The other would echo of tyrants the knell!
(
Aside
)
Oh, wouldn't I raise a devil of a yell!
Were my arm but as long as the great
Mississippi
,
My bosom as broad as the Prairie-du-Chien,
With the one, for their sake, how, ye tyrants!
I'd whip ye,
And breast with the other your torrents of
spleen!
(
Aside
)
Blast my eyes! Jack Brisk, if I know
what you mean!
If my legs were as long as the tall Alleganies,
Like Barclay, I'd walk the wide world
round-about
And rescue, wherever I found them, poor
royalist
zanies,
And put with my vigor their rulers to rout!
(
Aside
)
Don't, for Heaven's sake, gentlemen,
make such a shout!
Oh, give me a breast that expands like the
ocean,
And eyes like the vigilant planets above,
Then, oh then, to my heart I will hug with
emotion
The people I smile onthe people I love!
(
Aside
)
Provided the perquisite pay, I approve
.
TOM LUG.
(
Aside
.)
Now he must give us the hornpipe he danced
at the fancy ball, with Aunt Peggy on his back.
Cook will do for Aunt Peggy, if she brushes up
a little.Come, alderman, another favor to
your constituents!
BRISK.
What's that, Tom? Anything you can ask
you know I am the servant of the people.
TOM LUG.
Nothing much: I'm a'most ashamed to ask
you, it's such a mere trifle.Joe, you ask him,
you ain't afraid of the penitentiary keepers.
Why, Uncle Brisk, to make a plain story of it,
you must give us your fancy-ball hornpipe
around the table with cook on your back.
BRISK.
(
Feigns sudden sickness
.)
Landlord, what have you put in these
lobsters
?
They have made me sick as death
Give me fresh airThere, so; now lead me
to the door: I shall be well in a minute.
(
Is conducted to the door, and makes off
.)
TOM LUG.
What a kind good man Mr. Brisk ishe's
broke his constitution working at dinners, and
suppers, and cold collations for the people!
That was a capital song, as good as the
quirister
himself could give us; but I'm afraid the
idea of cook and he in a hornpipe was too much
for his nerves! Any how, three cheers and our
votes to a man for little Jack Brisk!
END OF ACT II.
ACT III.
SCENE I.
Gudgeon's house
.
Gudgeon
and
Glib
.
GUDGEON.
I begin to feel the anxieties of a candidate.
Last night I was harassed with a vision of six
constables standing around me with staves,
and with their hats in their hands, bowing to
to methus. After this, a fellow in a white
apron came in with a large green turtle, which
seemed to be lying on its back, and struggling
with its hands and feet to turn itself over. I
suppose the poor thing was troubled with
indigestion
.
GLIB.
You shouldn't give way to these feelings,
Mr. Gudgeon: they will unman you before the
election.
GUDGEON.
Not they! I was no more scared by the
sight of the six constables and their staves,
than if I had been an alderman all my life, or
if they had been so many plain farmers, with
ox-gads, viewing a prize-bullock, in my own
native
town of Danbury.
GLIB.
I think it would have a good effect to
mention
that in my address to the citizens at one
of the meetings: they'll call you the fearless
GudgeonWhat is your opinion, sir?
GUDGEON.
It mightyes, it might. Well, sir, you may
try itbut not as if it came from me. You can
state, for instance, that my man William
over-heard
me talking in my sleep, as he came in
for my boots this morning.
GLIB.
And the remark about the ox-gads?
GUDGEON.
You might add, that William thought I lay
as proud and unconcerned as if the constables
had beenhad beenwhat would occur to
him?so many puffed bladders!
GLIB.
And you one of them.
GUDGEON.
And I one of them.
GLIB.
That will produce a sensation in the
meeting
!
GUDGEON.
UnquestionablyI expect it. Hadn't I
better
be present, so that they can come up and
shake hands with me, after the allusion. I
don't see how I can avoid it.
GLIB.
Perhaps it would be more proper for you to
remain at home, looking out of a second story
window to address the people, when, in their
enthusiasm, they shall adjourn to meet in front
of your house.That's always a great stroke
of policy, to make a speech to people in the
streets, when the boys are hooting, and the
carts rattling up and down, and the engines
puffing by with trumpets!
GUDGEON.
But how will my voice answer? It's hardly
a two-story voice.
GLIB.
Capitally, capitally: you have a good round
bass, and if, when you see a ragged fellow
shivering in the farthest edge of the crowd,
with his hands in his pockets, you address
your remarks to him, as if
you
were
standing
in a cold entry, and calling for your
over-coat
,
you will succeed in making a happy effort
of it.
GUDGEON.
With a nightcap on, as if I had rushed straight
from my bed, to meet my constituents?
GLIB.
Without a nightcap. Positively without a
nightcapThat is aristocratic; but you might,
if you choose, in your shirt sleevesthey are
republican.
GUDGEON.
That's a mystery.
GLIB.
So it isand so is the connection between
democratical principles and threadbare
indispensables
;but
that's the ground on which they'll
beat us, if any: Brisk dresses shabbier than
you.
GUDGEON.
But then consider, my dear sir, Brisk hasn't
my form, arm, leg, my back and bust.
GLIB.
Allow me to suggest, sir, that during an
election
,
we none of us have backs or busts to be
thought of. I entreat you, as I have before, to
abandon these fancies: I ask it as the greatest
favor you can confer on me, on your party, on
the community, to put on corduroys at least,
my own wishes are for fustian, during the
contest
.
Wear a pea-jacket with a few rents in
it, and an appearance of being soiled with
cigar smoke and tar.
GUDGEON.
I will do my uttermost.
GLIB.
And I think you had better send your coach
into the country, darken your astral lamp, and
take down your damask curtains.
GUDGEON.
Well, sir,I will consider of it. In the
mean time, I trust you will exert yourself in
your harangues at our public meetings. Ride
high, sirride high. Express your willingness
to die for your countryin the lastthe
deepest
ditch
GLIB.
I shall do my endeavor.
GUDGEON.
Sternly and fearlessly.
GLIB.
I will.
Enter a
Boy.
BOY.
Tom Lug, sir, the bully's round the corner,
and says he'll drop Mr. Glib, if he catches him,
like a shot hawkand he'll curry him, he says,
like a bull's hideand he'll skin him like a
weasel!
GUDGEON.
This is unpleasant news.
GLIB.
I wonder if I could get out by the back fence,
without being observed?It's unpleasant to
meet that man in the face, his breath smells so
of brandy and oakum.
BOY.
There's nothing but a clothes-line and a
cistern
,
sir, on the other side.
GLIB.
I'd rather run the risk of drowning and
hanging
combined, than encounter that barbarous
fellow.
[
Retiring
.
GUDGEON.
I believe you address the proscribed
lamplighters
to-night?
[
Calling after him
.
GLIB.
The proscribed watchmen and lamplighters.
GUDGEON.
Give it to them vigorously, if you please.
GLIB.
I shall.
GUDGEON.
Don't spare words!
GLIB.
Depend upon me: I'll lay the dictionary
waste! I'll ravage it!
[
Exit
GLIB.
SCENE II.
Blanding's Apartments
.
BLANDING.
My mistress might as well be at Nova
Zembla
or the North Pole, as far as I am concerned;
she is as much to the cham of Tartary (now
that I am forbidden her presence) as she is to
me. Where is the difference, I would like to
know, between a lady and a whale or a walrus,
if one is not permitted to enjoy her society: to
smile with her, muse, meditate, and talk.Now
if I were in the country, I should hang myself;
but the city, the glorious city, warms one's
brain like a November sun, and sets it all in a
ferment with contrivance and strategyI am
not to see Kate Brisk any moreha! ran it
so? at the penalty of a chastisement. Now
see, Master Brisk, how soon your rod of
chastisement
turns into a serpent of revenge, and
your bully is cozened by a gentler man in his
wits. Here, ye old badges of obscurity, I throw
ye off! I disdain the name and the vocation of
Charles Blanding, and am, henceforth, at least
to this threatening father, Mr. Jefferson Goss,
grandnephew to the United States senator, by
the mother's sideI think this weak fish will
run into this net, and while he is floundering,
we will get far enough out at sea, I trust, to
make a more certain cast.
[
Exit
.
SCENE III.
A public room
.
The Committee and
Crowder
.
CROWDER.
I agree with you, as to the muscular arm on
the banner, with a hammer aloft; I think the
addition of a stout leg would be judicious:
there are many cordwainers in the ward, that
would be won over by the device. A stout
leg in a neat pump, and no stocking, to show
the calf distinctly. This will please the
butchers
too, who are proud of their legs.
FIRST COM. MAN.
The stout leg, then; shall it be set down?
ALL.
Agreed.
CROWDER.
But, mind me, mark it down to cost not more
than one dollar and a half.
SECOND COM. MAN.
(
Writing
.)
One stout leg, naked and in a pump, twelve
shillings.
CROWDER.
We must be economical this campaign, for
the freeholders begin to complain that the taxes
of the party to meet the expenses of an
election
,
are getting to be as bad as the
plunderings
of the corporationWhat noise was that
above?
FIRST COM. MAN.
I heard nothing.
CROWDER.
They say to run a sewer through a man's
pocket and drain it to the last cent, is as bad
as to cut a street through his domicil and leave
him the rubbish to pay damages.
SECOND COM. MAN.
How, in the name of Heaven, can an
election
be conducted without money? Joe Surge
must be hired to fight, and must be paid his fists'
worth.Tom Lug must make himself a
nuisance
,
to keep decent voters of the other side
back; and he must have a percentage on the
disgust he excites. We must have Blaster to
blow the trumpet and to brow-beat and be
scurrilous
when he's off duty, and I'm sure he
should be handsomely remunerated for the use
of his person. He works as cheap as any bully
we ever hadbesides the trumpeting.
9
CROWDER.
Very trueevery word;but we can
diminish
our committee expenses a little, at least, for
the sake of appearances. We can smoke half
a box and carry none away: we can leave the
candle-ends for next evening, and not throw
them at any clean person we may see passing
in the street: a quart of beer a piece should
satisfy us, and we can be more strict with our
landlord, and have him render a nightly account
of charges. I hear that noise againwhat can
it be? Eaves-dropping?
FIRST COM. MAN.
I hear it this timeit's overhead.
SECOND COM. MAN.
Let's hunt the rascal, and if we capture him,
we'll have a roasted goose to insert in the bill.
[The Committee go out and return.]
CROWDER.
Strangethat we could find nothing, not so
much as the tip of a nose or an ear to levy on;
but a political spy during a warm election,
shrinks like a plant in a tropical climate, and I
believe could even hide himself in the knot of a
pocket handkerchief, or the crack of a
wainscot
.
SECOND COM. MAN.
I saw Botch in the shadow of a house over
the way as we came in.
CROWDER.
When I sounded the chimney to ascertain if
he might be ambushed there, I heard some frail
thing crash, which might have been Botch's
skull. It yielded like a hollow thing, whatever
it was.To avoid any further chance of
listeners
,
let's call in the landlord's bill and adjourn
till to-morrow.Landlord! landord!
LANDLORD.
(
From without
.)
Coming!
CROWDER.
We want your bill. That will bring him up
with it, short and quick.
LANDLORD.
(
From without
.)
It's e'en a'most made outonly a few items
to add.
Enter
LANDLORD.
CROWDER.
Come, read it off, jolly Job Works, in a good
clear half-price voiceby particulars, and it's
cash on the nail.Begin!
LANDLORD.
That I likesfour sperm candleNothing
like the ready metalTwo quarts beer, with
snuffers.
CROWDER.
Well; he has a fine throat of his ownit
smacks of the spigot.
LANDLORD.
Room-hire, cigars, and two julaps, with
benches.
CROWDER.
Well.
LANDLORD.
A small pig with lemon.
CROWDER.
A pig with lemon!
LANDLORD.
Two plates pickled beans, two rolls twisted
bread, and beer extra.
CROWDER.
Beans, bread, and beer!
LANDLORD.
Six lobster and two pound sage cheese:
likewise
a splendid pork pie made of chops.
CROWDER.
A splendid pork pie made of chops!
LANDLORD.
And a suet pudding.
CROWDER.
Nothing else?
LANDLORD.
Nothing else.
CROWDER.
We have seen none of these things. Have
you?
(
Turning to one Com. Man.
)
Lobster
and sage cheeseHave you?
(
To another
.)
Pig with lemon, bread, beans, and beerpork
pie, and suet pudding!
LANDLORD.
This may be as it may, Mr. Crowder; but
you sent down for the things
CROWDER.
Sent down for the things!
LANDLORD.
Yes, sir, in a very unpleasant, and, begging
the committee gentlemen's pardon, a very
uncivil
wayyou might have found a better
messenger
nor a stone bottle as big as my two fist.
CROWDER.
Ah! I begin to see how it isthat cursed
experiment of mine.
LANDLORD.
Yes, sir, that experiment of yoursit came
bouncing down the chimney like mad, and first
it strikes my cook, poor hunchback Jenny, in
the small, or I should, say, in the big of the
back, as she was stooping over a dish of prawns
for Tom Lug.
FIRST COM. MAN.
Bad enough!
LANDLORD.
Yes, gentlemen, bad enough you may say,
for, springing from Jenny's hump an it had been
a horsehair cushion, away it flies on to the
table
where the alderman had been sitting just a
minute beforeit's mortal mercy his life was
sparedand smash, smash it goes, like artillery,
till every living dish on the board was
fragments
and scatterings.
FIRST COM. MAN.
We must practise economy, Crowder.
SECOND COM. MAN.
We must be prudent this campaign, for the
freeholders begin to complainsewer through
the pocketsegars and candle-ends, and we
must be a little frugal in our beer.
CROWDER.
Mr. Works, you'll be good enough to charge
your bill to the ward, as usual; and you'll
oblige me by smothering this unhappy
breakage
under the general expenses.
SCENE IV.
Crumb's house
.
Old Crumb
and
Citizens
.
FIRST CITIZEN.
But, sir, it is the wish of a large body of the
people of this ward, that you should become a
candidate; they are tired of these squabbling
office-seekers, and wish to have for their
alderman
,
once more, a plain, honest citizen.
CRUMB.
I am plain, I know, and, I believe, honest;
but I have no other claims for this honor. I
have never harangued at public meetings,
given
charity at noonday, clutched the skirts of
great men, sat on midnight caucuses, walked
prominently in processions or at celebrations;
nor have I been seen at public dinners,
thundering
out toasts and sentiments that sounded
loud with patriotism and the name of the
people
.
How can I be your candidate? You had
better look elsewhere, the creature grows in
every street.
FIRST CITIZEN.
You are a plain, true citizen, as we said
before
,
and for that we choose you. We are
satisfied
with your private acts, your wayside
charities to the sick, the orphan, and the
oppressed
;
some of us have seen you, in the
storm and at the dead of night, performing your
offices of kindness and humanity. The light of
a single star upon a good deed, dear sir, is worth
more than the blaze of the sun or the approval
of a thousand eyes. We will take you as you
are, and for what you are, if you will allow us.
CRUMB.
Give a moment, and I will answer you.
[Citizens retire.
CRUMB.
I care not for the honor, that is certain; I
have no private end to answer, that is certain;
nor will it suit my habits to wrangle by the
hour, or to sit at late feasts, where man shows
but as a creature of one sensemere appetite.
Again, the city needs friends; her revenues are
wasted, her foundations sapped with unthrift
and neglect; an old man's voice may be
listened
to when younger tongues would sound
idle; the grayhaired pilot may be heard and
heeded, when he attests that the rock is at hand,
and the ship fast foundering. Ah! another
thought, deeper than all these, I
will
be the
candidate
!the
honest enthusiasm of the ward shall
elect meour Master Brisk's tone will change
when I am in the council. He will seek my
influence, and hope to get it, and, perchance,
will yield to my old wish about Blanding and
his daughter. That perchancethat happy,
bright-omened perchance, fixes me.
(
Aloud
.)
Gentlemen, come in!
Enter
Citizens.
FIRST CITIZEN.
Your answer?
CRUMB.
I will act!
FIRST CITIZEN.
And so will we! We thank you sir, and when
the sun rises on Thursday morning, read our
thanks in our recorded voices. Good day, good sir.
CRUMB.
I bid you all, good men, good day.
[
They
retire
.]
And an early sun thereafter shall shine
upon a happy bride and groom, if old Zachary
Crumb is a true man and an alderman!
SCENE V.
An apartment in Brisk's house
.
Brisk
,
alone.Enter
Servant
.
SERVANT.
A gentleman, with great black whiskers, is
below, sir. He swells and ruffles an he were
the governor's son.
BRISK.
Ask him up, immediately.
[
Exit Servant
.]
It's Jefferson Goss, from the description; my
heart flutters like a young pigeon's. I am in
the same house, under the same roof with the
grand-nephew of a senator. I hear the
creaking
of his boots! Harkhe coughed! He is
on the stairs. Was I entitled to expect this?
What weight and character this will give to
my canvass, that I have been closeted with a
functionary's near relative! Besides, my
daughter
Kate, now that that fellow, Blanding, is out
of the waybut I must be prepared to address
him formally.
[
Walks up and down reciting
Sir, it affords me much, &c.
When
Blanding
enters, advances, and addresses him:
]
Enter
Blanding,
as
Jefferson Goss.
BRISK.
Sir, it affords me great happiness to see you
unmixed happiness. I will not disguise the
pleasure it gives me to receive, under my
humble
roof, so near a connexion of so
distinguished
a character.
BLANDING.
(
Aside
Now a little figurative impudence,
for the great man's nephewwho may be
supposed to have been reared in pot-houses
at the capitol.) Sir, you do me proud! Proud,
sir, as if I sat on Chimborazzo, with a bald
eagle in my lap.
BRISK.
(
Aside
what a ward-meeting orator he would
make!) Be good enough to be seatedthis
way, sir, if you please, and condescend to
partake
of these humble viands.
BLANDING.
Thank you, sir, I will gorge.
BRISK.
(
Aside
What a happy style of expression!)
I keep this table spread for my friends during
the election. You will find this beef's-tongue
exceeding nice. It is sound policy, it strikes
me, this of overpowering a man's
understanding
with detachments of roast-beef and
blackberry-pudding
.
BLANDING.
But don't you think it best to skirmish a
little
at first, about the outskirts, with bottled-ale
and cogniac?
BRISK.
Decidedly, sir; this shakes the outer walls.
Then you come up with your heavy troops,
Turkey and the Porte, and in a few minutes
you have possession of the man.
BLANDING.
Between ourselves, Brisk, this mutton of
your's is dd nice. It's almost as fine as
I have ever known to be raised on the old
senator's
farm. Were these cranberries reared in
the hothouse or in beds?
BRISK.
In beds, I think; they are Long island
berries.
BLANDING.
They make an excellent sauce with
woodcock
I
believe this is woodcock.
BRISK.
Yes, sir, that is woodcock, and considered
very choice; it's from the Jersey meadows.
(
Aside
the young man has a keen appetite
but what penetration, what insight he betrays
in his dishes! the true senatorial blood. I have
no doubt he'd appreciate Kate at once. I'll call
her.) Kate! Daughter
BLANDING.
I beg your pardon, sir, but I hope there are
no ladies about the houseI'm excessively
timid, timid as arhinoceros.
Enter
Kate Brisk.
BRISK.
My daughter, sir; Kate, let me introduce
you to Mr. Goss, the senator's nephew.
KATE.
(
Aside, not looking at him
)
Some disgusting
politician, no doubt, with his tariffs and
currencies
,
high rates and low rates, and scurrilities
both high and low.I wish he would carry his
conversation among the Hottentots and other
heathen, rather than bring it into this house.
(
Pouts
.)
BRISK.
Kate, will you be good enough to observe
it's Mr. Goss, Mr. Jefferson Goss.
BLANDING.
(
Aside
.)
I can advise her better who it is.
(
Hums a
tune in a low voice
.)
KATE.
(
Looking at himaside
)
As I live, it's
Charles Blanding.Ah, I understand the
knave!
(
Aloud, and in a different tone
)
Good evening, Mr. Gossyou are welcome.
What is the pleasant news, sir?
BRISK.
(
Aside
.)
I knew she must change her line of behavior,
the moment she obtained a glimpse of his fine
person!
BLANDING.
Nothing, madam, stranger or pleasanter, than
that a soland goose was seen crossing the sound
yesterday in pursuit of an eagle who fled
KATE.
This waynearer, if you please, sirand
give me the nicer particulars of this singular
history.
[
Draws him apart
.
BLANDING.
The eagle fled, Kate, till hegot as near
heaven
as he thought proper, when he turned and
struck his talons into the thin pate of the stupid
bird, and it fell out of the sky, a leaden fool, as
it was.
(
Aside
)
This way, further.
KATE.
Oh the assurance of the thing called man!
How could you venture to practise in this way
on my good father.
BLANDING.
Venture, Kate! there is no venture in it: he
expends his industry in contriving bars to his
garden; I employ my agility in leaping them;
and the mutual operation is aided by our being
cits and strangers.
KATE.
How will you make that appear?
BLANDING.
Easily. Now, if we had lived in your
favorite
rural vicinity, where every boor and
ploughman
is classed in the memory of his
neighborhood
,
like so many bugs and beetles in the
Linn
an
system, I might have as well attempted
to borrow your father's head of hair, with his
eyes open, for a fancy wig, as to get access to
you without his knowledge.
KATE.
Then you ride your old packsaddle, the city,
still; making that a carry-all for your tricks
and stratagems, your knavish doings and
impudent
disguises.
BLANDING.
In truth, I do: and now confess, Kate, that
the town is the place for loverstheir true and
natural hive.
KATE.
What they lose in simplicity, is not
BLANDING.
Is
gained in quickness of wit and variety of
expedients for their mutual enjoyment: the
lecture to be criticised; the mountebank to be
stared at; the theatre to be dazzled with; the
concert of sweet sounds heard together.
KATE.
Ah, if you knew my honest father's preju
dices just now against sweet sounds, you would
scarcely venture to remain here, even in your
disguise. His prejudices show themselves
dreadfully.
BRISK.
(
Aside
.)
Love at first sight, I verily believe. They
are already as intimate as a pair of assembly
men. Just what I could desire.
BLANDING.
Dreadfully:see what faces he is making at
me this very minute! But in what ways, I
pray? A politician that takes all the world to
his bosom, should scarcely have prejudices.
KATE.
From his sudden horror of your occupation,
he has sold my piano to a lady going into the
country, at half price.
BLANDING.
Well.
KATE.
He has had lids put upon all the key-holes,
because they whistle.
BLANDING.
Well.
KATE.
And the chimney pots taken down, because
they sing.
BLANDING.
And further?
KATE.
He has sacrificed the old tortoiseshell cat,
because he was told her purr was a musical
concord in A.
BLANDING.
What a passion for music the pleasant old
gentleman must enjoy! Shades of Bethooven
and Mozart, look upon the melodious old
creature
kindly!I should like to have his opinion
of the disputed solo in Handel's Creation.
[Takes his flute from his pocket and sounds a
stave.
BRISK.
(
Rushing forward
.)
Good God! did you hear that, Kate? Did
you, Mr. Goss?The sound of a flute; there
must be incendiaries about the house. After
all the pains I have taken to escape that odions
playerto shut him from my ears and my
houseI am afraid he has obtained an
entrance
It
seemed as if he was in this very
room. Let's search every nook, corner, and
cranny. Be good enough to assist us, Mr.
Goss; for this is really a serious matter.
[They search under chairs, behind paintings, &c.]
Why, sir, the trouble I have taken to silence
that fellow and his cursed serenading flute, is
really astonishing. Sir,
(
panting
)
I have planted
two approved bull-dogs in my yard; I have
employed a private watchman, with a club of
double the ordinary dimensions in front; I have
had a vacant ground to the northeast, in which
he practised his discordant stick, declared a
nuisance by the corporation; and, moreover, I
have ordered my servants, sir, if they detected
a squinting, limping, awkward fellow, loitering
about the house, to assail him from the upper
stories, without remorse, with such vessels as
might be at hand.
BLANDING.
Why, sir, your benevolence is unbounded, for
you have offered him every variety of death
drowning, throttling, and knocking in the head.
An ungracious scamp he must be, if he doesn't
accept your kindness in one shape or the other;
an ungrateful, pudding-headed villain!
BRISK.
Extermination is the best he deserves: if I
had my way, I would annihilate the brood, and
make room for men of merit, like yourself, Mr.
Goss.
BLANDING.
The devil blast my stars, but you flatter me,
Mr. Brisk, beyond my merits, entirely beyond
my merits. But I must bid you good day, Mr.
Briskgood day, sirI shall be with you early
again. Good day, Miss Brisk.
[
Exit
Blanding
.
BRISK.
A charming young man!
KATE.
(
Dubiously
.)
Charming indeed!
BRISK.
What a contrast to that odious Blanding!
You must confess a vast distance between the
two.
KATE.
It's too palpable, sir.
BRISK.
Do you think you could love him, Kate?
KATE.
I think I might, if I had time. I am not
sure.
BRISK.
Well, Kate, strive hard: turn your thoughts
diligently that wayand perhaps I will
forgive
the old offence; perhapsrecollect!
END OF ACT III.
ACT IV.
SCENE I.
The open street
.
Kate Brisk
and
Mrs. Gudgeon
,
meeting
.
MRS. GUDGEON.
Well, Kate, poultry flies high in the market,
this morning, and eggs are only four to the
dozen
.
I really believe the times have reached our
roosts and henhouses, and that hens and
turkeys
have become so dissolute and idle, with
long holding of warm nests and abundance of
good feeding, that they care not a straw for the
public interest! However, this is a large-built
and fine-looking pullet that I have bought, and
if it makes the dish it ought to make, we shall
know what's what in three days from this time.
KATE.
It's certainly a noble bird; and these pigeons'
eggs, where did you purchase them?
MRS. GUDGEON.
From my old one-and-elevenpence, the fat
huckster, who says that twelve pigeons' eggs,
made into an omelet with four strips of bacon,
bring health and luck to the man that eats
them: what will Mr. Robert Gudgeon say to
that? Here's a sheep's gizzard, too, to be taken
at ten o'clock in the evening, made into a pie.
KATE.
What is that for?
MRS. GUDGEON.
To make Mr. Gudgeon amiable during the
election. And here are two peacock's
feathers
to lay under his pillow to make him
dignified
.
The boy is coming on with two rounds of
beef and a dozen strings of Bolognas to feed
his friends with, to keep them in good humor;
and I've told him to buy some fresh chickweed
and goosegrass to carry in his pocket; they say
it draws votersat least, Charles Blanding told
me so. Poor boy! I'm afraid you'll see him no
more, Kate.
KATE.
No more, Mrs. Gudgeon! Well, I shall
preserve
my senses, I hope, if I do not, now that I
have seen Mr. Goss. Sweet, sweet young
man!
MRS. GUDGEON.
Who is he? Who is this Mr. Goss?
KATE.
This Mr. GossMrs. Gudgeon, I am
astonished
Mr.
Jefferson Goss, the grand-nephew
of the senator.
MRS GUDGEON.
What look has this young man? I think I
know the Gosses.
KATE.
Firstly, a blue, smiling eye.
MRS. GUDGEON.
Well, all young men have smiling eyes.
KATE.
Arched brows, hair, auburn and gentle, with
the light glancing from it every way.
MRS. GUDGEON.
His nose?
KATE.
Straight and spiriteda pale, thoughtful
cheek, and a sweet chin, with a mole on it.
(
Aside
The foolish old owl! she must know
it's Charles.)
MRS. GUDGEON.
I'll warrant by that mark and my
sunflower-coverlid
,
he belongs to the Gosses of Cross
river
.
Auburn hair, you said.
KATE.
Yes.
MRS. GUDGEON.
And a mole on his chin?I know the Gosses
as if they were blood-relationswhat is the
young man's gait and aspect?
KATE.
Gentleand he sometimes looks up and
sometimes
down.
MRS. GUDGEON.
The very marks! And his height?
KATE.
Middling, you might say, neither tall nor
short.
MRS. GUDGEON.
True, again. There can be no doubt he
is one of the Cross river Gosses. But you
have not given him your heart, Kate, as you
seem to say by sighing?
KATE.
I must confess a partiality, Mrs. Gudgeon.
MRS. GUDGEON.
What! and desert Charles Blanding, for this
fellow?
KATE.
Willingly, and I think Blanding would
second
it, for Goss is his particular, in fact, his
bosom friend. However, have one or the other of
them I am determined. I think it will be Goss; at
least, father wishes it to be so. You shall come
to the wedding, Mrs. Gudgeon, and be pleased
with the bridegroom, too!
[
Exit
KATE BRISK.
MRS. GUDGEON.
Pleased with a cross child, or a horse in
overalls
sooner! Foolish, fickle thing! Kind Charles
Blanding must be abandoned for this lacquered
upstart, that professes to be his friend for the
purpose of seducing his mistress. That Goss
is a rascal, I'll warrant, for the Gosses always
was said to have bad blood in their veins from
their grandfather, the tory quartermaster.
We'll see whether poor Blanding's to be cast
off in this way, like so much foul linen. I'll
have Mr. Gudgeon in this business in
four-and-twenty
hours, or my name shall be taken
from the family record as Margaret Cox, now
Gudgeon.
SCENE II.
The street
.
Botch
and
Gudgeon
.
BOTCH.
Oh! this is dreadful news: support yourself
against the wall, Mr. Gudgeonyou had better.
Shocking! shocking!
GUDGEON.
What is it? For mercy's sake what is it,
Botch?
BOTCH.
They've got Old Crumb up for a candidate.
GUDGEON.
What for, alderman?
BOTCH.
Yes, sir.
GUDGEON.
Against
me?
BOTCH.
Yes, sir, and he's as popular as the baker
before breakfast, or the brewer after dinner.
Whole flocks of people are winging their way
to the polls, like so many pigeons in autumn.
GUDGEON.
This must be put a stop to.
BOTCH.
They come out of the houses by hundreds;
all the carriages have got Zachary Crumb
on them, and the minister has voted for him
already.
GUDGEON.
There must be an end to this.
BOTCH.
I doubt whether there be such a thing as an
end to it.
Enter
Glib.
GLIB.
I have just halted to tell you that the whole
lower section of the ward has gone for Crumb,
in a body.
GUDGEON.
You know that's a poor part of the ward.
GLIB.
It's rumored that the Quakers are moving in
his favor, and I'm afraid the plague will get
among the lamplighters and watchmen, for
these bodies lie near each other, and the
Quakers
chiefly furnish for the public lamps. So look
to yourselvesI am off, to address the meeting
of proscribed citizens of this class.
[
Exit
GLIB.
BOTCH.
I forgot to tell you, sir, that they have
planted
a great liberty-pole on one of the corners.
GUDGEON.
Thank Heaven! that hasn't a vote.
BOTCH.
No, sir, that's not a citizen, although it
carries
its head so high. And they've got flags
displayed
from a thousand private houses, with
Crumb's name on in large letterstwice as
big as ours.
GUDGEON.
Who could have done that? Our painter
was ordered to put my name in the very largest
possible capitals.
BOTCH.
Besides this, sir, they have brought out two
immense wagons, that carry twenty-four deep,
and they are both hurrying voters up, five in a
row, breast-wise, like so many fish packed in a
firkin for market.
GUDGEON.
Botch, this is certainly the most astonishing
thing I have ever known. I have heard of wild
buffaloes rushing down rocks a hundred and
fifty feet high; but for human-kind, why, it's
sheer madness. Was it a full moon last night?
BOTCH.
It was.
GUDGEON.
It must be thattheir brains are turned. I
consider the city is ruined; it never can
recover
from this shock. I shall have no documents
to sign for the corporationthat's clear. I am
sorry I sat up last night to address the voters,
for it was a great inconvenience.
BOTCH.
Don't despair, sir, I beg you not to despair.
GUDGEON.
I must despair, Botch; there's no other
enjoyment
left to me.
BOTCH.
Can't you walk between the two men drunk,
as we agreed?that might cheer you up.
GUDGEON.
Thank you for the suggestion. I'll do it. It
must have an exhilarating effect, and may turn
the tide. Get the men ready.
[
Botch retiring
.]
But, Botch, be good enough not to have them
overdone; not too drunk, if you please.
[
Exeunt
GUDGEON
and
BOTCH
severally
.
SCENE III.
The same
.
Brisk
and
Crowder
.
CROWDER.
We must carry this election, or I am undone.
They have levied on the liberty-pole in front
of my door as personal property; and the
glorious
cap, with all those mottoes that please
the mob so much, will be struck off with the
greatest rudeness, by the hammer of some
tenpenny
auctioneer.Foolish love of civil liberty!
I had better have clothed my back, or lined my
belly, than have spent my substance in planting
liberty-trees that are as barren as crabs.
BRISK.
Poh! Crowderyou know better; it's a
perfect
bread-plant to the office-seeker; and more
poor Christians have gained a living by shaking
it, and opening their mouths and throwing
up their caps under it, than all the peach,
plum, apricot, and greening trees in
Christendom
.
Forty thousand worthy gentlemen, in
this noble republic of ours alone, climb this
tree annually, and furnish their families a very
pretty livelihood. Think of that
CROWDER.
I do think of that; and if I only had a snug
government birth during one president's term,
I'd whistle at Fortune, and rattle my silver
with the best men in the land.
BRISK.
If we succeed, as we mustlook at the
prospect
,
it's almost enough to bring tears into one's
eyesyou shall be made a contractor for the
almshouse, and have a nice little profit on every
morsel that goes into a pauper's mouth: a
perfect
prince of a contractor: and not a candle
shall be snuffed in the establishment, nor an
eyelid dropped, without your having clipped
the tallow and discounted the drug for both.
CROWDER.
I am then to have the furnishing of physic as
well as food to my poor children on the island?
BRISK.
Of course, for medicine is a natural part of
the diet of a pauper. He requires scouring as
much as pewter pots, and takes sulphur as
freely as if he had been educated in a match
factory.The very poorhouse dog, Crowder,
shall not dare to shake himself in the yard
without your permission, and a collar of your
providing, to make it known that he's the slave
of King Crowder, and owes him a per-centage.
And so we will reward you.
CROWDER.
And how will you reward yourself?
BRISK.
Very simply.You have heard of Greenwich
lane?Well; my great-uncle, the bachelor,
owned a small plot of ground there, in the
heart of a block, which he used as a circus,
and made a tolerable income therefrom, with a
bear and fiddle, two stunted shetlands, and a
loafer clown; but, since that lively period, and
a different current of population, the ground
hasn't paid taxes, and has, in fact, been a dead
weight at the end of my pocket. Now, mark
me, when I become alderman, we will have
that same Greenwich lane broadened into an
avenue, which will just take the short front
lots away, and bring my pretty plot of ground
upon the street, without a penny's assessment.
All this shall be done for the good of the
people
,
the health of the neighborhood, or any
other patriotic and high-minded considerations.
CROWDER.
Nobly contrived! But here's a new
difficulty
Old
Zachary Crumb, who has been
started by the citizens, you know, is said to be
making great headway.
BRISK.
Poh! A weak old man, who will make about
as much headway as a superannuated
racehorse
brought out upon the course ten years
after he has lost his natural heat and powers of
motion.
CROWDER.
The people, they say, are gathering for him
in great numbers.
BRISK
Have no fears! it's only a device of our
own friends to blind the enemy. Two thirds of
the votes that go in the boxes for Gudgeon and
Crumb, will come out, mark my word, for John
Brisk, and no other!
[
Exeunt severally
.
SCENE IV.
A public room
.
Glib
,
discovered on a platform, speaking, with
citizens before him
.
GLIB.
Ay! fellow citizens, I dare avouch,
And call star-spangled heaven to witness it,
Posterity shall knowbe proud to know,
Ye gallant band of watchmen, thus proscribed,
And lamplighters of eighteen thirty-five
To know that ye your caps thrust back, your
coats
Threw off, and down your ladders cast,
despising
The power that took your offices away.
How in their cradles will your grandbabes
thrill.
Thinking that they are yours!sons of men
that dared
To blow a blast of stern defiance
On the trump
CITIZEN.
(
To his neighbor
.)
Now we'll have something nice; he's always
good on trumpets.
GLIB.
Of patriotic fire that shook
These soup-fed tyrants in their chairs of
power
:
That you it was, who raised the bloody flag
CITIZEN.
His flags, if such a thing be possible, is
better
than his trumpets.
GLIB.
Far up on high, where still it shall be held,
Until to fibres heaven's winds have whistled it
No larger than the small spool-cotton threads.
Yes, yes, my fellow-citizens, inspired
With large and noble thoughts, and in a cause
That sun-lit planets might be jealous of
The cause of lamplighters extinguished,
Of watchmen wakenedburst beneath the feet
Of these stern men, like to an earthquake
Underneath a factory of earthenware,
And into fifty thousand fragments break
Their fragile power.
CITIZEN.
Good! I told you his earthquakes was nice.
SECOND CITIZEN.
That earthquake, it strikes me, burst rather
too much like an overdone egg.
CITIZEN.
Earthquakes is more like melons, and
requires
a nice hand and strong fire to get 'em
up to the true pitch. I never heard a speaker
that did earthquakes better than Glib.
GLIB.
Lo! Freedom's temple, now
CITIZEN.
Now listen, neighbor: if this ain't the
best-built
thing you've ever known, call me a
groundmole
GLIB.
Begirt with peril! Yen, that edifice
Reared on the bones, cemented by the blood
Of all our grandsires and their wives,
Hewed by their swords, and with their shields
roofed in
With scabbards Iathed:To hostile dire
assaults
This holy, sacred temple 'gins to yield,
Beleaguered round; but hope, my countrymen,
Dawns, through the darkness dawns, and
'gainst the walls
I see large ladders planted fearlessly.
Yours they are, ye agile lamplighters!
The alarum-rap I hearit calls aloud
The friends of civil liberty together.
Ye vigilant guardians of the night,
That solemn summons from your clubs
ascends
.
Now, from this huge height of rhetoric to fall:
CITIZEN.
See how gracefully he comes down; never
flew from a house-top, a turtle dove gracefuller.
SECOND CITIZEN.
In truth, my friend, he went up like a
heavy-winged
fowl, and I doubt not he will come
down like a night hawk by daylight.
CITIZEN.
Well, listenlisten, and no disparagements.
GLIB.
I say the lamplighters, upon th' alert,
Have sprung with all their 'customed
nimbleness
.
The watchmen, I repeat, the watchmen are
awake
,
Quite wide awake, (
great cheering
,) and if the
foe survive
Beyond the four-and-twenty hours now next
Ensuing, gauged by town-clock time, I pray
you
Call Slickson Glib, thenceforth, with my
consent
,
An owl, a blind bat, and no true prophet!
SCENE V.
The street
.
Various citizens, meeting
.
AN OLD CITIZEN.
This almost makes me young again, neigh
bor. It looks like twenty years agothis
enthusiasm
for a citizen's candidate.
SECOND CITIZEN.
Did you mark when the sky was overcast
this morning, how the sun shone on Crumb's
name on the banner, while all the rest was in
darkness?
OLD CITIZEN.
I did, and it's a sight I saw but once before
in my life, and that was when this old soldier
that voted to-day, was baptizedthe sun fell
through the upper church window on his white
old head, as he went down into the baptistry,
making a single golden spot in the midst of the
congregation.
SECOND CITIZEN.
He deserves the heavenly approval.He is
too pure-hearted to be made a tool of
politicians
;
and I was glad to see the old man,
when he approached the poll, cast off the
bandages
and patches they had thrust upon him,
pretending to draw down respect for his
veteran
services, by these signs, from the people.
When he learned there was a third ticket, he
exchanged his ballots at once, and voted for
Zachary Crumb.
THIRD CITIZEN.
I entered with a crowd of thirty, and when
they were asked, What ticket do you vote?
they all answered, like a corporation of
deacons
on a grant for new pew-cushions, Old
Crumb, and shook hands as if they had met
at a wedding.
OLD CITIZEN.
Yea, and I have seen old men like myself here
to-day, that have not cast a ballot before for the
last fifteen years. I have seen sick men, that
apparently tarried in the world but to deposite
a vote for Crumb, and young lads just of age,
(but who have been smiled on by this good man
when they have borne satchels at their sides)
hurry up as eagerly as if it were a holiday
business.
SECOND CITIZEN.
They say that when Brisk entered to give
his own vote, the eagle that his friends had
perched on a staff above the door, shrieked and
dropped his wings; but this I can scarcely
believe
,
although I know of my own
eye-knowledge
,
that a parrot which a sailor brought up
with him, when his master was solicited to vote
for Gudgeon, exclaimed, in answer for the
sailor, Not so green!
OLD CITIZEN.
The bird was figurative, of course, for I
marked the creature, and of a deeper literal
green was no parrot's jacket that I ever beheld.
That sailor, I think I was told, was one of a
crew of fifty that came in only last night from
the Friendly islands of the Pacific, and not one
failed the true ticket.
Enter a
Fourth Citizen.
FOURTH CITIZEN.
Cheerly, friends, cheerly: the Brisk men
and Gudgeonites begin to give way, and it's
said about the poll that Crumb has the day thus
far by a hundred!
OLD CITIZEN.
Let's hasten to the ground, and, while we
gather the rumor, give countenance to our
friends.
[
Exeunt
.
SCENE VI.
Blanding's apartments
.
Old Crumb
and
Blanding
.
CRUMB.
Well, Charles, how fares your wooing?
BLANDING.
Strangely enough: the more my proposed
father-in-law dotes on me as Jefferson Goss,
the more he detests me as Charles Blanding.
CRUMB.
So you are likely to succeed as a pretender,
and to come off poorly as a man of merit?
Isn't that the way of the world?
BLANDING.
I think it isand while I am allowed to eat
his cranberries and woodcock as the nephew of
a senator that has no existence, I am regaled
with curses as the child of my own mother.
CRUMB.
You are then faring admirably, I think, for
in either event, you will have your mistress:
if she marries you in the name of one of the
logical postulates, what matters it, so long as
she gets the person she likes.
BLANDING.
But I imagine she would scarcely be pleased
to open house with me in an upper cell of the
city prison, and receive her wedding calls in
the character of an indicted impostor's wife
with an alias!
CRUMB.
Have no fears of that!Do you rehearse the
character you have assumed, carefully? An
error in the keeping might be disastrous.
BLANDING.
I believe I am doing myself justice there, for
I read the Washington letter-writers every
morning for politics, and visit Delmonico's and
bully the waiters, to acquire the right style of
manners, in the afternoon.
CRUMB.
Do you, as the hypothetical great man's
nephew, disparage American institutions
steadily
when you are at Brisk's?
BLANDING.
No, I haven't brought myself to that
perfection
yet; but I speak contemptuously of
American
habits, intellect, society, commerce,
literature
,
and American things generally, which I
thought would answer the same purpose.
CRUMB.
Of course, you have not omitted a minute
biography of the imaginary senator?
BLANDING.
By no means; for although I treat every
other native production with contempt, I
always
speak of the senator with the utmost
reverence. I have given Brisk a particular
history of his early life and struggles, his labors
on a semi-weekly country newspaper, with a
circulation of nineteen paying subscribers
CRUMB.
Didn't you overstate the matter a little there?
BLANDING.
His first speech on the occasion of a
sheep-shearing
in the waters of a private pond, with
the great questions involved therein, which
were destined (as usual) to shake our
institutions
and jeopard the Union itself. Then I
described to him the style of the senator's
congressional
oratoryand how one day he came
into the senate chamber without an idea, and
spoke six hours on the establishment of a
college
for young Indians in Michiganand how,
when he was through, the audience were so
astonished at his fluency, they didn't recollect
a word he had said.
CRUMB.
This must have made a vast deal of dry
talking
for you.
BLANDING.
Not at all; for it was constantly moistened
with gentle showers of Madeira and perfect
love, and sustained by more solid supplies. In
fact, I relied on my appetite more than any
other single point, to establish my character;
and the more I devoured, the more Brisk's eyes
dilated with admiration of my supposed
connexion
with the distinguished senator.
CRUMB.
Well, brave it out, Charles, with a bold face
it pleases me to have this shrewd politician
outwitted so cheaply. All will end well, for
the charm is now brewingthis very hour
that shall give us the magician's voice over
the issues of this business.
[
Exeunt severally
.
SCENE VII.
A street near the poll
.
Gudgeon
and
Glib
,
meeting
.
GUDGEON.
As I told you, you will find a house in Cherry
street
GLIB.
Very likelyyou will find houses in every
street in the city, except the new-fangled
streets that are no streets, but two parallels of
speculative kerbstone.
GUDGEGN.
But listen to me, Mr. Glibtime presses.
It's a lodging-house (I forget the number),
with an exchange office at one side of it, and a
toy shop, a shop where they vend masks at the
other.
GLIB.
Why, this must be the church that you are
directing me to!for there you will find false
faces enough I'll warrant, and money-changers
too, at times. And I'm sure there's sufficient
sleeping done there to earn for it the character
of a lodging-house. So I have your direction.
What next?
GUDGEON.
If it were a church, it would not be a wrong
place, at a suitable season, to look for the man
to whom I send you: in a word, you must go
immediately and secure the vote of Bill Baffin,
the stevedore. He is sick, and I'd have you
treat him kindly.
GLIB.
It shall be done, sir; the old whale shall
flounder his vote in, if it's his last act.
GUDGEON.
Kindly, I say, Mr. Glib; but bring him by
all means. One vote may make or ruin us.
GLIB.
Oh, he shall come sir, if it's on crutches, and
if I am obliged to be as persuasive as Patrick
Henry. He shall come.
GUDGEON.
And after that, you will be good enough to
come to me at the public room, where I shall
be engaged buoying up our friends, and eating
burnt crackers and old cheese with the voters,
for effect.
[
Exeunt severally
.
SCENE VIII.
A sick chamber, Baffin in an armchair, &c.
BILL BAFFIN.
I am afraid my last hour is at hand; and the
old keel will have to be sunk in the earth for
ever, and left there to decay, like a dead root.
The sun goes fast; I begin to lose my
reckoning
,
and with the next round of the
time-keeper
,
I shall be counted with the ships that
have foundered. Well, wellwe'll trust yet
to the old Commander aloft.Who knocks?
In!
Enter
GLIB.
GLIB.
Ah! Mr Baffin, this is a sad pass for one of
your mould!the stoutest stevedore on the
river!
BAFFIN.
Ay, and the weakest on the deathbed.
GLIB.
Not so badnot so bad, I trust. But now
that I look in your eye, there
is
something that
shines like the next world. Anyhow, you
carry
a free heart out of this.
BAFFIN.
So I humbly hope.
GLIB.
Is there nothing on your mind? No single
act to be performed? No little duty
undischarged
?
BAFFIN.
None that my memory wots of. So help me
God, not one!
GLIB.
Nothing that you owe to your familyyour
fellow-citizensyour country?
BAFFIN.
Nothing!
GLIB.
Bethink yourselfthink of the present day
the present hour. Have you, for example,
deposited
your ballot?a sacred duty, remember.
BAFFIN.
Yes, with the sextonas a candidate for the
other world. Another knockwho can it be?
Come in!my friends increase toward the
extremity.
Enter
Crowder.
CROWDER.
Don't listen to that man, Mr. Baffin! I have
the true ticketHuman rights, sir!
GLIB.
Have at you, sir! mine is civil liberty!
CROWDER.
An unlimited democracy!
GLIB.
No taxes, pew-rents, ground-rents,
assessments
CROWDER.
Sumptuous accommodations for paupers.
GLIB.
A bill of special privileges for stevedores!
(
In Baffin's ear
)
Gudgeon has a job for you.
CROWDER.
(
Whispers
.)
The office of dockmaster.
Baffin
.
(
Springs up, and with his crutch
drives them from the room
.)
Out, ravens and sharks! Away with you,
and let me yield my breath in peace.
Glib
.
(
Returning
.)
Your vote is all-important; if your health
should improve before sundown, send us word,
and you shall have a coach to bring you to the
poll.
[
Exit
GLIB.
Crowder
.
(
Looks in
.)
Poor creature, he begins to flush!Dn
me, it's a vote lost.
[
Exit
CROWDER.
SCENE IX.
The open street
.
Brisk
and
Crowder
,
meeting, in haste
.
BRISK.
Have you brought up the shabby volunteers?
CROWDER.
I have, sir; and they all discharged their
oath like a drilled company of riflemen.
BRISK.
The wollopers and tag-end ragamuffins?
CROWDER.
Ay, sir; and they came into the poll like the
ghosts of so many pawnbrokers, with all their
stock-in-trade at their heels.
BRISK.
The man with the smallpox?
CROWDER.
No, but he is hard-by.
BRISK.
I think we had better throw him in.
Matters
look desperate, and a wholesome panic may
relieve us of superfluous voters on the other
sidefor it would surely have the effect to
scatter
Gudgeon's friends.
They
have prejudices
against contagion, whereas, our men, you know,
are smallpox-proof. You have not neglected
the suburbs, I trust.
CROWDER.
Hardly; we have depopulated two taverns
at the Wallabout; a naval force of six
oyster-boats
has landed from Staten island. We have
scoured Newtown creek and taken captive four
brace of honest countrymen, who are pledged
to swear their tickets through, with flying
excursions
,
from time to time, into Queens county
and the Jerseys.
BRISK.
There's a one-eyed man, that tends the
shot-tower
at Kipp's bay; I hope he'll not be
forgotten
.
He's generally overlooked on account
of his forlorn situation.
CROWDER.
Hadn't we better open a few fresh
brandy-bottles
at Works's? There's a danger of
faint-heartedness
coming on them toward night,
unless
some such thing is done.
BRISK.
By all means; and, if necessary, broach a
new barrel of beer. The chief of our work is
to be done in an hour. Strike swiftly, and let
every spigot tell on the canvass! In the
meantime
I'll go and talk Dutch with the German
voters, and O'hone a little with the Hibernians.
[
Exeunt severally
.
ACT V.
SCENE I.
An old Citizen and others, meeting in front of
Crumb's house
.
SECOND CITIZEN.
Well, the day is ours, and a brighter hasn't
left the sky since this island was parcelled into
wards!
OLD CITIZEN.
Only one brighter, I admit, and that was the
day George Washington crossed the river to
take the chief magistrate's oath. This is a true
and joyful day. I shall not scruple to put it in
the family-bible as a memorable day.
SECOND CITIZEN.
My girl, Mary, shall work it in a sampler, with
evergreens over the top, and a great lion
rushing
out of a corner to devour the sneaking
spotted
zebra that I will have her figure on the other
side of the sampler. And that shall denote that
the foul beast, the spotted knave of politics, is
K
whipped and vanquished, and the true-hearted
one, honest old Crumb, triumphant.
OLD CITIZEN.
I suppose the citizens will have a procession,
and, if they do, I'll lend them the old blade my
father wore at Yorktown, with a pair of
Hessian
boots, captured with his own hands from
the owner, to carry as trophies above their
banner!
THIRD CITIZEN.
I wonder whether Crumb is stirring?
FOURTH CITIZEN.
I think not; and if he were, he is but little
of a speaker, and would thank us silently; so
let us give a good round shout, and leave.
ALL.
Agreed!
[
They shout and retire
.
SCENE II.
In front of Brisk's house
.
BRISK.
Beaten!After all our stratagems and
schemings, the supper at Works's, the
slander
at the poll; after enlisting the uttermost
rank and file of the earth, invading the
canvass
with the halt, the blind, the dumb, and the
deaf, and threatening the inspectors themselves
with infectionbeaten!this is the very
condensed
abstract and story of the whole matter.
Enter
Crowder.
BRISK.
What say you to this, Crowder?
CROWDER.
I say it's the greatest damper that has
happened
since the flood.
BRISK.
I suppose it hasn't left you a cinder of spirit
to contest the matter further? You are
completely
quenched.
CROWDER.
Not altogether; I proposed to the committee
to battle it before the canvassers, but they
groaned at the suggestion like whipped hounds;
and, by the Lord, they are no better than curs,
or they would have made a rush for the
ballot-box
last night; the inspectors passed through a
by-street, and it might have been as easily done
as kissing a wench.
BRISK.
Fie, fie, Crowder!we must move gently;
anything but a misdemeanor or open breach of
law. You may scrawl on the glass as hard and
as hard words as you choose, but you shall not,
with my consent, make a flaw in it.
CROWDER.
The liberty-pole goes to the hammer at noon.
BRISK.
If that's all, let it pass; it's nothing but a
stick of timber.
CROWDER.
That's not all, for there's my assortment of
trumpets and banners, besides my extra
ward-robe
of electioneering coats with false pockets
and spread-eagle buttons; my crutches for
lame voters; a box of green shades for blind
ones, and my little book of facts in the private
history of politicians. That's the most cruel
levy.
BRISK.
How, in the name of secrecy, were these things
discovered by the officer?
CROWDER.
Why, the cursed rascal's a Gudgeonite, and
instead of making a front-door levy, as a
gentleman
should, the villain came in with his
execution
through the scuttle, and the first drag
he made was this precious cargo, which lay in
a pantry in the garret.
BRISK.
Unfortunate, very unfortunate, Crowder.
CROWDER.
Barbarous enough, and I'm now bankrupt;
for, with that book in my hand, I could make
myself acceptable to any set of politicians. But
my day's over; and now that I have exhausted
my lungs and my ingenuity, in this election, to no
purpose, I think I'll return to my original
vocation
,
of manufacturing bellows-snouts and
hoe-irons.
[
Retiring
.
BRISK.
I think you are well-advised in that. Politics
is, after all, a poor trade; but you shall always
have my custom, Crowder. I need a new snout
a year, and I have two country-brothers that
I have no doubt will take a hoe a-piece
annually
.
Good day.
[
Exit
CROWDER.
BRISK.
Now that clamorous Tom Crowder is
disposed
of, what shall we do with cunning Jack
Brisk? Is he on his backflat on his back,
think you? Cudgelled out of all his
contrivances
,
and beaten into the consistency of an addled
egghave his wits lost their saltness, and the
nimble blood that coursed through his brain
turned into ditch-water? Not exactlynot
altotogether
so. Zachary Crumb is aldermanold
Zachary Crumb, and if I do not cozen his
venerable
understanding to my purpose, call me a stale
herring. Why, hasn't he a vote in the
council-chambers
,
the same as if John Brisk himself
had been chosen? I'll be the master of that
vote, and, to gain that mastery, I'll humor the
old curmudgeon's whims. He wishes this
Blanding
to marry my daughter Kate; what
reasonable
objection can there be to that? Kate is
rich by legacy, and is destined to wed some poor
fellow without a farthing; and why not this
Blanding as well as another? He is
good-looking
,
they say, and accomplished. It seems
feasiblevery, extremely feasible. But there's
Mr. Gosshard to part with so distinguished a
connexion; but the gruff dog, self-interest,
shows his teeth, and we must part: I'll be
quits with him by a plausible letter.
[
Exit
BRISK.
SCENE III.
In front of Gudgeon's house
.
Gudgeon, Glib
,
and
Botch
.
GUDGEON.
I thought it ill-advisedextremely
ill-advised
,
not to allow me to exhibit my person
more prominently during the canvass. I am
satisfied it must have turned the tide.
BOTCH.
It was only regard for your personal safety
GUDGEON.
Regard for my personal safety, Botch! Stuff!
Have I not been called the fearless Gudgeon
by resolution of a public meetingand am I to
be prevented from throwing myself into bold
relief at a critical time? Who says that
Robert
Gudgeon should not have shown himself,
like a man, at every conspicuous point, instead
of being mewed up like a sick parrot, in a
scanty room to receive hourly reports of the
election?
GLIB.
If we had known that so much evangelical
spirit was in you, we could have made a St.
Stephen of you in a few minutes.
GUDGEON.
St. Stephen, St. Paul, and St.
Book-of-the-Acts
what
are they to me? I am a plain man
and no prophet, and, I can tell you this,
matters
would have had a different ending if I had
had my way.
GLIB.
Why, sir, you had your own way about the
walk with the drunkards, and I must confess
you made an admirable thing of it.
GUDGEON.
You think I didEh?
GLIB.
Most admirable: first, you were dressed in
capital taste; your glaring buttons made you a
mark a hundred yards off, and you shone like
Orion with his stars all about him; then, you
pitched this way and that way so excellently,
as your two friends swayed, that many thought
you all three a little in liquor.
GUDGEON.
That was goodvery good; but what did
they say of my mode of taking snuff, as we
turned the corner.
GLIB.
Admirable! They never saw a point more
nicely turned, than your emptying the contents
of the box into your own hand, and giving the
lid to one and the bottom to the other; it was
the best practical joke they had ever witnessed.
GUDGEON.
So I thought myself; but that affair of the
balcony was not managed as it should have
been. When they cheered for Gudgeon, I should
have stepped out and waved my hat; and when
they sent the oranges through the window, it
would have been proper for me to pick them
up and say, Thank ye, gentlemen, I'll
present
these to Mrs. Gudgeonfor that's the
way I understood it.
GLIB.
It was a mere trick of the enemy, to draw
you out and pelt you.
BOTCH.
And drench you, too; for I saw a great
two-handed
fellow with a huge syringe, loaded with
dyers' stuff
GUDGEON.
They would never have dared to do it. The
moment I had shown myself, they would have
quailed like tame rabbits. Depend on it, that
neglect at the balcony, and one or two like
points, have been the death of us; but I'll have
satisfaction of Brisk, in one way.
BOTCH.
Heavens! I wish that could be done!
GUDGEON.
Botch, it shall be done. I'll have Blanding
marry his daughter in spite of his teeth; and
that will play the mischief with his projects,
or I'm an ass! So Mrs. Gudgeon says.
[Exeunt.
SCENE IV.
Crumb's house
.
Crumb
and
Brisk
.
CRUMB.
This is certainly an age of miracles; for
instance
,
there is the old lady, my neighbor,
whose eyesight, that's been impaired these five
years, is so wonderfully improved by one of the
great oculists of the day, that she can now even
distinguish a bankrupt's carriage from the
poor-house
hearse, that's carrying his creditor to the
grave; an attorney from a tax-gatherer; an
officer
of police from a pickpocket, and a
physician
from a criminal convicted at the Oyer and
Terminer of a murder! And now, at the tail
of these wonders, comes John Brisk, and calls
me alderman, and gives me the pleasure of his
society as freely as a twin-brother.
BRISK.
I admit this is something out of the
customary
line of things; but it is as a brother, a
twin-brother, if you please, that I wait upon
you to-day.
CRUMB.
Well, here's a miracle greater than them all;
a politician, who but yesterday was as busy as
a pawnbroker's clerk putting out his greasy
boxcoats after the first cold nip in November,
and as noisy as the square a week after
quarter-day
,
when all the old furniture in the town
comes under the hammer to pay rentthis
self-same
roaring gentleman subsiding, to day, into
the twin-brotherwas it the twin-brother?
of a decayed old man! Oh! its enough to
burst one's heart with melancholy!
BRISK.
I hope you will be good enough to delay the
bursting for the present, for I wish to enlist it's
kind services in a business that I have very
near my own heart.
CRUMB.
In any such business, if you could satisfy me
of these conditions, I would be pleased to act.
BRISK.
It's a business of a delicate nature, sir, and
one in which you might scruple to be
employed
.
But it has agitated me a long time, and I
must move in it, or be miserable.
CRUMB.
If the difficulty has not been more than a
century growing, and be not larger than a
mountain in size, I think something may be
done.
BRISK.
May I depend on you, sir?as brother
depends
on brother?
CRUMB.
Perhaps you may.
BRISK.
It will require your whole ingenuity and
kindness steadily employed; in a word, (
whispering
)
I am anxious to bring about a union
between
my daughter, Miss Catharine Brisk, and
a young gentleman of great respectability, by
the name of Blanding.
CRUMB.
Are you assured of his respectability?
BRISK.
Of that, there can be no questionnot the
slightest.
CRUMB.
Of what family of Blandings is he? There
is an upper family of that name and a lower, I
think. With which does he class?
BRISK.
Upon my word, I never gave that a thought.
The young man's merit is so predominant, I
entirely
lost sight of every such consideration,
and if he had been born and reared in a cave,
it would not have struck me very forcibly.
CRUMB.
(
Pretending to remember
.)
Blanding, Blandingis his Christian name
Charles?
BRISK.
It is, sir, and I had hopes you might know
him; in fact, I had some indistinct recollection
of such a fact.
CRUMB.
Yes, yesyou have a sprightly memory, and
you should cultivate it. But what kind of
person
has this young gentleman? Is he comely?
BRISK.
Oh, exceeding comely.A picked man out of
a thousand: a broad manly chest, a clear bold
voice that rings like a trumpet, and a step and
gesture full of majesty. He looks like one of
the gods in the old painting.
CRUMB.
Hath he accomplishments?
BRISK.
There he lacks notfor on the flute, his
favorite
instrument, he plays ravishingly; every
breath is an achievement, and as you listen,
you regard his stick as sacred, like a fragment
of the cross, or a splinter brought from King
Solomon's temple. I do believe if he had been
Noah's grandson, and had played in the ark, it
would have gone far toward assuaging the wild
deluge.
CRUMB.
Now that you describe him so justly, I know
the young man well. Iwill move him to second
your wishes.
BRISK.
I shall be most happy.Be urgent, if you
please.
CRUMB.
I shall not neglect the proper means to
impress
on him the match you propose.
(
Aside
Particularly as his mind is already
unalterably
fixed in its favor.)
BRISK.
I shall regard it as a personal kindness of the
highest obligation.
CRUMB.
It shall be speeded.
BRISK.
And will never forget the debt.
CRUMB.
(
Aside
If I vote for your project in the
common
council. I shall be satisfied if he pays the
debt and relieves his memory of the burden of
recollecting it!) It shall be looked to on the
instant; and you shall be freed quickly from
your state of painful agitation. Sons-in-law
grow on every bush, and I will out at once, sir,
and pick one to your liking.
[
Exeunt severally
.
SCENE V.
The open street
.
Gudgeon
to him, Enter
Botch
.
BOTCH.
It's all arranged, sir; Goss is to marry Miss
Kate Brisk to-day at twelve; Tom Scissors, the
attorney, is to be trustee of the estate for her
benefit, and immediately after the deed is drawn
and the dinner over, they start for the capitol.
GUDGEON.
Mark my word, if I am Robert Gudgeon, and
not some impostor or other under that name, it
shall all be disarranged, and not a particle of
the whole matter shall fall out as you have
described it.
BOTCH.
That would truly be a marvel!
GUDGEON.
I grant you the parties shall be present at
Brisk's house as you have said, but there shall
be another there they have forgotten to invite;
and that will be Mrs. Margery Gudgeon, my
own spouse.
BOTCH.
That will make a very pretty little wedding
of it!
GUDGEON.
Yes, a very pretty little wedding, Botch, but
not exactly such a wedding as they
contemplate
.
The manner of it shall be thus: you
are to have my coach about the corner in the
neighborhood of Brisk'sthe corner with the
yellow frontprecisely at eleven.
BOTCH.
Am I to tell William to grain the horses
before
he comes out?
GUDGEON.
Yeslet them be well filled with oats, for
speed will be needful, and at the rendezvous
punctually as the hall gives out eleven.You
will be stationed in the baker's yard, and when
Mrs. Gudgeon shouts from Brisk's window,
you will rush along the church fence and order
William about with the carriage in front of
Brisk's door.
BOTCH.
This will be fine sportsomething should
come of all this shouting.
GUDGEON.
Something shall come of it, for I will rush
instantly up stairsbut after that I'll be
present
myself. Do you, Botch, be true to your
time, and you shall see the upshot.
[
Exit
GUDGEON.
BOTCH.
I think it will be worth something to see the
upshot of all this.I am to run along the
church fence and up the steepleno, not up
the steeple, Mrs. Gudgeon does the steeple,
and shouts from the window of Brisk's house;
and the coach-horses stuffed with oats run up
stairsor is it William that grains the horses
and Mr. Gudgeon that runs up stairs? No
matter, I'll see the right of it before it's ended!
[
Exit
BOTCH.
SCENE VI.
Brisk's house
.
Brisk
aloneEnter
Servant
.
SERVANT.
The gentleman with the large whiskers is
below again, sir.
BRISK.
I thought I had told you to reconnoitre
through the side-light, and not admit him.
SERVANT.
We did sir; but he took us by surprise, by
ringing like the penny-post; and now, sir, he's
making his way up stairs like the colossus of
Rhodes in the spelling-book.
[
Exit
SERVANT.
Enter
Blanding,
as
Jefferson Goss.
BLANDING.
Good morning to you, BriskUp with the
larkeh!That's your sorts. I wish I had a
brace of the sky-scrapers broiled for a luncheon.
BRISK.
Why, really, sir, this is an unexpected
pleasure
,
after the latters I sent you. You must
have received them, sir, for I sent them by my
attorney's clerk, and he carries as true as a
rifle. You must have misapprehended my
meaning, sir.
BLANDING.
Not at all, sirI wish to marry your
daughter; you wish your daughter to marry
meand she agrees with both of us.
BRISK.
You have misread my letter, sir. I there
stated, that I regretted that a prior engagement
prevented the honor of an alliance with you,
and that I wished you to present my respects
to your uncle, the senator, and name to him
in the kindest possible way, that when he came
in town to his public dinner, I would explain
the business to his satisfaction. Did you read
me so?
BLANDING.
Something facetious of that sort, I confess,
was handed to mebut it's all a joke, Brisk.
Now confess, Brisk, you wrote under the
influence
of excitementthe bottle, perhaps?
BRISK.
Under the influence of the bottle, sir! This
is too much for you, even with your great
connexions
.
Am I a dunghill fowl, that you fling
your spurs at me in this way? I'd have you
know the Brisks have blood, siryes, blood
blood; the Brisks of Bethpeg, sir, of Babylon,
Jerico, and Hempstead, have as good veins as
the president himself!
BLANDING.
But, sir, the fun of the thing
BRISK.
Dn the fun!
BLANDING.
And the senator's rage.
BRISK.
Dn the senator's rage!
BLANDING.
And my own feelings
BRISK.
Enter
Mrs. Gudgeon
at one side
, Kate Brisk
at the other
.
MRS GUDGEON.
Bless my stars! here they are, and the
diabolical
tragedy will be perpetrated in a
cock-crow
.
What a ferocious monster this Goss is!
I know him by the description. He looks for
all the world like a buffalo that the droviers
kept in my father's woods, and fed on acorns
and heifers' milk.I'll shout to Mr. Gudgeon.
(
Puts her head out at the window and calls
)
Gudgeon! Quick, or it will all be over
Gudgeon!
Enter
Crumb.
BRISK.
Good-morrow, Alderman Crumb.
CRUMB.
Good-morrow, sir.Ah! a happy day to you,
child. Blessed influences are abroad this
morning
and
depend on it, they will shine here
before
they set.
BRISK.
(
Aside
I wish I could get rid of this
fellow
,
GossHe has fixed himself upon me like
the stamp-act, and I'm afraid there'll be a devil
of an insurrection before he will quit the
country
.)
But where's the bridegroom? He travels
slower than his tribe, not to be here by this
time.
CRUMB.
Oh, sir, he will be here in good season, or
there's no attraction in two fair planets.
Astronomy
is at fault as well as witchcraft, if he
tarries beyond the putting on of a glove-finger,
or giving a new turn to his wedding-day smile
in the looking-glass(Blanding
removes his
whiskers, &c., while
Brisk's
back is towards
him
.) Behold him, sir!
BRISK.
Ah, son-in-law, I am happy, most sincerely
happy to see you. You need not blush, for you
have not come about a business that we do not
all understand, and take an interest in.
BLANDING.
Thank youMy old friend, here, has
explained
,
I presume.
BRISK.
Oh yes, he has explained all. Nothing could
more exactly meet my wishes. From this day
forth, I shall write myself down, the
contented
man.
CRUMB.
(
Aside
.)
If Greenwich lane cuts into the proper
avenue
!
Otherwisethe baffled manager!
Enter
Gudgeon
after him
, Botch.
GUDGEON.
(
Shouting
.)
I forbid the match; I forbid the match. It's
arson and burglaryHe has broken in and
stolen your daughter's affections, and he has
set fire to her poor heart as he went out. Goss
is an impostor, sir; it's a case for the police
court. Besides, there will be murder added,
for aught I know, for Botch, here, says poor
Blanding is pining this very minute in a
lone-some
attic, and does nothing all day, but wrap
his head in a cotton handkerchief, and write
sonnets and madrigals and pennyroyals.
BOTCH.
And I heard just now, as I came along, sir,
that the neighbors were afraid he meditated
something, because they have seen him several
nights looking out of the skylight at the moon,
and then running down the ladder and putting
his quill in swifter motion over foolscap paper,
than it ever had in the bird's wingeven when
the bird itself was out of its wits with fright
from a double-barrelled gun.
BRISK.
I knew something must come outI was
quite sure of it.Mr. Gudgeon, my intended
son-in-law, Charles Blanding.
GUDGEON.
Your intended son in-law! That was just
what I had my carriage got up forand a
chaplain
waiting at St. Thomas'sand Botch
running
about all the morning to effect: that very
connexion in the family.
MRS. GUDGEON.
There's witchcraft and petit larceny in this
business, as Mr. Gudgeon guessed: for Goss
was here a minute ago, and he has stolen off
with himself; and Blanding wasn't here a
minute
ago, and he has come out of the earth, like
Samuel's ghost for the witch of Endor.
CRUMB.
A very pretty witch of Endor, too, you must
allow, has conjured him up: but there's no
ghost here, Mr. Briskso don't trembleit's
only the senator's nephew.
KATE.
Nor any Charles Blanding: one of the Gosses
of Cross River, Mrs. Gudgeon. You are as
familiar with him as a blood relation; but it
must be very cold blood, for he has almost
petrified you.
MRS. GUDGEON.
Now, Kate, I knew all the timethere was
something about the eyes that said they didn't
belong to that family. I suspected it was
Charles Blanding, all the time.
BLANDING.
Will it be worth while, Mr. Brisk, to deliver
this letter to the senatorwhen I see him?
BRISK.
Yeswhen you see him: for I suppose he is
as imaginary as his own nephew.I deserve
to be buried in lead for my stupidity in not
seeing
through this before; but it was your
voracity
at the table that deceived meI confided
in that to establish your character. It might
have deluded any one into the belief in your
congressional connexionsmight it not, Mr.
Crumb?
CRUMB.
It might unquestionably; particularly if, as
Blanding informs me, he was vociferous about
port wine and canvass-backs.
BRISK.
Yes, and Long Island cranberries in the bed
or in hothouses? and mutton raised on the
senator's farm. That overturned my sagacity,
I admit: it was enough, you must all confess
for was there ever an American great man,
that hadn't his flocks of Merinoes and Durhams
and Derbyshireshis long naps and short naps,
as well as his public dinners and premeditated
extemporaneous speeches!
MRS. GUDGEON.
Happiness be with you, children! and that
you may start with the true principle of
matrimony
compromiseI
shall make Mr. Gudgeon
let you have his snug two-storied house in the
suburbs, where you, Kate, can look out upon
green fields, grasshoppers, and chirping birds,
and rivulets; and you, Charles, by mounting
to the upper windows or the roof, can catch
frequent glimpses of city buildings, citizens, and
gashouse smoke, and can even steal a glance
into Broadway and its fantastic crowds. On
the one side you will be visited by the farmer
with fresh eggs and asparagus, and on the other
by the taxgatherer with his annual demand, and
the captain's orderly with his half-yearly notice
of parade.
BRISK.
And to be able to entertain these gentleman,
and others of their fraternity, such as duns and
milliners, Kate shall be invested with her own
property forthwith. Glib shall prepare the
papers.
CRUMB.
It would be unkind to have Mr. Gudgeon's
morning industry count for nothing, so with his
consent we will call his carriage, which I saw
at the corner, pack our party in, and relieve
the chaplain at St. Thomas's from the painful
state of suspense which he must be in by this
time; unless the fee was paid in advance.
GUDGEON.
I took that precaution, sir.
BRISK.
That was lucky, and we shall all be happy
without a drawback.
CRUMB.
And now I think, we are all agreed on one
point;whatever wranglings or differences
may distract houses of congress or legislature,
may the debates of this young house be always
kindly, and have happy issues! Whatever
suffrages
may be cast for other
Politicians
out
of doors, may we always have your votes
(
to
the audience
)
at the end of the evening's
canvass
in favor of the candidates we venture to
present.
THE END OF THE POLITICANS.POEMS ON MAN,
IN HIS VARIOUS ASPECTS UNDER
THE AMERICAN REPUBLIC.
I
THE CHILD.
Calm
, in thy cradle lie, thou little Child,
Thy white limbs smoothing in a patient sleep,
Or, gambolling when thou wakest at the peep
Of the young dayas clear and undefiled
As thou! Around thy fresh and lowly bed
Look up and see, how reverent men are
gathered,
In wonder at a babe so greatly fathered
Into life, and so by influence fed.
They watch the quiet of thy deep blue eye
Where all the outward world is born anew,
Where habit, figure, form, complexion, hue
Rise up and live again in that pure sky;
At every lifting of thine arms, they feel
The ribbed and vasty bulk of Empire shake,
And from the fashion of thy features take
The hope and image of the common-weal.
See! through the white skin beats the ruddy tide!
The pulses of thine heart, that come and go,
Like the great circles of the ocean-flow,
And dash a continent at either side.
Thou wield'st a hopeful Empire, large and fair,
With sceptred strength: about thy brow is set
A fresh glad crown, with dewy morning wet,
And noon-day lingers in thy flaxen hair!
Kingdom, authority and power to thee
Belong; the hand that frees, the chain that
thralls
Each attribute on various man that falls,
Strides he the globe, or canvass-tents the sea:
The sword, the staff, the judge's cap of death,
The ruler's robe, the treasurer's key of gold,
All growths the world-wide scope of life
may hold,
Are formed in thee and people in thy breath.
Be stirred or still, as prompts thy beating heart!
Out of thy slumbering calmness there shall
climb,
Spirits serene and true against the Time
That trumpets men to an heroic part;
And motion shall confirm thee, rough or mild
For the full sway that unto thee belongs,
In the still house or 'mid the massy throngs
Of lifethou gentle and thou sovereign Child!
II.
THE FATHER.
Behold
thyself renewed! But think not there
A slave or suppliant lies; nor on him bow
Thy curious looks, as if another heir
Had sprung to bear about thy civil brow
In public streetsthy sober suit to wear:
In all things to obey, in all to trust
And, when thy time has past and his ensues,
Ape-like to track thee downward in the dust.
See, rather, from the little lids looks out
A soul distinct and sphered, its own true star,
Shining and axled for a separate way,
Be its young orbit's courses near or far.
His little hands uplifted for his right
To have an individual life allowed
Implore of men, of men, from thee the first,
The freedom by his birth-right hour bestowed.
Check not, nor hamper with an idle chain,
With customs harsh, of a loose leisure grown,
With habitudes of craft, of health or pain
The youngling life that asks to be its own:
His early friend, his helper and his guide
To stay his hold upon the rugged way
Turn not that life-branch from the sun or shade
aside,
But in heaven's breezes, rather, let it go
astray.
Be thou a Heaven of truth and cheerful hope,
Clear as the clear, round midnight at its full;
And he, the Earth beneath that elder cope
And each 'gainst each for highest mastery pull:
The child and father, each shall fitly be
Hope in the evening vanward paling down,
The onethe other younger Hope upspringing,
With the glancing morning for its crown.
There is no tyranny in truest love,
Nor rightful mastery in triumphant force;
And gentleness at hearth and board will prove
Felicity is born of their divorce:
Father and Child, the after and before,
Latest or first, whatever matters it?
Of mutual hopes, of mutual fears and loves,
Rounded and firm, their strands of life are
knit.
III.
THE TEACHER.
With
reverent steps approach the soul that lies
Before thee, rude, unformed and full of life;
A chaos shrouding up a future world
To order bornyet with itself at strife.
Peer for a while within the dark domain,
And see how temples mighty spring to sight,
Arks, palacesall dead or living things
Doomed to climb up into the Heaven's light,
To heap the Earth or sail the outward Sea;
The giant mass of things to come at large,
Hovering about and shaping silently
Within that baby soul's unquiet marge.
[3]
[3]
And in such indexes.....
...... there is seen
The baby figure of the giant mass
Of things to come at large.
Troil. and Cressid
.
In beauty shall that fresh-girt spirit build?
Shall harmony through all its chambers sing
While rising day by day, and pile on pile,
Its topless worlds of heaven-ward wonders
spring?
Say thouthat broodest on its infant breast!
Whose eyes cry light through all its
dawning
void
Or, with a double darkness would invest
Young thoughts, on labor without hope
employed.
'Tis there the truest work Earth knows is done
Each hour, each instant buys the world an age
With glory bright: knits up its golden peace,
Or rends the web of time with endless rage.
Bend to the Teacher, bend, oh world, thy knees!
And pray him, blessed God's name, to be true!
Lest he for ever break that spirit's precious
peace,
And following millions in its fall undo.
A consecrated manthou man of thought
Keep clear thy master-soul in every act,
And be thy features pure as early light
Crossing in power that spirit's undimmed
tract.
The world's dust ever shake from off thy feet,
When drawest thou to that white temple near,
Nor vex its amber cope with words unmeet
Of hate, or anger harsh, or unblest fear.
Listen the way the spirit seeks to go
And watch its sacred steps, or firm or frail;
Haste not its pace, nor hinder it the path
Smiling or sad, in changeful mirth or wail,
Remember, thou art standing by thy God!
Ere Earth has soiled his beauty, touched his
strength:
'Tis there th' Almighty makes his sweet abode;
And there, if undisturbed, would Heaven at
length
Take up and fix its everlasting rest:
Yea, Heaven with these, its children, fain
would dwell,
And, far-withdrawn within their stainless
breast,
Deliver thence, at times, a blessd oracle.
IV.
THE CITIZEN.
With
plainness in thy daily pathway walk
And disencumbered of excess: no other
Jostling, servile to none, none overstalk,
For, right and left, who passes is thy brother.
Let him who in thy countenance looks,
Find there in meek and softened majesty,
Thy Country writ, thy Brother and thy God;
And be each motion, forthright, calm and free.
Feel well with the poised ballot in thy hand,
Thine unmatched sov'reignty of right and
wrong
'Tis thine to bless, or blast the waiting land,
To shorten up its life or make it long.
Who looks on thee, not hopeless, should behold,
A self-delivered, self-supported Man;
True to his being's mighty purposetrue
To a wisdom-blesseda god-given plan.
No where within the great globe's skyey round
Canst thou escape thy duty, grand and high,
A man unbadged, unbonneted, unbound
Walk to the Tropicto the Desert fly.
A full-fraught Hope upon thy shoulder leans,
And beats with thine, the heart of half the
world;
Ever behind thee walks the shining Past,
Before thee burns the star-stripe, high
unfurled.
V.
THE FARMER.
Full
master of the liberal soil he treads,
With none to tithe, to crop, to third his beds
Of ripely-glowing fruit or yellow grain
He knows what freedom is; undulled of pain
Looks on the sun and on the wheatfield looks,
Each glad and golden in the other's view;
Or, on the meadow listening to the sky
That bids its grasses thrive with starry dew.
To him there come in such still places,
Undimmed, majestical and fresh as life,
The elder forms, the antique mighty faces
Which shone in council, stood aloft in strife
When went the battle, billowy, past;
When high the standard to the sky was raised;
When rushed the horsemen with the rushing
blast,
And the red sword through shrouded valleys
blazed.
When Cities rising shake th' Atlantic shore
Thou mighty Inland, calm with plenteous
peace,
Oh temper and assuage the wild uproar,
And bring the sick, vexed masses balmy ease.
On their red vision like an angel gleam,
And angel-like be heard amid their cries
Till they are stilled as is the summer's stream,
Majestical and still as summer skies.
When cloud-like whirling through the stormy
State
Fierce Revolutions rush in wild-orbed haste,
On the still highway stay their darkling course,
And soothe with gentle airs their fiery breast;
Slaking the anger of their chariot-wheels
In the cool flowings of the mountain brook,
While from the cloud the heavenward prophet
casts
His mantle's peace, and shines his better look.
Better to watch the live-long day
The clouds that come and go
Wearying the heaven they idle through,
And fretting out its everlasting blue
Than prowl through streets and sleep in
hungry dens
The beast should own, though known and
named as men's;
Though sadness on the woods may often lie,
And, wither to a waste the meadowy land
Pure blows the airand purer shines the sky,
For nearer always to Heaven's gate ye stand!
VI.
THE MECHANIC.
O, when
thou walkest by the river's brink,
Thy bulky figure outlined in the wave,
Or, on thine adze-staff resting, 'neath the ship
Thy strokes have shaped, or hear'st thou
loud and brave
The clangor of the boastful forgeThink not
To strength of limb, to sinews large and tough,
Are given rights masterless and vantage-proof,
The sad, pale scholar and his puny hand
Idling his thoughts upon the idle sand,
May not possess as full: oh, maddened, drink
not
With greedy ear what selfish Passion pours:
His a sway peculiar is, no less than yours.
The inner world is his; the outer thine
(And both are God's)a world, maiden and
new,
To shape and finish forth, of iron and wood,
Of rock and brass, to fashion, mould and
hew
In countless cunning forms to re-create
Till the great God of order shall proclaim
it Good!
Proportioned fair, as in its first estate.
Let consecrate, whate'er it strikes, each blow
From the small whisper of the tinkling smith,
Up to the big-voiced sledge that heaving slow
Roars 'gainst the massy bar, and tears
Its entrail, glowing, as with angry teeth
Anchors that hold a world should thus-wise
grow.
In the First Builder's gracious spirit work,
Through hall, through enginery, and temples
meek,
In grandeur towered, or lapsing, beauty-sleek,
Let order and creative fitness shine:
Though mountains are no more to rear,
Though woods may rise again no more;
The noble task to re-produce is thine!
The spreading branchthe firm-set peak may
live
With thee, and in thy well-sped labors thrive.
The untried forces of the air, the earth, the sea,
Wait at thy bidding: oh, compel their powers
To uses holy! Let them ever be
Servants to tend and bless these new-found
bowers;
And make them household workers, free and
swift,
On daily useon daily service bent:
Her face again old Eden may uplift,
And God look down the open firmament.
VII.
THE MERCHANT.
Who
gathers income in the narrow street,
Or, climbing, reaps it from the roughening
sea
His anchor Truth should fixshould fill his
flowing sheet,
His weapon, helm and staff the Truth should
be.
Wrought out with lies each rafter of thine house,
Black with the falsehood every thread thou
wearest
A subtle ruin, sudden overthrow,
For all thy household's fortune thou preparest.
Undimmed the man should through the trader
shine,
And show the soul unbabied by his craft:
Slight duties may not lessen but adorn,
The cedar's berries round the cedar's shaft.
The pettiest act will lift the doer up,
The mightiest cast him swift and headlong
down;
If one forget the spirit of his deed,
The other wears it as a living crown.
A grace, be sure, in all true duty dwells;
Humble or high, you always know it thus,
For beautiful in act, the foregone thought
Confirms its truth though seeming-ominous.
Pure hands and just, may therefore, well be laid
On duties daily as the air we breathe;
And Heaven amid the thorns of harshest Trade
The laurel of its gentlest love may wreathe.
VIII.
THE SOLDIER.
With
grounded arms, and silent as the
mountains
,
Pause for thy quarrel at the marbled sea:
And, when comes the ship o'er the curled wave
bounding,
Remember that a brother in a foe may be.
Thy battles are not wars but self-defences,
Girding this Universal Home about
Least lion-wrong and subtle-fanged pretences
Pierce to its heart and let the life-hope out.
Though sleeps the war-blade in the amorous
sheath,
And the dumb cannon stretches at his
leisure
When strikes the shore a hostile foot
out-breathe
Ye grim, loud gunsye fierce swords work
your pleasure!
And sternly, in your stubborn socket set,
For life or deathyour hilt upon the
stead-fast
land,
Your glance upon the foe, thou sure-set bayonet,
Firm 'gainst a world's shock in your
fastness
stand!
This, this, remember still, thou son of war
The child of peace within his doorway seated
Thine equal isthough beats the luring drum
afar,
Or flies the meteor column, battle-heated.
Lo, in the calmness of that silent man,
And in the peaceful sky-arch o'er him
bending,
A pure reposea more triumphal span
Than sees the death-field 'mid its storms
ascending.
IX.
THE STATESMAN.
Up
to the Capitol who goes, a heart
Should bear, state tyranny may not subdue:
Wakening at dawn to fill its ample part,
It, ever, day by day, grows fresh and new,
Nor sleeps through the mid-watches of the night,
Though there the thankless world has left
its smart
Without some visions, beckoning and bright,
That make him gladly to his bedside start.
Accursed who on the Mount of Rulers sits
Nor gains some glimpses of a fairer day!
Who knows not there, what there his soul befits,
Thoughts that leap up and kindle far away
The coming time! Who rather dulls the ear
With brawling discord and a cloud of words;
Owning no hopeful object, far or near,
Save what the universal self affords.
He that with sway of empire would control
The various millions, parted or amassed,
Should hold in bounteous fee, an ample soul
Equal the first to know, nor less the last.
At once whose general eye surveys as well
The rank or desert wastethe golden field;
Whose feet the mountain and the valley tread,
Nor ever to the trials of the way will yield.
Deeper to feel, than quickly to express
And then alone in the consummate act
Reaps not the ocean, nor the free air tills,
But keeps within his own peculiar tract:
Confirms the State in all its needful right,
Nor strives to draw within its general
bound
For gain or loss, for glory or distress,
The rich man's hoard, the poor man's patchy
ground.
Strip from the trunk that props the empire up,
All weeds, all flowers that hide the simple
shaft:
Plain as the heavens and pure as mid-day light
Swell up its ample cope: nor there ingraft
A single leaf nor draw a single line
To daze the eye, to coax the grasper's hand;
Simple it roseso simple let it rise
For ever, changeless simple let it stand!
X.
THE FRIEND.
In
fortune, quality and temper mated
Let spirit, spirit chooseeach suited best
To th' other's moving mind or mind at rest;
In kinship nearer than red blood related.
No castled shadow falls upon the heart,
Darkening two faces each turned unto the
other,
No lowly roof shuts in or out the heart's
true brother:
Life deals to each, with equal chance, an equal
part.
With mutual talkof kingdoms past and gone,
Of Rome republic-strong, and emperored
Rome,
Of Venice in her heart-struck days of doom
Old Israel pure, and scarlet Babylon;
Of muniments to guard a free-born State,
And ships built proof against the world's
worst shock,
Of battles won, white-handed peace to rock
The coming age,they share a mutual fate.
Sweet is the counsel of two noble souls!
Where sleeps no lie of thought with art
concealed
Beneath the blood, nor in the face revealed:
Friendship goes oftenest down on secret shoals!
XI.
THE PAINTER.
A spirit
moving through the Universe,
On Heaven's errand or his own Nature's
pure behest,
Would feed the beauty of his living wings
On the free air, and on the sunset bright
And on the dawning morn; should a later quest
Detain him far through the heart of night,
Some darker tints might creep across the light,
Or a chill splendor, of the moonbeams born,
Dying in gloom or wakening into morn.
Lighting by chance amid the haunts of men
Though yearning to get purely forth again
Their dusty shouts would not sully, but renew
Rather, the glory when it had wandered through.
To pause beneath a mountain, should he choose,
Its shadows would be portion of the many
hues:
And, up returning to his hearth-sky post,
And, dwelling, once again, within his
native coast,
The mountain and the sea, the setting sun,
The storm, the face of men, and the calm moon
Would live again upon the pictured vans and
in the glowing crest
Of that High Spirit, moving or at rest.
Be, thou, oh Painter, various, pure and free,
As Heaven's boundless and wide-wingd
minister:
Moving abroad, thy spirit let confer
With whispering beauty, born of Earth, of
Air or Sea.
Look on the earth that breaks about thy feet,
In valleys and in mountains starry:
Look on the woods, amid whose colored bowers,
The dark bright seasons, else departed, tarry.
See Heaven shining through the pale blue sky
On some fair day of dreamy summer,
Smiling upon a gentle hour just dead,
Or kindling welcome for a gentler comer.
Are there no spirits, kin to light and beauty,
Springing to cheer these sweet and suited
haunts?
Faces of love and forms of eldest duty,
Which, unexpressed, the soul thereafter
pants?
Fill thou, the mansion of thy Father-land
With hues to gladden in its hours of need,
With glancing shapes that every fairness
breed,
And pour a larger life from thy creative hand!
XII.
THE SCULPTOR.
Leap
up into the light, ye living Forms!
And plant 'mid men your birthright feet;
Angry and fierce as the maned thunder's storms,
And as the lightning beautiful and fleet.
Of quick and thoughtful souls the truest
thoughts,
Born of the marble at Heaven's happy hour
Ye blessed Realities! who strike the doubts
Begot of speech, dumb, with your better
power.
Human and life-like with no sense of pain,
Come forth, crowned heroes of the early age,
Chieftain and soldier, senator and sage
Benignant, wise and brave again!
Would the soul clothe itself in elder gloom
Let stand upon the cliff and in the shadowy
grove,
The tawny ancient of the warrior race,
With dusky limb and flushing face,
Diffusing Autumn through the stilly place
For battle stern, or soothed for love.
Or should a spirit of a larger scope
Seek to express itself in sacred stone:
Cast, life-long, on the mountain-slope
Or seat upon the starry mountain-cone,
Colossal and resigned, the gloomy gods
Eying at large their lost abodes,
Towering and swart and knit in every limb,
With brows on which the tempest lives,
With eyes wherein the past survives;
Gloomy and battailous and grim.
Think not too much what other climes have
done,
What other ages: with painful following,
weary,
Each step thou takest darkens thy natural sun,
And makes thy coming course, thy by-gone,
dreary.
Let the soul in thee lift its awful front,
Facing the Universe that stands before it;
Beaten by day and night and tempests' brunt,
All shapesall glorious passions shall cross
o'er it.
Forth from their midst some forms will leap
That other souls have never disencumbered,
And up shall spring through all the broad-set
land,
The fair white people of thy love unnumbered.
XIII.
THE JOURNALIST.
As
shakes the canvass of a thousand ships,
Struck by a heavy land-breeze, far at sea
Ruffle the thousand broad-sheets of the land,
Filled with the people's breath of potency;
A thousand images the hour will take,
From him who strikes, who rules, who speaks,
who sings;
Many within the hour their grave to make
Many to live, far in the heart of things.
A dark-dyed spirit he who coins the time,
To virtue's wrong, in base disloyal lies
Who makes the morning's breath, the evening's
tide,
The utterer of his blighting forgeries.
How beautiful who scatters, wide and free,
The gold-bright seeds of loved and loving
truth!
By whose perpetual hand, each day, supplied
Leaps to new life the empire's heart of youth.
To know the instant and to speak it true,
Its passing lights of joy, its dark, sad cloud,
To fix upon the unnumbered gazers' view,
Is to thy ready hand's broad strength allowed.
There is an in-wrought life in every hour,
Fit to be chronicled at large and told
'Tis thine to pluck to light its secret power,
And on the air its many-colored heart unfold.
The angel that in sand-dropped minutes lives,
Demands a message cautious as the ages
Who stuns, with dusk-red words of hate, his ear,
That mighty power to boundless wrath
enrages.
Hell not the quiet of a Chosen Land,
Thou grimy man over thine engine bending;
The spirit pent that breathes the life into its
limbs,
Docile for love is tyrannous in rending,
Obey, Rhinoceros! an infant's hand,
Leviathan! obey the fisher mild and young,
Vexed Ocean! smile, for on thy broad-beat
sand
The little curlew pipes his shrilly song.
XIV.
THE MASSES.
When
, wild and high, the uproar swells
From crowds that gather at the set of day;
When square and market roar in stormy play,
And fields of men, like lions, shake their fells
Of savage hair; when, quick and deep, call
out the bells
Through all the lower Heaven ringing,
As if an earthquake's shock
The city's base should rock,
And set its troubled turrets singing:
Remember, Men! on massy strength relying,
There is a heart of right
Not always open to the light,
Secret and still and force-defying.
In vast assemblies calm, let order rule,
And, every shout a cadence owning,
Make musical the vexed wind's moaning,
And be as little children at a singing-school.
But, when, thick as night, the sky is crusted o'er,
Stifling life's pulse and making Heaven an
idle dream,
Arise! and cry, up through the dark, to God's
own throne:
Your faces in a furnace glow,
Your arms uplifted for the death-ward blow
Fiery and prompt as angry angels show:
Then draw the brand and fire the thunder-gun!
Be nothing said and all things done!
Till every cobwebbed corner of the
common-weal
Is shaken free, and, creeping to its scabbard
back the steel,
Let's shine again God's rightful sun!
XV.
THE REFORMER.
Man
of the Future! on the eager headland
standing,
Gazing far off into the outer sea,
Thine eye, the darkness and the billows rough
commanding,
Beholds a shore, bright as the Heaven itself
may be;
Where temples, cities, homes and haunts
of men,
Orchards and fields spread out in orderly
array,
Invite the yearning soul to thither flee,
And there to spend in boundless peace its
happier day,
By passion and the force of earnest throught,
Borne up and platformed at a height,
Where 'gainst thy feet the force of earth and
heaven are brought;
Yet, so into the frame of empire wrought,
Thou, stout man, can'st not thence be severed,
Till ruled and rulers, fiends or men, are taught
And feel the truths by thee delivered.
Seize by its horns the shaggy Past,
Full of uncleanness; Heave with mountain
cast,
Its carcase down the black and wide abyss
That opens day and night its gulfy precipice,
By faded empires, projects old and dead
For ever in its noisy hunger fed:
But rush not, therefore, with a brutish blindness
Against the 'stablished bulwarks of the world;
Kind be thyself although unkindness
Thy race to ruin dark and suffering long,
has hurled.
For many days of light, and smooth repose,
Twixt storm and weathery sadness
intervene
Thy course is Nature's; on thy triumph flows,
Assured, like hers, though noiseless and
serene.
Wake not at midnight and proclaim the day,
When lightning only flashes o'er the way:
Pauses and starts and strivings towards an end,
Are not a birth, although a god's birth they
portend.
Be patient therefore like the old broad earth
That bears the guilty up, and through the
night
Conducts them gently to the dawning light
Thy silent hours shall have as great a birth!
XVI.
THE POOR MAN.
Free
paths and open tracts about us lie,
'Gainst Fortune's spite, though deadliest to
undo:
On him who droops beneath the saddest sky,
Hopes of a better time must flicker through.
No yoke that evil hours would on him lay,
Can bow to earth his unreturning look;
The ample fields through which he plods his way
Are but his better Fortune's open book.
hough the dark smithy's stains becloud his
brow,
His limbs the dank and sallow dungeon claim;
The forge's light may take the halo's glow,
An angel knock the fetters from his frame.
In deepest needs he never should forget
The patient Triumph that beside him walks,
Waiting the hour, to earnest labor set,
When, face to face, his merrier Fortune talks.
Plant in thy breast a measureless content,
Thou Poor Man, cramped with want or
racked with pain,
Good Providence, on no harsh purpose bent,
Has brought thee there, to lead thee back
again.
No other bondage is upon thee cast [hand;
Save that wrought out by thine own erring
By thine own act, alone, thine image placed
Poorest or President, choose thou to stand.
A mana man through all thy trials show!
Thy feet against a soil that never yielded
Other than life, to him that struck a rightful blow
In shop or street, warring or peaceful-fielded!
XVII.
THE SCHOLAR.
Bosomed
in peace and far apart from crowds
Who sits till hands grow wan and eyes grow
dim,
Pausing his pulse and stirring not a limb,
Though paling fast toward the dead man's
shrouds?
'Tis thou, 'tis thouthou foolish scholar's
heart [flows,
Forgetting round thee what a world there
How, ever in and out, its mighty eddy goes
And yet thou sittest on its edge, so still, apart.
Who thinks that dull dead books have deepest
life,
Calls them by names of awed delight or
gladness, [ness,
With one or other argues with a joyful mad-
And with the tidiest pillows for a wife?
Oh, thou poor, idle moon-struck heart of youth
Has the keen air no better wit brought to thee;
This folly in this land will sure undo thee
In spite of nobleness and worth, of gentlest truth!
Go cast these follies in the barren sea:
Seal up, for ever seal, the hateful leaves,
And turn thine eyes where light no more
bereaves [free.
Their orbs, and lift thine arms up strong and
Away, away all gentle thoughts shall glide,
All happiest fancies night or morning born;
It may be thou wil't feel awhile forlorn,
And drop, one day, unmissed, beneath the
hurrying tide!
XVIII.
THE PREACHER.
Ever
aslant the sky behold a shape,
Leaning at length upon the mastered air!
Man-like in form and yet divinely fair,
About his head a golden glory glows,
And fair as morning every feature shows.
His feet are toward the earth, and upward
thrown
His stretched and yearning arms appeal to God;
With God he talks at that far heightwith
God alone.
Athwart all troubles of the day or night or
clouds, [tempest's shrouds
Athwart eclipse of sun or moon, or the dun
Behold that radiant figure streaming,
'Twixt Earth and Heaven, and Heaven and
Earth, [infant at its birth,
An angel mightymeek as the swathed
All the mid-region from its gloom redeeming.
'Tis Christ, 't is sacred Christ who there is
beaming. [ple-wall
Oh, ye who sentried stand upon the tem-
Holy, and nearer to the glory's golden fall
Moon-like possess and shed at large its rays
The wide world knitting in a web of light,
Whose every thread the gladd'ning truth
makes bright;
Peace, love and universal brotherhood,
Good will to man and faith in God the good.
Withered be he, the false one of the brood,
Who, husbandman of evil, scatters strife,
Brambling and harsh, upon the field of life:
But deeper cursed whose secret hand
Plucks on to doom the safeguards of the land,
Freedom, and civil forms and sacred Rights
That conscience owns: he, conscience-stung,
who plights
His voice 'gainst these, should sheer-down fall
From off the glory of the temple-wall,
Smitten by God as false to truth and love
And all the sacred links that bind the heavens
above
And man beneath: a withered Paul,
Apostleless, beyond recall!
Rather, with blessings and the bonds of life
Let Heaven's good workman bind together
The house that roofs us on this dear, dear plot
of earth,
An arbor in the genial sun,
A stronghold in the tyrannous weather:
Kindly and loving brothren every one,
All equalall alike who thither tend,
Where all may dwell together without end
And as our course must be, so let it be begun.
But shrink not, therefore, from the coward age,
That shows, in mockery shows, its hideous
face at times, [sabbath-chimes;
And crosses with its cursed din the very
O, smite and buffet with a holy rage
Its brassy cheeks and brow of icy coldness
Dash and confound it with the storm-cloud's
boldness [trembles,
That frowns and speaks till every house-roof
And face to face no more dissembles
The God-fear coiled within the crusted heart!
Brandish the truth and let its four-edged dart
Cut to the quick, and, cut through every armor,
Unbosom to the light the Satan-charmer!
Ye holy Voices sphered in middle air!
Lower than angels, nor as they so fair,
Yet quiring God's behest with truth and
power
Pitch your blest speech, or high or low,
That angels may its language own and know,
Through the round Heaven to which it rises,
And ever on the earth may fall in glad surprises,
The spring-sweet music of a sudden shower.
Heaven shall bless thee and the earth shall
bless,
And up through the close, dark death-hour
thou shall spring [wing
With fragrant parting, and heaven-cleaving
To ask, nor ask in vain, thy Christ's caress!
XIX.
THE POET.
The
mighty heart that holds the world at full,
Lodging in one embrace the father and the
child,
The toiler, reaper, sufferer, rough or mild,
All kin of earth, can rightly ne'er grow dull;
For on it tasks, in this late age, are laid
That stir its pulses at a thousand points;
Its ruddy haunts a thousand hopes invade,
And Fear runs close to smutch what Hope
anoints.
On thee, the mount, the valley and the sea,
The forge, the field, the household call on thee.
Menbountiful as trees in every field,
Menstriving each, a separate billow, to be
seen,
Mento whose eyes a later truth revealed
Dazzling, cry out in anguish quick and keen,
Ask to be championed in their newborn thoughts,
To have an utterance adequate and bold
Ask that the age's dull sepulchral stone
Back from their Saviour's burial-place be
rolled:
All pressing to be heardall lay on thee
Their cause, and make their love the joyful fee.
There sits not in the wildernesses' edge,
In the dusk lodges of the wintry North,
Nor crouches in the rice-field's slimy sedge
Nor on the cold, wide waters ventures forth
Who waits not in the pauses of his toil,
With hope that spirits in the air may sing;
Who upward turns not, at propitious times,
Breathless, his silent features listening:
In desert and in lodge, on marsh and main,
To feed his hungry heart and conquer pain.
To strike or bear, to conquer or to yield,
Teach thou! O, topmost crown of duty, teach
What fancy whispers to the listening ear,
At hours, when tongue nor taint of care
impeach
The fruitful calm of greatly silent hearts;
When all the stars for happy thought are set,
And, in the secret chambers of the soul,
All blessed powers of joyful truth are met.
Though calm and garlandless thou may'st
appear,
The world shall know thee for its crowned seer.
Mirth in an open eye may sit as well,
As sadness in a close and sober face:
In thy broad welcome both may fitly dwell,
Nor jostle either from its nestling-place.
Tears, free as showers, to thee may come as
blessed,
As smiling, of the happy sunshine born,
And cloaked-up trouble, in his turn, caressed
Be taught to look a little less forlorn;
Thy heart-gates, mighty, open either way,
Come they to feast or go they forth to pray.
Gather all kindreds of this boundless realm
To speak a common tongue in thee! Be thou
Heart, pulse, and voice, whether pent hate
o'erwhelm
The stormy speech or young love whisper low.
Cheer them, immitigable battle-drum!
Forth, truth-mailed, to the old unconquered
field
And lure them gently to a laurelled home,
In notes softer than lutes or viols yield.
Fill all the stops of life with tuneful breath,
Closing their lids, bestow a dirge-like death!
WAKONDAH, THE MASTER OF LIFE.
We have already noticed the superstitious feelings with which the Indians regarded the
Black Hills; but this immense range of mountains (the Chippewyan or Rocky Mountains)
which divides all that they know of the world and gives birth to such mighty rivers, is still
more an object of awe and veneration. They call it, The Crest of the World, and think
that Wakondah or the Master of Life, as they designate the Supreme Being, has his residence
among these arial heights.
Astoria
,
Vol. I., p.
265.
[The following stanzas are to be received as
the incomplete (and, no doubt, very imperfect),
fragment of a work, which opportunity and a
mood, equal to what seems to the author the
requirements of the subject, could alone
conclude
.
This portion is published, with the hope
that the author might feel himself, in its further
progress, borne forward by something of the
friendly impulse that grows from favor, and
should not turn back, heart-smitten, to find that
his was the only eye which dwelt with cheerful
regard upon the ample look-out of its Future.]
I.
The
Moon ascends the vaulted sky to-night;
With a slow motion full of pomp ascends,
But mightier than the Moon that o'er it bends
A Form is dwelling on the mountain height
That boldly intercepts the struggling light
With darkness nobler than the planet's fire:
A gloom and dreadful grandeur that aspire
To match the cheerful Heaven's far-shining
might.
II.
Great God! how fearful to the gazing eye!
Behold the bow that o'er his shoulder hangs,
But ah! winged with what agonies and pangs
Must arrows from its sounding bow-string fly;
An are of death and warfare in the sky.
He plants a spear upon the rock that clangs
Like thunder; and a blood-red token hangs,
A death-dawn, on its point aspiring high.
III.
Upon his brow a garland of the woods he wears,
A crown of oak leaves broader than their wont;
Above his dark eye waves and dims its brunt
Its feathers darker than a thousand Fears
A cruel eagle's plume: High, high it rears,
Nor ever did the bird's rash youth surmount
A pitch of power like that o'ershadowed front
On which the plume its storm-like station bears.
IV.
Filled with the glory thus above him rolled
How would some Chinook wandering through
the night
In cedern helm and elk-skin armor dight
Be pierced with blank amazement dumb and
cold:
How, fear-struck, scan the Spirit's awful
mould;
The gloomy front, the death-dispelling eye,
And bulk that swallows up the sea-blue sky
Tall as the unconcluded tower of old.
V.
Transcendant Shape! But hark, for lo a sound
Like that of rivers and of mingled winds
Through forests raging 'till the tumult finds
Or makes an outlet free from hedge or bound,
Breaks from the Holder of the mountain-ground.
Oh, listen sadly to the urgent cry!
No mightier shadow of a strength gone by
Through the whole perishable Earth is found.
VI.
The Spirit lowers and speaks: Tremble ye
wild Woods!
Ye Cataracts! your organ-voices sound!
Deep Crags, in earth by massy tenures bound,
Oh, Earthquake, level flat! The peace that
broods
Above this world and steadfastly eludes
Your power, howl Winds and break;the
peace that mocks
Dismay 'mid silent streams and voiceless
rocks
Through wildernesses, cliffs and solitudes.
VII.
Night-shadowed Riverslift your dusky hands
And clap them harshly with a sullen roar!
Ye thousand Pinnacles and Steeps deplore
The glory that departs! Above you stands
Ye Lakes with azure waves and snowy strands,
A Power that utters forth his loud behest
Till mountain, lake and river shall attest
The puissance of a Master's large commands!
VIII.
So spake the Spirit, with a wide-cast look
Of bounteous power and cheerful majesty;
As if he caught a sight of either sea
And all the subject realm between:Then shook
His brandished arms, his stature scarce could
brook,
Its confine; swelling wide, it seemed to grow
As grows a cedar on a mountain's brow
By the mad air in ruffling breezes took.
IX.
The woods are deaf and will not be aroused
The mountains are asleep, they hear him not,
Nor from deep-founded silence can be wrought,
Tho' herded bison on their steeps have browsed:
Beneath their banks in darksome stillness housed
The rivers loiter like a calm-bound sea;
In anchored nuptials to dumb apathy
Cliff, wilderness, and solitude, are spoused.
X.
Then shone afar Wakondah's dreadful eyes,
With fire and lurid splendor, like the stars
That dazzle earth belolding them;the wars
That noble spirits wage with enemies,
Flash in his aspect through its cloudy guise;
His tower-high stature quakes in all its parts,
And from his brow a mighty sorrow starts
A sorrow mightier than the midnight skies.
XI.
Oh, wherefore tremble? Wherefore should
I fear
Because these creatures now, by chance,
are dumb,
Nor longer to my bidding with obeisance come;
As when, in times to startle and revere,
Templed on high within this cloudy sphere,
With wondering worship of the dusky wood
The quivered stream, the dark-eyed solitude
I stamped my image on the rolling year.
XII.
At eve or morn whene'er I walked these hills
From ridge to ridge they shook, from peak
to peak;
A thousand warrior tribes that dare not speak
Lay in my shadow with the awe that chills,
Dumb with the fear that boundless force instils.
Wakondah was a god and thunderer then,
Nor bent his bow nor launched his shafts in
vain
Lord of each power that terrifies or thrills.
XIII.
Your dark foundations felt my framing hand;
Nor can your sun-smote summits e'er forget
By whom their flood-resisting roots were set
By whose clear skill their skyey power was
planned.
Through all the borders of the lofty land
Mountains! I call upon you to attest
Whose habitable wish upon your crest
Reared up his throne and fixed his Godhead
stand.
XIV.
My spirit stretched itself from East to West,
With a winged terror or a mighty joy;
And, when his matchless bow-shafts would
annoy,
I urged the dark red hunter in his quest
Of pard or panther with a gloomy zest,
And while through darkling woods they
swiftly fare
Two seeming creatures of the oak-shadowed
air,
I sped the game and fired the follower's breast.
XV.
Outsounding with my thunder thy loud vaunt,
Thou, too, hast known me, mighty Cataract!
When rocks in headlong motion thou hast
tracked,
Like some huge creature goaded from his haunt,
Along the mountain passes rough and slaunt
Who makes his foaming way while all around
He awes the circuit with a shuddering
sound:
So ragest Thou and lift'st Thy sounding front!
XVI.
Power crumbles from the arm, and from the brow
Glory declines with surety swift as light:
Like towers that loose in storms their
wondrous might,
Dark principalities of air must bow
And have their strength and terror smitten low:
The hour draws nigh, Wakondah, when on
thine
You full orbed fire unpaled, shall cease to shine
Uplifted longer in Heaven's western glow!
XVII.
Lo! where our foe up through these vales
ascends,
Fresh from the embraces of the swelling sea,
A glorious, white and shining Deity.
Upon our strength his deep blue eye he bends,
With threatenings full of thought and steadfast
ends,
While desolation from his nostril breathes,
His glittering rage he scornfully unsheathes
And to the startled air its splendor lends.
XVIII.
The nation-queller in their length of days
The slaughterer of the tribes art thou! the
rude
Remorseless, vengeful foe of natural blood
And wood-born strength reared up amid the maze
Of forest walks and unimprisoned ways;
The dwellers in unsteepled wastes; the host
Of warriors stark and cityless, whose boast
Was daring proof 'gainst torture that betrays.
XIX.
Oh wrestle not, Wakondah, with the Time;
The Time resistless in its present hour
Of rugged force, of multitudinous power
To make itself triumphant o'er the clime,
Where streams are endless, mountains as sublime
And valleys shadowy and calm as ever
Yet tasked a Godhead's high and bright,
endeavor
,
Since first the world was in its mighty prime.
XX.
Far through the desert, see his fiery hoof
Speeds like the pale white courser of St. John,
With rage and dreadful uproar thundering on!
At every step old shadows fly aloof,
While on and on he bounds with strength enough
To master valley, hill and echoing plain
Cheered by the outcry of a savage train
Of white-browed hunters armed in deadly proof.
XXI.
Through the far shadows of the gathering
years
I see, visions denied to mortal eyes;
Phantoms of dreadful aspect that arise
Cold with the anguish of their wintry fears;
And struggling forth from out a gulf of tears
And blood by banded nations vainly shed,
Above them all a single Wo its head
Lifts high and awes its customary peers.
XXII.
I say not now what name that Wo shall bear,
What mournful omen on its front is written,
What pillared glories by its sad rage smitten
Shall fall to earth, and all th' embracing air
With its dread sound of wasting tumult tear;
These are the future'svoiceless let them rest
Deep in the shadow of her silent breast,
'Till vengeance bid the sons of menPrepare!
XXIII.
So spake the Spirit; but I deemed I saw
That in the language of his gloomy eye,
That made a falsehood of his augury.
I know that Heaven is true to its great law;
I know how deep and damnable a flaw
Has through its righteous code of truth been
rent
By erring swords and hands with blood
besprent
And this it is that fills my soul with awe.
XXIV.
And yet, oh God! I dare to ask of thee
Pardon and palmy days for this dear land;
The glory of thy sun, thy shadowing hand,
In mercy spread abroad from sea to sea,
That all its wide vast empire so may be,
From loud Atlantic unto Oregon
An orb of power, and never to be won
Nor yielded up, a home and fortress to the free!
XXV.
The past is past! Wakondah spoke the past
Is past: to others lifeless, cold and dumb
Beyond repeal, I bid it's shadows come
Swiftly before me, nor care I how vast
That which I gendered shall appear at last
As when at first it's him colossal form,
Huge, rude, mis-shapen, noisy as a storm
Rose up, by me called upward and amassed.
XXVI.
Falling or rising through the azure air
Green dells that into silence stretch away;
Ye woods that counterfeit the hues of day
With colors e'en the day could not repair
From his wide fount of morning dyes and fair
Evening or noon; innumerous rampant life
With which this waste or verdant world is rife
As yet were not; the offspring of a god-like care.
XXVII.
Oh, backward how that youthful glory gleams
Ye creatures of my undiminished arm,
When shadowing hills were lifted like a charm,
And at a word their duly measured beams
Sprung to their chambers in the mountain seams.
This was no task-work, nor a toil of joy
Thus an immortal puissance to employ
In building worlds and pouring ocean-streams.
XXVIII.
Oh! might and beauty of the forming earth
Shaped by a hand upholding and divine,
For such was then Wakondah even thine!
With hill and mountain masses bursting forth,
And struggling all along the blue-aired North
With smiling valleys winding far between,
And rivers singing all aloud, though yet
unseen:
While I, their sire, hung joyous o'er their birth.
XXIX.
A fearful and a perilous joy was mine,
When brooding thus above the seething world
I saw the striving giants swiftly hurled,
With thunderous noises to and fro; a constant
line
Of furnaced lightnings, ever forced to shine
Quick, fierce and kindling through the
shape-less
gloom.
Made the dull void some creature disentomb,
And cheered its birth-pangs with a fire benign.
XXX.
What voice of portent shook the gulf that held
The uncreated majesty of woods,
The calm deep beauty of the solitudes
Of boundless fields; and from the deep compelled
That Behemoth, whose roar has lately quelled
Nations in panoply of arms arrayed?
Amid the sounding mass and undismayed
By striving rivers, shock of hills impelled
XXXI.
'Gainst hills and wild beasts raging into light,
Wakondah stood, and o'er the tumult bent,
It's Ruler and it's steadfast firmament.
He breaks the bondage of the cruel Night
That wraps them in its folds, and like a blight
Of storms that rage and thunder but to save
And purify, he burst your rock-ribbed grave
The matchless Master of redeeming might.
XXXII.
The Spirit ceased and all along the air,
From where in speechless majesty he stood
On either hand through all the solitude
Of glittering peaks and dusky vales, to where
The wild beasts held afar their anxious lair
A sudden silence like a tempest fell;
A silence and a gloom that none can tell
A calm too dread for mortal things to bear.
XXXIII.
No cloud was on the moon, yet on His brow
A deepening shadow fell, and on his knees
That shook like tempest stricken
mountain-trees
,
His heavy head descended sad and low:
Like a high city smitten by the blow
That secret earthquakes strike and toppling
falls
With all its arches, towers and cathedrals,
In swift and unconjectured overthrow.
XXXIV.
Thenceforth I did not see the Spirit lift
Again that night his great discrownd head,
Nor heard a voice: He was not with the dead
Nor with the living, for the mighty gift
Of boundless power was passing like a rift
Of stormy clouds that still will have a tongue
Ere yet the winds have wafted them along
To endless silence, whitherward they drift.
THE END OF WAKONDAH.THE CAREER OF
PUFFER HOPKINS.
PREFACE.
It
was the hope of the author when he began the
following work, that he might be able to produce a
book, in some slight degree, characteristic and
national
in its features. Now, that it is completed, he
fears it may be found far short of that hope, and
unequal even to his own feeble purposes. He had
a design which seemed, in some of its
circumstances
,
to partake a little of utility and truth, but
which, he is afraid, is not made quite so clear to
the reader.
Where he has attempted to shade and soften, he
may have blurred; and where he would have cut
sharp lines and effected contrasts, it may prove
that he has merely mangled character and story.
Imperfect as is his own judgment in such a case,
he thinks he can discover one or two places at
least, where more should have been said and less
done; or more done and less said. He wishes only
that he had sufficient influence with the reader to
persuade him to guard against a single false alarm
frequently raised against works of this class. The
constancy with which the charge of caricaturing
Nature is brought against writers who attempt the
humorous, should lead us to suspectparticularly
as Cervantes, Smollett, Fielding, and Scott, to say
nothing of more recent eminent examples, have all,
at one time or another, been included in the
accusation
that
there is less justice and more
assumption
in the charge, than seems at first possible.
These authors all wrote from a sure instinct, a
profound knowledge of their art. They knew very
well, or must have early learned, that the spirit of
the accusation would drive all literature upon a
servile
transcript of every-day objects, and most
effectually
stifle every work claiming to be a work
of art. It was their province, they knew, to
discover
in nature the germe of character, and to
expand
it by processes of which genius is master,
into
a livelier, truer development than nature, in her
ordinary moods, presents. To group, to separate,
to soften and elevate nature, is allowed to the
author
as well as the painter; and the charge of
caricaturing should be brought only where Nature
is lost sight of and fails to furnish the original
staple
out of which the product is wrought.
It happened to the author, during the progress of
the early parts of this Tale through the pages of a
magazine (
Arcturus
), to be engaged in the
advocacy
of a law of International Copyright; a cause
which he will not fail to urge at all proper
opportunities
.
As it was not found altogether
convenient
to answer what he advanced, an attack was
made, by a new sort of evasive logic, upon the
present
work. What kind of generalship it would be
to set out with the valiant purpose of the conquest
of Mexico and proceed to its execution by march
ing a couple of thousand miles in directly the
opposite
course, and opening a brisk cannonade upon
the Heights of Abraham, for examplethe reader
may determine. The author only expresses a
wish that the work may be judged by itself,
apart from collateral issues and distracting
personalities
.
In that spirit he believes it will be judged
by all fair-minded and capable critics. Whatever
the issue may be, he can not altogether regret that
he has written it, since it has afforded him an
opportunity
to serve, in a very humble way, objects
of which he ought not to be ashamed.
New York
,
Oct. 28th
, 1842.
CHAPTER I.
THE PLATFORM.
To
say that the townspeople of this mighty
metropolis were in a state of greater excitement
and activity on a certain night in a certain
month of Novemberwhich it is not necessary
more particularly to definethan they are on
certain other nights of periodical recurrence,
would be to do the said townspeople arrant
injustice
,
and to establish for the chronicler of
the following authentic history, at the very
outset, a questionable character for truth and
plain speaking. On this immediate occasion,
however, there was, it must be confessed, a
commendable degree of agitation and
enthusiasm
visible, in almost every quarter of the
city. Crowds were emerging from lane, alley,
and thoroughfare, and pouring into the central
streets in the direction of the Hall; sometimes
in knots of three, four, or more, all engaged in
earnest conversation, in a loud key, with
vehement
gesture, and faces considerably discolored
by excitement. The persons composing these
various peripatetic and deliberative groups,
could not be said to be of any single class or
profession
,
but mingled together indiscriminately,
much after the fashion of a country storekeeper's
stock, where a bale of fourth-price flannel
neighbors a piece of first-quality linen, and
knots of dainty and gallant wine-glasses are
brought into a state of sociable confusion, with
a gathering of hard-headed plebeian stone
bottles
.
Although all tending the same way and
on the same errand, let no man be so rash and
intemperate as to imagine that no distinctions
were observed; that certain lines and
demarcations
were not maintained; and that
broadcloth
was not careful here, as usual, not to have
its fine nap destroyed by the jostling of homespun.
The knot of tough-fisted mechanics kept its
course, roaring out its rough sarcasms and great
gusts of invective, while the company of
well-dressed
gentlemen bound for the same harbor,
glided more quietly along, their talk scarcely
disturbed by the extravagance of a rippling
phrase or an oath.
Here a substantial citizen advanced in great
state and dignity, alone, toward the place of
gathering, unless his horn-topped walking-stick
might be held as suitable company for so grave
and dignified a personage; and again a
thoughtful
young gentleman might be discovered,
striding
along with his hands thrust deep in his
pockets, conning a few common-places for a
speech.
This various crowd has at length reached its
destination, and scampering up the stairs of a
large mis-shapen building, with no little heat
and racket, finds itself landed in a spacious
saloon, facing a raised platform, protected in
front by a rough railing, with some score of
vacant chairs occupying the floor of the same,
and as many stout candles ranged against the
rail. Beneath the platform is a small square
table, holding a capacious inkstand, ornamented
with two or three huge gray goose-quills.
Abreast of the table are stretched a number of
rude benches, to afford accommodation for such
infirm, ease-loving, and sedentary individuals,
as may see fit to take possession of them; and
taken possession of they are at a very early
stage of the proceedings, first by a squad of
precocious shipwrights' 'prentices, secondly by
a broad-bottomed dairyman who was left at the
Hall in the afternoon by one of his own wagons
from Bloomingdale, and thirdly by a rout of
scrambling fellows, from no place in particular,
who push and jostle and clamor their best for
the occupancy. The meeting is one the eve of
being organized, when in marches a well-fed
uppish manthe very citizen that was alone
with his cane in the streetwho,
contemplating
the crowd with an air of austere regard,
urges himself toward one end of the platform,
where he meets a scraggy man, smartly dressed,
and displaying from the pillory of a sharp-edged
clean shirt-collar, a very knowing countenance
extended to the audience, and engages in a
whispered conversation, the concluding clause
whereof embodies this sterling sentiment (
enforced
by the thrusting of a roll at the same
time into the open hand of the scraggy
gentleman
):
There's a current tenmake me a
vice, will ye? The scraggy man thereupon
cocks his eye significantly, and the stout
citizen
,
slipping away, gets into the outskirts of
the crowd, where he stares at the platform and
the candlesthe political heaven of ambitious
stout gentlemenas if they were the most
remarkable
objects in creation, and as if he was
perfectly unconscious of the objects for when
the meeting was then and there convened.
In due time the meeting was called to order,
and the innocent stout gentleman established
himself, with five others, upon the platform, as
an assistant presiding officera viceof the
same. Silence was proclaimed, and a dwarfish
little man, with one of the oddest countenances
in the world, was lifted upon a high stool by
the mob, and commenced reading a manuscript,
which he dignified with the name of the
Report
of the Anti-Aqueduct Committee,
appointed
by the citizens of New York, at a large and
respectable meeting held at Fogfire Hall, &c.,
&c., in which was furnished a certain amount
of statistics (taken from the 'Cyclopedia): a
decoction of moudly jokes (from the
newspapers
):
and a modicum of energetic slanga
direct emanation from the inventive genius of
the reader of the report.
This was a great, a tremendous question
suggested the Anti-Aqueduct manuscripta
question, to come to the point at once,
involving
the rights of mankind, the interests of
universal humanity. If this principle was
allowed
to pass unopposedthis pernicious
principle
of setting up pure water, democratic
Adam's ale, the true corporation gin, for
purchase
where
would we land? The
committee
that drafted the report could tell 'em!
in tyranny, despotism, bloodshed, and
debauchery
.
Individuals would get drunk at the pump,
as soon as the price was made an object: there
was a consideration for them! The people
had their rightshere the reader wagged his
head vehemently, and grinned like a demon
just going out of his senseshe could tell them,
and the people could take care of 'em.
A general dissemination of genuine gin
cock-tails
among the hearers, could have scarcely
produced greater excitement than did this most
apposite and thrilling sentiment: caps flew up,
and hats flew off, as if the air were alive with
great black insects, and canes came down with
a general crash, like a cane-brake itself in a
state of tornado. It seemed as if they never
would be done applauding this happy allusion;
and the committee-man stood on the stool,
swaying
on one leg, and smiling, as if he considered
it the most agreeable spectacle he had ever
enjoyed. The committee did not suppose that
it was the purpose of Providence to destroy
mankind by a second flood, but they were
satisfied
,
morally satisfied, if such an intention ever
did come within the purview of the divine
displeasure
,
the object would undoubtedly be
accomplished
by the bursting of the reservoir
which it was proposed to erect at the junction
of the Third Avenue and Bowery: at least,
the committee thought it proper to add, as far
as the citizens of New York were concerned.
And so the report rambled on, like an echo
among the Dutch hills, until it finally died
away in a thundering resolution, and the little
reader was inadvertently knocked off the stool
by a charcoal-vender, who was employed,
besides
grinning through the sable stains of his
trade in a ghastly manner, in swinging his hat
in approval of one of the concluding sentiments
of his report.
The charcoal-man was hustled, the little
committee-man set upon his legs, and a vote
of thanks unanimously passed for the able
report
just read.
A very long, dull-looking man, next offered
a resolution, and delivered a speech as long and
dull as himself; which resolution and speech
were seconded by a round, heavy man, in an
harangue quite as rigmarole and ponderose;
when a pause occurred, during which the mob
seemed to be reflecting what they should do
next. After a proper degree of cogitation, they
commenced shouting for a favorite speaker,
who always interested their feelings by
proposing
a general division of property: which was
very liberal in him, as he had nothing to divide
but the payment of two-score old debts, and
the expenses of a small family; but he failed
to make his appearance. Upon which certain
sagacious persons began peering about in the
crowd, as if they expected to find him
sandwiched
away snugly among the carmen,
omnibus-drivers
,
and stevedores, there present.
Certain other active persons were despatched
into the halls and purlieus of the building; a
self-formed committee of five rushed post-haste
for the bar-room; and one over-zealous
individual
was so far carried away by his
enthusiasm
,
as to run a mile to the orator's dwelling,
and there to demand his person with such
breathless incoherence, as to lead his small
family to suspect that their dear protector and
paymaster harbored the intention of making
way with himself.
A second popular favorite was called by the
audience; the same scrutiny instituted, and
with the same result. Affairs now looked
exceedingly
blank, the audience began to despair,
and to entertain the horrible expectation of
having to go to bed speechless, when an
unknown
individual pushed convulsively through
the crowd, struggled up the steps, and placed
himself at the foot of the platform, and
stretching
out his right arm to its full extent, began.
He was youngthe bloom of roseate health
upon his cheek would satisfy them of that. He
was timid and doubtful: witness his tremblings
and shiverings on presenting himself for the
first time before that highly respectable body
of august citizens. He was rash and
fool-hardy
,
he was aware, in coming before so
intelligent
an audience, at that critical moment.
But he was actuated and impelled by a sense of
duty, which would not allow him to be silent
while that great question called for an
advocate
.
They had heard the thunder of the
cannon
,
in the report; the braying (a slight titter
at this word) of trumpets, in the speeches of
the two learned gentlemen that had preceded
him; and now that the grand overture of battle
had been performed, he ventured to come upon
the field, and with his simple shepherd's pipe
to sound the humbler music of peace. He
trusted that no violent, no vindictive feeling,
would be indulged toward their opponents.
Let their measure passlet the aqueduct be
reared, and let its waters begin to flow:from
these very waters, pernicious as they seemed,
should be drawn the rainbow of promise for his
friends; for the friends of cheap government
and good order! Taxation was not democracy;
debt was not democracy; public ruin and
bankruptcy
were not democracy (gently warbled the
shepherd's pipe): and if this insane, wolfish,
and reckless party wished to destroy itself with
its own fangswhy, in God's name, bid them
God-speed, and give them a clear field. He
would not suggest that the farmers in
Westchester
county should oppose the passage of the
aqueduct through their own lands; they were
freemen and knew what was what. He would
not stir up the Harlaem Bridge Company
(Heaven forbid!) to withstand this
encroachment
upon their rights; they were a
corporation
,
and could discriminate carrot from
horseradish
.
He hoped, he fervently and sincerely
hoped and trusted, that the entire race of
water-rats and ground-moles might be
annihilated
,
before the undertaking was commenced;
so that it might not be impeded or undermined
by their operations. At these various hopes
and suggestions, as they were delivered, there
was an uproarious ha! ha! uttered by the
assemblage
,
who seemed to relish them hugely;
and, with a hint or two to the audience, not to
allow themselves to be tampered withnot to
look on and see their heads taken from their
shoulders, and the bread from their children's
mouths (all of which was heartily seconded by
the hearers), the young oratorthe gentle
friend of peacestepped from the platform.
At the conclusion of the speech, some one in
the crowd jumped up a foot or two, and
shouted
,
Three cheers for the last speech! and
three cheers were given with great animation;
and then, at the same suggestion, three more;
and three at the end of them. Different
members
of the audience turned to each other and
shook hands, and exclaimed, Royal, That
was fine, and other like phrases of
approbation
;
and then inquiries were set on foot as
to the name of the new speaker, to which no
one could furnish a satisfactory answer; and
whether he was from this ward or that ward,
which was in a state of equal doubt and
uncertainty
;
and finally it was conjectured and
suggested
,
that he didn't belong to any ward at all,
but had come from the country, which they
were for proving by his rural simile of the
rainbow (rainbows not being indigenous in
incorporated
towns), and his intimate
acquaintance
with the feelings of the Westchester
county farmers and ground-moles.
Whatever might be his name and origin, his
foot had no sooner touched the floor, than he
felt his sleeve twitched, and turning, he
discovered
a singular-looking little gentleman,
beckoning
him to follow.
CHAPTER II.
FIRST ACQUAINTANCE WITH HOBBLESHANK.
Disengaging
himself from the crowd at
Fogfire Hall, the young politician followed his
unknown conductor into the open air. From
the rapidity with which he moved in advance,
although his gait was shuffling and uncertain,
he was not fairly overtaken until he had
reached the mouth of a neighboring refectory,
at which, pausing only for an instant glance at
the young man's countenancewhich seemed
to create a pleasurable feeling, and caused him
to smile strenuouslyhe plunged down the
steps. The young politician followed, and
found himself in a close, narrow room, the air
of which was musty with confinement, and
having no opportunity from the pent place
where it was imprisoned, to ramble about
among meadows and fresh streams to enliven
itself, depended on fumes of brandy and clouds
of cigar-smoke, for whatever life it exhibited.
A tall man stood before the fire, who would
have inevitably perished of its noxious
qualities
if he had not taken occasion, through the
day, to stand up the steps with his head and
shoulders above ground, contemplating the
clay-covered wagons that came in fresh from
the country.
Judging from the starved, narrow-breasted
skeletons of turkeys and fowls, the cold,
sepulchral
hams, the cadaverous, shrunken legs of
mutton, and the dwarfed tarts and bread-rolls,
that lay in miserable heaps on the table, they
might have easily concluded that the piehouse
into which they had descended was the dreary
family-vault, to which melancholy butchers,
bakers, and poulterers, were in the habit of
consigning such of their professional progeny as
had ceased to have life and merchantable
qualities
on earth. The room was, of all possible
dirty rooms, the dirtiest. With walls smoked
and tallow-stained; an unsanded floor; tables
spotted all over, like the double-six of
dominoes
,
and a fire with just enough animation to
blush at the other appointments of the place.
The piehouse had its pretensions, too; for it
possessed not only a common room for outside
customers, but a private parlor, snug and
select
,
cut off from its vulgar neighbor by elegant
blue curtains, made to resemble patches of
dirty blue skymoving on a wire with jingling
brass rings, and entered by a half-raised step.
Upon this, which was little more than a
large stall, after all, they entered. The
mysterious
little gentleman, drawing the curtains
behind
them, rushed up to the fire and rubbed his
hands together over the blaze, opened the
curtains
,
thrust out his head, called for oysters and
beer, and took his station at one side of the
table
in the middle of the floor. It's all right,
said the stranger. Don't be alarmed; my
name is Hobbleshankwhat's yours?
Puffer Hopkins, replied the young politi
cian, surveying more closely his whimsical
companion
.
He was an irregularly-built little gentleman,
about fifty-five years of age, with a pale face,
twitched out of shape somewhat by a paralytic
affection; with one sound eye, and one in a
condition of semi-transparency, which gave to
his features something of a ghostly or goblin
character; and hedging in, and heightening the
effect of the whole, a pair of bushy black
whiskers
,
of a fine, vigorous growth. The little
gentleman wore a faded blue frock, short
pantaloons
,
low shoes, an eyeglass, and a hat
considerably
dilapidated and impaired by age.
The singularity and whim of the little old
gentleman's demeanor was shown in his
shambling
up sideways toward Puffer whenever he
addressed him, and looking up timidly, first
with the doubtful eye, as if sounding his way,
and then with the sound one, fortifying himself,
from time to time, from an immense snuff-box,
which he carried awkwardly in his left hand.
That was an excellent speech, young man!
said the strange little gentleman, dropping into
a seat, and simultaneously swallowing an
oyster
,
black with pepper.
I trust the sentiments were correct,
modestly
suggested his companion.
Never better, sir; sound as a
Newtownpippin
,
to the core, continued the strange
little
gentleman. But you are young yet, sir
quite youngand have a thing or two to learn.
Be good enough not to advance upon the stage
again, if you please, without your coat
buttoned
snug to the chin, which shows that you
mean to give them a resolute speecha
devilish
resolute speech, exclaimed the little
gentleman
,
glaring on the youth with his spectre
eye, full of storm and thunder, sir; or else
with your breasts thrown wide back, indicating
that you are about to regale them with an airy,
well-ventilated, and very candid effusion.
Appreciating the interest that the little old
gentleman expressed in his future success, his
companion promised to comply, as far as in him
lay, with these new requisitions in the art of
addressing public bodies.
There was an awful omission, continued
the strange gentleman, a very awful and
unpardonable
omission, in your harangue
to-night
.
The little old gentleman's voice
sounded
sepulchral, and his companion cast his eyes
anxiously about the select parlor.
For Heaven's sake, what was that, sir?
asked the young gentleman, regarding his
censor
with intense interest.
Why, sir, said the little old gentleman,
relaxing into a grim smile, where were your
banners? You hadn't one in your whole speech!
An address to a political assembly in New York,
and not a tatter of bunting in the whole of it
you must excuse me, but it's the weakest thing
I've ever known. An army might as well go
into battle as an orator into our popular
meetings
,
without his flags and standards. Where
were your stars, too? There wasn't even the
twinkle of a comet's tail in the whole harangue:
they expect it. Stars are the pepper and salt of a
political discoursemind that, if you please.
At this passage the little old gentleman
became
thoughtful, and fell upon his oysters and
beer with horrible avidity; which process
caused him to grow more thoughtful than ever.
Many a good speech have I heard, he at
length said, contemplating Puffer Hopkins with
melancholy regard, whose deliverer now lies
under the tombstone. Others lie there, too!
I'd give my life, sir, he exclaimed earnestly,
pressing his hands closely together, my life
with its resulting interest, if I dared, for a
minute's
gaze at features that are lying in the
silence
and darkness of dust. That's hard, sir
too hard to bear:a young wife borne away
in her bloom, by a cold, cruel hearseblack,
all over black! And then what followeddo
you recollect what followed? I'm a foolyou
know nothing of it; why should you? Life is
a green field to you, without as much as a grave
or a furrow in it all.
I am not too sure of that, answered
Puffer
Hopkins, for I have a dim remembrance
of a death that touched me nearly, long ago;
whose death I can not say, but a vision, away
off in past times, of a darkened housea solemn
train issuing forth, with one figure staggering
into the funeral coach, drunk with excess of
griefthe heavy roll of wheels, and many tears
and lamentations in the small household.
While he delivered this, Hobbleshank looked
earnestly in his face, as if he discovered in
what he said, a meaning deeper than the words.
At this there was a long silence, which Puffer
Hopkins at length attempted to break, by stating
to his companion the character in which he had
appeared that night, for the first time, at Fogfire
hall.
I know, said Hobbleshank, pushing his
open palm toward Puffer Hopkins, don't say
a word; I know all about it. You're a young
professional trader in politics and patriotism;
a beginnerjust opened to-night with your
first speech, and a fresh assortment of
apostrophes
and gesticulations. I know you are
new in the business, for when you spoke of
Heaven and eternal justice, you looked at the
audience. Very green, my boy; an old
spouter
,
in such a case, always rolls his eyeballs back
under their lids, and smells of the chandelier,
which is much better, although the odor isn't
pleasant.
A mere 'prentice at the business, I confess
myself, answered Puffer.
I wish you would bear in mind, too,
continued
his whimsical adviser, when you
address
a mixed audience, and have occasion to
speak of the majesty of the people, that the
established
rule is, not to stare at any individual
dirty face in the middle of the crowd, but to
look away off, beyond the crowd entirely; as if
you discovered what you're speaking about in
some remote suburb with which they have
nothing
to do. Do you understand me?
I think I do, replied Puffer; but isn't
there generally some placid gentleman or other,
who comes to the meeting early, and plants
himself in front of the platform at a proper
distance
,
with the praiseworthy purpose of having
the speaker lay out all his strength in gazing at
him, and moving his bowels and understanding?
I used to think soand have tried it more than
once; it feels very pleasant, I can assure you.
What of that? It's your business to
humble
these gentrythey're aristocracy in
disguise
,
and borrow their cartmen's hats to come to
public meetings in. No, no! cried Hobbleshank,
with emphasis, don't you be caught in that
trap. Do you pick out the dirtiest waistcoat
in the audience, with the most cadaverous face
in the room peering over itpitch your eye
upon
the second button from the top, just where
the proof of a lack of under-garments becomes
overwhelmingand fire away. Your target's
a poor scampthe beggarliest in the house,
with an understanding like a granite rock (
needing
the whole force of an incorporated company
of metaphysicians to quarry and dress it), and
a select circle of acquaintance, among
wharfingers
,
small-boatmen, and bean-eaters, near
the market. That's your man. Dash your hair
back from your brow, swing your arms, and
don't spare flowers, knuckles, tropes, and
desklids
.
By the time Hobbleshank had arrived at this
division of his subject, he had reached,
working
himself along by degrees, the extremity of
the stall, and was standing on his toes, with his
goggle eyes glaring over the partition at a
melancholy
personagethe very counterpart of his
descriptionwho sat on a stool by the fire,
with his piece of hat drawn over his eyes, with
one leg on the ground and the other thrust
under
him on the seat.
That's one of them, whispered
Hobbleshank
,
casting an eye down at Puffer, and
pointing with his finger over the partition.
No it isn't, after all, for there's the top of a
book sticking out of his pocket. Our kidney
don't know books.
Puffer Hopkins leaned out of the stall, and
stretching himself forward, contemplated the
object to which Hobbleshank directed him; but
instantly drew back, and seizing his companion
by the skirts, pulled him, almost by main force,
into a seat.
Don't, for Heaven's sake! he said, as he
bent forward and placed his mouth at the ear
of Hobbleshank, that's my poor neighbor,
Fob, the tailor.
These brief words were delivered in such a
way as if Puffer Hopkins expected their mere
utterance would silence his companion, and
cause an entire revolution in the feelings with
which he had regarded the sorry creature
before
the piehouse fire.
A poor tailor, he echoed, well, is that all?
Yes; that's all! answered Hopkins.
Nothing more? asked Hobbleshank.
Nothing more, replied Puffer Hopkins.
These questions were asked and answered,
in tones that brought the conversation between
them to a dead pause, at which it stayed for a
good many minutes, when Puffer Hopkins,
rousing
a little, asked if that wasn't enough?
At this moment the poor gentleman at the
fire waked, heaved a great sigh, and taking an
imperfect copy of a book from his pocket, and
lifting his hat from his eyes, fell to perusing it
with great earnestness; all of which interfered
very seriously with any further conversation
on his condition and prospects in lifeso that,
after contemplating him steadily for several
minutes, they thought proper to retreat to the
previous subject of their discourse.
You shouldn't have dropped from the
platform
so suddenly, said Hobbleshank.
I was through my speech, answered
Puffer
Hopkins, and wished to get out of sight
at once.
Out of sight! exclaimed his companion,
as if unconscious of Puffer's presence, what
a fool the boy is. Why, sir, if you intend to be
a politiciana thriving one I meanyou must
keep yourself in view, like St. Paul's steeple,
that frowns down on you wherever you go
through the city. Out of sight, indeed! You
should have made a bow to the audience
wheeled aboutseized the first adjacent hand
on the stageshook it with the utmost violence,
smiling in the owner's face all the while, very
pleasantlyand then planted yourself on a
chair fronting the audiencehooked your
elbows
over the corner of the chair-topsmiling
steadily on the populace, and leaving off, only
every now and then, to nurse your ruffle and
pull down your wristbands.
I'll endeavor to practise this next time,
said Puffer, meekly.
Do, said Hobbleshank, and look to your
costume, if you please. What do you mean by
wearing this brown coat, and having your hair
cut plain?
I don't know why I had my hair cut this
way, answered Puffer, but I wore the coat
because it was large in the sleeves, and allowed
a wide spread of the arms when I came to the
rainbowthus, and he expanded his arms
after
the manner of an arch, as he had, indeed,
endeavored to do in the delivery of his speech,
but was prevented, at the time, from the
embarrassment
of having to employ his handkerchief
in clearing the sweat which oozed out in liquid
drops on his forehead. You recollect the
simile?
Perfectly, answered Hobbleshank. And
don't station yourself next time, sir, on the
lowest
point of the platformbut stand forth in the
centre, making wings of the six vices on either
side of you, and compelling the anxious
presiding
officer, directly behind you, to stretch
his neck around the skirt of your coat, and to
look up in your face with painful eagerness to
catch what you're saying, which always makes
the audience, who have great confidence in the
head of the meeting, very attentive. It's a grand
stroke to make a tableau on any stageworthy
the biggest type on the showbills, and here
you have one of the very finest imaginable.
But as to the orator's position, asked
Puffer; do you think a public speaker is
ever justifiable in standing on his toes?
In extreme cases, he may be, answered
Hobbleshank, pondering; but it's best to rise
gradually with your hearers, and, if you can
have a private understanding with one of the
waiters, to fix a chair convenientlya
wooden-bottomed
windsor, mind, and none of your
rushers; for its decidedly funny and destroys
the effect, to hear a gentlemen declaiming
about a sinking-fund, or a penal code, or the
abolition of imprisonment for debt, up to his
belly in a broken chair-frame. As the passion
grows upon you, plant your right leg on one of
the rounds, then on the bottom, and finally,
when you feel yourself at red-heat, spring into
the chair, waive your hat, and call upon the
audience
to die for their country, their families,
and their firesidesor any other convenient
reason. As Hobbleshank advanced in his
discourse, he had illustrated its various topics
by actual accompaniments, mounting first on
his legs, then the bench, and ended by leaping
upon the table, where he stood brandishing his
broken hat, and shouting vociferously for more
oysters.
No reply to this uproarious summons
appearing
,
Hobbleshank thrust his head between the
curtains, discovered that the tailor had
vanished
,
and that the tall man was sitting against
the chimney-piece, with his legs stretched upon
a stool, and sound asleep. He snatched up his
hat, and hurrying toward the street, said he
thought it was time to go.
As it had worn far into the heart of the
night, Puffer Hopkins could not gainsay the
postulate, and followed on. Hobbleshank
keeping
a little in advance, they rambled thus
through many streets; the little old gentleman
sometimes hurrying them forward at a gallop,
and again subsiding into a slow, careful step,
as if he kept pace with the heavy chimes that
were sounding midnight from the town-clocks,
or perchance, with thoughts that beat at his
heart with a sharper stroke.
Be constant, child, said he, as he was
preparing to leave his companion, in your
visits to popular associations and gatherings:
many a man is platformed and scaffolded by
these committees and juntoes, into the high
places of the nation. He then told Hopkins
where he could leave word for him, in case he
should at any time require advice or assistance;
said that, if he chose, he might be at Barrell's
oyster-house the next evening, and he would
wait upon him to one of these assemblages;
and before Puffer Hopkins could answer one
way or the other, he had disappeared from his
side, and vanishing into a by-street, was soon
lost in the darkness.
It can not be matter of wonder that Puffer
made his way home with a head considerably
bewildered and unsettled by the occurrences of
the night. The great popular gathering; his
own first speech; the thundering and
tumultuous
applause; and, what fastened itself with
peculiar force upon his imagination, the voice
and figure of the little old man, uttering pensive
truths or shrewd observations, with the kindly
interest he had expressed in himself from the
first momentall crowded upon him, and made
him feel that he was in an actual world, where,
if he would but bestir himself, fortune might
prove his friend. The result of the whole
was, that he determined to prosecute his
career; and in furtherance of that
determination
,
he resolved to meet Hobbleshank again;
the last image that his mind distinctly
recognised
,
ere it yielded to sleep, being that of the
little paralytic, passing and repassing, at times
dissolved in tears, and again, filling his
chamber
with the echoes of smothered laughter!
CHAPTER III.
THE BOTTOM CLUB.
Punctual
to his appointment with
Hobbleshank
,
Puffer Hopkins, at a few minutes of
seven o'clock the next evening, directed his
steps toward Barrell's oyster-house, where in
due time he arrived, and made discovery of one
of the most singular little oyster-houses that
could be found throughout the whole of
oystercating
Christendom. Mr. Jarve Barrell, it
would seem, had, in the golden age of his
career, been the proprietor of a large public
house, occupying an entire building, and
surrounded
by his regiments of waiters and
wine-bottles
,
whose services were clamorously and
steadily demanded, by a mob of customers,
from six in the evening until one, morning; in
fact, the poor man's head had been half turned,
by the pressure of a prosperons and growing
business. But, somehow or other, oysters, one
unlucky season, grew smaller, waiters more
impudent for their pay and custom walked out
of that street into the next, on a visit to a
new landlord, who served his stews with silver
spoons and his oysters in scollop-shells, so that
poor Jarve Barrell was compelled, in spite of
himself, to clip his wings and confine himself
to an humbler cage; in a word, he rented his
second floor to a boarding-house keeper, took
in a barber at the rear of the first floor, and
continued business on his own account in the
front room of the same. A second decrease in
the size of shell-fish, the opening of a street
that carried travel in another direction, and
Barrell was forced into that last stronghold of
the oyster-man, the cellar; and there it was
that Puffer Hopkins now found him, standing
on one leg of his own and one that came out of
a fine piece of oak woods at West Farms, a
coarse white apron about his waist and a
salamander
in his countenance, declaring stoutly to
a customer, that although he had roughed it
against the tide all his life, he was determined
to have his own way in dying.
Being questioned as to the way to which he
alluded, he proceeded to explain, that
whenever
he felt the approaches of death, he should
hire a White-haller to pull him over to Staten
Island, cast anchor just above the richest bed
in the shore, and giving one good deep plunge,
said Jarve Barrell, I'll carry myself to the
bottom
,
and stetching myself out on a picked
oyster-bed, make up my mind to die; so with
the tide rippling over my head, and a dozen or
more pretty mermaids standing about me, I'll
give up the ghost, and hold myself entitled to
haunt the bay and island ever after, with a
spruce ruffle of sea-weeds in my bosom.
Puffer Hopkins was well pleased with the
joyous spirit of the decayed oyster-man, but had
scarcely heard him through when he detected
a quick clatter upon the steps, and turning, he
discovered his singular companion of the
previous
night hurrying down. In a moment he
had Puffer by the hand, and hailed his
appearance
with a sort of wondering enthusfasm, as
if it gave him great joy to find him there and
to take him again in a friendly grasp.
Hobbleshank
interchanged a few words with Mr.
Jarve Barrell as to the influence of certain
recent
enactments relating to oyster-beds upon
his own trade and custom, to which Mr. Jarve
Barrell gave very lucid and convincing replies.
and they set out forthwith for the Bottom Club,
This they were not long in finding, for
Hobbleshank
guiding Puffer rapidly through sundry
dark alleys and by-ways, for which he seemed
to have a peculiar inclination, they reached a
building in front of which a dusky lamp was
glimmering, ascended two flights of stairs, and
knocked at a low dingy door.
The door was opened from within, and Puffer
advancing, with Hobbleshank in front, found
himself in a long narrow room, with a plain
pine table stretched through the centre, a
forlorn-looking
eagle, with a bunch of arrowy
skewers in its talons and a striped flag about
its head for a turban, two or three carpenters'
benches along the walls, and the whole lighted
by four sombre tallow twopennics at the
farthest
extremity.
Upon the table was planted a large earthen
pitcher, with an emblematic toper with his leg
cocked up, in a state of happy exaltation,
displayed
on the side thereof in white wareand
around the board were established a dozen
individuals
or more, constituting the chief force
of the immortal Bottom Club.
The gentlemen of the Bottom Club, as they
presented themselves at that moment to Puffer
Hopkins, certainly furnished a remarkable
spectacle; the most remarkable feature of
which was, that all the large members of the
club, by some inscrutable fatality, were
constrained
and restricted in small hats and
irksome
jackets, while all the small members, by
some equally potent dispensation, were allowed
to revel in an unlimited wilderness of box-coat,
petersham, and tarpaulin. The delicate
gentlemen
wore great rough neck-stocks and
commanded
huge iron snuff-boxes on the table, and
the robust and muscular members assumed
dainty black ribands and elegant turn-down
collars, with more or less ruffle crisping up
under
their broad heavy-bearded chins.
A thin, thoughtful gentleman, at one corner
of the table, was enveloped in an overgrown
vest, hideous with great red vines creeping all
over it, and large enough to serve the purposes
of a body-coat; and confronting him, at an
opposite
corner, sat a stout omnibus-driver,
making
himself as comfortable as he could in a
waistcoat, so many sizes too small, that it gaped
apart like a pair of rebellious book covers, and
drew his arms into a posture that resembled not
a little that of the wings of a great Muscovy
gander prepared for the spit.
We welcome you, said the pale
thoughtful
man, rising and extending his right hand
toward
Puffer as he advanced, while with his left
he secured the sails of his great red vest, we
welcome you, Mr. Hopkins, to this association
of brethren. In us you see exemplified the
progress of social reform; we are wearing each
other's coats and breeches in a simultaneous
confusion, and, laboring under a passional
excitement
,
we may yet ameliorate our condition
so far as to undertake to pay each other's debts.
We are subjecting ourselves to a great
experiment
for the benefit of mankind, the interests
of the total race. You see what hardships we
are undergoinghe did, for at the mere
mention
of the thing, the whole club wriggled in
their ill-assorted garments like so many clowns
in the very crisis of a contortionto test the
principles of an ameliorated condition of things.
Yet, sir, we are happy, very happy to see you
here to-night. This spot on which you stand,
is consecrated to freedom of opinionto the
festival
of the soul. This is no musical forest, no
Hindoo hunter's hut, got up for effect at the
amphitheatre; we haven't trees here alive with
real birds! the branches laden with living
monkeys
!
the fountains visited by longlegged
flamingoes
!
the greensward covered with gazelles,
grazing and sporting! Oh, no; we are a
mere caucus of plain citizens, in our everyday
dresses, sitting in this small room, on rough
benches, to re-organize society, and give the
world a new axle; that's all.
Hereupon the thoughtful gentleman sat down,
the club looked at each other and shook their
heads, as much as to say, This chairman of
ours is certainly a born genius; and Puffer
and Hobbleshank were earnestly invited to the
upper end of the board, where they could
possess
the immediate society of the intellectual
president, with the convenient solace of the
beer-pitcher. As soon as they were seated,
and furnished with a draught from the earthen
jug, to make them feel at home (a man always
feeling most at home when his wits are abroad),
the legitimate business of the club proceeded
with great spirit.
The first subject that was brought before
them was, a general consultation as to the part
the clubthe friends of social reform and a
re-organization
of societyshould play in the
approaching
election of a Mayor for the city and
county of New York; something striking and
decisive being always expected from the
redoubted
Bottom Club. One member hinted and
proposed that there should be a general
destruction
of the enemy's handbills; which was
amended so as to embrace a thrashing of the
enemy's bill-stickers, wherever found; which
was still further enlarged, so as to cover the
special case of freighting a hostile
bill-sticker's
cart with building-stone and breaking a
bill-sticker's donkey's back. The cutting of
the flag-ropes, and sawing down of liberty-poles
next came up, and passed promptlya stout
man in a small roundabout asseverating
vehemently
that the price of firewood should be
brought down, if he stayed up till midnight three
nights in the week, to accomplish the
benevolent
object. The club then proceeded to
preamble
and resolve that they considered the
liberty
of the citizens of this metropolis in
imminent
danger, and that they would protect the
same at the hazard of their lives; by which the
Bottom Club meant, that they would hold
themselves
prepared to breed a riot at five minutes'
notice, if found necessary to prevent a surplus
of voters on the opposite side from enjoying the
invaluable franchise of depositing their ballots.
Two sturdy members, belonging to the
intellectual
and highly-refined fraternity of
omnibus-drivers
,
next pledged themselves in the most
earnest manner, to conduct their respective
vehicles
,
at such time as might be most apposite,
through the centre of any well-dressed crowd
that might be in the neighborhood of the poll,
and also to indulge in such incidental flourishes
of the whip on their way, as would inevitably
persuade the gentry to stand back. As beer and
brandy flowed through the clubwhich they
did, with a marvellous depth and celerity of
currentthe tide of heady resolution deepended;
and they at length, in their extreme heat and
fervor, determined to throw off their coats to a
man, and enjoy a regular break-down dance
about the table.
With wonderful alacrity they carried this
judicious
resolution into effect, by disrobing
themselves
of coats, shad-bellies, and jackets, and
casting them in a heap on a sailor's chest
established
under the eagle's wing. They then,
hand in hand, Hobbleshank and Puffer Hopkins
joining in, commenced capering in a circle,
dashing down, first the right heel and then the
left, with astonishing energy, and as if they
were driving in the nails of the floor all over
again; meantime roaring out the tag-ends of a
M
partisan song, which intimated that, They
were the boys so genteel and civil, that cared
not a straw for Nick nor the devil; with other
choice sentiments metrically stated. While
they were immersed in this elegant recreation,
a single gentlemana member of the club
who did not choose to partake thereof, sat apart
indulging in his own profound cogitations. He
was in many respects a peculiar personage,
and seemed to enjoy a copy-right way of his
own; which copy-right might have borne date
as early as his birth and entrance into the world,
for Nature had given him a pale, chalky
countenance
,
a sort of blank between youth and
age; a pair of knavish gray eyes, always turned
upward, and a nose of the same class, which
appeared most honestly to sympathize with
them. He was of a small, shrunken figure,
with a slight indication of a hump at the
shoulders
,
long, thin fingers, and legs of a
somewhat
misshapen and imperfect character.
This singular little gentleman, as we said,
sat apart, indulging in his own thoughts; the
purport of which appeared presently to be, a
determination to investigate and scrutinize the
pockets of the various coats, jackets, and
shad-bellies
,
which had been laid aside by the
dancers
,
for to this task he now assiduously
applied
himself, and while his companions were
enjoying themselves in their way, he enjoyed
himself in his own way, by divesting them of
such of their contents as suited his purposes,
whatever they might be. In this general
scrutiny
it would have been an impeachment of his
talents as an inquisitor to have charged him
with neglecting the remotest corner or
out-of-the-way
borough of the apparel either of
Hobbleshank
or Puffer Hopkins.
Having accomplished this undertaking to his
own satisfaction, he established himself at a
side of the long table, planted a fur cap of great
antiquity, after a drunken fashion, over his
brows, dropped his head upon his folded arms,
and devoted himself, with great apparent zeal
and sincerity, to the business of sleeping.
Meantime the gentlemen of the Bottom Club
had wearied of their sport, and oppressed by
beer and hard work, they dropped into their
seats.
The pitcher went round, once, twice, and
thrice, and by this time they had attained an
elevation of conduct and expression that was
truly sublime to behold. The heavy-bearded
man swore, and laughed, and dashed his fist
upon the table, with the uproar of half-a-dozen
bakers at kneading time. The two
omnibus-drivers
,
for some unknown, and at this remote
period from the event, unconjecturable cause,
entered solemnly into a set-to, in which much
muscle and science were displayed, and which
ended in a most fraternal embrace under the
table.
A cadaverous, thoughtful mannot the
chairman
who
was no talker but a wonderful deep
thinker and metaphysician, grew mysterious
and communicative, and hinted that he had
that in the pocket of his swallow-tail which
would raise a devil of a ferment if the public
but knew of it.
A fifth associate of the club, who still
retained
an insufficient hat planted jauntily on
his head, thought it would be a capital idea
a very capital ideaa devilish first-rate idea
in the way of a social re-organizationto get
together a parcel of gilt steeple-balls, and hatch
out a brood of young churches by clapping a
bishop upon them.
Another gentleman was inclined to think
that the Bottom Club had better mind its own
business, by petitioning the common council to
have jugglers appointed inspectors of election,
who could pass into the ballot-box two tickets
for one on their own side, and no tickets for
ever so many on the other.
A wide-mouthed member, the author of the
ditty that had been sung, and clerk and
bell-ringer
to a neighboring market, became
horribly
sentimental, shed tears in his beer, and
kissed his hand to the eagle at the other end of
the room. As the entertainments were
manifestly
drawing to an end, Hobbleshank glanced
warily toward Puffer Hopkins, and made for
the door. But they were not let off so easily
for simultancous with the rising of Puffer
Hopkins
was that of the entire Bottom Club; and a
general friendly assault was begun upon the
person of that worthy young gentleman.
First, the gentlemen of the club insisted on
shaking hands all round toward the right, and
then all round toward the left; one or two
were resolved to embrace him, and did so; and
at last, after the pantomime, there was a
unanimous
call for a speech from that gentleman,
which summons was, however, without a
discovery
of the substitution on the part of the
astute
members of the Bottom Club, responded to
by Hobbleshank, after his own peculiar fashion,
with a very happy allusion to the striped flag
and the refreshments.
The unshorn man hoped Puffer Hopkins
would come again, and vowed he was his friend
to command, from the state of Maine to Cape
May; and the metaphysical deep thinker,
struggling
manfully with the beer he had imbibed,
promised next time to communicate something
of vital consequence to the welfare of this
Union; with which promises, protestations,
and God-speeds, Hobbleshank and Hopkins
departed
.
CHAPTER IV.
MR. FYLER CLOSE AND HIS CUSTOMERS.
It
can not be denied that Mr. Fyler Close had
selected his lodgings with commendable thrift
and discretion. A single small apartment over
a bakery, and looking out upon a public pump,
supplied him at the lowest current rate with
the three primary necessaries of life; namely,
warmth, from the bi-daily inflammation of the
oven for the benefit of neighboring families
biscuits, the legitimate spawn of the oven
and water, the cheap creature of corporate
benevolence
.
It could scarcely be expected, that
sundry fat spiders that kept their webs in the
different corners of his room, would be
incorporated
in any of the banquets of Mr. Fyler
Close, although by many people they might
have been regarded as a respectable addition
thereto. With the exception of its inhabitants,
the single small apartment was almost wholly
voidthere being no covering upon the floor,
no curtains at the window, no paper upon the
walls, and not the slightest semblance of a fire,
past, present, or future, on the deserted
hearth-stone
.
To be sure, if you had opened a
narrow
door on one side, you might have detected
in a cramped closet a pair of coverlids, in which
Mr. Close was in the habit of sheathing his
meager limbs every night, as a nominal
protection
against chilblains and rheumatism; while
the door of the closet was carefully fastened
and secured within, from a fear which the
occupant
somehow or other encouraged, that he
should be roused some unlucky morning with
a heavy hand on his throat, a big grim face
bending over him, and his pockets all picked
clean.
In the outer room stood a dilapidated
candle-stand
,
covered with a tattered baize, with a
battered inkstand and two stumpy pens lying
upon the same; three chairs with decayed
bottoms
;
and, in the corner of the hearth, a
single
long gloomy poker, with its head up the
chimney.
The advantages of these commodious
quarters
were, at the present juncture, enjoyed by
Mr. Fyler Close himself, who being a short,
hard-visaged gentleman, in a great blue coat
some three sizes too large for him, and a pair
of ambitious trowsers that climbed his legs,
disdaining
intercourse with a pair of low
cheapcut
shoes, became the accommodations
admirably
.
There was another, a long, spare
personage
,
with a countenance so marked, and
scarred, and written all over with ugly lines
and seams, as to resemble a battered
tombstone
;
and having old decayed teeth that
disclosed
themselves whenever he opened his
mouth, the fancy of uncouth dry bones sticking
out at the corner of a grave was still further
kept up. There was something extremely
sinister
in the features of this individual, who sate
in the nook between the closet and
chimney-piece
,
and constantly glared about him, in a
restless manner, as if the air swarmed
wherever
he looked with unusual sounds, and as if
he caught sudden sight of faces by no means
pleasant to look upon.
I don't see that I could have managed my
little moneys much better, said Mr. Fyler
Close, unless I had locked them up in an iron
safe, and buried the key under the walls of the
house. There's only about four hoursand
they're at dead midnightwhen my debtors
could slip away from me; and then they'd have
to do it devilish cautiously, Leycraft, not to be
heard. See, sir! I am in the very centre of all
my investments, and have a watch on them
like an auctioneer at the height of his sales.
You see that yellow house? I make the owner
keep his shutters open, because I have a
mortgage
on his piano, which I wouldn't lose sight
of for the world.
Quite an eye for music, I should think!
interposed his companion.
And a pretty good ear too, continued Mr.
Close, for if I should fail to hear my little
blacksmith's hammer in the old forge, off this
way, I should go distracted. It sooths me
very much to hear that anvil ringing from
early light down to broad dusk; and you can't
tell what a comfort it is to me when I'm sick!
Is he punctual in his interest? asked Mr.
Leycraft, well knowing that the fine arts must
be associated in Mr. Fyler Close's mind with
some such disagreeable contingency.
Exemplary, sir; and when he falls sick
and can't make a racket himself, he always
sends round word and employs a couple of boys
to keep it up, just to satisfy my mind. If
the forge stopped for two days, I should be
under
the necessity of coming down on his shop
with a sharp-clawed writ, which would be very
painful.
Excruciating, I should think, said Mr.
Leycraft, smiling grimly; it would give you
a sort of moral rheumatism, I've no doubt!
You know it would! rejoined Fyler Close,
returning the smile. Then here's the baker
he can't run away without my smelling the
fresh loaves as they go into the cart; and the
haberdasher over the way in front, couldn't
escape me, unless she undertook to dress up all
her male acquaintance in ruffles and false
bosoms
,
and let them out through the alley.
That might do, but I guess she isn't up to it;
since she lost her husband she's gone a little
weak in the head, and pays an extra cent on
the dollar when she is borrowing from Mr.
Fyler Close.
These are small gains and slow ones, said
Mr. Leycraft; you might sit on spiders' eggs
like these for a century, and not hatch out a
fortune. Let's have something bold and
dashing
something
where you put in no capital
and double it to boot in less than a week!
Something modelled on the farm-house
affair, eh? said Fyler Close, leering on his
companion significantly.
Will you let that subject alone, if you
please, Mr. Fyler Close! cried Mr. Leycraft,
whose countenance lowered and darkened on his
companion as he spake. We have had talks
enough about that cursed house, and one too
many. I wish the title-deed was in the right
owner's hands!
You dodo you? urged Mr. Close,
pleasantly
.
Shall I ask Mrs. Hetty Lettuce, the
market-women, when she comes here next to
pay the rent or renew her mortgage, if she
can't find him for us? Perhaps if we paid her
well she might relieve us of the property, and
provide a very gentlemanly owner in our place.
Shall we advertiseoffer rewardspost
placards
?
I've no doubt if the purlieus of the city
were well dragged, that an heir would turn
up.
Stuff! Fyler Close, you know well enough
that an heir couldn't be brought alive off either
one of the five continents, that could make
good his claim; and that makes you chuckle so
like a fiend. Mrs. Lettuce has lost trace of
him for more than twenty yearshas grown
fat and lazyborrows money on bond and
mortgage, and don't care a straw about the
subject:
Where's your grand project all this time?
interposed Fyler Close. Shall we have
something
new to practise our wits on, or shall we
rake among our dead schemes for wherewithal
to warm our brains with?
Now that you are on that, said Mr.
Leycraft
,
rapidly surveying the nooks and privacies
of the apartment, and bestowing a broad glare
on the door and windows, I say freely and
without the least reserve, that my head's a
nine-pin, if I don't lay a plan before you will
make you thrill down to your pocket-ends with
rapture: it's a neat schemevery neat,but
at the same time mighty magnificent.
Saying this, Leycraft drew close up to the
side of the broker, laid their heads close
together
,
and bending over the stand, he moved
his finger slowly in a sort of hieroglyphic
over it, and, tapping his forehead
complacently
,
was about to detail his notable plan, when a
knock was heard at the door, which cut short
any further communication for the present.
The knock was repeated a little louder;
Fyler
Close motioned to his companion, who
vanished
expeditiously down a pair of back stairs
into the yard, looking anxiously back all the
time as if under pursuit, and so through the
baker's
;
and Close, snatching from his pocket a
well-worn hymn-book, began reciting a most
excellent passage of psalmody, in a deep and
nasal intonation.
The knock was repeated three or four times
before an invitation was given to enter; and
although the broker glanced over the top of
his book, as the door opened and discovered his
visiter, he assumed not to be conscious of the
presence of any person whatever, but proceeded
steadily, in fact, with rather increased energy,
in his capital divertisement. Please, sir, said
the visiter, a stout-built lady, curtseying and
advancing timidly a step or two, please sir,
what's to be done about the little mortgage on
my grounds, sir?
This question Fyler Close seemed at first
altogether
unable to apprehend; but when it was
repeated, accompanied by a slight jingle of
silver
in the visiter's pocket, he started, deposited
his book open upon the standas if he wished
to resume it at the very earliest convenience
looked about him and pensively remarked,
twitching his whiskers, of which there was a
dry tuft on either cheek, violently:
Poor old man!there's no comfort left for
you now, but psalm-singing and class-meetings
every other evening in the week. These are
old chairs, madam!
They certainly are, Mr. Close; very old;
there's no denying facts, answered the
huckster
.
This is a dreadful dreary room for an old
man to live in! again groaned the broker.
Sartain! responded the unwary
market-woman
;
I think in that point, to do you
justice
,
it's but next better than a family vault,
saving the death's-heads and the smell.
And now you ask me, a poor lonesome
man, living like Death himself, as you admit,
and that can afford to keep no better company
than three poor crazy chairs, to renew your
mortgage
at seven per cent.!why, a cannibal, with
good cannibal feelings, wouldn't ask it!
Mr. Close, on delivery of this speech, fell
silent, and dropped into a profound meditation,
during which he from time to time looked up,
and eyed the stout person of the huckster as if
he thought it would furnish a most delicate
morsel for a Carribee. But his own method of
devouring a victim differed essentially from that
adopted by the benighted heathen, and he now
proceeded to demonstrate his dexterity in his
own particular line of manipulation.
Well! you shall have it! he cried,
awaking
as from an anxious revery; I have
considered
ityour business shall be done, Mrs.
Lettuce.
Thank you, sirthank you, sir! I am very
much obliged, exclaimed the market-woman,
bowing and curtseying with great show of
gratitude
,
but misapprehending slightly the
meaning
of Mr. Fyler Close, and promising the
accruing
interest in hard dollars, punctually on
quarter-day.
But I must have my summer supply of
radishes
!
said Close.
Oh, for the trifle of that, Master Close, we'll
not differ. I can send you down a bunch or
two by the girls, every now and then.
Every now and then will not do, madam;
I must have them regularly, for I can't live
without putting a few for sale, in the season of
them, at the baker's window below stairs.
Well, I don't mind a handful of greens, in
the way of binding a bargain; so the cart shall
stop every morning if you please, and leave you
a dozen bunches.
Very good, very good! exclaimed the
broker
,
rubbing his hands together, you are a
woman of sense; and now, I must have my
asparagus
,
that's a dainty herbI love
asparagus
,
dearlyand it sells well when it's early.
Mind, I must have early tops, or none at all!
Pick me the tops that grow near the house,
close up by the foundations, will you?
Early tops, and such as he desired, were
accordingly
promised, perforce; Mrs. Hetty
Lettuce
diving convulsively into her pockets, to
make sure of such small change as she had
about her, as everything appeared to be
slipping
away from her ownership with
extraordinary
velocity and despatch.
I'll not ask you, continued the
discriminating
Mr. Close, to supply me with butter, nor
with eggs, although something nice might be
done with them through my neighbor below
but eggs are quite apt to addle on hand, and
butter must be kept in ice, which costs
twopence
a pound, and melts without leaving as
much as a thank-ye in your pocket.
Your sentiments are very excellent, sir, on
that subject, said Mrs. Lettuce, brightening
up.
Yes, they are, very excellent; but you'll
think them far nicer on the subject of good
worsted stockings, made with your own dainty
handsthree pair for winter use, I should have
three pair at least, and as many more for fall.
You know we must guard against frosts and
chilblains a little; made with low tops, with
red clocks to show they are your fabricone of
the sweetest knitters in the market.
With this he fell back quietly in his chair,
and reminding Mrs. Lettuce that he should
expect
his first pair of fall socks Wednesday-week,
he wished her good day; which wish Mrs.
Lettuce
was by no means idle in accepting, for her
departure was, in fact, accomplished with such
expedition, as to amount almost to a
precipitate
flight. At this we can not be greatly
astonished
,
when we consider the chance of a
requisition
being made upon her to furnish the
entire outfit and wardrobe of the broker, by
way of lightening his doleful condition and
eking out the percentage on his mortgage.
As soon as Mrs. Lettuce had departed, the
broker ascended a chair, and after careful
inspection
of an old chest in his closet, and
making
discovery of a single pair of fragmentary
hose and an old stocking, he said laughing to
himself, This merchandise of the old
market-woman's
must go into the hands of Ishmael,
that's clear. Nights are growing sharper; a
little, a very little wood must be laid in; and
where fires are kept, socks should be
discountenanced
.
He had just stepped down from
this inquisition, when a sharp rap echoed
through the hall, and, without waiting for a
summons to enter, the strange old body, Puffer
Hopkins' friend, marched abruptly into the
apartment, with a very peremptory and
threatening
aspect.
I have come again! said the old
gentleman
,
sternly.
I see you have, replied Mr. Fyler Close,
smiling on him with all the suavity and
mellowness
of an August day.
Do you see that I am here? continued
Hobbleshank.
Most assuredlyunless you are an
apparition
;
and then you are here and not here, at
the same time, answered the broker.
If I were a goblin, sircome in here with
a thong of leather to strip you to your skin and
stripe you all over with blowswould I be out
of place, do you think?
Perhaps not much; a little, we'll say a
little
,
answered Mr. Close, still smiling gently
on his visiter, just to balance the sentence.
And then if I carried your bruised old
carcase
,
continued Hobbleshank, and plunged
it in a gulf of boiling fire, and held it there
by the throat for a century, or sowould it be
pleasant and satisfactory?
Extremely so, answered the broker;
nothing could be desired more charming,
unless
it might be a bond on compound interest,
with the interest payable at twelve o'clock
daily.
That would be finer, you think?
Much finerbecause that would leave one
the use of his legs to get out of troubles with.
Now, sir, said Hobbleshank, who always
made it a point to subject the broker to a
searching
and playful cross-examinationthe answers
to which, as has been seen, on the part of the
broker, were always extremely candid and
confiding
,
now, sir, I want to know of you, whether
you think a gentleman who has stood by and seen
a man's wife die by inches in the veriest need of
common foodhas seen the man go madyes,
mad, sir, withgrief, and flee from his house in
utter despair and miserydo you think this
gentleman, who, when he has put the child and
heir of these poor wretches out of the way
God knows howtakes the roof that should
have sheltered his boy's headdo you think he
deserves the use of his legs? or his cursed,
griping
hands? or his great devilish eyes?
Not at allby no means, my dear sir,
answered Fyler Close, blandly. It would be
waste and extravagance to allow such a
monster
anything but his neck; you know he might
hang by that.
Suppose you hadn't conveniences to hang
him withno tackle, no scaffold, no murderer's
cap, continued Hobbleshank, and couldn't
persuade the gentleman to lend his neck to a
noosewhat then?
What then?I confess I should be at a
stand. The case stands thus, if I apprehend
you, my dear sir, answered Mr. Close, with
the same astonishing equanimity, here's a
great villain to be punished; the law can't
reach him; he won't consent to be strung up
without law, and declinesis it so?
positively
declines to come into any friendly
arrangement
to be burnt or bastinadoed, what's to be
done? Upon my honor, my good sir, I must
allow the knave has the better of you. I am
sorry for it, extremely sorry; but the ways of
Providence are just, very just, and I guess you'll
have to wait for them!
As Mr. Close uttered these words he assumed
a benign and tranquil expression of
countenance
,
and looked serenely forward into empty
space, as if it was a hardshipa very great
hardship, that such a case should exist, but that
it was his duty, as an exemplary citizen, to
resign
himself to it without a murmur. In this
seeming quietude of feeling Hobbleshank
scarcely
shared.
What's to be done? he shouted, darting
forward toward the brokerhis ugly flesh is to
be torn with sharp nails, like pincers; his head
is to be broken, where these maggots hatch
wretch!
But ere he could fasten upon the broker,
and exemplify his notions of punishment, that
gentleman, who had been warily watching his
visiter all through the interview, dropped from
his chair, glided athwart the candle-stand, and
throwing himself into the adjoining closet,
secured
it from within.
Having rehearsed this performance many
times before, in previous interviews with his
visiter, Mr. Fyler Close achieved it at present
with marvellous despatch. For a few minutes
Hobbleshank made furious assaults upon the
broker's fortress, with his feet and clenched fists
which he dashed violently against the panels;
all of which proceedings were echoed from
within
by a hard, iron laugh, that almost set
Hobbleshank
beside himself. From time to time
the laughter continued, and the rage of the old
man increased, until at length, in his extremity
of passion, he snatched up the single piece of
furniturethe prime ornament of the
apartment
dashed
it in fragments upon the hearth,
kicked open the outer door, and rushed almost
headlong into the street.
Mr. Fyler Close had no sooner heard his
retreating
steps, than he quietly unearthed
himself
,
and stepping along the hall of the building,
hoisted a window in front, and putting forth
his head, watched with considerable interest
the form of Hobbleshank as it was whirled
along by the rage and desperation of its owner,
without much regard to children, flshmongers
with which the street swarmedwheelbarrows,
or ladies in full dress. He then tranquilly
gathered
the remains of his writing-table, tied them
in a bundle with a string, and placing them
tenderly
in the corner, produced from an upper
shelf of his closet-stronghold a single
sea-bis-cuit
,
and proceeded to his evening meal.
CHAPTER V.
THE AUCTION ROOM.
Anxious
to become familiar with the
people
in their assemblies and public gatherings
to learn how crowds are excited and assuaged,
and made to do the bidding of cunning men;
now that which would be folly and sheer
madness
with one, may, practised upon many in a
confused mass, take the hue of profoundest
wisdom
and justice; and having at heart, withal,
the suggestions of his strange old friend of
Fogfire
hall, Puffer Hopkins now made it a point
to haunt meetings and congregations of every
sort, anniversaries, wharf crowds and lectures,
and to detect how the leviathan populace is
snared in a fair net of silvery words and
pleasant
speeches.
At the lower extremity of the great
thoroughfare
of Chatham street, just below the theatre,
lies an oblong, deep shop, into which is drawn,
between the hours of seven and nine, evening,
a portion of the metropolitan life, where it is
kept raging and fumingpent up in a close
massand struggling with the black-haired
demon
of the place. The genius of the oblong
warehouse is none other than a gloomy-looking
auctioneer, who hangs over a counter fixed on
a raised platform, calling on the individuals
before
himwho are chiefly clerks, newsboys,
journeymen, and innocent gentlemen from the
countryto sustain him in his disinterested
desire
to advocate the elegance of binders, the
instructive
and entertaining qualities of authors,
and the gorgeous genius of colorists, engravers,
and paper-rulers.
This gentleman is ably sustained and
seconded
in the performance of these arduous duties,
by a sable-haired associate, who makes it his
business to stroll cheerfully up and down the
enclosed space behind the counter, rubbing his
hands from time to time, as in token of
internal
satisfaction at the success of their joint
efforts
,
and dashing down upon the counter such
wares as a sagacious glance at his audience
satisfies him are most likely to be competed for.
On some occasions one or other of the
black-haired
gentlemen behind the counter
condescends
to be facetious, and says remarkably
funny
things for the special benefit and solace of
the citizens underneath. This department
properly
belongs to the auctioneer, but is
incidentally
filled by the feeder, with such chance
morsels
of humor as may suggest themselves to him
as he rambles to and fro.
Into this oblong region of sale, as one of the
resorts where his plans might be furthered,
Puffer
one evening made his way.
Gentlemen, cried the black-haired auo
tioneer, with inereased animation as Puffer
Hopkins entereddiscovering, perhaps, in the
peculiar costume and manner of that excellent
young gentleman some indications of a
melo-dramatic
tendencygentlemen, here's the
primest article I've offered to-night; this is
`Brimstone Castle,' a native melodrama, as
performed one hundred nights at the Bowery
theatre, Bowery, New York. The hero of
this piece, gentlemen, is a regular salamander,
and could take out a policy in any company in
this city at a low hazard; he's fireproof. In the
first act, he appears sitting on a log, meditating;
is suddenly surprised and taken by a band of
savages of a red-ochre complexion, from whom
he escapes by ruthlessly cutting off the right
leg of every mother's son of themrushes over
a bridgerescues a lady with dishevelled hair,
and a small boy in her hand; climbs up a
cataract
,
waves his cap to the rescued lady, loses
his appetite, and is finally retaken by the
savages
,
and burnt at the stake for an hourwhen
he walks out of the flame, advances to the
foot-lights
,
and, with a very cheerful smile on his
countenance, announces `Brimstone Castle'
for the next twelve nights, with an extra
savage
and fresh fagots every night. How much,
gentlemen? Going, going. How much?it's
a masterpiece, gentlemena perfect work of
art. How much?
The melo-drama was bandied about for more
than a quarter of an hour among sundry young
gentlemen in round-crowned hats, with sleek,
shining heads of black hair and broad-skirted
blue coats, but finally fell to the lot of a bidder
with a stout voice, just one of those voices that
are irresistible in an auction-room, and a
terror
to gentlemen who desire cheap purchases.
I now offer you, cried the auctioneer, one
of the most astonishing and wonderful works
of the present day. It's full of thought,
gentlemen
,
expressed in the very happiest words
out
of Todd's Johnson and Noah Webster, as
clear as a moonbeam, gentlemen, and profound
as the Atlantic. It treats of various subjects,
such ashere the auctioneer turned the pages
of the book in his hand rapidly, after the
manner
of a quarterly reviewer, with the hope of
gleaning a comprehensive knowledge of its
contents
;
but, judging by the face of ineffable
despair
he assumed after thrusting his nose
half-a-dozen
times between the leaves, with little
success
excuse
me, he continued, smiling
sardonically
on his audience, it would be
presumptuous
in me, a plain, unlearned citizen, to
undertake
to convey to your minds the substance
of a volume like this. Gentlemen, I'll read
you a passage from the introduction, which
explains
itself:Ponds have presented turtles
in two aspectseither as turtles or as not
turtles
.
In the one, turtle, the living, breathing,
air-cased creature, the individual in his
pneumatic
being, sitting on a rock, pond-centred, is
mighty, supernal, vastly infinitemore than
frogdom at bottom, blind-eel, or muscle life.
Not he theirs, or for them, but they nothing,
save for him. Outward worldto them,
mud-encompassed
otherwise
dead as door-nail. In
the other, slidden from pond-centred rock down
to the depths of the unsearchable, frogdom,
blind-eel, and muscle lifeeach more than
turtle. He theirs, being thick-headed,
obfusticated
by lack of light, and doltish;and for them,
he little or nothing save a black lump, part of the
general pond-bottom, pavement, chips, wind,
gas, snake-grass, and bulrushes.'
It need scarcely be added that the lucid work
on which the auctioneer was engaged, was
nothing more nor less than a volume of
transcendental
lectures. Puffer Hopkins detected
the same burley voice bidding for thisand
triumphing
in its bidthat he had heard twice
before.
At this juncture a member of the great
fraternity
of lay bishopsin other words a very
worthy cartman in his short frockcame in,
and supposing, from the few words that he
caught as he entered, that the work in hand
was illustrative of some new and improved
method of bobbing for eels, was rash enough
to invest seven shillings in the purchase of a
second copy. Paying his money very
awkwardly
at the counter, out of a blind-pocket in his
cart-frockbe carried his purchase to a lamp
in another quarter of the auction-room, and
proceeded
,
very slowly and painfully, to enlighten
himself on the favorite pursuit of eel-bobbing.
He bobbed, however, in that pond to very little
purposeand becoming confused and horribly
enraged at the constant recurrence of the
phrases
a oneness, an obscure and unreachable
infinite, divergence toward central orbits,
and revolutionary inwardnesses
intemperately
sold it (for six cents and a fraction) to a
match-boy, who stood by with a basket ready
to catch such purchases as might prove
unavailable
or disrelishing to the buyers. There's
an acre of fog-bank there, boy, said the cartman
from between his teeth, take it away. My horse
has a better head for writings, and authorships,
and what not, than the stupid journeyman
fellow
that spoked this wheel together. Just away
with it.
If there's a patriot in the room, continued
the salesman, a single young or middle-aged
gentleman that loves his country and the story
of her achievements, let him come forward and
lay down his one dollar fifty. I offer you,
gentlemen
,
the `Battle of Bloody Puddle,' a
narrative
poem, in six books. This masterpiece of
genius
has nine heroes, each one of whom
accomplishes
more in the way of slaughter,
swordsmanship
,
and small-talk, from various
elevations
,
peaks, cliffs, and hill-tops, than any nine
heroes ever let loose on the world before. The
stanza is irregular, to correspond with the
thought, which is very wild and superhuman.
The chief herothe A No. 1pattern
warrior
,
is discovered by moonlight, sharpening his
sword on a boulder of granite, in two
nimblefoot
octosyllabic stanzashe loses his
scabbard
and temper in four Spenserianentering
a cave to conceal himself from the bloody
British
foe, who are tracking him about like dogs,
in twenty-five hexametersbut recovers both in
an eleven-syllabled song, in which he grows
very happy about wine, war, and woman,
particularly
Isobel the fairuntil, all at once, he
discovers a cloud on the moon, which reminds
him to prepare for a few elegiac verses and
death. He ultimately hangs himself in a
hemlock
sapling, and leaves his pocket-book, with
a counterfeit bill and two forged letters in it,
to his Isobel, bidding her, in a brief, touching,
epistolary farewell, never to part with these
relics
of his affectionnever, never! which it isn't
very likely she ever will, particularly the
counterfeits
.
The rest of the poem corresponds,
how much, how much? Cheapgoing cheap
as politicians' consciences, a penny a dozen.
It's yours, sir, at twenty-five cents. It's
perfectly
ruinous to sell this work at that price,
sighed the auctioneer, wheeling round and
stoically
receiving from his assistant a bundle of
two dozen more of the same.
There was something in the voice of the
bidder who had borne off the chief purchases
of the evening, that excited the curiosity of
Puffer Hopkins; he thought he had heard it
before
,
and, to ascertain the owner, now mounted
a bench and peered over the heads of the
audience toward the quarter whence it had
issued.
In a remote angle of the auction-room apart
from the crowd, in a little domain of his own,
stood a square broad-breasted gentleman, with
his arms folded and gazing at the auctioneer
with a fixed and intense look that could not
have been readily surpassed by a Spanish
inquisitor
,
or a petty justice reproving a constable.
The fury of his demeanor was heightened by
the close buttoning of his coat, to the very
throat, the inflation of his coat skirts with a
thick bundle of newspapers and a large
bandanna
handkerchief, the strapping of his
pantaloons
firmly down upon the boot, and still
further by his being a gentleman of moderate
stature, in whom, it is well-known, fierceness
is natural and quite becoming. It was this
gentleman that bid for the melo-drama, the
poem of Bloody Puddle, and the volume of
Transcendental
Lectures; and, now that he had
attained
a full view of his person, Puffer felt
quite sure that he knew him. Pushing through
the mass of bidders, he reached the little
Zahara
which this gentleman's frowns and dignity
had created for himself.
Mr. Fishblatt, I think, said Puffer,
respectfully
contemplating the figure before him.
The same, sir, responded the
broad-breasted
gentleman, starting back, a pace or two,
dropping his brows, and regarding the
questioner
steadily for a minute or more. You are
one of our speakers I believe, continued Mr.
Fishblatt, still maintaining his survey, one of
the oratorical youth of Fogfire Hallam I
right?
You are, answered Puffer Hopkins: I
had the honor of speaking before you at the
last general meeting; you were a
vice-president
.
What! cried Mr. Fishblatt in an earnest
whisper, you are not the young gentleman
that used the simile of the rainbow? On my
soul you are; don't blush, my dear sir, and turn
every color in a minute, for that convicts you
at once. I'm glad to see you, it's quite a treat.
Take my hand, Mr. Hopkins.
Hereupon Mr. Fishblatt took possession of
Puffer Hopkins' right hand, shook it strenuously,
and then, turning to the auctioneer on service,
said:
That man's worthy to be a Quarterly
Reviewer
.
He's a Jeffrey, a Babbington
Macaulay
,
sir; an Edward Everett, with the devil in
him. He tells books by the smell of the leather.
And see how daintily he holds an annual up,
as a fishmonger does a bass by the tail, so as to
send the circulation to the head, and give the
eyes a life-like look. Don't he play on the
leaves and illustrations like a musical genius?
See, my good sir, how he displays that volume
with colored plates, it's like a glimpse into the
fall woods. This is the shop for sound
criticism
;
writers that are disdainfully treated in
the weeklies and monthlies needn't be afraid to
come here; if they're hacked and hewed so that
their best friend couldn't know them, all they
need do is to huddle themselves into a coarse
blue-cloth apparel and throw themselves before
that black-haired gentleman, and they'll have
a blast sounded in their behalf that will bring
every two and six pence in the place rattling
on the counter.
While the broad-breasted gentleman was
engaged
elaborating this artful encomium on his
friend, the auctioneer had produced a huge
bundle of controversial tracts and almanacs,
black with wood-cuts, and dashed them upon
the counter with great spirit, at which Mr.
Fishblatt started, again grasped Hopkins by the
hand, gave him the street and number of his
residence, and urged him to call speedily.
You can't mistake the house; it's a red
front with tall chimney-potsgrenadier pots
we call themand a slab of brass on the door
with `Halsey Fishblatt' in large text. Any of
the hackmen on the square can direct you, for
they can all read my plate as they stand, nearly
two rods off. Come soon!
Pouring out his passages of description and
invitation vehemently, Mr. Fishblatt gave
Puffer a strenous good-night, advanced and
threw his card upon the counter, and thrusting
his right hand into the breast of his coat,
marched out of the auction-room with great
vigor and self-possession.
Now that the chief bidder, who had held the
room in awe by his peremptory and majestic
manner of calling the price, had departed, the
minor customers immediately swelled into
consequence
,
and a horrible conflict was forthwith
engendered betwixt the match-boywhose
imagination
always kindled at the slightest
suggestion
of a goblina small retail clerk, who
had sympathies with coffins and family vaults,
as he slept every night in an unwholesome and
grave-like cabin at the rear of the dry-goods
shop; and a broken-down gentlemana
speculator
in cemeterieswho was on the look-out
for information on sepulchral subjects.
Here's a rare morsel for you, my lads, said
the auctioneer, whose style grew more familiar
on the departure of the majestic Fishblatt, a
dainty mouthful, I can tell you. `
The Vision
of the Coffin-maker's 'Prentice
,'a story in
manuscriptnever published. It's a copyright,
boys, as good as new in first hands. It's said
the author starved to death because the
publishers
wouldn't buy his book; they could import
goblins and bugbears cheaper than they could
be grown on the spot. The biggest
bugbears
always come from abroad, said the
feeder
,
pausing a moment from his rambles, facing
the audience, and laying both hands on the
counter. Come bid up, will ye? Don't go
to sleep if you please, in that corner. Others
say the author choked himself with a chicken
bonenobody believes that. Poets and
poultry
have never been on good terms, that I could
learn. Will the band be good enough to strike
up?
Sixpencethere's a dodge! cried the
match-boy.
I'll go nine, said the retail clerk; that's
a more superlative go, I know.
Nine and one, cried the match-boy,
reddening
in the face, and glancing spitefully at the
retail bidder.
No penny bids in this shop, interposed
the auctioneer, authoritatively. Try again,
gentlemenyours, twelve and a halftwelve
and a half!
This last was the bid of the cemetery
speculator
.
Twelve and a half. Fifteen, fifteen,
fifteen
one
and nine. The bids ran on; the
auctioneer
chanced to turn the volume toward
Puffer
Hopkins, who discovered at the side of one of
the pages, a pen-and-ink drawing of a stout
gentleman standing in a coffin, with his right
arm outstretched as if on the point of
beginning
a speech. Not knowing but that this
might be some new exercise in oratory, and
seeing
at once the facilities for the pathetic
afforded
by a snug-built coffin, Puffer entered the
field, and, overtopping all competition by a
half-dollar
bid, paid the purchase-money in silver
which it employed him some ten minutes to
hunt into a corner of his pocket and secure
and bore it away.
In less than a quarter of an hour he was at
his own room in the Fork, and called in his
poor neighbor, the tailor, and by the light of a
dim candle (snuffers not being within the
appointments
of his establishment), entered upon
the persual of his new-bought story.
The manuscript was bound in a black linen
cover, worn threadbare and ragged by much
handling; was ornamented with rude drawings
of crossbones and tombstones, with quaint
inscriptions
on the margin; and the leaves were
spotted in various places, and the ink faded, as
if many burning tears had fallen on the page.
CHAPTER VI.
THE VISION OF THE COFFIN-MAKER'S 'PRENTICE.
What
is more natural than that the thoughts
of Sam Totton, the coffin-maker's 'prentice,
should be running on death's-heads and
grinning
sculls, and damp, dark vaults, deep down
in the earth; with now and then a cheerful
feeling of the pleasantness of country
church-yards
,
with tombstones interspersed among
sweet-scented apple-trees, and rich green palls of
bright meadow-grass spreading over the grave.
Now and then, too, he might think of ghosts,
releasing themselves from the grave and taking
a night's ramble, and whistling down tall chim
neys in cities, or glaring in, with great cold
eyes, at farmhouse-windows, and frightening
the quiet circle at the fireside with a dread
token
of death near at hand, or some heavy evil
about to burst on the unlucky house. By the
hour would the young 'prentice sit in the
undertaker's
shop, meditating on the sorry
chances
of life, the wonderful demand for coffins
in the summer months, and the strange world
into which many merry, stout gentlemen, and
joyous ladies, would ere long be transported,
screwed close down in the cruel coffins that
stood in a grim row before him.
Some he knew would stretch themselves
quietly at length, and fall asleep; others would
fight and wrestle, like very demons, ere they
could be brought to bear to be shut down and
cabined in for ever; and others again, in whom
life was furious and not to be readily
extinguished
,
would smite and dash their deadly
hands against the coffin-lid, and would cry out,
in voices stifled in the damp, thick clay, to be
freed.
With this turn of mind, the 'prentice was
sitting one night in the shop, on an
undertaker's
stool, and watching the various shadows
that came through the door, as the August sun
settled in the sky. Now the shadow would flit
in at one coffin, filling it only breast-high;
then, shifting itself, it would take entire
possession
of a child's, that stood next; and so
flitting past, from one to the other, it brought
into Sam's mind the thought how these coffins
would one day be tenanted, and what manner
of people it might be that should be laid in the
coffins that stood about himlarge and small
and how soon they would all be filled and borne
silently away.
The thought had scarcely formed itself in
Sam's mind, when the shop bell was rung very
gently; a glass door that was between him and
the street was opened, and a figure, more
wo-begone
,
wretched, and disconsolate, than he
had ever before beheld, presented himself, and
paused for a moment, just long enough for the
'prentice to take note of his appearance. His
eyes were wild, and sunken far behind pale,
ghastly, hollow cheeks, in which there was no
drop of blood; his head was without covering
of any sort, except a shock of uncombed,
matted
hair, and he limped sadly forward on
disproportioned
,
infirm legs, in scanty apparel,
and, with an apologetic appeal in his looks to
the young 'prentice, shambled away into a
remote
corner of the shop, and planted himself as
nearly upright and with as great show of
decorum
as he could, in a cheap pine coffin that
stood by itself.
Sam felt strongly inclined to enter into
conversation
with the poor figure, and to learn by
what chances it had been brought into that
lean and melancholy beggary. Ere he could do
this, the door was pushed forcibly open, and a
portly personage entered, and, stalking across the
shop with great dignity and majesty of bearing,
proceeded to an inspection of the coffins; going
close up to them, examining nicely the grain
of the woodyea, even smelling of it, and
turning away with an air of vast disdain
whenever
it proved to be cedar or baywoodthe
quality of the muslin, and the action of the
hinges. After turning up a majestic nose,
discolored
slightly by the use of wine or
table-beer
,
at two thirds of the undertaker's
assortment
,
the portly gentleman at length pitched
upon a magnificent tabernacle of mahogany,
with fine rolling hinges, that could'nt jar on
his delicate ear when he should come to be
fastened
in, and an enormous silver plate, with a
chased border of cheerful flowers, that took
away the very appearance of death. Having
concluded to occupy this tenement, the portly
gentleman proceeded to take possession, and
with great difficulty crowded himself into the
coffin; forgetting, however, to put off his hat,
which remained fixed on his head in a very
sturdy and consequential position; and there
he stood, bolt-upright, staring at the young
'prentice as if it was his determination to chill
him into an icicle. Sam was, however, not so
easily over-awed, but, on the contrary, felt
greatly inclined to burst into a good hearty
laugh at the comic figure the nice portly
gentleman
made in his dainty, brass-hinged,
mahogany
coffin.
As he turned away his eyes, they
encountered
a spectacle which came nigh changing
their merry humor to tears; for a sweet lady,
all in white, floated gently past him, of a fair,
meek demeanor, and bearing in either hand two
little children, a boy and girl, whose faces ever
turned toward the lady's, with an expression
of intense and tender regard. Clinging to her
with a firm grasp, they glided by, and tried at
first to rest in one coffin together, which proving
ineffectual, they chose coffins neighboring to
each other, and, quietly assuming their places,
they stood calm and patient, as if death had
fallen kindly upon them; the two children
turning
reverently toward their dear mother, and
hanging on her pale, sweet look, with
passionate
constancy.
Directly in the steps of these visiters, there
entered a personage who, judging from the
dotted
apparel in which he presented himself,
might have been the ghost of some
black-spotted
card or other, come to take a hand with
Sam's master, who was greatly addicted to the
sport and entertainment of whist-playing.
However
this might be, the new comer entered with
a couple of somersets, turned about when he had
reached the centre of the shop, took off his
pie-bald
cap, and made a leg to Sam, and then
scrambled into a coffin directly opposite that of
the portly gentleman.
For a long time these two personages stood
regarding each other; the one grinning and
hitching up his leg, as if he felt the
irksomeness
of confinement, and the other, with a
solemn
look of consequence and self-importance,
determined the very grave itself should not get
the better of him.
`This is pleasant!' said the portly
gentleman
,
at length, with a slight tone of irony and
condescension, to his neighbor the clown.
`Very; but not so airy as the ring!'
answered
the merry-andrew.
`Nor as snug as a corporation pantry, with
a cut of cold tongue between two debates,'
returned
the portly gentleman. `But then it has
its advantages. No taxesmind that (those
tax-gatherers used to be the torment of my life)
no ground-rents, poor-rates, no beggar's
dingding
at the front-door bell.'
`But consider,' responded the clown, `though
we lodge in a cellar, as it were, a good
under-ground
,
six steps down, where are the oysters
and brandy? Did that occur to you?'
`I confess it did not,' said the portly
gentleman
,
slightly staggered; `but I was thinking
now what a choice storage this would be for
half a gross of tiptop champagne, with the
delicate
sweat standing on the outside of the
bottles
.'
`There's no room for a somerset here,
either
,'
said the clown.
`Nor to deliver a speech in,' answered the
portly gentleman. `See, I couldn't stretch out
my right arm half its length, to make even my
first gesture: rather a cramped, close place,
after all.'
`Vanities! vanities!' cried the Poor
Figure
,
from his distant coffin, unable to suppress
his feelings any longer. `Cramped and close
is it! It's a paradise compared to the dark,
damp dungeons on the earth, where the living
body is pent up in dreary walls, and the
cheerful
light of day comes in by stealth through grim
bars; when the world moves past the poor
prisoner's
window without a look of recognition;
when no man's hand takes his in a congenial
grasp: is that life, d'ye say? He is dead, I
tell youdead!' cried the Poor Figure, in a
voice of piercing agony, `as if the marble slab
was laid upon his breast, and the grave-diggers
piled mountains upon his corse.'
`Many's the jolly time,' resumed the portly
gentleman, without much heed to the Poor
Figure's
declamation, `we've had at city suppers.
How tenderly the turkey's breastbought by
the commonalty, purchased by the sweat of the
hard-worked million, yielded to the shining knife;
how sweetly the popular Port wine and the
public
porter glided down the throat. Choice times
were those, my good sir, when the city paid the
hackman's fare for dainty rides to the suburbs,
and when we made the poor devil paupers stand
about us licking their thin chaps, while we
rolled the rich morsels under our tongues. But
now,' he added in a rather melancholy tone,
`I am little better than one of the heathen. I
smell nothing but the musty earth; my gay
apparel is falling piecemeal into doleful tatters,
and I can get nothing to chew upon but an
occasional
mouthful of black mould, that sadly
impedes digestion, if one had any digestion in
such a place as this, worth speaking of.'
`Think but of one thing, sir,' said the
clown, with an uneasy movement in his coffin,
`and you can not fail to be content. Where
are the duns in this new empire of ours? We
are as inaccessible to the vile creatures as the
crown of an iceberg. Why, sir, there was a
poor wretch of a collector that haunted me for
a vile debt of twenty-two and sixpence, until I
was sorely tempted to take his very life, and
put myself upon contrivances how I could take
it with most pain and torture to his body and
soul. I thought of all sorts of man-traps, and
pitfalls in blind alleys, and leaden-headed
bludgeons; and at lengthheaven save the
mark!I pitched upon the scheme of carrying
him off in a balloon, and, about two miles up,
letting him slip, with a cord about his neck,
and hang dangling by the neck, until dead, ten
thousand feet high. He was got safely into the
balloon by a dexterous accomplice, was carried
up, and, now that my mind was at case as to
the result, I went home to take a quiet cup of
tea, and to settle up my books, meaning to run
my pen through the twenty-two and six as a
settled account, whenthe Lord save uswho
should knock gently at my door, and march in
with his old impudent smile, than my old
enemy
the collector, with his customary phrases
hoping he didn't intrude, and, if it wasn't too
much trouble, he would like to have the small
amount of his bill, which, as I knew, had been
standing some time. The rope had broken, sir,
just as they passed over my house; the vile
little rascal had pitched upon the roof, and,
making the best of circumstances, had walked
down my scuttle, and availing himself of the
opportunity, had looked in with his cursed
little
bill. We're free from the scamp now: I'm
not sureisn't that he in the pine coffin?'
Sure enough, there stood the Poor Figure,
leaning toward them, and listening in an
attitude
of intense regard, to every word that had
fallen from the lips of the clown.
`I am the man!' he cried with great
emphasis
,
when the clown had ended; `none other
but I. On the little paltry debt of twenty-two
and sixpence hung my old father's life, who lay
rotting in the cold jail, waiting for deliverance,
which I had promised him many times, with as
false a tongue as man could. I said I would
come to-morrow at such an hour, and the next
to-morrow at such an hournaming, in my
desire to bring him definite hope, the very
minute and secondand I did not come. Was
not that a lie? And did you not stand behind
me, another liar? How many lying, false
tongues, wagged with yours and mine, in that
little business of the twenty-two shillings and
sixpence, God only knows! I forgive you the
debt: the old man's bones are at the bottom of
the prison well, where he perished; they should
plead for truth from its gloomy womb, and have
a voice to shake prison walls and fetters from
manly limbs: God grant they may.'
The Poor Figure had scarcely ended, when
the door was slowly opened, and disclosed a
meek little man, clad in a neat suit of plain
black, with two snow-white bands falling under
his chin. His gait and aspect denoted many
solemn thoughts, and with a slow pace, and a
seeming consciousness of the gloomy realm in
which he was treading, he advanced to an
obscure
corner of the place, and, folding his arms
calmly upon his breast, stood silently in his
coffin, his head only inclined a little to one
side, as if he expected momently to catch the
sound of the last great trump, and to welcome
the summons.
Sam heard a noise in the hall, as of some
person shuffling about in heavy boots in search
of the door, and, after the lapse of a few
minutes
,
a large man, in a white coat with a dirty
cape, a ponderous leather hat, and a club in his
hand, swaggered boldly in, and after looking
about him for a while, as if on the watch for a
ghost or apparition, walked quietly off, and
taking
his station in a comfortable cedar coffin in
the middle of the apartmentobviously
mistaking
it for a watch-boxfell gently asleep.
From all that he saw, Sam imagined that this
was a city watchman; and the presumption is,
that he was not far wrong.
After a salubrious slumber of some ten
minutes or more, this gentleman waked up, and
thrusting his head out of his coffin, stretched
his neck, and gazed up and down the
apartment
,
and then toward the ceiling.
`How the devil's this?' he at length
exclaimed
,
`the lamps are out early to-night, and
the alderman must have put the moon in his
pocket, I guess: that's the way they serve us
poor charleys; we wouldn't catch a rogue more
than once an age, if we didn't take them into
porter-houses and get 'em drunk, and study their
physiognomies, and so set them a stealing half
fuddled!'
`What's that you say, my man?' cried the
voice of the portly gentleman. `What fault
have you to find with the corporation, I'd like
to know? Do you pretend to impeach their
astronomy, sir, and to say, sir, that the moon
doesn't rise when she is set down for in the
almanac? I'd have you know, sir, the moon's
bespoke three months ahead; and that the
oil-dealers
know when they put a short allowance
in the lamps! I'll have you broke, if you
haven't a care how you speak of an alderman:
a word to the wise in your ear, sir.'
The watchman was making up his mouth
for a reply, and it is impossible to say what
choice specimens of rhetoric might not have been
furnished between them, but, at this moment,
the shop-bell was rung with great fury. Sam
started up with wonderful alacrity
distinguishing
the ring at once from all other possible
ringsand receiving, as he advanced to the
front of the warehouse, a thumping blow on the
side of the head, was asked what he meant by
leaving the shop open at that time of the night,
and coffins out at the door to be rotted by the
night-dew and chalked up by young vagabonds
in the street?
This was of course Sam's master. Sam's
visiters mistook it, however, for a summons of
a very different kind; the watchman, supposing
it to be an alarm of fire, rattled his club against
the coffin-side and sprang for the door; the
portly getleman thought it a melodious
supperbell
,
and, disengaging himself, exhibited equal
activity; the Poor Figure followed, hobbling
along like a waiter in a hurry; the clown, for
the call-boy's notice, and somerseted through
the door; the sweet lady in white, for the last
peal of the Sunday summons, and glided away
with her children at her side; and the little
parson, smoothing down his bands and calming
his thoughts to the purpose of the hour,
taking
it for the Wednesday evening lecture-call;
and so the company dispersed.
Sam, busying himself in obeying the
undertaker's
orders, soon closed the warehouse; and
as he moved past the empty coffins, to his bed
at the end of the shop, and thought how they
had been lately filled, it occurred to him how
inopportunely men might be laid in their graves;
debtors lying nearest neighbors to catchpoles
and deputies, whose approach was the curse of
their life; the clown and the alderman,
parsons
and profligates, in a tender vicinage;
tapsters
and the favorers of the pure stream,
perchance
murderers and their victims, and
breakers
of troth and violators of faith pledged to
woman, in a proximity so close, that the skeleton
arm outstretched might reach into the grave
where the broken heart lay, and take its cold
and ineffectual hand back into that which had
done it such deadly wrong. On judgment day,
when the trump sounds among burials like
these, if aught of fiery or human passion remain,
what awful scenes will bear witness to the
fancy
of the young 'prentice-boywhen forms
shall start up and have life again but to glare
on other wakened formsto loathe, curse,
scorn, and abhor that on which they gaze!
Grave-yards would then know a strife and
passionate
conflict, that battle-fields could not
match, with all their sanguinary stains, and
cries of horror, vengeance, or despair.
CHAPTER VII.
PUFFER HOPKINS RECEIVES AN APPOINTMENT.
Toward
the close of an afternoon, a few days
after the visit of Puffer Hopkins to the
auction-room
,
a deformed little personage was strolling
through the street, with his arms nearly to his
elbows in his breeches'-pockets, his head thrown
back a trifle, and his eyes turned up as if he
were in the very depths and profundities of a
cogitation of some consequence; in short, it
was our gentleman of the Bottom Club, who
practised upon certain pockets, as has been seen,
on a former occasion.
Three pair of fowls at three shillings, makes
nine, said the little gentleman, the old red
rooster at five shillingsthough his liver's
disordered
,
for I smelt his breath this morning
fourteen. That's for after-breakfast work.
Then before, there's twenty pound of hoop,
at twopence a pound, and a sheet of copper,
seven pound, at fivepencethirty-five and
forty
,
as good as seventy-five; and all the
afternoon
for a holyday to find out where this Puffer
Hopkins lives, and to hatch out an
acquaintance
with him. There's something brewing in
the wind 'twixt him and that shabby old
lunatic
,
Hobbleshank; something going on that
ought to be put a stop to; and as the wice
chance-seller of law won't interfere to
separate
such good friends, we'll see what Mr.
Small, Ish Small, of Pell street, or thereabouts,
can do. He walked a few paces farther, and
again broke out, Let me catch that old fellow
trying any of his tricks on Uncle Close, as he
did ten years ago, when he pitched his
familywatch
at my crown, and we'll see if there a'n't
a spice of sport about it, Strike up, old 'un,
I'm here!
Saying this, he trotted down the street,
turned into a by-way, crossed that at a good pace,
and speedily reached a corner building, from
which a great striped flag was waving and a
tumult
of voices issuing. Into this he made his
way, selecting a suitable position, and at the
proper moment (a great deal of the same sort
of business going on at the time), he called out
the name of Puffer Hopkins, which was duly
entered by one of the clerks of the meeting
upon
a roll, and the agile little performer,
thereupon
,
departed.
This time he selected a different course,
striking
straight toward the heart of the city, for
several blocks, and emerging upon an open
square. He now looked about him for several
minutes, indulging in a severe scrutiny of the
neighboring buildings, and at length fixed his
eye upon a dingy, yellow house, which stood
facing the square, and forming the fork or
extreme
point of two streets.
I think I should know the house by the
description
,
he said, measuring it again with his
eye from top to bottom; it isn't quite a
palace
,
that's clear; I don't believe the Grand
Signior lives here, nor his highness the chief of
the Seneca tribes. There's considerable
poverty
written in dirty paint all about the front;
and, judging by the windows, I guess it's had a
hard fight with the brick-front across the way,
and got an eye or two put out. At this
moment
the light of a lamp fell from a window of
the upper story, and Mr. Small, turning his face
up toward it, exclaimed, His light, by all that
shines! It an't a astral, anyhow! He's
studying
a speech, or mixing a dose of resolutions,
now, and I'll step in and surprise him. I've no
doubt the stairs will hold out till I get up and
down, although they look as if they was on their
last legs.
Climbing a narrow and ill-arranged way, he
attained the topmost landing, where he stood
for some time, in doubt which door, of the
many
that presented themselves, to select, when,
turning suddenly, as he heard some one
ascending
the stairs, he stumbled, and falling against
a door, dashed it open, and landed in the very
centre of a room. It would be, perhaps, a
sufficient
description of this apartment, to say that
it was hardly large enough to fight a
boxing-match
in, with the attendant spectators; that,
besides the person of Puffer Hopkins, it held
the heads of Demosthenes and John Randolph,
a solitary chair, a small auction-bought desk,
and a long fragment of looking-glass established
in one corner.
Your humble servant, sir; your most
obedient
!
I thought I'd just stop as I was passsing,
and tell you you are a regularly-elected
member
of the Vig'lance Committee of this ward!
said the visiter, grasping his cap in both hands,
assuming a countenance of great simplicity and
innocence, and travestying a bow, a good deal
in the style of a theatrical waiter, retiring.
By whose goodness is this? asked
Hopkins
,
eagerly.
Mine, for lack of a better, sir. I thought
it would be a little sort of a treat, now that
strawberries are out of season! answered the
little gentleman, licking his lips.
Yours, sir? exclaimed Puffer, seizing him
by the hand; I owe you a debt of gratitude
for life for this. Don't I know you, sir? you
are a member of the club, I believe; the
memorable
and immortal clubthe Bottom, I
mean?
Receiving an answer in the affirmative, he
ran on in a very fluent and enthusiastic style,
pronouncing his introduction to the Bottom
Club one of the most fortunate incidents of his
life; his acquaintance with the gentleman
before
him as one of the greatest pleasures he had
ever known; said that he was attached to his
party and his principlesno man more; and
that he was resolved to perform his duty as a
member of the Vigilance Committee with the
utmost zeal, promptitude, and despatch.
The stranger, although a small man, was not
a little astonished at this tide of eloquence (for
Puffer Hopkins was in the middle of a
declamation
to his looking-glass on some supposed
festive
occasion when the visiter had broken in,
and which declamation, in the flutter of the
interruption
,
he applied to his unexpected advent)
we say he was not a little surprised; but it
was with main effort he subdued his mirth,
when, at the end of all these elegant promises
and professions, Puffer Hopkins asked him
what he had to do?
Now there are many things that a member
of a vigilance committee, giving a liberal
construction
to the designation, might be supposed
to be engaged in with great propriety.
Possessing
the sharp eye that of right belongs to a
functionary so entitled, he should pierce into
the heart of hidden abuses, following them with
close, wary steps, into obscure dens and haunts
getting at awful secrets of crime, veiled from
all other eyesdetecting, through the world, in
their thousand disguises and hypocritical
mantles
,
fraud, cruelty, domestic wrong, and the
whole brood of cozenage and knavery.
It was pretty clear that it was to none of these
varieties of service that Puffer Hopkins was
expected
to devote his very promising talents;
and of this Puffer himself had some faint
conception
,
for when he puzzled his brain in search
of the duties of his new character, it did not
occur
to him that it had ever been the business
of any politician, past or present, or would be
in all future time, to subserve in any possible
way the plain, simple, every-day interests of
humanity.
At this question, Mr. Small laughed; not,
however, as if any circumstance of the present
interview, or relating thereto, had struck him
as at all humorous, but as if his thoughts were
fixed upon some remote incident, away off a
good many miles, and arising from such
innocent
sources as might be supposed to move the
mirth of so simple-minded a gentleman. Laugh
he did, however, with such violence as to
compel
him to place a hand upon one of his ribs,
while he planted his elbow against the wall to
support the other.
From all which, it might be presumed that
the little gentleman thought it quite a diverting
question, to be asked what the members of a
vigilance committee had to do. Laughing, and
still holding his sides, the dwarf gentleman
again burlesqued a bow, and hurried from the
apartment, leaving Puffer Hopkins in a state
of no little wonder and bewilderment.
Determined, nevertheless, to acquire a more
definite knowledge of the functions and duties
of this majestic office, Puffer snatched up his
hat, shifted himself into a bright blue coat with
intense brass buttons, and went forth. In the
excitement and anxiety of mind resulting from
the sudden knowledge of his appointment, he
had enjoyed a brisk walk of two squares or
more before it occurred to him that it would
greatly further his inquiries if he would take a
minute or two to consider where they should be
made.
After many misgivings and fluctuations of
opinion, he at length fixed on Mr. Fishblatt,
and, for a variety of reasons, selected that
gentleman
as an adviser in his present emergency;
to whose residence he turned his steps with all
becoming expedition. Glancing about for an
overgrown door-plate and a red front
surmounted
with gigantic chimney-pots, Puffer was not
long in discovering the domicil of which he was
in search; which domicil was, however,
adorned
,
beyond the description of Mr. Fishblatt, by
an oblong sign stretched across the entire front,
and cutting the house unpleasantly into halves,
indicating that the safe, cheap, and
accommodating
corporation of the Phnix Fire Insurance
Company harbored within.
Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, therefore, inhabited a
second floor; and after a due performance on a
door-bell, and ringing all the customary
changes
,
Puffer was led by a frouzy-haired servant
girl through the hall, up one flight of stairs, and
into a small supplemental building, in a small
room whereofcomprehending the entire
breadth and length of the samehe came upon
Mr. Fishblatt, seated grandly in a very
high-backed
chair, holding in his outstretched arms
an enormous newspaper, on which his eyes
were fixed as keenly and comprehensively as if
he expected by the perusal of the sheet before
him at that very time, and the mastery of its
contents, to become one of the finest scholars
and profoundest critics in the country. He was
assisted in the achievement of this mighty
purpose
,
if he entertained it, by a gorgeous
spirit-lamp
which was fed by a ball, and blazed away
on a table at his side like a meteor.
On the entrance of Puffer Hopkins, the
reader sprang to his feet, cast down the paper,
and rushing anxiously toward his visiter, fixed
upon his right hand with the tenacity of a
griffin
.
My dear fellow, cried Mr. Fishblatt,
earnestly, I'm glad to see you. Down with
your hat. Make yourself at home. This looks
like home, doesn't it? Everybody thinks so
that comes here. I don't suppose you could
find a snugger room of the kind in the whole
planetary system. You see how roomy and quiet
it is: here are all my books around me
pamphlets
,
sermons, speeches, documents from
Congress
,
documents from Legislatures, catalogues,
tracts, and lexicons. And look here, sir!
turning
about in his chair, and running his finger
rapidly along a line of great, grim volumes that
stood against the walla bound newspaper
from every state in the Union, written up in
tiptop
style; classical, sir, every word of them
classical and immortal! What do you say now,
sir! Isn't it very nice?
I certainly think it is, answered Puffer,
contemplating the questioner with considerable
astonishment.
There's something on your mind,
continued
Mr. Fishblatt, scarcely waiting an answer;
I know it; I see it plainlysomething that
harasses and worries you. You don't sleep;
you can't rest: it troubles you so. Come, out
with it, my boy; let's have it at once. What
is it that makes you look so anxious?
To tell the truth, I'm a member of the
Vigilance
Committee, and don't know what my
duties
are, answered Puffer; and I have taken
the liberty to come and ask you what I shall do
in my new capacity.
If I was a member of a vigilance
committee
,
said Mr. Fishblatt, regarding Puffer
Hopkins
with great gravity and steadiness, I
should consider it my duty to have immense
telescopes constructed; and I would plant them,
sir, where I could look into the very interior of
every domicil in the ward, and know what was
in every man's pot for dinner six days in the
week. This may not be your view of duty,
sir; but I should feel bound to have great
legers kept, with leaves that opened like doors,
and there write down every man's name in
large letters; and I'd have a full length of him
drawn on the margin, and colored to the life.
I'd give his dress, sir, down to the vest buttons,
and if there was a mote in his eye, I'd have it
there to be cross-examined, when he came up
to vote. Now don't say you can't do thisyou
haven't the physical strength to keep such a set
of books.
Would you inquire so very particularly,
asked Puffer, timidly, for he felt abashed by the
grand conceptions of the imaginative Fishblatt,
into the private habits of voters?
I would, sir, answered Mr. Fishblatt,
peremptorily
;
I'd know whether they slept in
trundle-bedsteads or high-posts; whether they
preferred cold-slaugh cut length wise or crosswise
of the cabbage; whether their shoes were
hobnailed
or pegged. Can you tell why I'd do this?
Puffer Hopkins frankly and heroically
confessed
that he could not very readily, without
the aid of Mr. Fishblatt.
I knew you couldn't, said that
distinguished
rhetorician. Don't you see that the
public
conduct of the man is foreshadowed in his
personal habits? A man that wears red flannel
shirts is always for war: a man that employs
night-caps is opposed to riots. The voters that
browbeat their servants at home, sir, always
cry out for strengthening the executive. Go
into that man's house over the way, sir, the
house with the meek salmon-colored door; that
door is a hypocrite and deceiver, sir! Climb
to the fourth shelf of his pantry and you'll find
two red-handled rawhides; that man approves
of despatching the Florida Indians by drugging
their brandy with ratsbane. That man's on
his knees every Sunday in the orthodox chapel,
wears out a pair of knee-cushions every year,
and has breeches made without pockets to
escape
the importunities of beggars in the streets
and highways. Put him down in your journal,
sir, as a knave, a villain, a low base fellow
will you?
The laws hardly reach such men,
suggested
Puffer.
I'd make them reach, said Mr. Fishblatt,
confidently, I'd stretch 'em till they did reach.
I'd hang such men higher than Haman; I'd
invent
every kind of rack and thumb-screw, and
worry their lives out by inches; I'd fill their
houses with bugs and alligators: they should
have pirates to wait on them at table; and
they should sleep with bandits swarming about
their beds, great black-whiskered bandits, with
pistols charged to the muzzle and always on
the full-cock. Would that serve them right?
I think it would, strictly speaking,
answered
Puffer; but, as a member of a vigilance
committee, should I undertake to spy out such
abuses?
Oh, no; your business ishave I told you
what your business is?to go along the wharves
and up into alleys, and down into cellars, and
inquire for voters, disseminating the right
doctrine
by the way, and making everybody of
your opinion, by having no opinion at all. Are
you on the dock committee, or one of the alley
committees?
Neither, answered the young politician,
I think mine is known as the rear-building
section.
Are you advised whether there are any old
women there, to give iron spectacles to? or
small children, to nurse with gingerbread? or
any recent deaths in any of the families, that
you may sympathize in the bereavement, by
wearing a strip of crape on your hat?
I have no instructions, answered Puffer
Hopkins.
Then you had better go prepared for all
emergenciesyou had better carry a piece of
calico under your arm, to cut into gowns; half
a dozen papers of confectionary in your
pockets
;
a gross of clay pipes, for the superannuated
voters or their aged relatives; a bale of
corduroys
;
and, perhaps, I only suggest this, a
basket
of sheep's pluck.
What is this last for? asked Puffer,
gaping
with astonishment at the personal services
required of him, as a member of the high and
mighty ward vigilance committee.
To wheedle their dogs with, answered
Mr. Fishblatt, if they happen to keep any in
the front yard.
Surprised and perplexed by the requisitions
of the vigilance branch of the serviceas
expounded
by Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, the
extraordinary
fervor of whose fancy Puffer Hopkins
had not yet quite learned to appreciatehe
directed
his steps toward his lodgings in the
Fork, striving his best to project the means by
which he should procure the articles
enumerated
,
and the kind of conveyance by which they
were to be transported to voters' houses.
As to the latter, his mind wavered between
a porter's go-cart and a butcher boy with broad
shoulders, and, as to the first, he had not
reached
a conclusion when he reached home; where
he was opportunely relieved from further
perplexity
for the present, by having a dirty billet
placed in his hands, inviting him to a meeting
of the very vigilance committee itself at the
headquarters, at half-past seven that evening.
Disposing of a thrifty meal, consisting of two
cheap slices of bread, a saucer of onions in
vinegar (an excellent thing for the voice), and
a bowl of black tea, he whirled his hat half a
dozen times about his left hand, applying to its
nap, meantime, the sleeve of his right arm,
buttoned his coat as smartly as he could, and
leaving word that he had gone to a public
meeting
,
the young politician put forth.
A few minutes' rapid walking, for he was
behind his time, brought him to the room in
which the committee assembled, and halting
for a moment for a general survey, he entered,
and assumed his seat on a bench against the
wall with his fellow-laborers, who were present
in great force, looking as vigilant and
shrewd-minded
as their station required. A member
was on his legs expounding, in very animated
and felicitous style, the glory to be reaped by
any adventurous canvasser, who, in the service
of his country and impelled by a desire to
transmit
a name to his children, should plunge down
a certain cellarwhich he describedand
secure
the names of several desperate villains
who there harbored with the intent of coming
forth as voters at the spring election, and per
juring themselves in the very face and eye of
Heaven.
This gentleman was followed by a second of
equal power and comprehensiveness of vision,
who declared, on his personal honor and
well-known
character for integrity, that they might
look-out for a riot, and one of a very serious
east. He had said serious cast because the
size of the clubs in preparation was unusual.
He had a friend (thank Heaven!) whose
confidence
he believed he possessed. He was a
woodturner
,
he had been secretly employed to furnish
a gross of heavy bludgeons in the disguise of
balustrades. For this fact they might take his
word. He didn't mention it to alarm any
gentleman
present. He didn't wish any gentleman to
stay at home or to put himself at nurse on
election
day, to avoid anything unpleasant that
might be abroad in the shape of clubs or
bludgeons
.
For his part, he had nothing to fear,
he only wished to put gentlemen of the
committee
on their guard, and to drive them to take
into serious consideration the expediency of
reviving
the use of the ancient helmet.
These words had scarcely escaped him, when
a pale young gentleman sprang up from a table
at the corner of the room, and offered a
resolution
imbodying the suggestions of his friend;
which was promptly seconded by a respectable
and worthy tinker across the room, who had a
presentiment that the helmets in question must
be made of sheet-iron quilted with tinwhich
would all fall in his line of trade. The
resolution
was, notwithstanding this able advocacy,
doomed not to become an heroic determination
of the committee corporate, being extinguished
and quenched for ever by a flood of invective
and ridicule issuing from a gentleman who
condescended
to perform journey-work in a hatter's
establishment, and who properly enough
regarded
such an attempt as an invasion of the rights
of the guild.
The early part of the evening proved,
therefore
,
very tempestuous and windy; but as soon
as the various gusts of debate and declamation
had blown over, a very plain-looking
gentleman
,
at about ten o'clock, rose, and beginning
in a very soft voice, which seemed to grow
softer
as he advanced, proved himself to be a very
sensible fellow, by calling the attention of the
meeting to some little particulars which had
been overlooked. These particulars consisted
of the division and organization of the
committee
into sections, enrolling their names in a
book, each section having its own head or
chairman, and the allotment of their duties to
the various members of the committee.
There was the dock committeethey
wanted
a gentleman on that, who wouldn't feel the
inconvenience of a tarpaulin hat, a
wide-skirted
,
shaggy box-coat, with two sepulchral
pockets
,
for his fists to be carried in, at the sides,
and who couldn't well live without a segar.
Then, they wanted a short man for cellars and
areas; a thin man to go up the alleys; a
spruce-looking
member to visit at the quality houses; a
supple man, of an enterprising turn, for
rear-building
and garret service, and a jolly-looking,
portly dog, to talk with the landlords and
tavern-keepers
.
The plain man described, in a few words and
with becoming modesty, what he thought the
duty of the members of the vigilance committee
then and there assembled: they should be
keeneyed
in discovering voters, artful and
insinuating
in approaching them, copious of tongue,
subtle in argument, and prepared to clinch
anything
they might choose to assert.
He thought vilifying the opposition wasn't
bad, if it was done in a Christian-like way, and
by describing them as some persons, or,
there were people who he (the member) knew
couldn't bear the poor; who would take the
last potato out of the poor man's pot, and
similar
fetches of expression.
When this gentleman had occupied the floor
for about an hour, Puffer Hopkins very
discreetly
held himself to be as well advised as to the
services required as he was ever likely to be;
and determining in his own mind not to be
easily
outdone and to set about his portion of the
task on the morrow, he departed.
CHAPTER VIII.
ADVENTURES OF PUFFER AS A SCOURER.
The
sun had certainly made up his mind,
that morning, not to see company; and if all
the vigilance committees in the seventeen wards
had turned out expressly for that purpose, it
would have been impossible for even their
well-known
and extraordinary astuteness to have
detected the slightest glimpse of his benevolent
features anywhere in the very murkiest sky of
a November day. The forty-five spirited
fire-companies
of the metropoliswho had seen
proper, at a very early hour in the day, to take
a run at a horse-shed near Bowling Green,
which had extinguished itself the moment it
was discovered nothing else could catch from it
might with equal propriety have turned in
and stayed at home, smoking long-nines and
talking over past achievements; for the rain
came down in torrents, and kept every
combustible
plank in the city as nice and moist as
heart could wish.
Omnibus-drivers and hackmen carried a
proud head, and looked down on the sinful
world of dry-goods men and in-door
trades-people
,
from their box-seats, with an air of
pleasant disdain; and the proprietors of
livery-stables
peered forth from their small
office-windows
,
smiling and making themselves happy
and comfortable at the prospect, as Noah might
have done on a similar occasion. Pedestrians
with umbrellas looked melancholy, and buried
themselves in their blue cottons and brown silks
to indicate their misanthropy; and pedestrians
without umbrellas looked small and miserable,
and making the most of their wrappers, hurried
along, in a supreme unconsciousness of the
inhabited
character of any window they might pass,
or the identity of any possible friend in the street.
Others pushed along, thinking more of the
respective errands on which they were bound
than of any violence of weather, and heeding
the plashing shower no more than if it had been
sunshine and fair walking. Among these was
the resolute Hopkins, who, embowered in a
cheap blue cotton umbrella, strided along, bent
on the thorough and faithful discharge of his
arduous duties as scourer or canvasser of the
ward.
He had selected for the first visitation, a rear
building in a by-street, inhabited by sundry
gentlemen
of doubtful politics, and, making all
proper speed, he arrived in a short time in the
neighborhood where he intended to operate.
Opening a blind gate, which worked with a
pulley
and closed swiftly behind him, Puffer found
himself in a square enclosure, filled with carts,
fragments of boarding, old iron pots, broken
pieces of garden-fence standing against the
walls, two cistern-heads, and, at the rear, a
row of cheap wooden houses, with the windows
dashed out, sundry breaches in the casing, and
various red pots, supposed to contain stunted
specimens of horticulture, arranged in the
upper
windows. Directly in the middle of the
yard, there stood, under one large
ivory-handled
umbrella, a couple of well-dressed,
white-haired
individualsone of whom was very
stout, portly, and commanding, and the other
very shrunken, round shouldered, and
obsequious
looking
up at the buildings; the portly
gentleman staring at them with great severity
and talking boisterously, and the round
shouldered
glancing up at the portly gentleman,
meekly, and making minutes of what he said.
Draught of the chimneys, heavy; note that
down, will you? said the portly gentleman,
peremptorily.
I will, said the meek man, it's down,
sir.
Supposed equal to two factory furances,
with the blowers on; down with thatand put
my initial to it, if you please.
I have, in large capitals, said the timid
gentleman.
That's right, said the portly gentleman,
promptly. Scuttles always open, and
children
allowed to smoke burnt rattansI see one
of 'em at it now. Will you mark
that
down?
cried the stout gentleman, evidently very much
enraged, and with a startling emphasis that
caused the meck man to jump out from under
the shelter, which compelled his superior to
order
him back twice, very distinctly, before he
could be induced to return to his duty, and
chronicle what fell from the stout gentleman's
lips. They dry their hose at No. nine, on
the back of a rocker before the fire, and use a
decayed Dutch-oven at No. eleventhis last
attributable
to the extravagance of the lower
orders
,
who are too proud to patronise the baker.
That's a very happy observation, said the
meek man, shall I print it out large, like the
play-bills?
Stuff! cried the portly gentleman, smiling
haughtily, just mind your business, and
recollect
that all private feelings are absorbed in
the company's interests, will ye?
I'll try, said the meek man, timidly.
Do! and just say, if you please, that the
first floor's occupied by a journeyman
lightning-maker
.
A journeyman lightning-maker! echoed
the meek man.
None of your nonsense, now, Crumpbut
down with what I tell you; a journeyman
lightning-maker
in the employ of one of the theatres.
Say we are informed that he lives on brandy
(brandy's a pretty inflammatory article, I
believe
,
and cases of spontaneous combustion
have occurred; put that reflection in a note
and mark it J. B. in the corner), and makes
lightning in the garret. Now for the cisterns.
Have you smelt No. eleven?
I have, sir, answered the secretary,
making
a wry face, and it's uncommon noxious.
Do you know the cause? asked the portly
gentleman, disdainfully.
I do not, sir, answered the meek
gentleman
,
groping in his pockets.
A childa juvenile small childthat went
to a public school, took his own life in despair
one day, in that very cistern, sir, because he
couldn't spell phthisic, sir!
That was strange, wasn't it?
Very strange, Crump. The child came
home in the afternoon, with the same green
bagtake notice, sirthe same green bag on
his arm that he'd carried for fourteen months,
and said, `Mother, there's a pain,' laying his
hand on his head, `a great violent pain here.'
That was all he said, and then he went up
stairs, made up his little couch, tied his wooden
horse to a bed-post with a new riband about his
neck, put on his Sunday hat and a clean apron,
and stepping stealthily down stairs, walked
comfortably into the cistern, and ended all his
agonies.
That's a remarkable affair, said the
secretary
with his mouth and eyes wide open.
Don't you think it's a serious argument
against the public schools, sir?
It's a smasher, Crump, an extra-hazardous
smasher, said the insurance president, for that
proved to be his official station. There's
something wrong in the system you may depend
on it, or children would never destroy
themselves
in this way because they can't spell
diphthong
words of two syllables. Now to
business
,
if you please. Say it's the opinion of the
president that no engine will ever consent to
draw water from the cistern of No. eleven;
that engines can't be expected to take little
boys or little girls into their chambers and
extinguish their bereaved parents' burning
dwellings with the rinsings. Firemen have
feelings (this is a moral axiom for the benefit
of the directors), engines have works: and
although
the coroner did sit on the cistern-lid the
better part of an entire night, inquiring into
this melancholy case, and sent down several
courageous small boys with boat-hooks, and
called patriotically into the cistern himself, yet
add, the boy was never found; and from the
fact of deceased's never having been seen to
come out, a strong suspicion prevails in the
neighborhood that he is still in; but what
makes the corpse so very outrageous and
stubborn
nobody can say. Is that it, Crump?
All down, sir, answered Mr. Crump.
Stand out from the umbrella, then, if you
please, Mr. Crump: business is over. You're
Crump and I'm Blinker. And the insurance
president looked down upon his assistant in the
most commanding fashion.
Crump obeyed, and, withdrawing from the
brown-silk protector, stood outside, awaiting
the further pleasure of the portly gentleman.
This is a sweet day, Crump, said the
president, contemplating with evident
satisfaction
the huge drops that plashed in one of the
puddles.
Charming! said Crump, slily inserting a
cotton pocket-handkerchief between his
coat-collar
and the back of his neck, for Crump was
slightly rheumatic.
Stocks should rise in weather like this,
said Mr. Blinker. The roofs are all good and
wet, cellars under water, and a good number of
garrets flooded. Now, if we could have a
little rain horizontally, the second stories would
be nice and safe. To be sure, families might
suffer a little inconvenience, but it would be
morally impossible for fires to show themselves,
and I should look in the papers for two or three
melancholy cases of incendiaries having made
way with themselves. It's a pelter, Crump.
That, I believe, is admitted, answered
that worthy individual, with a slight tinge of
impudence in his mannerbuttoning up his
side-pockets, which began to fill, and throwing
his hands behind him under his coat-tails, which
arrangement, as he stooped forward, formed a
commodious roof for the rain to run off at.
It's lucky we're not in the marine line,
continued the president, glancing at the
secretary
,
goods not under hatches will be nicely
soaked, I'm sure, particularly woollens and
drabs.
Now it so happened that the unfortunate
Crump was the owner of a very pretty pair of
woollen drabsrather old fashioned to be sure
which, very singularly, he was wearing at
that very moment as he stood in the shower in the
open yard; but, as Mr. Blinker was well known
as a benevolent-minded gentleman, and above
all manner of personalities, Crump was bound
to regard his observation as one of those happy
general reflections for which he was equally
remarkable
.
The shower comes down so nice and
straight, said Mr. Blinker, erecting his
umbrella
,
and drawing himself close under its
N
centre, at the same time consulting his watch,
so nice and straight, that it must put out a
good many kitchen-fires; which all helps; but
it's time to be at the office. Do you go on,
Crump, and have the grate well piled, don't
spare the coals, for I'm chilly. But stop
whose buildings are these, did you say?
I didn't say, answered Mr. Crump, flushing
slightly.
Whose? cried Mr. Blinker, in his official
key, which started the secretary into a small
pond.
Fyler Close's, sir, answered the intelligent
Crump, speedily.
Humph! very well, said Mr. Blinker. Go
on; and don't forget to wheel my chair out and
warm my slippers. And if the lime-dealer
calls for his policy tell him it isn't made out,
and that he may call the first fair day. This
is fine weather for slacking that article, Crump;
excellent weather to set houses on fire with
water and white chalkdo you understand?
Go!
At this the secretary picked his way through
the yard, carrying his head obliquely to avoid
the rain that dashed directly in his face, and
holding the gate for a moment, was followed
by the superior functionary, in great state;
who paused once or twice, however, and turned
about to take a glance at the buildings under
survey for insurance.
Very well, said Puffer Hopkins, stepping
out from under a shed where he had ambushed
himself during this instructive conversation;
these gentlemen must be on the relief
committee
,
they have a wonderful tenderness for
poor people, and wouldn't see 'em made martyrs
of by a conflagration, for all the world. Let
me see; I think I'll visit the lightning-maker
in the garret, first. He's a genius, no doubt,
and, belonging to the melo-dramatic school,
may dazzle two or three weak minds in the
neighborhood.
With these words the young politician
proceeded
to the house which had been pointed out
as the residence of the lightning-maker, and
knocked gently at the door.
The summons was answered by a small girl,
with an unclean face and eyes that twinkled
through the dirt like a ground-mole's, who gave
him to understand that the gentleman in
question
was at that moment in the garret of the
building, busy upon a two-quarter, and that he,
Puffer Hopkins, if he went up stairs, had better
come upon him cautiously, lest he might, in the
confusion of a sudden surprise, let slip a
volcano
,
or something horrible of that nature in
the combustible line.
Taking to heart the suggestion of the small
adviser, Puffer walked up stairs, and knocked
at the door of the artisan's laboratory with
great discretion, beginning with a rap in the
very lowest key, and ascending gradually to a
clear double-knock.
Hold a minute, cried a voice from within,
till I mix in a trifle of red and blue. If you
should come in now, continued the voice,
pondering and speaking a word or two only at
a time, as if it was interrupted by some manual
operation, you'd lose us three good rounds
with the pit. They always loves to see a sheet
of red fire, provided there's a cross of blue in it.
In a moment Puffer was admitted, and
discovered
a lean man bending over a mortar with
great staring eyes and cheeks discolored with
brimstone or yellow fumes of some other kind;
and surrounded by black bottles, two or three
broken pestles, an iron retort, and various other
implements of his trade. Puffer introduced
himself and proceeded at once to the exercise
of his function as a scourer.
This profession of yours, said Pufferhe
dared not call it a trade, although the poor
workman was up to his eyes in vile yellow paste
and charcoal-dustthis profession, sir, must
give you many patriotic feelings of a high caste,
sir.
It does, sir, answered the lightning-maker,
slightly mistaking his meaning; I've told the
manager more than fifty times that lightning
such as mine is worth ninepence a bottle; but
he never would pay more than
fourpence-ha'penny
,
except in volcanoesthem's always two
quarters.
I mean, sir, continued the scourer, that
when you see the vivid fires blazing on Lake
Eriewhen Perry's working his ship about like
a velocipede, and the guns are bursting off, and
the enemy is paddling away like ducksis not
your soul then stirred, sir? Do you not feel
impelled to achieve some greatsome glorious
act? What do you dowhat can you doin
such a moment of intense, overwhelming
excitement
?
I
generally, answered the lightning-maker,
with an emphasis upon the personal pronoun,
as if some difference of practice might possibly
prevail,
I
generally takes a glass of beer, with
the froth on.
But, sir, when you see the dwelling-house
roof, kindled by your bomb-shells, all a-blaze
with the midnight conflagrationthe rafters
melting away, I may say, with the intense heat,
and the engines working their pumps in vain
don't you think then, sir, of some peaceful
family
,
living in some secluded valley, broken in
upon by the heartless incendiary with his demon
matches, and burning down their cottage with
all its out-houses?
In such cases, answered the
lightning-maker
,
I thinks of my two babies at home, with
their poor lame mother; and I makes it a point,
if my feelings is very much wrought up, as the
prompter says, to run home between the acts
to see that all's safe, and put a bucket of water
by the hearth. Isn't that the thing?
I think it is; and I'm glad to hear you talk
so feelingly, answered Puffer Hopkins; our
next mayor's a very domestic-minded manjust
such a man as you are, only I don't believe he'd
be so prudent and active about the bucket on
the hearth.
At this the lightning-maker smiled
pleasantly
to himself, and unconsciously thrust a large
roll of brimstone in his cheek.
Is this your natural complexion that you
have on this morning? resumed Puffer
Hopkins
,
seeing how well the personal compliment
took, and glancing at the lightning-maker's
yellow
chaps. If it is, the resemblance between
yourself and the gentleman I have mentioned
is more striking than I could have expected.
His nose is a copper. Isn't yours inclining a
little that way?
I believe it is, answered the journeyman
lightning-maker, complacently.
Your eye is a deep gray, I think, as far as
I can see it by this light: that's what the
Committee
of Nomination, when they waited on the
next mayor, thought was his.
In the flutter of nerves created by the
scourer's
instituting these pleasant comparisons, the
lightning-maker unadvisedly brought together
a couple of hostile combustibles, which
occasioned
the premature bursting of a small bottle
of azure lightning, without scenery to match;
and a small skylight was opened thereby through
a decayed shingle in the roof. Instructed by
this, of the tropical climate of the
lightning-maker's
garret, and thinking that a sufficient train
had been laid for a future vote, Pufferwho
had been advised of the residence of a stout
cobbler in the neighboring attictrotted up a
ladder, and through the open scuttle, and
scrambling over the pitched roof, plunged down
a similar opening in the next house, and came
very suddenly upon the object he sought. The
burly shoemaker was seated on a cobbler's
bench, working away merrily enough. At his
side was laid a long clay pipe, filled ready to be
lighted, and hard by him a bundle of chattels,
corded up and arranged apparently for instant
transportation.
How is this? cried the cobbler, as his eye
caught the person of Puffer Hopkins; this
isn't fairnor is it legal in any courts, whether
of chancery or common law. Writs don't
descend
,
sirI know enough for that. No
deputy-sheriff
was ever enough of an angel to come
from above. I resist process! Do you hear
that?
Saying this, the cobbler started up, and
seizing
his bench, planted it on end in front of
the corded bale of chattels, and standing
between
the two, he glared fiercely through the
circular broken seat of the bench on the
suspected
deputy.
A few words, however, calmed his agitation:
he threw down his bench, resumed his seat,
and, in token of his perfect satisfaction and
pleasure in the explanation Puffer had given of
the character in which he visited him, he
kindled
his pipe and smoked away in good, long,
hearty puffs.
Growing communicative, as their intercourse
continued, Puffer at length learned that the
gentleman was the proprietor of the Dutch oven
down stairs; the terror of Mr. Blinker, the
president; was greatly distressed by creditors,
who hunted him with catchpoles and marshals
from morning till night; that all his proprietary
interest on the lower floors lay in the oven
aforesaid, and a very comfortable little fat wife
(whose pride and comfort consisted in a turkey
browned before a slow fire), and other little
necessaries allowed by law. The corded bale
held his valuables; and with these he was
prepared
to mount, at a moment's warning, through
the scuttle, and to convey himself to the peak
of the house, where he made it a point to sit in
the shadow of a broad chimney and smoke his
pipe at ease, until the cloud of pursuers was
fairly dispersed or blown over.
They shall never catch me while I live,
cried the cobbler, energetically. If they come
on the roof, I'll climb down the lightning-rod
with that bundle on my back. I can do it, and
if one of the rascals attempts to climb up to me,
I'll drop it, and break his neck off short
depend
on that. My dear fellow, I'd be at the
expense of the board, lodging, and education of
a South American condor, and teach him to bear
it off in his beak, before they should touch a
thread of it. Now you know my mind!
At this he struck a thick heel, on which he
was at work, a thumping blow with his
hammer
,
and kicked his lapstone across the whole
breadth of the garret.
Puffer Hopkins of course applauded the spirit
of the cobbler, and artlessly suggested that no
man, with the soul of a man, would submit
quietly
to such impertinent intermeddling with his
private affairs.
However, my friend, he continued,
scouring
as industriously as he well knew how, I
trust this will not always be so. These
gentlemen
of the law may yet have their combs
cut. I don't think they will always be
allowed
to crow and chanticleer it over honest
men!
Why not? asked the cobbler, looking at
Puffer Hopkins anxiously, and planting his
great hands upon his knees.
For no very particular reason, answered
the scourer, except that I have heard it
suggested
that our new common councilmind, I
say our new common councilwill abolish the
office of sheriff, and all others that interfere
with the enjoyment of a man's property by
himself
.
They'll do away with writs and
executions
,
and all that sort of thing, said Puffer,
coollythat's all!
Say you so? shouted the cobbler,
springing
from his bench and seizing Puffer by the
handI'm your man! Now try your luck on
the down-stairs people; don't let me keep you
back a minute. Try the bereaved mother down
stairs. Her husband's a wavering: have him
by all means. Dogs! you've done me more
good than the sight of the big boot in the square
the first time I set eyes on it. God speed you!
Luck to you!
With these ejaculations, the cobbler dismissed
his comforting visiter, who hurried below, and
opening, according to the instructions he had
received, the first door to the right, arrived at
a new field in the domain to be canvassed.
Taking a rapid and comprehensive survey,
Puffer Hopkins was aware that he had entered
the apartment of the bereaved mother; for
there upon the mantel, in a glass case, dressed
in crape, stood the identical wooden horse, with
the riband about his neck that had been
attached
to the bed-post by the little misanthrope,
on the day he had taken his own life in the
cistern
.
As he discovered this, a gloom suddenly came
over the countenance of the scourer, and he
approached the afflicted parent with an aspect
as wo-begone and dolorous as the wood-cut
frontispiece of the most melancholy mourner's
companion ever printed.
Mr. Hopkins, of the ward committee, said
Puffer, advancing and taking the bereaved one
by the hand. The good man of the house is
not in, I think?
No, he isn't, sir, she answered; it's
very
little that he is in now, since the eventhe
can't bear the sight, poor man, of that grievous
monument therepointing to the quadruped
in the glass casealways in his sight. It
e'en a'most drives him mad.
Puffer Hopkins wonderedif the sight of a
miserable caricature of a horse in wood, under
a glass cover, was so near making a lunatic of
himwhy he didn't go mad at once, like a
sensible
man, and shiver it all in atoms, which
would have done something toward making it
invisible; but he didn't utter these thoughts,
but, on the contrary, kept them hidden in the
very darkest recess of his bosom.
You do right, madam, continued Puffer,
to keep that constantly before your eyes. It's
a softening objecta mellowing spectaclefor
the heart to contemplate. Oh, no; there is
nothingthere can be nothingpursued the
scourer, in a voice choked with agony, and
turning
away as if he was too manly to expose his
feelings, like a mother's grief. A mother's
griefit is a sacred and a solemn thing; and
when the affliction comes thusin this ghastly
shapeit's too much to think of. Who can
repress their tears at the thought of the agony
of this family, on the day of this fatal
discovery
?
The father frantic with sorrow and
exertions
to get the body; sisters and brothers
how many have you, madam?
Five small onesone at the breast.
Five little ones, shouting for the departed
angel; and his motherhis poor, bereaved,
broken-hearted motherwhen she thinks of
the suit he had on, his nice, tidy, Sunday suit,
bends over the cistern and drops in her tears
till it overflows!Oh, there's a picture for the
moralist and the patriot!
Don't, sir, don't, cried the afflicted mother.
Don'tyour eloquence quite breaks my heart;
it makes me feel it all over again.
I will not, said Puffer, I'll resist my
feelings
,
and say no more about it; not if you'll be
good enough to take this little order on the
dry-goods
dealerjust so that the poor boy, if he
should ever be found, may be put in a decent
shroud; he was a small boy, I thinkthe
order's
for a small boy, a very small boy; and
oblige me by telling your husband that Puffer
Hopkins, of the vigilance committee, called.
Good daygood daypoor child! Uttering
these last words with a pathetic glance at the
toy on the mantel, and heaving a profound
sigh, the scourer closed the door.
With the door, he closed his labors for the
day, and shaped his course homeward, satisfied
that he had done his country some slight
service
,
and that two or three minds, at least,
had been sufficiently enlightened to vote the
proper ticket at the next charter election.
CHAPTER IX.
AN ENTERTAINMENT AT MR. FISHBLATT'S.
A few
mornings after his adventures as
scourer
,
Puffer Hopkins was sitting at his desk in the
Fork, earnestly engaged in the preparation and
composition of a handbill, for the approaching
election. That this was a sufficiently arduous
undertaking for the young politician, was
proved by the great multitude of model
placards
strewn about the floor, from which he at
intervals solaced himself with a line or two;
by the blank looks with which he at times
entirely
halted in his task; and by the painful
gaze he occasionally directed toward the wall,
as if he expected to discover there handwriting
wherewith to eke out the unfinished sentence.
Having a good eye for catching phrases, and
considerable readiness in sounding words that
would tell well in the popular ear, the
composition
presently flowed apace; line upon line
lengthened out, Puffer reciting each aloud as it
was finished, and in the course of about two
hours, a thundering manifesto, doomed soon to
echo back from wall, shutter, bulk-head, and
houseside, great words of fearful import, and
to set the whole world of meeting-hunters and
politicians astir, was completed.
Puffer Hopkins was clearing his throat and
preparing for a grand rehearsal of this
masterpiece
,
when he was suddenly confronted by a
frouzy-headed small girl, who had got into the
apartment, it seemed to himfor he had no
notice
of her entranceby some underhand
jugglery
or legerdemain, and who, assuming a face
of great mystery, levelled at him a diminutive
billet, with a faint streak of gold about its
edges, and his own name written elaborately
on the back.
Complimentshopes as how you'll come
and wishes the bearer to say, wouldn't feel
cheerful if Mr. Hopkins should fail; said the
frouzy-haired girl reciting something that had
been, evidently, ticketed and laid away in her
mind, to be delivered when called for.
Three lines of writing and a date within,
worked out, obviously, with painful toil and a
great variety of pens, explained the object of
the small visiter, in a request that Mr. P.
Hopkins would favor Mr. H. Fishblatt with
company at seven o'clock this (Thursday)
evening
,
at the sign of the brass-plate and
chimney-pots
,
as before; giving him at the same time
street and number.
Puffer was in fine spirits, for he had been
successful
in his literary laborsand what
author's
heart is not a-glow when his invention
proves ready, and his hand runs free across the
page?and he accepted the note with great
complaisance, and bade the frouzy-haired
messenger
(who stood staring at the huge text
scattered about the floor, as if the great black
letters might be ogres, giants, or some other
monsters) inform Mr. Fishblatt he would attend
his summons with the utmost pleasure.
He was as good as his word; and two hours
before the time named in the invitation, Puffer
began to prepare for the party at Fishblatt's.
First and foremost, he drew forth from a case,
in the corner of his lodgings, a brass-buttoned,
blue coat, of a popular cut, and fell to
beating
it over the shoulders and down the back
with a yardstick, as if he had under his hand
the body and person of his direst enemy in the
world; then he twisted the right arm up and
dashed at the place where the ribs might have
been; then he fell upon the breasts and
pummelled
them horribly; and then, casting aside
his stick, he fastened fiercely on the collar, and
gave the whole a mighty shaking, as if he
would have the very life out of it. A pair of light
drab cloth pantaloons, dragged from the same
confinement, shared in like manner at his
hands; a striped vest was stretched on the back
of a chair like a rack; then his boots were
forced into a high polish, the pantaloons drawn
on, the vest released, and the coat occupied by
its legitimate lord, and Puffer, first
attitudenizing
a little before the long glass, and
running
his fingers through his hairto get his
head as nearly as possible into the model he had
in his eye of a great politician, whose portrait
was in the gallery at the museumwas ready
for the party. Sallying gently forth, and
marching
steadily through the streets, with a secret
conviction that every eye in the metropolis was
fixed immovably upon him, he shortly
discovered
the great brass plate of Halsey Fishblatt
gleaming through the dark, where he knocked,
waited for a minute in a state of awful suspense,
and was admitted, as before, by the
messagebearer
,
who came to the door with a face
wrinkled
with smiles, and strongly suggestive of
something very nice and choice to be had
within
.
The small girl asked Puffer to be good
enough to go to the third-story back room, and
thither he proceeded; encountering on his way,
and at the base of the second flight of stairs,
a fry of dolorous-looking gentlemen, who
lingered
about the parlor-door, pulling down their
wristbands and contemplating it, as it opened
and shut, with as much dread as if it had been
the gate of the doomed; while others hovered
about the great balustrade of the staircase, in
waiting for the descent of their lady partners
from the third-story front room above. Every
now and then an angelic creature, in a white
gown and abundant pink ribands, came down
this Jacob's ladder, and, fastening upon the
arm of one of the sentinels, they marched into
the parlor with great state. Returning from his
toilet up stairs, Puffer Hopkins followed the
general current, and discovered a scene the
solemnity
whereof was exceedingly impressive
and disheartening.
The walls of the parlor upon which he had
entered were lined all round with well-dressed
ladies and gentlemen, sitting as erect as corpses,
and gazing into the empty space in the middle
of the apartment, as if some curious
meteorological
phenomenon were going on there, in
which they all had a special interest. At the
announcement of Puffer Hopkins by a pale
young gentleman at the door, the corpses
waked up a little, some twittered
spasmodically
,
a few moved uneasily in their chairs, and
by the time Puffer had attained a seat in the
corner, the company had again subsided into
its condition of tomb-like repose.
They were presently, however, again
wakened
and
with rather more successby the
entrance of the host, Mr. Fishblatt himself,
bearing before him, firstly, a huge ruffle, which
stood straight out from his bosom like a
mainsail
,
and secondly, reposing in the shadow of
the said ruffle, a black teaboard of
proportionate
dimensions, garnished with small jugs or
tumblers of lemonade.
Mr. Fishblatt walked very erect and
majestically
,
and holding the waiter at arms' length
smiling pleasantly, as a gentleman always
does when he's engaged in a business he knows
himself to be altogether too good for, but which
the crisis of affairs requires him to look after
presented it to the ladies all around,
beginning
at the left hand, as he was bound to do,
and skipping ever so many thirsty gentlemen
who gloated on the small jugs; and then
coming
down toward the right hand, as he was
likewise
bound, he allowed the thirsty gentlemen to
glean from the waiter the tumblers that
remained
.
It is not to be supposed that Mr.
Halsey
Fishblatt all this time held his peace; on
the contrary, the bearing of the waiter was not
a tithe of his toils, for he kept strenuously
urging
,
wherever he went, the propriety of taking
a tumblerthe necessity of a draught of the
lemonade to cool themselves, and particularly
soliciting and entreating the ladies to make a
paradise of his (Mr. Fishblatt's) parlors, by
enjoying themselves with all their might and
main.
The lemonade had scarcely vanished and the
empty tumblers been gathered and borne out of
sight, when it was announcedto the
discomfiture
and confusion of the companythat the
celebrated and distinguished representative of
13
the thirteenth ward in the city councils
Alderman
Punchwind, by namewas in the house
having, as it was understood, done Mr.
Fishblatt
the honor to call in and partake of the
agreeable hospitalities that were then and there
going forward. Mr. Fishblatt, at the thought
of so august a presence, recoiled a little, but
recovering speedily, a deputation was
immediately
sent out, consisting of Puffer Hopkins and
two young gentlemen who wore large
watchseals
and were rather ambitious of office and
employment
of this kind, to wait upon his eminence.
In a few minutes a heavy tread was heard
upon
the stair, a commotion in the entry, and in
stalked, in a broad-brimmed hat, a portly,
capacious
,
and solid gentleman, of such
dimensions
as to resemble not a little a great
school-globe
,
stepped out of its brass ring, and taking
a walk of pleasure. In he marched,
accompanied
by his delegation, who clung close to his
skirts to watch the impression his presence
might make on the commonalty assembled.
Puffer Hopkins had a glimmering
reminiscence
of a broad-brimmed hat, very much like
the alderman's, escaping into a pantry at the
end of the hall as he came in at the beginning
of the evening, worn by Crumpcould it be so?
Crump, the meek secretary who had been
so browbeaten in the shower by Mr. Blinker.
His brows overshadowed by the huge hat, and
his chin buried in a capacious collar, Alderman
Punchwind paused for a minute at the door,
glanced about slowly and with an air of solemn
importance, and then, without removing his hat
or uttering a word, stalked across the parlor,
proceeded to fill a glass from the sideboard,
where relays of refreshment in liberal
quantities
were arranged, and at this moment,
deigning
to turn around and recognise the company,
he intimated by a look that he would drink all
their good healths; which he did, very
emphatically
absorbing his wine much as the Norwegian
Maelstrom might if it were a corporate
alderman
and fed at the public charge. Having
disposed
of the wine, the alderman next devoted
his attention to the cake and other eatables, of
which great batches disappeared from time to
time; with a pause now and then, to allow him
to vary the entertainment with a friendly
return
,
just to show he hadn't forgotten it, to the
decanter; which proceedings were watched
with painful interest by Mr. Fishblatt's guests
who were horrified at the miraculous
disappearance
of the provision for the party, and
who looked upon the performance much as they
would at the elephant at the menagerie,
feeding
with a bale or two of hay, or the pagan
anaconda at the museum, lunching on a pair of
fowls and a live rabbit, without so much as a
grace to the meal.
As soon as Alderman Punchwind had
concluded
his corporate banquet by stripping the
board of something more than two thirds of its
contents, solid and liquid, he wiped his lips,
and marching steadily toward the centre of the
rooms, there planted himself by the side of a
column and looked abroad upon the company,
fixing his eye, now and then, with peculiar
sternness, on some young lady who happened
to be fairer than her neighbors.
After he had enjoyed this recreation for some
time, various members of the company were
brought up by Mr. Fishblatt and introduced (by
consent) to the distinguished functionary, who
kept his ground manfully and received them all
with an air of bland and gracious
condescension
;
allowing each of them to take him by the
hand and to enjoy a few minutes'
contemplation
of his very classic and expressive features,
and then pass off, making room for others.
While this was proceeding, attention was
drawn toward the door, by the entrance of a
very uppish gentleman of a severe aspect, who
carried himself with great state and port, and
cast his eyes disdainfully about, as if he held
the individuals of both sexes and all ages there
assembled supremely cheap and of no account
whatever in making up anything like an
accurate
scale of society.
This disdainful and evidently select
personage
was no other than John Blinker, Esq.,
first director and president of the Phnix Fire
Company below stairs, who, as soon as he had
heard there was a live alderman in the room,
came forward extending his hand and smiling
pleasantly, quite anxious, it would seem, to
conciliate the favor of a mighty alderman and
common council-man. These overtures on the
part of Mr. Blinker were received by the
alderman
,
however, with an air of slight disdain,
which caused the president to cower and fall
back a little until Mr. Punchwind thought
proper to relax his features, when the
president
advanced again, and had the satisfaction
at last, and after many difficulties, of taking
him by the hand.
Do I understand that the fire-limits of the
city are to be extended? asked Mr. Blinker,
whose mind hovered about the fiery principle
of his calling like a moth about a flame, after
waiting in vain for a communication from the
alderman.
The question was asked, but not answered;
for Alderman Punchwind, reclining his head a
little toward his questioner, allowed a smile to
spread over his featuresas much as to say,
you don't know how important, how critical,
and how solemn a question you have put to me
and said not a word.
I think it would be an advantage to the
city to have them extended, sir. I hope I am
not so unfortunate as to differ in opinion with
Alderman Punchwind! said Mr. Blinker
meekly
.
The alderman only smiled again, intimating
thereby, apparently, that there were state
reasons
why this anxious interrogatory of the great
president's couldn't be answered just then.
At this moment, Puffer Hopkins, who had
overheard the questions of Mr. Blinker, and
entertaining
a becoming reverence for the
distinguished
individual before himfeeling, too,
perhaps, that a modicum of metropolitan
information
from the very fountain head, on a
subject
in which he felt an interest, from his
frequent
professional pilgrimages to political
meetings
,
lectures, and other night-resorts, might be
serviceableimpelled by some, or all of these
considerations, Puffer proceeded to ask, in a
tone of profound respect, Whether they were
to have new windows in the public lamps?
New lamp-windows did you ask? retorted
the alderman, as plainly as he could without
the trouble of opening his lips.
I did, sir, reiterated Puffer Hopkins,
beginning
to feel rhetorically inclined, and so
understanding
the learned gentlemen, and
knowing
the interest felt in the answer, and your
ability to give us a clear and decisive reply, I
put it to you in this public manner; whether
we are to have new glasses in the public lamps!
A gust of wind in our streets of a dark night
is equal to an eclipse of the sun in broad day,
in their present dilapidated condition. The
darkness of Egypt overspreads this city, sir, at
times; a Siberian darkness where bears and
catamounts might dwell, perhaps, if it were
not for the city police and our vigilant
magistracy
.
The alderman paused and looked about him
with a grave and majestic air. He seemed
reluctant
to respond.
It's your duty, sir, said Mr. Fishblatt,
coming in at this crisis, standing directly in front
of the alderman, and looking him steadily in
the face, to inform us of your views on this
all-important subject. The happiness of this
community is dependent on it, sir. There'll be
an immense oversetting of hacks, breakage of
legs, and fracture of skulls, if things remain in
their present condition, I can tell you. This
metropolis is as black now, sir, at night, as the
bottom of an ink-bottle, and people float about
the streets at random, like so many bugs on the
surface of a dark pool. What's all the crime
of this great city owing to, sir? Some will say
its intemperance and a neglect of the public
pumps. Others will say it's ignorance, and
neglect of the public schools. Some will tell
you it's because we've got too many
penitentiaries
and houses of refuge, and others will
tell you it's because they're too few. Pumps,
penitentiaries, and public schools, can't explain
it; it's your miserable public lamps, sir! It's
your knavish oil-men, and your rascally glaziers,
that are corrupting us every day and every night
more particularly at night. They're the origin
of your dissolute sons, your profligate
daughters
,
your sinful judges, and your dishonest
clerks. Nobody comes out at noon and makes
a beast of himself in the street. Keep the
city well lighted and you keep it virtuous, sir.
You should have a lamp at the front of every
tenement, and where the streets are so narrow
that the houses might catch from the wick,
you should have men moving up and down with
great lanterns, and keep all the thoroughfares
and alleys in a glow. You wouldn't have a
murder once in a century, and as for burglaries
and larcenies, they'd be forgotten crimes, like
the Phnix, sir, and the Megalosaurius!
At the termination of this earnest appeal the
company had gathered in a body about the
person
of the alderman, and stood waiting, with
intense interest for his answer. Alderman
Punchwind, hereupon, canvassed the
assemblage
with great deliberation, and, having
finished, elevated the fore-finger of his right
hand and passed it significantly down his nose,
despatched a sagacious wink toward Mr.
Blinker
with his sinister eye, and mildly muttering
Smoked beans, departed.
Can it create surprise to know that the
company
there assembled by invitation of Mr.
Fishblatt, were astounded at this strange and
unseemly exit of the distinguished gentleman
from the thirteenth ward? that Mr. Fishblatt
was horrified and stricken with amaze? that
Mr. Blinker was indignant? that the delegation
that had waited upon the alderman felt slightly
humiliated and abashed at the conduct of their
superior? That Puffer Hopkins was
profoundly
penetrated with a sense of the uncertainty
of human affairsfor had there not been here
an individual occupying, but a minute before,
the highest conceivable pinnacle, the very
Himalayah-top of human greatness attainable
at a small partyand hadn't that individual,
with most suicidal rashness, pitched himself
off headlong into the very centre of a low
vulgar
kitchen-garden, by an allusion to fumigated
beans?
The entertainment was now, in truth, at an
end; and although fragments of cake and
fagends
of decanters, generously left by Alderman
Punchwind, were from time to time brought
forward, the spirits of the party flagged. Mr.
Fishblatt hung his head; and when, at a few
minutes of midnight, the insurance president
disappeared, the party gradually broke up; two
or three, at first, leaving at a time, and then a
shoal of half a dozen, and in less than an
hour the rooms were deserted.
Puffer Hopkins, who had gallantly assumed
the charge of a young lady with a pair of
piercing
black eyes, who lived in a remote suburb
with which Puffer was by no means familiar,
spent the remainder of the night, up to three
o'clock, in piloting the young lady homeward,
and the balance, till dawn, in discovering his
way back again through divers crooks and
crosses, through streets that ran at first directly
for half a mile into town, and then directly for
half a mile more out again; getting now and
then into a road that had no outlet, and then into
one that had an outlet that led into nothing.
The mysterious proceedings of Alderman
Punchwind, it should be stated, remain to this
day unexplained. On inquiry a few days after
the entertainment, Mr, Fishblatt was assured
that on the night in question, Alderman
Punchwind
,
the authentic and accredited
representative
of the thirteenth ward, was in his own
room laboriously employed on a report of
fifty-three
pages foolscap, on the subject of spiles
and pier-heads, and hadn't left it for a moment,
except to step over the way to his neighbor the
timber-merchant, to get a few facts to put in
his report. It therefore only remained for
rumor
to say that this was the apparition of the
alderman; which was confirmed with the
superstitious
by Mr. Punchwind's being carried off
just seven days afterward by an apoplexy, at
one of the city suppers. Others thought it
might have been all a dream and delusion on
the part of the company, who may be
reasonably
supposed to have been at the time under
the influence of Mr. Fishblatt's good cheer:
and others againand certain mysterious smiles
on the part of the frouzy-haired servant girl
hinted as muchwould not be beaten from the
belief that it was Crump; Crump, the humble
secretary of the Phnix Fire Company,
himself
;
who had adopted this method, it was
suggested
,
of enjoying one first-rate banquet which
his own salary didn't admit of, and at the same
time of retaliating the severities of his superior;
having the entire pleasure of both amusements,
the feast and the revenge, to himself, which
was very characteristic.
For ourselves we rather incline to this last
solution, inasmuch as the subject of Mr.
Fishblatt's
party was, from the time of the starting
of this hypothesis, a forbidden subject
thenceforth
and for ever in the office of the Phnix
Company, by express order of Mr. Blinker,
who said it was altogether too frivolous to
think of.
CHAPTER X.
HOBBLESHANK AT HIS LODGINGS.
The
interest with which Mr. Fyler Close
watched the flight of Hobbleshank was by no
means diminished, when he discovered faring
forth from behind a stable-door, where he had
lain in ambush, and keeping, at an easy
distance
,
diligently in the track of the wrathful
old gentleman, no other than Ishmael Small.
Speeding along in a very eccentric route,
sometimes
on the pavement, again in the middle of
the road, and then, with one foot on the kerb
and one in the gutter, Hobbleshank made his
way through the straitened purlieu of Pell
streetPell street that lies just off the great
thoroughfare of the Bowery with a world of its
own, where great mackerel-venders' trumpets,
nearly as long as the street itself, are blown
all day long; where vegetable-wagons choke
the way and keep up a reek of greens and
potherbs
until high noon, and where, if all the
signs and omens that pervade the street
sights, sounds, and smellsare of any worth,
the denizens lead a retired life, with a lenten
diet, ignorant of what the great world beyond
may think of beefless dinners or breakfasts
after
Pythagoras.
Through this choice precinct they sped,
Hobbleshank
pushing swiftly on, and his pursuer
following
at a distance with equal pace, darting
in at entry-doors and out again in a glance, to
avoid discovery, if the old man should look
back; and so they soon entered the mouth of
Doyer streetthe Corkscrew lanethrough
which it needs skilful pilotage to bear one
safely
,
every house a turn, and every kerbstone set
at a different angle, for thus, like a
many-jointed
snake, Doyer street creeps out of the damp
and green-grown marsh of Pell street, upon
the open, sunny slope of Chatham square.
Following the whim of the street, which
must needs have its way, they got forth into
the broad region of the square along which
Hobbleshank speeded at a good round rate,
while Mr. Small regaled himself with an
eleemosynary
ride on the foot-board of a
hackney-coach
,
where he sat comfortably balanced and
keeping the old man in view until they reached
Mulberry street, when he dismountedjust in
time to evade the crack of a whip from the
boxscat
and
followed Hobbleshank warily into a
building some dozen or two paces off of the
main street. It was a dark, ruinous,
gloomy-looking
old house,built on a model that was
lost twenty years ago and never found again
and had a wide, greedy hall, that swallowed up
as many chairs, tables, and other fixtures, as
the various tenants chose to cast into it.
Up the broad, rambling stairs Hobbleshank
ascended, and by the time he had attained a
cramped room at the head of the second flight,
Mr. Small had accomplished the same journey,
crept along and clambered up a narrow cornice
in the throat of the hall, and gaining, by an
exercise of dexterity peculiar to himself, a small
window in the wall, was looking very calmly
and reflectively through the same at two aged
women upon whose presence Hobbleshank had
entered.
One of them sat by the hearth; she was
small and shrivelled, with a pinched and
wrinkled
countenanceso shrivelled and thin, and
seemingly void of life-like qualities, as if she
hovered only on the borders of the world, and
was ready to go at any moment's summons.
The other was stouter, though she too was
wrinkled with years and bore in her features the
traces of many past cares, which she seemed
zealous
to make known by larding her discourse
with great sighs, which she heaved at the rate
of twenty a minute, while she bustled about the
chamber and busied herself in various
household
offices.
These scarcely noticed the entrance of
Hobbleshank
,
who opened the door gently, and,
stealing in, proceeded to a corner of the room,
where, taking a chair and turning his back
upon
them, he bowed his head upon his hand and
was silent.
I tell youyou have been a blessed woman,
Dorothythat you have, cried the elder, in a
sharp, wiry voice from the chimney-corner,
where she was painfully employed in rubbing
her withered palms together over the blaze, a
blessed woman. There was my firstborn, Tom,
with as handsome a pair of blue eyes as
mother
ever looked at, didn't he fall into the old
brewery well, and die there, like a malt-rat,
shouting for help, which came, of course, just
the minute after he was stifled. Always so
always so, I tell you!
Whose roof was blown off in the great
September
galeyours or mine, Aunt Gatty? I'd
like to know that, rejoined the other, heaving
a sigh of course. Whose son was buried in
a trance for three days and better, and when
he comes to again has to be taught his
alphabet
all over like a suckling child? Your loss
Lord preserve us!was a drop in the bucket,
so speaking, when the brewers wound it up
nothing more.
And the stout old lady laughed gently at the
thought of the brawny brewers tugging away
at the rope for so lively a hoist, and then fell
straightway to sighing.
Why, you talk like a simpleton, answered
the other, sharply, a natural simpleton in a
dotage; there was a child of mine, Dorothy,
you mind it wellyou used to say he had
hawk's eyesso wild and bright and glancing.
That boy went mad, I think, and struck at me
me, his motherand that you know, too, for
many's the look you've taken at the old scar
me, who had watched his steps all through
infancy
and childhood and boyhood, up to the
very manhood that gave him strength to strike;
smote her down to the earthwas it he or the
fiend that did it?and would have snatched
her life away, but for the men who beat him
off like a dog. There was Joe, too, my dear,
continued Aunt Gatty, that went down of a
dark, drearisome night, in the wild Gulf stream,
crying Heaven's help! in vain, and snatching
at the waves, as Old Buncle, the shipmaster,
told me, like a madman. The old woman
shook as in a palsy, and waved her head
painfully
to and fro, as she recited these passages
of past trouble.
True, true, true, said her companion, who
had paused in her labor and watched her for a
moment, true, just as true as that Jacobmy
Jacob, I used to call him, but now he's
anybody's
or nobody'swas carried off to prison
by cruel men, ten times fiercer than your Gulf
streams and your tornadoeshad his limbs
chained, and was put to hewing great blocks of
stone like a devil on penancetaken away
from good day wages and bound in a jail
Peace! you foolish women! exclaimed
Hobbleshank, starting up at this moment from
the deep silence in which he had been buried,
turning toward them and lifting both his arms
tremblingly up, I can read you a page, a black
page out of the book of lamentationsthat
should make the blood creep in your old veins
like the brook-ripples in December. There's a
quiet, serene farm-housea quiet, serene
farm-house
with
a father, a mother, yes, merciful
God! a young, happy, beautiful mother. He
paused and bowed his head, but in a few
minutes
he proceeded, and a young child that has
just crept out upon the bleak common of this
world of ours, lying in her bosom, as it might
be Adam and his spouse, in some chosen corner
of their old garden. Some devil or other
secretly
ingulfs all the fortune of that household,
tortures
with a slow, killing pain, the father of
the family, by ever lending to him and ever
driving him for horrid interestmaking him
toil and moil in that great inexorable mill of
usury and borrowing till his brain turnshis
old reason totters like a weak tower that shakes
in the wind. He flies from his home,
wandering
to and fro, he knows not whitherstraying
back to it at times, after long lunatic absences;
and one daythere's a word that should prick
your foolish old hearts like a sword's point
coming suddenly back, he finds his fair young
wife dead!yes, dead! starved into a skeleton
so pale and ghastly, that anatomists and men of
death would smile to look on itand the boy, the
boy that should have gone with her, she loved
him so, into the grave she had travelled to
through hunger, or have stayed back to inherit
that roof that was his and cheer up this sad old
heart that is minesnatched away, secretly,
nobody could tell how, or when, or whither
and the very nurse that should have tarried to
keep company with death in that house of
sorrow
was
likewise fled; and I, and old,
shattered
,
uncertain, poor creature, left alone in
the midst of all this desolationas if it became
meand had only waited for me as its rightful
master and emperor. Well, God's blessing
with youand if you have seen greater trouble
than that, you have borne it merrily and are
miracles of old women to have lived through it
to this day!
Saying this, the old man started up from his
chair, and staggering across the room,
trembling
in every limb, he hurried into a small
chamber at the end of the apartment and cast
himself upon his couch. The two old women,
abashed by the passion and energy of the
speaker
,
were silent for a while and moved not a
limb. They both sat looking toward the door
where Hobbleshank had entered, as if they
expected
him momently to emerge.
A sad tale; a sad tale, in truth; at length
said the younger. Was the boy never heard
of?
Never, that I know, from that dark day to
this, answered the other mumbling as she
spake and shrinking back into the chimney, as
if what she recalled stood shrouded before her
in a deadly form; search was not made for
him until years after the mother's death; the
worms' banquet had been set and cleared away
many a day, when the old man who had
wandered
away as soon as the funeral was over, the
Lord knows whither, came back and loitered
and lingered about his former residence, the old
farm-house in the suburbs of the city, day after
day, watching in vain, hour by hour, for the
forthcoming of some one who could tell the
history
of what was past. The building is closed
and deserted, and has no historian but itself, or
such as would not tell, if they could, the fate
of the lost child, or the secret of his death if
dead he be.
And where is the nurse?
Absent, missing, drowned, or murdered, or
dead in due course of nature; nobody can tell.
The house is deserted and gone to decay and is
said to belong to a wretched miser, whose right
came, somehow or other, through the child's
death. There's the whole story, and this old
man who came to live with me so long ago
even before you knew meand has never once
spoken of it till this night, is the only wreck of
the troubles, and cares, and crosses, that
howled
about it till they found entrance twenty years
ago. Something has stirred him strangely or
he would not have spoken this night.
Perhaps his mind is failing, said the other,
for when that's ebbing away it always
uncovers
what is at the bottom, and brings to light
things hidden in its depths for years.
He may have seen some object associated
with old times that has touched him, answered
Aunt Gatty, visited, perhaps, the farm-house
itself; or have chanced upon some person
connected
with these terrible events.
It may be so. But let us to bed, my dear
old friend, and pray that the Spirit of Peace be
in the old man's slumbers.
Amen! said her companion; and,
extinguishing
their light, and carefully drawing a
curtain before the chamber-window where
Hobbleshank lodged, that the morning beam
might not disturb his repose, they were soon
sheltered in the quiet and darkness of night that
wrapped them all about.
Ishmael Small, who had greedily watched
them all through, after stretching his blank
features forward into the gloom of the
apartment
to catch any further word that might
chance to fall, crept down from his post of
observation
and stole cautiously away.
CHAPTER XI.
MR. LEYCRAFT RAMBLES PLEASANTLY ABOUT.
By
the time Ishmael Small had returned to
the street darkness had set in, and was growing
along all the thoroughfares into the
wide-bodied
mantle worn by so many stragglers and
evil-minded persons, and supposed to be a
commodious
cloak for all sorts of villanies and
misdemeanors. As Ishmael came into the open
way, his eye fell upon a tall, gaunt figure, that
kept before him, not altogether in a straight
line, but winding about through the crowd of
laborers and 'prentices that began to set up
Chatham street at this hour, in a strong
current
;
not halting at any time, exactly, but
pausing
every now and then in its progress, and
glancing about into the faces of those it en
countered. Mr. Small observed that the tall
figure occupied itself exclusively in gazing into
men's faces, and into none of these save such
as seemed to be in the early prime of life. The
figure would look about and contemplate a face
in this way for a moment, and then disengaging
itself from the crowd, as if thwarted in its
purpose
,
would hurry forward, until it plunged
again into another, and renewed the
never-ending
scrutiny.
On the traces of this personage Ishmael
hung, until they reached Doyer street, and into
this crooked by-way it hastened, first casting a
swift glance back upon the throng that
speeded
by, and Ishmael Small followed.
The tall figure glided stealthily along close
up by the house-walls, and peered in wherever
he could at the casements, coming at times to
a dead pause, putting his face against the
window
and looking long and painfully within, as
if he were bound to have an inventory of every
article in the apartment.
In this way he toiled through the street, until
he had reached its farthest extremity, where he
crossed, entered a covered stable-way, and took
up his station against the wall, his eyes still
gleaming restlessly about, and his body bent
forward into the partial darkness to catch sight
of any face that chanced to pass.
Evening, Emp'ror, said Ishmael Small,
crossing over at this juncture, and approaching
himlifting his cap at the same time with an
air of profound respecttaking the census,
eh?
I wish I was, said the other, sternly,
plucking
his hat over his brow, I'd have a chance
then of learning whether he lives among men
yet.
You have the queerest fancy for faces I
ever did see, Mr. Leycraft, said Ishmael,
turning
his own delightful countenance comically
up toward Leycraft's, the very funniest taste
for juvenile noses that was ever heard of.
Nothing'll serve you but a first-swath mug,
about twenty-three year old, with a small
blackberry mole under the left eye. Is that it?
That describes the child that was put foully
out of the way, answered Leycraft, so long
ago, that it seems as if all had passed in
another
world, and yet as fresh, by Heaven, as if
it belonged to yesterday.
There's a plenty of boys in this street,
answered Ishmael, and in the next, and the
next to that, thad 'ud answer, Emp'ror; you
can have your pick, perhaps you won't get the
black-berry under the eye, but then you can get
lots of hair-lips and boar-teeth, burnt faces and
scald heads, and what do you say to a lad with
a portmantle on his shoulders, like Ishmael
Small, for example.
Do you think Fyler Close has any clew to
the boy, dead or alive? asked Leycraft, paying
no heed to the suggestion of Ishmael.
Lord! He know anything of the
scapegrace
,
exclaimed Mr. Small, turning about so
that the light of a stable lamp that hung above
them should fall directly on his blank visage,
bless you, Mr. Leycraft, he's ignorant as the
Mogulthe great grand Eastern Mogul, that
takes tea with the moon. He knows nothing,
nor cares nothing!
Mr. Leycraft grasped the seat with both
hands, and bending down, looked sternly into
the countenance of his companion, but
discovering
there nothing to the purpose, soon returned
to his former position, and standing almost
bolt upright, gazed straight forward, as if he
would pierce the utmost limits of the darkness
with his glance.
I'd give my soul if the boy were alive!
he at length exclaimed with startling energy,
reining in his breath as he spake, and
discharging
each word with the force of a missile;
alive! Ragged though he might be, maimed,
blind, in prison, the commonest vagabond, or
vilest felon that stalks a prison-hall; yea,
though he stood before me now and with his
raised hand should strike me to the earth, I'd
leap up to greet him, and would bid him
welcome
back to God's light, readier than his
mother's lips hailed his first coming into life!
Why don't you go to bed and sleep off this
nonsense? inquired Mr. Small; the youth's
abed somewhere or other, I'll warrant; if not
in a four-poster, may be in a church-yard crib.
Sleep's the physic for your excellency.
Curse it! I can't sleep, rejoined Leycraft,
I have put myself on board sloops and dirty
coal-smacks, and toiled away at the ropes till
my palms were blistered; have let myself to
carry logs and great iron sticks of timber, by
the day, and yet, when night camenight that's
nothing but a hideous dream to men like me
I've laid down and shut my eyes, and just as
slumber began to come pleasantly upon me, a
hand, a small hand seemingly, but as strong as
a giant's would be laid on my arm, would shake
me, and rousing, I beheld that accursed child's
eyes looking steadily in mine, broad awake and
glittering, but not half so cheerful as broad
day; and then shaking his head mournfully, for
a minute or two, it would move away, leaving
me gasping and struggling for breath on the
hard couch, like a drowning man. Blast my
face, I'm but a dead-alive after all; pleasant
company this, every night, but a little too much
of it!
While Leycraft ejaculated this passage in an
under-breath, Mr. Small stood aside and
grinned
cheerfully, as if at an imaginary spectacle
of a very pleasant nature, which might be
going on at a short distance before him; at one
minute he leaned forward with an ideal
opera-glass
at his eye; then he clapped his hands
gently, as if the sport were well-conducted, and
then he fell back, as against a comfortable
support
,
and laughed as if it were too much for
him. All this he did as if entirely unconscious
of the presence of Mr. Leycraft or any one
whatever.
Blast you! cried Leycraft, fixing his eye
sharply upon Ishmael, You don't make a mock
of me, do you, young radish-legs? eh!
Lord bless your excellency! rejoined Mr.
Small, waking, as by surprise, from an
agreeable
revery, you can't seriously mean such a
thing. I was thinking just then of a combat I
had seed once at the thea-ter betwixt a fine
speckled India tiger, and a little pock-marked
man in a military jacket. The brute-beast was
too much for him I guess, continued Ishmael,
smiling pleasantly directly in Mr. Leycraft's
face; the way he got the fangs first here and
then there, now in the head, now in the bosom,
was very agreeable to a young operative
surgeon
what was aside o' me in the pit, very
agreeable I can assure you.
In God's name, Ishmael, said Leycraft, his
mood changing abruptly from that of extreme
fierceness to one of earnest entreaty, Tell me
what you know of this matter! If the child be
dead, let me go and gather up his bones and
give them decent burial at least!
Suppose the lad died where you think he
did, Emp'ror, said Ishmael, evading a direct
answer, it was a natural death without drugs
or doctors, that's a comfort I'm sure.
A natural death, do you call it! cried
Leycraft, the death of a pilfering weasel or
a foul mud-rat rather. There's a plenty of
nature
in great black woods that swarm with
bats and hideous birds of darkness, where no
step comes but that of villains fled from city
justice, and where the earth is dank with slime
and sluggish ooze. A cradle and a calm pillow,
with a face or two to look in upon it when one
dies, is rather nearer the mark!
And it's a very pleasant subject to talk of
too, said Ishmael. There's no place like a
open stable-way for an agreeable interview,
unless it's in the jail entry. `Mr. Leycraft's
case is a very bad one,' says the keeper with
his twist in his mouth. `Not so bad, after all,'
says the keeper's man, knocking the bunch o'
keys agin his leg. `It was only a juvenile
boy.'
Blast you again! exclaimed Leycraft,
seizing Ishmael this time by the collar, and
holding him in a hard gripe, do you mock me
for journey-work I've done for that old devil,
pointing toward the lodgings of Mr. Fyler
Close, do you tell me I may come to hang for
the job! There'll be three pairs on the tree
my brave fellow, the day John Leycraft swings;
three ripe villains and you'll be the youngest,
and that old chap who begins to smell over-ripe,
shall have the middle place, out of respect to
his talents!
Ishmael again protested that he was friendly,
and that he was only striving with his little
wit to help Mr. Leycraft realize a pleasant
scene that he might one day come to be a party
to; to which explanation Mr. Leycraft would,
however, by no means hearken, but dragging
Ishmael forth by the collar into the street, he
pushed him from him with great vehemence,
and while Mr. Small reeled off laughing to
himself as he staggered, Leycraft turned his
back upon him and hastened away.
At first he hurried forward with his head
down and his hands clenched like one bound on
a task that must be performed, but presently,
as he got into the throng of a thoroughfare,
another purpose seemed to enter his mind, and
raising his eyes suddenly he began to peer about
like one wakened from a dream. Then he
watched every face that passed him; sometimes
singled out one from all others, and followed it
for a while until it crossed a light, and then he
fell back as if he had made a fatal mistake;
and then taking up another, and another, and
another, he renewed the pursuit, and again fell
off into a state of blank despair. At times,
too, he would strike from the crowd into
by-streets
,
lone and deserted, where no soul was
to be seen, and walking here for awhile, cast
his thoughts back upon what had passedwould
to God there were no such past timeyears and
years ago.
I remember well, he said to himself in
one of these pauses how the old devil brought
the work about; `Leycraft,' said he, with a
very pleasant and cheerful smile on his
countenance
,
`there's a sweet child, it's young, quite
young, that's never been in that piece of
woodland
,'
pointing to the hemlocks to the
northwest
,
`in its life, near as it is. Now it's quite
a warm evening and the wood will be much
cooler than the close room; the mother's dying
within thereshe can't last above a couple of
hoursnot beyond day-break at the best, and
I'm quite curious, as she must go to heaven,
for she's a delightful woman as ever was made,
I'm quite curious to see which'll get there first,
the mother postmarked by the doctors, or the
young lad franked by the night air. It's a very
curious little problem, isn't it?' I of course,
fool, double-woven, three-ply ass that I was
answered to his wish, and when night fell,
having the very sighs and moans of the poor
dying lady in my ear, bore the child away. An
apoplexy the first step I had taken would have
been Heaven's blessing on the job.
At that moment a sick man was borne by in
a curtained litter. Leycraft heard a groan, as
of severe suffering and anguish from within;
and this goaded his restless and uncomfortable
thoughts anew.
He, the generous, noble-hearted
gentleman
that he is, allowed me a lodging in the
garret
as long as I chose, said he, or rather,
recited
to himself, as he formed the thought in
his own mindI might as well have lodged in
the oven of eternal flame; the whole house
cried out, from peak to foundation, against the
deed I had done. The first nightgood
Heaven
can
I ever forget it?I slept well for a
few hours, the agony of doing the crime had
exhausted me; but when I awoke, it was from
a dreadful, dreary fantasm, made up of howling
crowds in pursuit, dark, chill woods, and a
whole army, it seemed, of innocent children,
surrounding and pleading with me, or cursing,
I don't know which. Before mein a gloomy
corner of the garretI saw, where the
moonbeam
fell upon it through a rent in the roof
and dressed it in ghastly light, the very child I
had slain. It stood like a spectre, stiff, cold,
threatening and rebuking me with its snake's
eyes and visage of churchyard-marble. At first
I was smitten aghastbut soon the devil
stirred within me, and, rushing from my bed,
I seized upon an old revolutionary swordone
that had been dyed long ago in a black
Hessian's
blood, and stood at the bed-headand
advancing upon the apparition, struck at it. It
moved not; I struck again and againit was
still dumb. In this way I wrestled with it,
grasping my sword fast with a death-hold, all
night, at least, till I fell down where I had
fought, like one in a swoon. When morning
dawned I turned my eyes fearfully toward the
quarter of my adversary, and then discovered
that I had been battling all night long with
nothing but the picture of a little old manin
all seeming an ancestor of the murdered child
and that I had pierced it at a hundred points.
A hidcous nightGod, thanks be to him, sends
few such to men!
Whenever his thoughts ceased to toil with
visions like these, he renewed his inquisition
among the crowds through which he was
passing
,
or which he hurried on to meet. In this
way he struggled with himself or speeded
forward
the better part of the night. Toward day,
when one might have supposed he would have
sought home and rest, wriggling his way
through lanes and crooked streets that plunged
down into the heart of the city, he entered an
alley of tenpin-players, and casting aside his
coat without a word, joined a grim-looking man
who had amused himself with tossing the
balls, one over the other, against flies upon the
ceiling, till Leycraft came in. They rolled
away for hours; bowling at the pins as if they
had been men, and knocking six at least in
head at each stroke.
CHAPTER XII.
A FURTHER ACQUAINTANCE WITH FOR, THE
TAILOR.
It
was in the peak of the Fork, even higher
up than Puffer Hopkins, that Fob, the tailor,
lodged, and there Puffer, ascending by
laddersteps
,
one pleasant morning about this time,
found him nestling, like a barn-swallow, under
the eaves, with his legs gathered under him,
after the immemorial fashion of the craft.
The room which was occupied by Fob, was
scarcely more than an angle in the roof; the
ceiling was formed by the slope of the housetop,
and it was lighted by a small dormer window
which bulged out of the roof like an eye, and,
being the only dormer in the neighborhood,
stared boldly down into the yards and alleys
adjacent. It enjoyed the further privilege, from
its great elevation, of peering off beyond the
river, into a pleasant country prospect in the
suburbs of Williamsburgh, and furnished many
cheerful rural images to any one that looked
forth. Besides this paramount advantage of
the dormer, there was within the apartment
a pair of glass bottles on a small mantel,
garnished
with sprigs of asparagus stuck in at the
top; a chain of birds'-eggs hung against the
wall over the shelf; an old-fashioned
clothes-press
,
very much broken up and debilitated, at
the foot of a dwarf truckle-bed; parts of old
spinning-wheels, rusty stirrups and sur-cingles,
the back of a moudly and moth-eaten saddle,
and other ancient trumpery in a corner, and
suspended at the window, overlooking a pot of
plants, a cage with a blackbird in it, busily
engaged
in passing up and down from a
second-story
perch to the ground-floor of his tenement.
Although Puffer had many times before
visited
the lodgings of the little tailor, he had
not failed each time to express, by his manner
at least, a degree of surprise and bewilderment
at the peculiar appointments and furniture of
the apartment. To come up out of the noisy
and brawling street, where everything was so
harsh and city-like, into a little region where
everything was quietly contrived to call up
remote
places, with the thought of a life so
different
,
so simple, and pastoral, compared with
the dull tumult below, was like magic, or
playhouse
jugglery; and such a feeling betrayed
itself
in the countenance of Puffer Hopkins.
You wonder, I doubt not, to see this
blackbird
heredon't you? said the tailor,
detecting
the question which Puffer's looks had often
asked before; what business have I with a
blackbird, unless I might fancy that I could
catch the cut of a parson's coat from the
fashion
of his deep sable feathers. That blackbird,
sir, is to me and my opinions, what the best
and portliest member of Congress is to the mind
of this metropolis. He has come a great way
out of the country, from the very fields where I
was born, and where my childhood frolicked,
to remind me of the happy hours I have passed
and the sweet dreams I have dreamt, in the
very meadows where he and his brethren
chattered
on the dry branches of the chestnut-tree.
He stands to me for those fields and all those
hours and occasions of the past. I am a fool
for being so easily purchased to pleasure, and
so I am!
Puffer had indicated by the attentive ear and
glistening eyes with which he had regarded
his poor neighbor, that, although a politician
and a crowd-hunter, he had yet something in
his heart that answered these conceits of the
fancy-stricken tailor.
This pot, too, of worthless flowers,
continued
Fob, my neighbors, every morning
and evening, see me water them, and wonder
how I can so waste my time. They see in it
nothing but a few coarse weeds in a cheap
earthen pot. I, and thank God for it, recognise
in it the great green wood, where summer and
I haunted when we were young together. I
hear in every breath that stirs them, the rust
tling of the noonday-wind, as it spake to me long
ago, in a quiet nook of the old ancestral
woodside
;
and the pattering of the rain on their leaves
renews the sound of that ancient brook, whose
voice was like a prophet's, to cheer and
encourage
all that green region in its growth. From its
banks these flowers were plucked and brought
into this heart of humanity, to give me a thought
at times of the good childhood that was buried
by me long ago where they had their birth.
Puffer still listened and said not a word.
Oh, how many delicious discoveries in the
tall grass; how many stealthy approaches;
how many swayings in perilous branches, and
mad antics in tree-tops; how many boisterous
pursuits of the young bird and lucky arrests of
winged fugitives, resound and come back and
repeat themselves in this speckled string of
birds' eggs hanging against the dingy wall!
As he spake, the large black eyes of the
tailor
grew more lustrous, and still the more from
the tears which stole out and back again with
the emotions that stirred him.
Fob had scarcely finished his earnest
declamation
,
when they heard creaking steps upon
the stair, and in a minute or two, while they
listened, the door was thrust open, and a
person
of no little consequence, if his own
countenance
was to be taken as a commentary on his
pretensions, came forward. He was a fine,
sleek, well-fed gentleman, of a good middle
stature, apparelled as daintily and cleanly as
one could wish; and judging by his jet-black
hair and whiskers, which shone again with oil
or some other ointment; his shapely and
well-cut
coat, which sat to his back like a
supplementary
skin; his pantaloons, so straight and
trim that the legs must needs move rectilinearly
or not at all; his hat, with its smooth, glossy nap;
his boots, quite as polished and serenely bright;
and the massy gold chain that stretched like an
are of promise over the azure heaven of a
deep-blue
vest: judging, we say, by all these, this
personage must have been the first favorite of
all the guilds and craftsmen, whose business it
is to prepare a gentleman for a promenade.
Are those pants finished, Fob, I mean the
superior with open fronts and patent straps?
said the sleek visiter, swelling as he spake and
staring over the little tailor's head very fiercely,
as if he meditated boring a couple of holes in
the wall beyond with his glances. Curse it,
sir, my boy sat up in the ware-house till
midnight expecting you every moment. What
do you think I'm made of, he continued,
dashing
his elegant heel on the floor, cast-iron or
New Hampshire granite? Eh?
I worked, sir, answered Fob, looking up
timidly into the face of the sleek gentleman,
till my needle grew so fine I couldn't see it;
and by the time I got down the right leg, the
moon was set; my candles all burnt out, and I
fell back on my lapboard, sir, and slept till
dawn, when I took up my last stitch with the
rise of the sun. You shall have them by three
this afternoon, if you'll be good enough to wait.
Rot your slow fingers, do you call that
work? pursued the visiter. Get in a new
supply of lights, and keep it up all nightyour
wages would bear it. Here am I, paying you
at the extravagant rate of ninepence an hour
for your labor, and you grumbledo you?
I do not, sir, said Fob, meekly, I am
satisfied, perfectly satisfied. I'm bound to
make clothes for gentlemen, and it pleases me
to see gentlemen wear them, if they suit.
Do you know, Fob, that it's my private
opinion, continued the sleek visiter, my
private
opinion, if you had fallen a corpse on that
board, and had never got up againit would
have done you great honor?
Fob assumed a puzzled look at this, as if he
didn't exactly fathom and comprehend how that
could be.
I should like to know, resumed the
well-apparelled
visiter, whether it isn't as
creditable
to a man to lose his life on a pair of
patent-strapped
,
open-fronted pantaloons, as in a
ditch, with a ball in his head, or a great
bagnet
in his bellytell me that, will you? If
some man, you, for instance, would only make
a martyr of himself in getting up a new-fangled
coat, or a vest extraordinary, the craft of
clothiers
would make a saint of him. Overwork
yourself, Fob, and be found by a coroner's 'quest
stone-dead, with the pattern griped in your
hand, and I'll bury you at my own expense!
'Gad I willand that as soon as you choose!
To this pleasant proposition Fob made no
answer
,
but smiled doubtfully and glanced up at
his bird in the cage, thinking, perhaps, he'd
rather be black and idle, and in prison like him,
than a feeble-bodied tailor, working for
journeyman's
wages, with a delightful circle of calling
acquaintance, like the gentleman there present,
among Broadway masters and down-town
clothing-merchants
.
Never mind that now, said the master,
you may think of it. Don't fail to run down
at three, with the pants on your armmark
me, now, Fob; and he shook his finger as he
turned for the door. I've got a wedding-coat
to give out to you, to be ready for Monday
evening, so there may be a little light
Sundaywork
for you. You needn't put any
button-holes
in the coat-tails, as you did once before,
if you please. The blunder didn't take with
the fashionables, although it was quite original
and fresh. Down by three or I cut you off
from our shop!
With this solemn admonition and menace,
the high and mighty master tailor from
Broad-way
descended the narrow steps with great
caution; and getting once again into the free
and open street, and on a good level pavement,
launched out into some of his finest paces, at
which he was soon so well pleased as to begin
smiling to himself, and kept on in both
recreations
,
smiling and launching out, till he reached
his shop-door, where he entered majestically in.
After the Broadway master had departed,
Fob laid aside his implements and the garment
he was busy on, and getting down from his
lapboard
,
walked to the window, where he stood
gazing
earnestly out, beyond the river, for several
minutes.
I am sometimes surprised, he at length
said, returning, and taking a seat on the
corner
of his board, while a little globule,
thawonderfully
resembled a tear, stood in the
corner
of his eye, I am sometimes surprised,
said he, at the passionate fondness with which
my mind dwells on the country. But it has
always been so. When I was a mere child, and
my father lived then in the city, how I used to
yearn after a sight of the green fields. I
watched the months as they waned away, with
one hope, and that was, that August would
soon be here and take me with its holyday coach
away to the dusty turnpike, the long green lane,
and the low roof of the homestead. At school I
bent over my desk, and folding my hands upon
my eyes, to help the labor of fancy, would strive
with all my might to call up vividly some little
scene or spot that I loved or preferred to others.
When the world was rough with me, even at
that early time, I would hie away in thought to
the side of a shady pool that I knew of, and
quench my thirst and drown my troubles in
waters
purer and more limpid, as it seemed to
me, than any other that ever flowed or
bubbled
up from the earth.
In explanation of the character of his poor
neighbor, Puffer afterward learned, that the
homestead of Fob's ancestors, for, poor and
wretched as he now seemed, the fanciful tailor
once had ancestorsthe homestead which Fob
loved next after his own soul, every rood of
which was fairy ground to his memory, peopled
with lovely shapes, having power to stir the
fountain of tears, every nook and angle
associated
in his fancy with precious hours long
passed away; that this dear homestead had
been wrested out of the hands of its rightful
heritors, and was, by law and custom, a
forbidden
realm to him. In spite of this, it was
Fob's wont to visit it secretly every year, at
midsummer, to wander silently about its familiar
fields and dusky woods, and returning when he
had gathered a store of pleasant thoughts and
fancies to last him a twelvemonth, to bring back
such memorials and relicslike those which
garnished
his garretas would suggest to his
mind the kindliest recollections of his favorite
haunts.
Among many images which perpetually
come into my mind associated with that old
past time, resumed the little tailor, after a
pause, there is one more distinct, more fixed
and impressive than any other. I know not
why, nor do I know how it should occur to me
so forcibly now that you are here. There was
a strange old man, who many years ago was a
wanderer along the Scaresdale road; they said
he had spent his school-holydays somewhere
thereI marked him and loved him for that
and whose wild actions were a constant theme
at half the country firesides. I saw him once
at midnight, or very near that timeupon
the shore of the Sound, where I had been
walking
up and down, for I chanced to be a
sorrower
myself. He had cast off his hat, and stood
facing the water with his hair streaming
wildly
back, and his eyes gleaming forth upon the
wave, with all the splendor of madness. He
cried aloud as if in discourse with the billows.
`Has't anything to lend to day? I must have
moneydisgorge, or I shall starvemy wife is
hungrymy boy cries for bread! Foam will
not feed himnor will these loud-sounding
rebuffs of yours! Wave on wavecent
percent
how
they jump, and frolic, and climb
each other at a compound pace. Oh, what a
leger of interest must there be on the other
shore, when we reach it! God's there,
keeping
countmark that!'
The Sound was in a stormy state; a ship
was passing that wrestled fiercely with the
billows
that tumbled against her sides and rushed
in the way of her prow, and kept her in a
perplexing
grasp, struggling in vain to get free.
The old man caught sight of this. `Dash and
howl and drag her down, will you?' he shouted,
`that's the true death-grapple, and, old ship,
you must yield. See! she shivers against a
rock and down she pitches,'at this the vessel
struck a bulging crag, and was in a moment
broken into a thousand fragments. `Pull her
in pieces, joint by joint, and make shreds of
her, as I do of thisyes, this cursed scroll that
the old engulfing miser gapes for in the city!
Sosothus!' Saying this he snatched from
his breast what seemed a large square of
parchment, and tearing it into tatters, scattered
it with the wind, along the beach!
What became of the fragmentswere they
never gathered? asked Puffer Hopkins.
They wereand by me, answered Fob.
And where are they now?
The Lord, that hath a record of all things
lost, only knows! he answered. I collected
them, patched them together, and after passing
from hand to hand, without much advantage to
any, they were thrown into some old trunk or
garret, where, doubtless, they are mouldering
nowand in all human chances, passing
through the same process their once owner
that poor, wild, sorrow-stricken old man is
undergoing
in some almshouse burial-ground!
Do you recollect nothing of the purport of
this recovered paper? asked Puffer Hopkins.
Only this much, answered Fob, that it
was a conveyance of house and land, with the
singular provision that no transfer or sale of
the property could be good and sufficient while
the child or son, I forget now his name, was
living. The names, the dates, much more the
boundaries, have all fled from my memory;
but I shall never forget the wild tones and
eager looks of the old creature that made the
deed into fragments; whose voice seemed to
echo the sea, and who borrowed from it the
method of his acts!
It suddenly entered the mind of Puffer Hop
kins, whose attention had been strongly
fastened
upon the narrative of the little tailor, that
the old man, that this sufferer, of so long since,
and who was supposed by Fob to lie in his
grave, might be none other than his kind and
singular companion whom he had followed from
the public hall. He was full of the thought,
and, interchanging scarcely another word with
the tailor, he left the garret, pondering on what
he had heard, and striving to gather out of it
something that might bear on what seemed the
distracted fortunes of Hobbleshank.
CHAPTER XIII.
THE ECONOMY OF MR. FYLER CLOSE AND
ISHMAEL SMALL.
Recovering
from the blow administered by
Mr. Leycraft, Ishmael promptly regained his
legs, and putting them into active service, he
moved down with good speedthe night-air
was sharp and pinchingupon a neighboring
shop window, and, knocking up his cap-front,
employed a minute or two in gazing through
the pane, at what lay inside.
There's fine slices of liver in there, said
Ishmael to himself, and excellent chops, and
all sorts of greens. A pound or two of chops
would be very nice with carrots; and so would
a slab of liver. But I guess I'll take a small
porter-house steak, without the bone, for this
time only!
He accordingly proceeded to invest a small
sum in the delicacy in question, skewered it,
and concealing it in an ingenious brown paper
hood, bore it exultingly away.
Something to wet the fibres, of course, he
resumed, as he approached a grocer's,
something
to drown the young critturs in; a pint
of fresh cider from the Newark keg; the very
choicest squeezin's of a thousand pippins!
That'll do! This beverage was procured,
and, in a borrowed pitcher, was put in
company
with the steak; and skipping along faster
than ever, bounding nimbly over any obstacle
that crossed him, he was in a very few minutes
in the hall that passed the broker's door.
Lightly
as he stepped along, the ear of the old man
was too quick for him, and in answer to a
summons
from within, he halted, placed his steak
and pitcher privily on a chair in the corner of
the hall, and turning a baker's measure that
stood by over them, for a screen, entered.
The lodgings of Mr. Close, were, as Ishmael
now entered them, if anything, more desolate
than ever. There was the dull, bare floor, the
naked walls, the great cold chimney,
breathing
,
instead of warmth and comfort, a dreary
chillness through the room; and the shivering
broker seated by the hearth, as if he would coax
himself into a belief that a cheery fire was
crackling upon it.
The only light the apartment was allowed,
came in through the open windows in the rear,
and was contributed by the various candles and
lamps of the neighborhood. In this
half-lighted
gloom, Mr. Small entered, removed his cap,
and stood by the door. He was hailed at once,
but in a very feeble voice, by Mr. Close.
Don't stand there, Ishmael, take a chair
by the hearth; it's much pleasanter than by
the door. Ishmael came forward and did so.
Don't you perceive a difference? said Mr.
Close, as soon as Ishmael was seated. Don't
you think of the many pleasant fires that have
blazed on this very hearth, and doesn't that
make you feel cheerful?
Ishmael confessed that it was a comforting
thought.
Yet pleasant as it is, pursued Mr. Fyler
Close, as this is a Thursday, I'd like to be
out; out in the open air, hurrying through the
streets at my best pace. What do you think
of that?
To class-meeting, of course, suggested
Ishmael, with the faintest possible smile on his
delightful features.
To be surebut my age and infirmities,
Ishmael, won't allow me, you know, answered
Fyler, pleasantly, to attend those delightful
social and moral gatherings, as I'd liketo.
Certainly not, rejoined Mr. Small,
grinning
slightly.
Nor to be at missionary lectures, dropping
in my little mite for the heathen, continued
Fyler, nor at the chapel, listening to the
native
African giving an account of the vices and
wild beasts that beset the aboriginal negro in
that benighted country. What a loss to an
evangelical mind!
Dreadful, sir, answered Ishmael. And
there's the privilege of subscribing to a new
cloak for the minister, and helping make up a
box of trousers and clean linen for the
Tuscaroras
!
Very true, Ishmaelvery true! I'm a
melancholy
old fellow, doing nothing but sit here
all day longwith people coming in and
begging
me to take twenty per cent. interest,
coaxing
me with tears in their eyes, to ruin 'em;
and when I have done it, coming back to break
my furnitur' up like old crockeryjust to get
me into temper, and make me mar my Christian
deportment. That's what I call ingratitude,
Ishmael.
The very basest sort, sir, said Mr. Small,
caught in the wild state, caged, and marked
on the peak of the den, `This here's the
monster
!'
Providence is a wonderful thing, Ishmael,
continued Fyler Close.
Very much so, answered Mr. Small,
lifting
his knavish gray eyes to a great spider on
the wall, sitting in the middle of his web, where
the light of a bright lamp shone from without,
in waiting for a gold-spotted fly, caught by the
legs in a mesh.
Now I suppose you followed old
Hobbleshank
providentially, down to his deneh, Ish
mael? said Fyler, leering on Mr. Small.
Ishmael
replied in the affirmative.
And no doubt you happened to put your
head through the window and overhear what
the old gentleman said. He wasn't very noisy,
I hope.
Not more thanthe Hen and Chickens, in a
storm! answered Ishmael. Why, sir, he
made a speech that 'ud have done honor to
a United States senator; and the two old
women whimpered like a couple of
water-spouts
.
A delightful speech, sir, and all about
that boy again.
Ha! ha! and didn't he tell 'em how like a
father I had been to him; and how I advised
him not to bother his head about what was past
and gone for goodand the old women, hadn't
they something to say, too, Ishmael?
Not much; the old story, answered Mr.
Small, about the old house, and the nurse,
and all that sort o' thing.
All in the dark as much as ever? asked
Fyler, pulling his whiskers with all his might,
in order to throw an expression of great
suffering
into his countenance.
I guess so; and old lunatic's wits are
breaking under him, and won't carry him
through the winter. That's better yetdon't
you
think it is?
Oh no, by no means, responded Mr. Close.
We should always hope for the best. It
would be a very painful thinga very painful
thing, indeed, Ishmael, to have the worthy old
gentleman go mad, out of mere ugliness and
spitebecause he can't find a boy that he
thinks he's the father of. Don't you see that?
Very melancholy indeed, said Ishmael,
who began to think remorsefully of the
neglected
cheer in the hall, so much so that I
don't feel equal to a conversation on the
subject
.
Won't you be good enough to excuse
me?
CertainlyI have too much respect for
your feelings. Go, by all means, Ishmael, and
the sooner you're abed, reflecting on the
wilfulness
of man, and the mysterious ways and
goings-on of Providence, the better for you!
Good night; you'll be in bed at once, I hope.
Keep yourself nice and warm, Ishmael.
I'll try, sir, answered Mr. Small, artlessly,
although it's a piercer out o' doors, and
partly aside, what a precious old mana
perfect
martyr to his feelings.
The door was closed; the old man leapt up,
and dancing about the room, running forward
every now and then to the window and staring
into the open casements that furnished the free
light to his chamber, rubbed his hands together
with very glee.
Ishmael paused for a moment without, to
look through a private crevice in the wall and
enjoy the spectacle; then uncovered his steaks
and pitcher, and taking them in his hand, bore
them up stairs, and entered the apartment
immediately
over Mr. Close. This was scarcely
more than a loft at the very top of the house;
with beams and rafters cutting it crosswise and
lengthwise in every direction; which beams
were garnished with a great number of
suspended
market-baskets; coils of ancient iron
hoops; great pieces of tarred cable; and here
and there, bunches of rusty keys of all possible
sizessome perfect giants, suited for great
warehouses, and others scarcely large enough
for ladies' writing-desks. The room, poor and
parti-furnished as it was, had an air of
comfort
,
from the circumstance of the walls being
lined on every side with coats, trowsers, vests,
roundabouts, and cloaks, hung upon pins about,
in great abundance and variety; and when
Ishmael, stepping gently about the room,
gathered
together from corners and hiding-places,
fragments of wood and shaving, heaped them
in the chimney and lighted a fire that blazed
and crackled up the flue, throwing out a
wavering
flame into the gloom of the apartment,
it seemed as if the room swarmed with visiters,
who stood shrouded in their various apparel
against the wall, and only waited an invitation
from Ishmael to come forward and make
themselves
merry over his fire.
When Ishmael saw how cheerily the fire
sparkled on the hearth, he could not hold from
laughing gently, and thinking of the old
gentleman
below stairs. Then he took down from
the wall an old rusted gridirion, planted it
upon
the coals, and spreading his steak upon the
bars, watched the process that followed with
an eager eye. In a few minutes it was finished
to a turn, and while a pleasant savor steamed
up and filled the garret with a grateful smell,
Ishmael arrayed his cheer on a blue plate on a
little mantel or shelf that overhung the hearth;
placed a small loaf (a perquisite from the
baker
)
with a knife and fork at its side; and
drawing a well-worn countinghouse-stool from
a corner, vaulted upon it with an easy leap,
and first perching his heels upon a round near
the top, and placing the blue plate on his knee,
entered with steady glee upon the business
before
him.
The meal was despatched, as all meals are
that are relished hugely; and when it was
fairly at an end, Ishmael jumped up, and
standing
for a minute on the very top of the stool,
and raising his hand above him, he brought
down from a beam a long clay pipe and a
handful
of well-dried tobacco; bent down and
lighted
it with a coal; and, balancing his seat
upon
its hind legs, fell back against the wall, and
watched the smoke complacently, as it was lost
among the rafters.
All this process seemed to operate with a
kindly influence on Mr. Small, and as, from
time to time, he removed the pipe from his lips,
he discovered that he was in a fine narrative
humor, and having no one to talk to, was
driven
,
from the sheer necessity of the case, to
talking
to himself.
That's not so bad, said Ishmael, glancing
about at the various distenanted garments that
filled the room, fourpence a day for trowsers,
and sixpence for the use o' respectable men's
coats with skirts; all for honest voters that
goes to the polls in other people's clothes out
o' respect to their memory. Nick Finch is a
capital 'lectioneerer, and dresses up his voters
as pretty and natural as any man ever did;
but if Nick's friends only knew what dignified
gentleman had wore their coats and trowsers
before 'em, they'd carry their heads more like
lords and commodores than franchise citizens.
Here's this nice suit of crow-black, pursued
Mr. Small, turning about and fixing his eye
upon
the garments in question. There wasn't a
nicer person in the whole hundred and forty
pulpits, than that gentleman afore he took to
private drinks, and began to borry money of
Uncle Close on his gilt-edged prayer-books and
great bibles out o' the pulpit. He used to look
quite spruce and fine, I can tell you, when he
first come here; then his beard began to
stubble
out; then his boots was foxy; and then
he'd come with his hat knocked in, and his
pockets full of small stones, which he tried to
pass off on the old 'un for change. When he
got to that Uncle Close had him took up by the
police for a deranged wagrant; and that was
the last of you, old fellow!
Volunteer firemen is queer chaps!
continued
Ishmael, casting his eyes upon a shaggy
white overcoat with enormous pearl buttons.
Bully Simmons was one of the primest, and 'ud
play a whole orchestra on a fire-trumpet, on
the way to a one-story conflagration. But fires
was too much for himthey come on too thick
and shiny on wet nights! First, Bully lost his
appetite
,
and then he sold out all his red shirts;
then he lost the use o' his legs, and couldn't
travel a ladder, with a pipe in his hand; and
that made him part with his best figured hoists,
every one of 'em; and, one night, Bully tried
his voice agin a nor'wester that was howling
among the flames of a big factory, and when
he found himself beaten out, he stood at the
back of old Forty and shed tears into an
engin'bucket
like rain; stopped at the old
gentleman's
on his way home, and sold out his fire-hat,
his belts, his boots, and that great rough jack
et, for a song; borrowed a coal-heaver's shirt
to go home in, and turned agin engines for life.
Bully's a very moral man, they say, now, and
takes in the tracts by handfuls every time they
come round, for shavin' paper.
As Ishmael sat perched upon his stool,
framing
,
in this way, a memoir of each boot, vest,
and overcoat, or meditating the course of the
next day's business, an humble tap was given at
the door, the door slowly opened, and a
forlorn-looking
personage, in a shabby hat,
covered
with dust, as was also his whole person,
from crown to boot, and having under his arm
a small parcel, came in. Advancing timidly,
removing his hat, and standing before Ishmael
while he looked piteously in his face, he
accosted
him.
O
Please, sir, said the stranger, is there
no corner of a bed a poor traveller might have,
with a morsel to keep down the famine of a
long day's march?
To this appeal Mr. Small made no answer,
but reclining against the wall, assumed to fall
into a profound slumber.
Do, for Heaven's sake, hear me!
continued
the stranger. Wake and hear me! I have
come from burying an only child in the country,
and have neither crust nor couch to keep off
the cold and hunger this night.
Hallo! what's all this? cried Ishmael,
feigning at that moment to waken from his
sleep. Who's here? Thieves! thieves! Do
you mean to murder us in cold blood?
The poor stranger stood shivering before
him, with his hat crushed in his hand.
There are no thieves here, said the
stranger
,
as soon as he could be heard. No man's
life to be taken but mine, from sheer lack of
food.
Oh, you're a beggar, are you? said
Ishmael
,
rubbing his eyes with his knuckles.
Why didn't you stop below, at the old man's?
He would have helped you, I'm quite sure.
So he wouldso he would, sir, said the
traveller, but he's poor toopoorer than I.
His health was broken, he told me; he's cut
off from all his religious comforts, and sits
watching there, in that cold room, the pleasure
of Providence. He's a nice, a worthy old man;
that I judged by what he said. He referred
me to you; there was a benevolent young
gentleman
up stairs, he said, that would do
anything
I asked.
He did, eh? And so you come to me, said
Ishmael, smiling mildly upon the stranger.
Lodgin' in a garret and old clothes
cem-e-tery
;
as if I had a scrap to spare. You're a wag
I know you are; but you shouldn't play off
your humor on poor lads that lives in the roof.
Oh, noit won't doand just, by way of
apology
for your rudeness, be good enough to give
my compliments to the first watchmanyou
know what watchmans are, I guessyou meet
at the door. Tell him to lend you his overcoat
he's sure to do itborry his rattle for a cane
rattles make first-rate walking-sticks, and
waddle home as fast as you can. Good night,
turnip patch!
The poor stranger dropped his head, and,
without murmur or answer, went away.
Mr. Small now felt that he was wrought to
as comfortable a state, intellectually and
physically
,
as was attainable by such a gentleman
as himself, and turned his eye bedward.
Casting
his coat off, and dexterously jerking a boot
from either leg, as he stood, into a remote
corner
,
he pulled down from their pegs, every one
of them, all the coats, vests, and other garments
in the apartment, into a heap upon his
truckle-bed
,
and creeping under the same, his knavish
gray eyes, alone, peering out from under the
mass, he fell into a tranquil sleep.
CHAPTER XIV.
PUFFER HOPKINS ENCOUNTERS HOBBLESHANK
AGAIN.
There
could be no doubtapart from what
had occurred to Mr. Smallthat a general
election
was close at hand; and that the city was
rapidly falling into a relapse of its annual
fever
.
The walls and stable-doors broke out all
over with great placards and huge blotches of
declamation; an erysipelas of liberty, temples,
and muscular fists, clenched upon hammers,
appeared upon the foreheads of the pumps; the
air swarmed, as with forerunners of a plague,
with ominous flags, streaked from end to end
with a red and white and spotted inflammation;
journeyman patriots and self-sacrificing
office-seekers
began to shout and vociferate as in a
delirium; in a word, unless the customary
blood-letting incident to a charter contest
afforded
relief, the patient was in a fair way of
going stark mad, and losing the humble share
of sense with which it looks after its washing
and ironing, and provides for its butcher's and
baker's dues during the rest of the year. It
could scarcely be expected that Puffer Hopkins
should escape the general endemic; on the
contrary, it being his first season, the
symptoms
were in him extremely violent and
furious
.
From morning till night he sat at his
desk like one spell-bound, fabricating
resolutions
,
preambles, and reports of retiring
committees
,
by the gross; or starting up every now
and then and stalking the room vehemently,
and then returning and committing the
emphatic
thoughts that had occurred to him in
his hurried travel, to the record before him;
varying this employment with speeches
without
number, delivered in all possible attitudes,
to imaginary audiences of every temper,
complexion
,
and constitution.
Sometimes he had very distinctly before him,
in his mind's eye, an assemblage where the
carting interest prevailed, and where the
reduction
of corporation cartmen's wages, for
instance, might be undergoing an
examination
.
Gentlemen, said Puffer to the prospective
audience, gentlemen, I put it to you whether
twenty cents a load will pay a cartman and a
cartman's horse? Gentlemen, I see a prospect
before me for any man that undertakes to work
for such prices. In six months he is a pauper,
his children's paupers, his horse's a pauper,
and what's better, walks up and down the
avenue
,
where he's turned out to die, like the
apparition
of a respectable dirtman's horse that
had been; meeting the aldermen as they ride
out in their jaunts, and rebuking 'em to the
face for their niggardly parsimony. Hasn't
a cartman, a dirt-cartman, rights, I'd like to
know? Hasn't he a soul; and why should he
submit to this inhuman system; why should the
sweat of the poor man's brow be wrung out to
fertilize the soil of the rich man's field? (
Imaginary
cheers, beginning in a gentle G' up,
and ending in an earthquake hurrah!)
Then his audience consisted of a great
number
of individuals, who, from their being clad
in nice broadcloth coats, and always having
their beards closely trimmed, are supposed to
be gentlemen and Christians.
Fellow-citizens! cried Mr. Hopkins, we
all see what they're driving at; alluding to
the other party, of course; they're at work
undermining the pillars of societythat's what
they would have. Not a man of 'em but would
plant a keg of powder under every pulpit, on
Sunday morning, and blow all our respected
clergy to heaven in a twinkling. They're
infidels
and agrarians, fellow-citizens, and when
they'd done that, they'd let the pews out for
apple stands, and fall straightway to eating
soup out of the contribution-plates. If you
don't beat 'em at the next election, if you don't
rouse yourselves in your strength and
overwhelm
these monsters and jacobins, I despair
of my countryI despair of mankind; and
you'll have a herd of vipers saddled on you
next year for a corporation!
Abandoning this disagreeable region, Puffer
relieved himself by the fiction of a room full of
stout, rosy, comfortable-looking gentlemen, who
groaned in spirit under a great burden of city
charges, and whose constant saying it was,
that they, figuratively only, were eaten up with
taxes.
The city aldermen, the common council of
this mighty metropolis, said Puffer, is
nothing
but a corporation of boa-constrictorsa
board of greedy anacondasthat swallow lot
after lot, house upon house, of the freeholders,
as if they were so many brick-and-mortar
sand-wiches
.
Commissioners of street-opening run
the plough through a man's sleeping-room of
a morning before he's out of bed; and clap a
set of rollers under his dwelling and tumble it
into the river, as if it were so much old
lumber
.
Will you submit to this? Never! The
spirits of your forefathers protest against it;
your posterity implore you to snatch their
bread, their very subsistence from the maw of
these gigantic wolves in pacific apparel! The
little children in their cradles raise their hands
and ask you to save
them
from ruin!
It is impossible to conjecture to what regions
of rhetoric and simile-land the imagination of
Puffer Hopkins might have conveyed him, now
that he was fairly on the wing; for at this
moment, and in the very midst of these
pleasant
fables and suppositions, Puffer received by
the hand of a messenger, a notice from the chief
or executive committee, directing him to
proceed
forthwith to the house of Mr. Nicholas
Finch, an electioneering agent, and secure his
services. Now, Puffer had heard of Nick Finch,
as he was familiarly entitled, before; believed
him to be as thorough-going, limber tongued,
and supple-jointed a fellow as could be found in
the county; and therefore relished not a little the
honor of effecting a negotiation for his
distinguished
talent. Without delay he hurried forth,
rousing by the way the messenger, who being
a fellow besotted by drink and stupefied with
much political talk, in taprooms and elsewhere,
had halted in one of the landings, and there,
retiring penitentially to a corner, had gone off
into a profound and melodious slumber.
Performing
this agreeable duty, and lending the
gentleman an arm to the street, Puffer
proceeded
to the quarters where he understood Mr.
Finch held his lair. He soon approached the
precinct, but not knowing it by number, he put
the question to one of a group of lads playing
at toys against a fence side. A dozen started
up at once to answer.
Nick FinchNick Finch, sirover here,
sir, this way, through the alley! And word
having passed along that a gentleman was in
quest of Mr. Finch, Puffer was telegraphed
along from window to window, area to area,
until he was left at the foot of an alley, by an
old woman who had gallopped at his side for
several rods, who shouted in his ear, Up
there, sir, up there! and hobbled away again.
Left to himself, Puffer entered by a gate, and
making cautious progress along a boarded lane,
arrived in front of a row of common houses,
to which access was obtained by aid of outside
steps, fastened against the buildings.
Ascending
the first that offered, he rapped inquiringly
at the door, was hailed from within by a
decisive
voice, and marched in. The apartment
he had invaded was an oblong room, with a
sanded floor, a desk on a raised platform at the
farthest extremity, a full length George
Washington
in perfect white, standing in one
corner
,
and a full length Hamilton, bronzed, in
the opposite. Against the wall, and over a
fireplace in which a pile of wood was
crackling
and blazing, was fastened the declaration
of Independence, with all those interesting
specimens of handwriting of the fifty-two
signers
,
done in lithograph; and across a single
window that lighted the room, where he had
entered, was stretched a half American flag,
cut athwart, directly through all the stars, and
suspended by a tape.
The owner of the voice, a short, thick-set
man, with a half-mown beard, a hard, firm
countenance, and apparelled in a cart-frock,
stood in the middle of the apartment; and
before
him, ranged on a bench, sat a dozen or so
ill-dressed fellows, whose countenances were
fixed steadily on his.
Come in, sir, come in, said the thick-set
man. Don't hesitatethese are only a few
friends that are spending a little time with me;
paying me a sociable visit of a day or two, that's
all. It occurred to Puffer that if these
fellows
were actually visiters of the gentleman in
the cart-frock, that he had decidedly the most
select circle of acquaintance of any one he
could mention.
I'm glad you've come, sir, continued the
electioneerer. I've been expecting you some
days.
Then you know me? said Puffer.
Of course I do, answered the other.
Allow
me to introduce you to my friends.
Gentlemen
(turning to the line of ragged gentry on
the bench), Puffer Hopkins, Esq., of the
Opposition
committee. Rise, if you please, and
give him a bow.
The ragged gentry did as they were bid, and
straightway sat down again, as if the unusual
exertion of a salute had entirely exhausted
them.
I am afraid I interrupt business, said
Puffer. You seemed engaged when I came
in.
I was, answered the electioneerer, and
you entered just in the nick of time to aid me.
You must act as an inspector of election; you
have a good person, a clear, full voice, and will
judge my voters tenderly. Take this chair, if
you please! Saying this, he at once
inducted
Puffer into a seat behind the desk on the
raised platform, placed before him a green box,
and proceeded to distribute among the
gentlemen
on the bench, a number of small papers
curiously folded, which they received with a
knowing smile.
Now, gentlemen, go up as I give the
signal
,
said Mr. Finch. Mr. Peter Foil, will
you have the goodness to deposite your ballot?
At this one of the company who had found
his way, by some mysterious dispensation,
into a faded suit of blackit was the
broken-down
parson'sbut whose hair was,
nevertheless
,
uncombed, and his hat in very
reduced
circumstances, shambled across the floor
and made a show of inserting a vote in the
green box before Puffer Hopkins.
That will never do, sir, said the
electioneerer
,
rather sternly, as he was crossing back
again. You shuffled up to the counter as if
you were shoaling through the market,
according
to your well-known habits, stealing pigs'
feet of the butchers to make broth of; and when
you attempted to give the inspector your ticket,
any one could have sworn you had been a
fish-vender's
secretary, thrusting your hand in a
basket to pull out a flounder or a bunch of eels;
try it again!
Mr. Foil renewed the attemptthis time,
with greater success.
That's better, said Mr. Finch,
encouragingly
,
worthier the respectable man whose
clothes you've got on; more of the air of a
civilized
being. Now, Mr. Runlet.
At this a heavy-built personage proceeded
to perform his duty as a franchise citizen, but
in so cumbrous a gait and with so weak an eye
to the keeping and symmetry of his part, as to
call down a severe rebuke from Mr. Finch.
You pitch about as if you were on your
own ploughed land at Croton, and not down
here, earning handsome wages on the
pavement
for doing freeman's service. You must
walk more level, and not up and down like
a scart buffalo. Carry your arms at your
side, and don't swing them akimbo, like a
pair of crooked scythe-sneaths. You'll do
better
with your dinner to steady you!
After Mr. Runlet, a third was summoned,
who wore the garments of the volunteer
fireman
;
but was condemned as failing most
lamentably
in his swagger, and missing to speak
out of a corner of his mouth, as if he carried a
segar in the other. After several trials he
amended his performance, and succeded at last
in bullying the inspector with a grace, and
geting
his vote in by sheer force of impudence.
Another was called, who, springing up with
great alacrity, endued, in a pair of stout
corduroys
,
with a shirt of red flannel, rolled back
upon his arms over one of white, a great
brawny fellow, pitched about from one quarter
of the room to another, putting it into
imaginary
antagonists with all his might; at one
time knocking one on the head with his broad
hand, then teasing another's shins with a
sideway
motion of the leg, and discomfiting a third
with a recoil of a bony elbow, to the
unqualified
satisfaction and delight of Mr. Finch and
all lookers-on, and then retiring to his seat,
apparently
exhausted and worn out with his
savage
sport.
About half the company had been drilled and
exercised in this manner, when a door was
suddenly
thrown open at the lower end of the
apartment, a shrewish face thrust in, and a shrill
voice appertaining thereto called out that
dinner
was ready, and had better be eaten while
it was hot. Puffer Hopkins caught sight of a
table, spread in a room that was entered by a
descending step or two. The voters in
rehearsal
started to their feet, and cast longing eyes
toward the paradise thus opened to their view,
and before Mr. Finch could give order one way
or the other, they had broken all bounds, and
rushed down, like so many harpies, on the
banquet
spread below.
If my eyes are not glandered, cried Mr.
Finch, as soon as they were gone, this is
capital
sport. Dang me, Mr. Hopkins, if I wouldn't
rather drive a tandem through a china-shop
than manage these fellows. I've polished 'em
a little, you see; but they're too thick on the
wall yet, they daub and plaster and don't
hard-finish
up. You'd like to have 'em for a day or
two, wouldn't you!
Puffer, descending from the inspector's seat,
which he had filled during the rehearsal with
all the gravity he could command, and,
complimenting
Mr. Finch upon the show of his men,
admitted that he would, and that he was there
on that very business.
There isn't a better troop in town, though I
say it, pursued the agent, a little rough, but
there's capital stuff there. I don't flatter when
I assert that Nick Finch gets up finer and
sturdier
rioters than any man in town. Only look
at that chap in the red shirthe's a giant, a
perfect Nilghau with horns, in a crowd!
Puffer answered that he thought that
proposition
couldn't be safely denied.
Perhaps my sailors an't got the salt water
roll exactly; but they'll pass pretty well I
reckon
for East river boatmen and Hellgate pilots,
and that's full as good; you want twelve men
for three days' work, in how many wards?
The whole seventeen if you please;
answered
Puffer. I'm afraid to try 'em in so
many, continued Mr. Finch. You might
have 'em for five river wards, and one out o'
town; and the volunteer fireman (he's first
rate when he's warmed with a toddy), for any
number. Terms, twenty-five dollars per diem,
as they say in Congress.
It's a bargain, sir, said Puffer, seizing the
virtuous gentleman by the hand. You'll
bring them up yourself?
I will, you may depend on it; you're a lucky
manthe other side offered me twenty, and as
much oats as my horse could eat in a week, but
it wouldn't do.
With this understanding Puffer left; the agent
crying after him to call in on Monday week,
when they would be finally broken inYou
make a capital inspector; all you want is age
and silver spectacles to make you as respectable
a rogue as ever sat behind a green box!
Breathing the word mum in an under
tone, and shaking his head in reproof at the
hardihood of the agent, Puffer descended into
the yard.
He had reached the ground, and was turning
to leave the place, when he discovered moving
across the extremity of the yard and passing
into a house many degrees poorer than the
agent's, a figure bent with years; he walked
with a slow shuffling gait, and pausing often,
wrung his hands and looked keenly into the
earth, as if all his hopes lay buried there.
Puffer
knew not whether to advance and greet the
old man as his heart prompted, or to withdraw;
when he raised his head as if he knew the
footstep
that was near, and, discovering Puffer
Hopkins
,
started from the dotage of his walk and
manner, hastened across the ground, and while
his face brightened at every pace he hailed him
from the distance.
God bless you,God bless you, my boy!
cried Hobbleshank. Where have you tarried
so long? You have not forgotten the old man
so soon, eh? If you knew how often I had
thought of you, you would have paid me but
fair interest on my thoughts to have called at
the old man's lodgings, and asked how the
world, a very wilful and wicked one, had gone
with him? Am I right?
You are, you are, answered Puffer, who
could not fail to be touched by the kindly
eagerness
of the old man. I have abused your
goodness, and was repenting of my folly but
this morningI meant to call.
You did! said the old man quickly. Well
never mind that, but come with me.
With this they entered a low building, the
roof of which was moss-grown and hung over
like a great eyebrow, and the door sustained
by a single hinge, stood ever askew, allowing
snow, tempest, and hail, to beat in and keep a
perpetual Lapland through the hall. Opening
the first door they entered a square room, cold,
bare, and desolate-looking, with no soul
apparently
present.
How is this? said Hobbleshank.
thought Peter Hibbard dwelt here.
So he does, answered a broken voice from
the corner of the apartment, Peter Hibbard's
body lodges here. Heaven save his soulthat
may be wandering in some other world.
Are you Peter Hibbard? asked
Hobbleshank
,
approaching the bed-side where the
speaker lay.
Peter Hibbard am I, he answered, as far
as I can know, though I sometimes think Peter
one Peterdied better than a score of years
ago. When a man's soul is killed and his
heart frost-stricken, then he's dead, isn't he?
He should be! answered Hobbleshank,
but Heaven isn't always so kind. Sometimes
the body's dead and the soul all alive, like a
fire, driving the poor shattered body to and fro,
on thankless tasks and errands that end in
despair
:
that's worse.
There's no despair for me, pursued Peter,
disclosing a lean haggard face, and leering at
Hobbleshank from under the blanket. There's
nothing troubles me; I've got no soul.
Where's your wife, Peter? asked the old
man.
I've got none, answered the other. No
wife, nor child, nor grand-child, boy nor girl,
nor uncle, aunt, sister, brother, or neighbor; I
and these four walls keep house here.
But where are your old friends? continued
Hobbleshank.
Ah! my old friends, there you are, are
you? oh, ho! There was Phil Sherrod, he
died in his bed of an inflamed liver; Phil died
finely they say, singing Old Hundred. Don't
believe it; he yielded the ghost choking the
parson with his bands. Parker Lent, at sea;
Bill Green, in jail for a stolen horse, it was St.
John's pale horse they say; Charlotte Slocum,
she married a Long island milkman and was
drowned. There was another, continued the
bed-ridden man, rising in his couch and
pressing
his hand upon his brow, and peering from
under it toward Hobbleshank, and Puffer,
another
.
Yeswhat of her? asked Hobbleshank
quickly.
What of her? he replied, are you sure
it was a woman? Yes, by Heaven it was, it
was; a rosy buxom girl, but never Peter
Hibbard's
wife, why not?
With this question he fell back and lay with
his eyes wide open and glaring; but still and
motionless as a stone.
Why not? said the bed-ridden man
waking
suddenly from his trance of silence. Why
should Sim Lettuce win where I lost? That
was a flaming carbuncle on Sim's nose, and
14
many's the laugh Hetty and I have had
thinking
of it; and yet she married him spite of it.
And Sim diedwhat then? asked
Hobbleshank
,
watching the countenance of him he
questioned with painful earnestness. What
then, my good sir, what then?
Let me seeSim died; the carbuncle struck
in and turned to a St. Anthony's fire, and
carried
him off; Hetty turned nurse. Did you
know that? Nurse to a lovely lady; she died
too one day. Hetty went offI followed her.
Yes, yes, you followed her, repeated
Hobbleshank, anxious to keep the wandering
wits of the sick man to the subject. Go on.
I followed herdidn't I say so! On my
honor, red-nosed Sim's widow would not have
me, eh! eh! not she. Off she slipped to keep
a garden in an out-of-the-way place, I can tell
you. Peter Hibbard watched her many a year,
but she never would be Mrs. Hibbard, and here
I lie this day without a wife, or child; child,
nor grandchild, boy nor girl, nor uncle, aunt,
sister, brother, or neighbor. We have a merry
time, these four walls and I.
It was in vain that Hobbleshank attempted
again and again, and by various devices, to
bring back his mind to a narrative humor; he
kept reciting the incidents of his hopelessness
and desolation, and after a while fell into a wild
jumble, where everything pointless and trivial
was huddled together, and then he declined
into a senseless torpor, where he lay dumb to
every speech and entreaty of the old man.
Leaving him in this mood, Hobbleshank and
Puffer turned away from his bed-side and
sending
in a neighbor that had stood watching at
the door, for on such chance aid the bed-ridden
man trusted solely for lifeto minister to his
wants, they escaped swiftly from the place. In
perfect silence they walked through street after
street together, until they reached a corner
where their way separated.
All is lost, all is lost! said Hobbleshank
grasping Puffer Hopkins by the hand, as tears
flowed into his eyes; and, parting without a
further word, in gloom and silence, each took
his way.
CHAPTER XV.
PUFFER HOPKINS INQUIRES AFTER
HOBBLESHANK
.
All
is lost, all is lost! The piteous look
and tone with which the old man had uttered
these words, lingered in the ear of Puffer
Hopkins
,
long after they had parted, and came up
in every interval of business and labor, to fill
the pause and excite in his mind a vague
wonder
as to what they might refer. Some deep
trouble, some profound grief, reaching through
years, and embracing the whole hope of the
old man's life, they seemed to point at. He
resumed
the pursuit in which the messenger had
found him engaged, but every now and then
there started out of the papers before him the
wo-stricken face of Hobbleshank and he heard
his voice, repeating again and again, that all
was lost, lost. Wavering in this way between
idleness and toil, night drew on; a dark stormy
and troubled night; winds howling about the
Fork, clamoring at the chamber-windows,
where he lay, as if demanding entrance;
subsiding
,
springing up afresh, and suggesting to
the watcher, to whom the turmoil would not
allow
sleep, thoughts of poor sailors far abroad,
sailing on the wide ocean, reefing and gathering
canvass, or lying-to, for shelter's sake, in cold
harbors, or drifting along on the pitiless tide.
Perplexed by thought of storm and tempest,
in the midst of all which his mind had recurred
to the subject of yesterday, Puffer awoke, and
after in vain endeavoring to shake off the
gloomy shadow of the old man that still
haunted
his chamber, he resolved to call at the
lodgings
of Hobbleshank and seek there further
confirmation of the good or evil of his thoughts.
Making good speed for the fulfilment of his
purpose, he was soon apparelled and in the
open air. The sky was clear as if no cloud
had ever crossed it; the house-tops lay basking
in the early sun, and the streets, half shadow,
half light, were filled with a throng of people
come forth to enjoy the tranquillity of the
morning. The distance was not great, and he
found the place he sought at once, and in a
moment
was directly at the entrance of the
chamber
,
where he knew by his description,
Hobbleshank
lodged.
The door was ajar, and Puffer entered
without
notice. On either side of the hearth the
two old women were seated, discoursing in a
whisper. A night taper flickered in its socket
on the shelf; the fire was smouldering and
expiring
in its own ashes, and the sunlight, as it
streamed through the small window in the wall,
showed the features of the two women,
haggard
,
care-worn, and anxious. The elder was
speaking as he came in.
Why do you say me nay, when I tell you
it must have tumbled in such a night; I'm not
deaf, good woman, though seventy and past
Heaven save us! Do you think I did not hear
the storm, howling and raging? Your own
eyes saw the chimney fall, and the same wind
that blows down chimney-stacks must overturn
steeples and church-tops. Let me seeit was
built before the war, so it had lived to a good
old age, and was cut down not a minute before
its time.
Why do you vex yourself with thinking in
this way, Aunt Gatty? asked the other,
laying
her hand gently in her arm and looking her
anxiously in the face. The storm was heavy.
God help our poor old friend that was abroad
in it; but the city still stands!
Be not too sure of that! answered the
other
.
Have a care! Are you quite clear that
the fire-bell was not ringing all through the
night? I heard it in every pause of the storm;
and what is not blown over you may be sure
was burnt up.
Grant it so, said Dorothy. Grant, as
you say, that the city was ravaged and torn
from end to end by fire and tempest, it was no
fault of ours!
No fault of ours, do you say? cried Aunt
Gatty, turning suddenly about, and laughing
hysterically in her face. Then all that
hawling
of winds meant nothing? All the ships
that went ashore or were dashed against piers
and wharves, did it in mere sport! Ha! ha!
Children that perished in the streets, or in
dwellings drearier than the open street, and
beasts frozen in the field, were all in a frolic?
Ha! ha! No, no, she continued, dropping
her voice to a fearful whisper, these were
judgments
come
near to me and I'll tell you how.
Dorothy, at this bidding, drew close to her
side, and watched for what she said.
Where was the old man last night? she
asked, can you tell me that?
Heaven knows! echoed the other. It's
morning, and he has not come.
Did we go search for him?did we
awaken
neighbors, and raise the cry that a good
old man was perishing somewhere, and hurry
off in hunt for him? Did we ring bells and
alarm all sleepers through the townthat we
do when even a worthless old building of boards
is burningwhy not for a dear old friend? No,
nohe's dead, she cried, in a voice that
pierced the ear to the quick. Dead,
somewhere
,
and his blood is on our old idle heads!
Dead! dead!
With this she turned away, and, heeding no
further any speech that was addressed to her,
sat in the corner of the hearth, mumping, and
muttering unintelligibly to herself. At this
moment Puffer Hopkins came forward, and
made inquiry for Hobbleshank.
Good Lord! you did not know then that
the old man has been absent all night long!
she answered, sighing; she knows it, she
knows it too well! All night in the rough
weather; Heaven send that he has found
shelter
in some shed, or under some poor roof,
although
it's not to be hoped. Have you seen
the old man of late? you are his friend.
I am, and saw him but yesterday morning,
answered Puffer. I expected, from what
passed then, to find him downcast, but safe at
home at least.
Good angels help us all! cried Dorothy,
fixing her eyes upon the ceiling; was he calm
when you left him, or was he stirred with a
passion?
Greatly moved, I must confess; cut to the
very heart, if I may judge by what fell from
him, answered Puffer. He was in despair,
and left me weeping, hurrying swiftly away!
I knew it would be so! exclaimed
Dorothy
I
knew it would be so! Arouse! Aunt
Gatty, arouse! she continued, bending down
to the ear of her companion, and crying at the
top of her voice. This gentleman has seen
Hobbleshank, and has seen him fly away from
him like one distracted! Do you hear me?
Did you say Joe was dead? answered
Aunt Gatty, gazing at the other like one in a
dream. I thought such a storm was too much
for him. And she relapsed again into silence,
or mumbled in confused and broken words.
Poor thing! she thinks of her Joe that was
drowned half a lifetime since; watching all
night through, with age and infirmity, have
bewildered
her brain. She thinks, sorrowful
creature
,
that St. Paul's steeple, too, fell in the
storm last night; nothing can drive it from her
mind; and, because a neighbor's chimney was
overturned and a few tiles blown through the
street, she will have it that the storm has made
a wreck of the city, leaving no stone upon
anotherpoor thing!
Then you have no tidings of Hobbleshank,
and can not tell where he passed the night?
asked Puffer.
None whatever. He left us, said
Dorothy
,
yesterday, a little after noon, in
cheerful
spirits, for he had learned, by a poor
stranger
that came in from the country, something
relating to his child that was lost many years
ago. He said that a few hours would bring
him back a happy man; it will be happiness
enough for us, alas!for this poor old woman,
that has been his friend and companion for
fifteen
yearsif he come back alive.
Who was this poor stranger that you speak
of? continued Puffer. Is he known to any
one here, or did he utter his news aloud?
The stranger, answered Dorothy, was
stained with travel, and bore with him a parcel,
which he did not open in our presence. Aunt
Gatty thought it might be some garment of the
child's that was lost. They spake apart, the
stranger pointing often to the parcel under his
arm; something was said of a bed-ridden man
whom, we could not guess; and then they
went forth together. Since then the old man
has not returned.
What noise was that? cried Aunt Gatty,
starting up at this moment, and looking up
earnestly
into the face of Puffer Hopkins. A
heavy wall has fallen; you heard the bell
jingle
as it fell? It tolls for him!
For Heaven's sake give her comfort, said
Dorothy, appealing to Puffer, who stood aside,
not knowing how to answer this sudden
question
;
tell her the city is not in ruins, that no
church-steeple is cast down.
St. Paul's stands this morning, answered
Puffer, where it has stood many thousand
mornings; the sun shines upon its weathercock
as high in air as ever. Would that
Hobbleshank
could be found as securely as that!
Hobbleshank! echoed Aunt Gatty, I
knew him in his lifetime; he was an excellent
old man, and sorely tried; let me see, where
was he laid? In Trinity yard; oh, no, no, that
was too full. In the middle burying-ground.
He had no right there, poor man; he was not
stout enough to fill a grave. Ha! ha! I have
it, it was in the old brewery well, where
Tom was drowned; they buried him there
because
he knew Tom, when the poor boy was
alive.
Does she indeed think her old friend to be
dead? asked Puffer, looking from one to the
other.
She does, and its that that has unsettled her
mind, answered Dorothy; Her life seems to
hang by some strange link, an invisible thread,
on that of the old man; with him she seems to
think the sun is blotted out and all things fallen
into decay, like herself. For her sake, I would
that Hobbleshank might return.
There was no mark, then, by which you
could guess his purpose, or the course he might
take to bring it about? said Puffer Hopkins;
nothing by which you could judge, further
than it involved a thought of the lost childon
what his mind is fixed?
Did I say there was nothing more? I was
wrong. He wore with him when he left, he
came back for it, a woman's likeness, painted
in a breast pin; the pin was a great square one,
and the lady, a mild lovely creature, with
gentle eyes. He took it from the closet, and
fixed it in his breast, where it had not been
in my knowledge, ever before. His look
softened
when his eye fell on it; and his step was
slower, it seemed to me, and more thoughtful,
when he left, than it had been when he came
in. I thought the lady's face had touched his
heart.
It's all darkness and shadow to me now,
said Puffer, pondering and fixing his eyes upon
the ground, darkness, with a single ray of
light: you have told me all?
All! But do, I pray you, bring back the
old man; seek for him, as you would for your
own father! Spare no time, night or day to
track his steps. There is some deep trust rests
upon him, some great wrong to be avenged. If
he die in the streets, with sealed lips; if his old
life should be taken by wicked hands, and such
may be watching for him, who shall answer?
Will you try, will you seek him out? Promise
me on your truth!
As the woman spake she raised both her
hands, and letting them fall, as in benediction,
on the person of him she addressed, she
watched
him silently for an answer.
I am but poor and helpless myself,
answered
Puffer, with few friends and narrow
means; I know not what I can do, but, in
God's name, I will do what I can; what a
friendless and fatherless young man may hope
to do.
For his sake, for hers, for your own
humanity's
sake, be true to what you would do!
exclaimed Dorothy, glancing from the helpless
old creature at the hearth toward Puffer, who
stood, glowing with his good resolution, by the
door.
She had uttered the entreaty; turned to the
old woman, who began to speak again, and,
when she had turned again, Puffer was gone.
CHAPTER XVI.
THE NOMINATING CONVENTION HATCH A
CANDIDATE
.
To
what purpose had Puffer Hopkins pledged
his efforts in tracing and recovering
Hobbleshank
?
What clew, what single clew remained
in his hand, now that he reviewed all that had
fallen within his knowledge, relating to the old
man?
At one time it had occurred to him that light
shone through upon his fortunes, from the
chance discourse of the tailor; that hope was
at an end, for, on a requestioning he extracted
no more than he knew already, and that was
nothing to the purpose.
Any hope that had arisen from the wish to
enlist the personal services of his poor neighbor
in a further search, was idle; for Fob, from
overwork, feebleness of body, and, as it seemed
to Puffer, some secret care that was preying
upon him, was failing every day. To be sure, Fob
dwelt upon the incident he had first recited the
same as ever; spoke of the look and voice of
the old man; his wild talk with the billows and
breakers, and his final act in rending the
parchment
in pieces. Of what avail was this? It
might be a mere fantasy, a useless humor of both,
that this man was Hobbleshank, this paper, the
bond and tenure by which he held or
relinquished
his rights. Then Fob would pass from this
topic to talk of the old subjects, the country, the
wood, the field; dwelling upon them with more
enthusiasm than ever, and pausing at times, to
bedew their memory with a tear. While his
strength lasted, the little tailor performed his
daily tasks manfully, murmuring not once,
repining
not at all, save over the remembrance
of his country life.
Any hope, therefore, built by Puffer on the
services of Fob dwindled day by day. To what
purpose, then, had Puffer Hopkins proffered aid
in tracing and recovering Hobbleshank? To
none whatever! Feeling this, and admitting
to himself how completely darkness hedged
him in on every side, he determinedas most
people do in such emergenciesto let the world
take its course, but at the same time was ready
to seize promptly on the first opportunity that
offered, and, to do him justice, fervently hoping
it might be near at hand, to execute his trust.
In the meantime, and while the fortunes of
Hobbleshank were so full of shifting currents
that hurried onward, or eddies that tarried and
were lost in themselves, the tide of public life
rushed on, swelling steadily. Puffer had
learned
by this time that pausing is to a politician,
ruin; and so he kept himself abroad in the
stream. He was now known as an active and
zealous partisan; was regarded as a promising
and rising young man; and somehow or other
had found himself, by some secret agency,
which he could not guess (it was the kind old
man toiling for him in silence), pushed forward
steadily, and appointed to offices of confidence
and trust, as they arose in the due progress of
his career. A convention to nominate a mayor
for the city of New York, was soon to be held
and assembled at Fogfire hall; a delegate to this
he was likewise appointed. Prompt in the
performance
of all his duties of this nature, Puffer
only waited for the evening of its gathering to
make his way to the hall. The night was
somewhat stormy, and the streets were muffled
and shrouded in mist, but this did not prevent
its being quite apparent that something more
than usual was afoot at Fogfire hall.
Brighter lights streamed through the
tap-room
windows as he approached; a din of
voices was heard issuing forth and silencing
the turmoil of the street, whenever the door
opened; and quick feet hurried in and out, and
kept up a constant commotion at the door. The
tap-roomat all times a resort of gossips and
talkersswarmed with politicians and
quidnuncs
,
some of whom were gathered in knots,
from which a gusty voice would spring up every
now and then above all others, and then subside
again; some walking the room in couples,
arm-in-arm
at a hurried pace; some lounging about
easily, with sticks in their hands from group to
group, and others, dropping off from the knots
of loud talkers, would saunter to the bar, and
arraying themselves in front of a long round
polea liberty-pole shaved down and shod at
either end with brassreplenished the thirsty
spirit without stint. The air of the place was
close and odorous, and every man's face was
flushed and wore a burnt and heated look, as if
the tap-room lay directly in the fiery zone.
Through this torrid region Puffer passed,
recognising
a friend or two by the way, and pausing
for a grasp; and emerging at a side door upon
the hall, ascended a flight of stairs and was
presently in the committee-room.
The delegates there assembled in great
numbers
,
stood about the floor talking in groups,
and growing red and excited as they plunged,
by degrees, deeper and deeper into the topics of
discourse. In a few minutes, when the room
was quite full and the hubbub at its height, a
pale man in whiskers stood up at the other end
of the apartment, holding his hat in one hand
and knocking with the knuckes of the other,
with great vehemence, on a table at his side.
This sound caused a sudden silence, and the
members wheeling about in a body,
contemplated
any further movement on the part of the
pale man in whiskers, with great interest;
which united gaze the pale man met with
another
quite as bold and decided, and, drawing a
deep breath, he nominated, in a loud voice, Mr.
Epaminondas Cobb, as chairman of the
committee
;
which was unanimously acceded to;
then a couple of secretaries; then a
door-keeper
;
all of whom with due ceremony assumed
their respective stations, and the committee
was organized and in session.
Then Mr. Epaminondas Cobb, who was a
short brick-complexioned gentleman, with dim
eyes, and a pair of stout silver spectacles
astride a dignified, but by no means massive
nosestood up and asked them if it was their
further pleasure to proceed to the nomination
of a mayor for the city and county of New
York? To which question no response being
given, it was concluded (the chief wisdom of
public bodies in such cases lying in the
observance
of profound silence) it was; and they
accordingly entered at once upon the exciting
and engrossing business of nomination.
Candidates were forthwith put in nomination
by members with great rapidity; some were
merely named; others proclaimed and sustained
and advocated at length, in formal harangnes.
There was one committee-man, a little
shrunken
dried-up gentleman, who was up and
down every five minutes, with a speech in
advocacy
of the extraordinary and unquestionable
claims of Thomas Cutbill, butcher; the said
Thomas Cutbill being the great man of his
neighborhood, the good Samaritan of his ward;
and, furthermore, a luminous expounder to the
delight of the little committee-man and a knot
of cronies, of profound political doctrine, at a
familiar bar or coffee-room, where Mr. Cutbill
condescended to be present of a Wednesday
night and take a hand in backgammon or other
intricate games, there going forward.
I knows Thomas Cutbill, said his
champion
,
and his claims is decided; pig lead isn't
surer. A benevolenter gentleman and a more
popular one was never known. To Mr. Cutbill
the people was indebted for the new
fish-market
;
and asking who it was that invented the
mode of ringing alarms by districts, he'd beg
leave of the committee to say Cutbill was the
man! Cutbill had been vilified, but there never
was a nicer man to the poor, a more lovely
friend of the pauper, than that aggravated
individual
.
He was proud of Mr. Cutbill. Mr.
Cutbill should have his vote!
When the little champion had uttered this
vindication something like half-a-dozen times,
a very mild gentleman remarked, that what the
gentleman opposite had said was true enough;
Mr. Cutbill
was
a very benevolent and worthy
individual, for he had to his knowledge, on
several occasions arrested lads, ragged and
unclean
lads, in the street, and advised themin
good faith advised them, laying his hand
kindly
upon their headsto go home and wash their
faces, and put on clean clothes! What had
the gentlemen of the committee to say to that?
On another occasion he had known Mr.
Cutbill
lift a poor woman out of the gutter, take
her by the arm and lead her directly into a
respectable
neighboring house, seat her on a sofa
in the front parlor, and call out, with a
vehemence
worthy of himself and the charitable
object
he had in view, for a jug of hot negus
immediately
,
and if that couldn't be had, for half
a dozen of Seville oranges, for the poor lady.
Wasn't that man worthy of their suffrages,
he
would like to know?
Just as this speaker was concluding there
entered the committee-room in great state, a
gentleman enveloped in a long brown overcoat,
buttoned to the chin; an ample bandanna
muffling his lower features, and his head carried
erect. He entered in a straight line, aimed for
a blank corner of the room, looking about as if
surprised that the committee could be in session
and he not thereattaining which, he cast off
his over-coat, unmuffled his chin, and rising at
once bolt-upright in his place, proceeded to
deliver
himself of his sentiments, first taking his
hat by either rim and fixing it on more firmly
than ever.
A single case was nothing this way or that,
said the new comer, did Mr. Cutbill make it
a habit, he would like to know, to send ragged
boys home for clean clothes? Did he go about
encouraging them to dismiss their broken
garments
?
that was the point. Was or was not
Mr. Cutbill privately associated, in interest, in
some clothing or ready-made linen
establishment
?
Was Mr. Cutbill a tall man or a short
man? Did he wear red vestings or white?
Was he lean-featured or rubicund? He would
not vote for any man as candidate for the
mayoralty of this great city until he knew his
person, his principles, his private habits, to a
hairto an inch! He might as well tell the
committee at once that he had his eye on a
gentleman that would make the very candidate
they wanted. On reflection, the gentleman
alluded
to had differed from the community in
some slight particulars; he was a man in years,
of a very venerable appearance, but somehow
or other had fancied that all his grand-children
were vinegar-cruets, and tried to unstoppel
them by screwing their heads off. This had
occasioned
his going into the country for a time,
and this would, perhaps, prevent his running at
the approaching election.
Opposite this speaker sat a thin, thoughtful
gentleman, rather grotesquely habited in a red
vest, which wrapped him round like a great
Mohawk blanket, who watched what fell from
him, touching the eccentric candidate, with
extraordinary
interest.
The other was no sooner seated, than this
individual stared to his feet, and stared wildly
about.
The man he desired to see presiding over
the destinies of this vast metropolis, was the
very one that Mr. Fishblatt had just mentioned;
but he couldn't be had! Who then should it be?
Not the Cham of Tartary, he was quite sure:
not the Imaum of Muscat, nor the King of the
Pelew islands. He must be honest; honest by all
means. He must be in favor of the largest
liberty
boundless
liberty, he might say; also
opposed
to all private rights. He wanted a man
in favor of all colorsof no color himself. In a
word, he must be opposed entirely to the present
condition of things; but what condition of things
he must be in favor of he (the speaker) wouldn't
at present undertake to decide. This is no
musical
forest, concluded the gifted declaimer,
reiterating sentiments he had expressed many
times before, but more particularly to our know
ledge on Puffer's introduction to the Bottom
Club. This is no musical forest, no Hindoo
hunter's hut, got up for effect at the
amphitheatre
.
We haven't trees here alive with real
birds!the branches laden with living mon
keys!the fountains visited by long-legged
flamingoes
!the
green-sward covered with
gazelles
,
grazing and sporting! Oh, no! we are
a mere caucus of plain citizens, in our
every-day
dresses, sitting in this small room, on rough
benches, to reorganize society by giving it a
new mayor, worthy of ourselves! And
thereupon
the illustrious chairman of the Bottom
Club sat down.
At the conclusion of this powerful and
majestic
effort, the committee might have laughed,
had they not reflected that the speaker
controlled
a couple of hundred votes or sothe
disciples and dependants of the Bottom Club
and they, therefore, on the contrary, looked
extremely
grave and respectful.
Candidates now began to be proclaimed by
the score; sometimes they were let slipone
by one in quick successionthen half a dozen
propounders would rise and discharge their
names among the committee in a body. The
chairman was constantly up shouting order;
and whenever a pause occurred, some member
or other would spring to his legs and call their
attention to the undoubted claims, the
unsurpassed
,
unequalled, and unrivalled services of
the Smith or Brown whom he happened to
advocate
.
At length, after a great number of ballotings,
and a great variety of fortune, the contest was
narrowed to two candidates; upon these the
divided members of the convention pitched their
whole strength, and, stripping themselves to
a final recontre, they respectively entered
upon the public and private history of the
gentlemen
in question, with a minuteness and
eagerness of biographical ardor quite
astonishing
.
One of these was Mr. Bluff, a wholesale
grocer; the other, Gallipot, a retail painter.
Mr. Bluff was a stout, comely gentleman;
Gallipot
,
thin and livid, as became his trade. Mr.
Bluff leaned toward the elegant and ornate in
dress; Gallipot to the vernacular and
homespun
.
Mr Egbert Bluff exercised his
wholesale
ingenuity in disposing of pipes,
puncheons
,
casks, and merchandise in gross; while
the revenues of Gallipot accrued from the
embellishment
,
by retail, of the houses of the
middle-class
,
the adornment of tradesmen's boards,
and the displays of professional literature on
attorneys' signs. Mr. Bluff, the master of every
elegant accomplishment, from the delicate
swaying of a cane, up to the cock of a hat and
the proper wearing of a rufflebelonged to the
Ionian order of candidates; Gallipot, rough in
dress, blunt of speech, rude of grasp, was of
the sterner Doric.
The two candidates, so contrasted, stood
palpably before the mind's eye of the
committee
;
and it was their present and immediate
duty to determine, not the separate value of
each of their qualities in itself; but their
aggregate
influence in either candidate on the
community, and their value when translated in
good current votes.
How many streetshow many blocks,
squares, wards, could they respectively
command
?
All they had done through many years
of struggle and endeavor in their various
callings
,
for they were both men in middle-life,
was now to be nicely weighed against ballots,
little talismanic papersthe secret
prescriptions
of the public acting as the physician; the
whole life of each to be tallied off against so
many of these mystic counters.
As for Mr. Bluff, said Mr. Fishblatt, who
was always the first to deliver his views on the
topic before the committee, I beg to know
whether it is true, as I am informed, he is the
gentleman that wears a lepine watch with five
jewels? Before receiving an answer to this,
I would inquire whether Mr. Bluff keeps a
carriage
,
with a black footman in a
silver-buckled
hat and white cambric pocket-handkerchief?
Also, could any member of the committee
instruct
him whether Mr. Bluff's pew was lined
with red damask and fastened with copper
tacks, rotten-stoned every Saturday morning by
one of his servants, privily admitted to the
church? Mr. Bluff might dress his children
in scalloped collars and laced pantalettesthe
children of a public man did not always belong
to the public (although he sometimes made it
a present of them when he died), but what
business had Mr. Bluff to put two stone dogs
on his stoop? If they had been lions, he (Mr.
Fishblatt) might have forgiven him; two great
roaring, open-mouthed lions; even a pair of
elephants. These were noble animals. But dogs!
Had any gentleman of the committee kept a
diary
of Mr. Bluff's doings for the past fifteen
years? Was any one prepared to say what
had been his private and personal habits
during
that time? If not, the committee were
entering upon a most solemn and important
business, with very imperfect materials in their
hands. He had heard that there had been a
lurking committee, of five or more, to institute
a watch upon Mr. Bluff; to have an eye upon
all he did and said from the first moment he
was contemplated as a candidate. Where was
that committee? They had followed him (Mr.
Bluff), he had been informed in confidence, for
more than two weeks; knew all his opinions,
as expressed in various places of public and
private resort. Mr. Fishblatt would like to see
their minutes. He had been told that Mr. Bluff
had been measured, in all the past fortnight,
for two new coats, and a new double vest of
black velvet. What was the meaning of this?
Mr. Fishblatt had spoken in his hat, which
he insisted on in despite the remonstrance of
the brick-complexioned chairman, as being
more formidable, and more according to strict
congressional method, when, at this juncture,
occasioned by the loud and peremptory character
of his oratory or from some other adequate cause,
a brass trumpet, fixed against the ceiling, was
dislodged, and striking Mr. Fishblatt on the
crown, buried him to the eyes. Before he could
fairly emerge from this sudden midnight and
renew his appeal, another speaker had
possession
of the floor.
He had satisfied himself, this was a
gentleman
of a very nice and accurate turn of mind
of the exact number of three-story brick
tenements
in the city and county of New York.
He wouldn't say how many there were, because
he knew, and that was enough. Every brick
tenement had its own voterssay three to each:
very good. Around these were scattered a
great many low-roofed wooden buildings.
Three-stories was always commanding. Every
three-story, that was his view, would carry
three frame-houses with it to the polls. There
was a calculation, and if Mr. Bluff wasn't the
man, he had no more to say!
And so this calculating prodigy sat down.
Will the committee be cautious, followed
a dark-looking member, with a low forehead,
from which a shock of jet-black hair bristled
and stood straight up, and a very harsh voice,
will they look out what they're at? Gallipot's
a painter; there's no objection to that. He's
a working man, and rolls back his sleeves when
he's on a job. He has a right. Peleg Gallipot's
a popular manwho says he isn't? What's
the matter then? I know what's the matter
Gallipot, this Peleg Gallipot afore the
committee
,
had lately painted a Presbyterian church!
There was a snag; get over it if you can!
To tell the truth, this was a snag; the friends
of Gallipot felt that it was, and, for a time, the
Bluffites had it all their own way. Here were
the religious prejudices of the community, by a
single act of the unfortunate Gallipot, arrayed
in deadly hostility against him; all the other
sects would go against him to a man.
Gallipot
had, in some unhappy moment of
professional
hallucination, painted a Presbyterian
church. In this state of affairs the question
was about to be put.
Hold a minute, my excellent friends, said
the very mild gentleman who had spoken once
before. Mr. Gallipot wishes to get upon his
legs, and I hope you will allow him a chance.
They need have no fearsthey might put their
minds at rest at once about a religious
antipathy
to Mr. Gallipot. It was true, and he felt
it his duty to confess it, Mr. G. had painted a
Presbyterian church a short time ago; it was
also true, and he felt great pleasure in being
able to make the statement, Mr. G. was now
also under contract to paint an Episcopal
church, also a Quaker meeting-house, also a
Unitarian chapel. There was an antidote; and
now, the sooner they went into an election, the
better he and other friends of the poor man's
candidate (as he would venture to call his
worthy friend) would like it!
Notwithstanding another last desperate
attempt
on the part of Mr. Cutbill's champion to
press the claims of that philanthropist on their
attention, they did go into an election, and
Gallipot was the man. The announcement of
this result was hailed by the friends of
Gallipot
in the committee, with shouts and stamping;
and as soon as it was made known below,
where they had been kept throughout the
evening
in a state of feverish excitement by the
contradictory reports of various members, who
had dropped down into the tap-room from time
to time, by similar demonstrations.
During all these deliberations, harangues,
and ballotings of the convention, Puffer, under
judicious advisement, had refrained from any
public expression of his opinions; but, as an
offset to this inactivity, had gone about the
committee-room and declared himself privately,
separately, and apart, to each member, in
behalf
of his candidate, and had taken great
pains, when it came to a final and decisive
ballot
,
to cast his voteand to have it so known
by his friends, in favor of Gallipot, the
strongest
man. When the committee was dismissed,
to avoid troublesome questionings or
reproaches
,
Puffer escaped as swiftly as he could, not
even tarrying to interchange a word with Mr.
Halsey Fishblatt, who, somewhat discomfited
by the sudden rebuff he had met, pushed his
way, as stately as ever, through the crowd in
the bar-room, not deigning speech or recognition
to a solitary soul.
Did no thought of the kind old man enter
Puffer's mind as he departed from Fogfire hall?
No thought of the first strange interview, the
kind counsel, the anxious look? It did; and
Puffer dwelt upon it till it all rose up anew
before
him, bright and fresh as the reality. Out
of the pastthe brief but eventful interval
the old man came shambling forth with the old
gait, the sidelong demeanor, the one eye closed
and the other fixed upon him. He walked by
Puffer's side all the way home to the Fork;
and when sleep and darkness again closed
upon him, again the little paralytic crossed and
re-crossed before him in tears and laughter;
and was, finally lost in a deep gloom, which
compassed him in and shut him from the sight.
CHAPTER XVII.
CERTAIN DISTINGUISHED PERSONS NEGOTIATE
WITH THE NEWSBOYS.
The
two parties, it was now quite obvious,
were rapidly approaching the field of encounter.
Both were on the alert for recruits; busy at the
drum, keeping up such uproar as they could;
summoning meetings; despatching spies to the
opposite camp; in a word, availing themselves
of every opening to obtain an advantage over
the adversary. Among other schemes, it was
thought expedient to secure, as early as possible,
the services of a corps of bold, active, and
ready-witted bill-posters, who would not only
come in aid of the Bottom Club and other
fraternities
of that class, in laying waste and
ravaging
the enemy's placards, but also serve, by
their ingenuity and vigor, to give prominence
and conspicuous display to their own calls and
handbills.
On this service Mr. Fishblatt and Puffer
Hopkins, as combining great readiness of
invention
,
with handsome powers of persuasion,
were named; and Puffer, accordingly, one
evening
called by appointment on his associate, to
set out with him on the performance of this
delicate
duty.
Mr. Fishblatt was discovered, as might
perhaps
have been expected, in his high-backed
chair, in nearly the same attitude as before,
with an immense newspaperit was larger
than the other, and had sprung up in the
interval
in
his outstretched arms; his feet braced
against the wall, and ranging with his eye up
and down the long columns of solid print, like a
dragoon under demonaical possession. It was
a little time before Puffer's entrance caught his
attention; but when it did, he sprang suddenly
to his feet, welcomed him, and spreading the
great sheet over a horse by the firewhich
contrivance
he had been driven upon by the
extraordinary
expansion of the weekly presssaid
he would be ready in a trice.
A wonderful age this, said Mr. Fishblatt,
while in the act of enduing his long brown
overcoat, an astonishing, an immense age; all
the ages that have gone before it, should be
counted as nothing, sir, and this year, this very
year of our Lord, should be called the year one.
We do our ancestors too much honor by
keeping
any accounts with them. We should cut
them at once; deny any knowledge of them.
They were a poor, mean, miserable set of
sneaking
folio-readers; do you know that? The editor
of this paper, sir, pursued Mr. Fishblatt,
grasping
a sturdy stick that stood in a corner, is a
wonderful man. His sheet is two inches longer
and four inches broader than any other in the
country; he always has news an hour and
three quarters in advance of the regular mail;
and he has latelythere's enterprise for you
purchased a small blood poney to ride down to
the office with his leaders. It's astonishing to
think what a popularity this man enjoys; he's
known from one end of the country to the other,
and gives us a half column of notices of his
paper every week, speaking of himhim
individually
in
the very handsomest terms.
There's the Nauvoo `Bludgeon' says he wields
a trenchant and vigorous penyes sir, the
Nauvoo `Bludgeon' says that. Then the
Potomac
`Trumpet' admits he has an unrivalled
genius for the more elegant species of
composition
;
and by the western `Thunder-gust,'
which has just come in, I see they allow him
`a penetrating eye and a remarkable talent for
journalism.' He's a wonderful man; we must
go. And forth they issued. They struck
through the heart of the city for the quarter
they were in quest of; Mr. Fishblatt, whenever
they passed through an obscure street,
unbending
a little and addressing his companion in a
familiar tone, but as soon as ever they were
abroad again in a great thoroughfare, he
stretched himself to his full stature, and
marched
forward very gravely, without so much as
uttering a word. From the manner in which
he wielded the cane that he bore in his hand
sometimes twirling it about in his fingers,
sometimes
making a home-thrust at an imaginary
object just before himhe may have been
employed
in revolving a passage or two of
declamation
;
anyhow, so they walked on. An old
dingy building soon stood before them and they
knew they had reached their destination. The
quarter in which they had arrived was gross,
squalid, and unclean, and the building itself
seemed a natural production of the soil, and not
the work of human hands. A broad gaping
area was there, in which such other fungi of
the place as broken quarter-kegs, stocking-ends,
and shattered hats, lay in heaps about, and into
this they plunged.
They descended a few steps, and, by the aid
of a flickering lamp, getting into an unclean
passage, the walls of which were embelfished
with numerous impressions of small hands
taken in primitive earth, they reached a door
from which a great hubbub of voices and
confused
sounds constantly escaped. Here they
entered, and found themselves in a low-roofed
apartment lighted by various glittering and
resplendent
reflectors pinned against the upright
posts at the side; around the whole room there
was a narrow bench, and at the farther
extremity
was a desk several feet above the level
of the floor. Puffer and his companion were
ushered to a place by the side of the desk; a
tall young gentleman, who seemed to act as
president, or chairman, stood up and knocked
on the board before him, in imitation of a
popular
tune, when there came pouring in at a side
passage, which Puffer had not at first observed,
a swarm of youths, of all sizes, ages, and
complexions
;
dressed in all possible varieties of
apparel
;
and bearing themselves with as great
freedom and independence of demeanor as any
number of gentlemen that could be found.
Many of them bore in their hands threepenny
pies, out of which, from time to time, they cut
a mouthful; many more carried cigars in the
corners of their mouths, at which they puffed
with an exemplary vehemence and unction. At
another bidding they were all seated, or
gathered
in groups and clusters about pillars in the
middle of the apartment, and pausing for a
season
in their respective labors, turned their
faces toward the tall chairman.
Ge'mmen! said the chief of the
newsboys
,
rising in his place, having first priggishly
buttoned his coat and thrust a broken yellow
handkerchief in his breast, Ge'mmen! said
he, we all knows what we've come here for
to-night. You know, Tom Hurley, and Joe
Shirks, and Bill Gidney, what we're come here
for to do. We all knows what a low ebb
'Mery-kin literature had got to, when we took
hold of it. We all knows what it is nowthe
wery pride and ornament of the earth. I can
say it of a truth, ge'mmen, that Bill Gidney,
the activest news-boy in the metropolis, is a
honor to his species, so is Joe Shirks, and so
is Tom Hurley. Where was natyve genius afore
we took hold of it? it was a bud in the worm,
a undeveloped onion. What's the complaint
now? There's too much genius, too much
surprisin'
talent, and keen obserwation, and
overpowerin'
eloquence. King Solomon and the
greasy wise men 'ud be ashamed o' themselves
if they only knew Mr. Flabby, what edits the
`Empty Puncheon,' or Mr. Busts, what
conducts
the `Daily Bladder,' or Mr. Bloater,
what writes four-horse leaders for the `Junk
Bottle,' but what's going to be the head man of
the new and interestin' paper called the `
Mammoth
Mug.' That'll be a remarkable paper,
gemmen, depend on it! The uncommon
quantity
of brains put into that newspaper will
be mere waste; it'll be a extravagant usin'
up o' the human intellect. For myself,
ge'mmen
,
if you ask my views of liter-a-toor, I
don't hesitate to say, in one sense o' the word,
excuse the expression, it's nothin' but a
powerful
combination o' rags and brass; by which I
means to say it takes a uncommon quantity o'
rags to make the paper out of, and it takes a
uncommon sight o' brass and courage to make
the paper full o' reading matter. Now what's
our duty? Shall we give the cause of natyve
genius the go-by; a sort of a wink to a blind
horse, instead of a nice nod of encouragement?
As long as we can make twenty-five off a
hundred
,
and lunches, shall we give it up?
Here the speaker was interrupted by a
terrific
and general cry of No, no. Carry
that man to Bellewue, he's lost his wits!
It was quite obvious that his excellency, the
chairman, was prepared still further to thrill
and enlighten them with his peculiar eloquence;
but at this stage of the proceedings there came
into the meeting, pushing his way through the
news-boys, with the most easy, natural, and
serene self-possession, a stout, blustering
fellow
,
with great staring eyesnot altogether
ill-looking eithera red neckerchief about his
throat, a frock-coat flaunting from his side, his
hair in disorder, and his countenance beaming
with a broad unrestrained expression of
assurance
and conceit. This was an editor. It
was Piddleton Bloater himself; and Piddleton
Bloater, the mighty, the immense, the
immeasurable
,
had come to bargain with the
news-boys to take an interest in a new journal
in which he was about to embark his
magnificent
talents.
The new paper to be issued on Saturday
morning, said Mr. Bloater, looking gigantic,
so as to overawe the juvenile gentry before him,
will be the completest paper ever published;
eight feet square, honest measure; illustrated
by the most splendid wood-cuts, head-pieces,
tail-pieces, and so forth, by the most celebrated
artists. Correspondents in every quarter of the
world. We have already engaged
Commissioner
Lin for the Chinese department; President
Boyer, of Hayti, does the African branch. The
board of directors of the N. Y. Gas company
are retained as regular contributors. Mr.
Bulfinch
Twaddle will furnish a poem to every
number. We expect to have a circulation of
one hundred and fifty thousand by the end of
the present year; in fact we have it already,
although they haven't all paid in yet. We
intend
to make the `Mug' the most remarkable
journal of the day. The `Mug' must go. Don't
all speak at once!
Here the orator produced from his coat-pocket
a great red handkerchief, the duplicate segment
of that about his neck, which he unfurled with
a flourish, and disclosed before the gaze of the
assembled news-boys, the words
The.
Mammoth
Mug
Edited by
Piddleton Bloater,
Esq.
, wrought thereon in portentous capitals.
This movement was hailed with a cheer, and
as he waved it about his head, and reddened in
the face by the exertion, the cheers grew in
energy and emphasis.
But, gentlemen, continued Mr. Bloater,
when the enthusiasm had a little abated,
sinking
his voice to an awful whisper, there's a
secret I've got to disclose that will astonish
you. Prepare yourselves. Brace up, and hold
fast of each other. Rum-fusti, the patriarch of
Jerusalem, is employed to write an entirely
original continuous tale for the `Mug;' to be
contributed exclusively to the `Mug' and to no
other paper!
This had a fine sounding style, and the
newsboys
,
from the very circumstance of not
apprehending
it very thoroughly, cheered and
shouted
more heartily than ever. With this
tremendous
announcement Mr. Piddleton Bloater
paused, and taking a note-book from his pocket
said he was ready for orders, but hoped they
would restrain themselves, and not come on too
fast.
Eight feet square, that's ever so many
thousand surface inches! said Master Tom
Hurley, a pale-faced news-boy apparelled in a
long tailed coat with metal buttons. I'm
death for the `Mug,' Mr. Bloater. I'll cut the
`Empty Puncheon,' and take a hundred `Mugs'
to start with.
The Puncheon! How in the name of
Heaven
could any one patronize that miserable
abortion
!
exclaimed Mr. Bloater. Flabby's a poor
withered alligator, and the Puncheon a mere
'pothecary's show-bottle, that shines a mile or
two off, but's nothing after all but colored
water
,
and that not fit to drink.
If Rum Buster out o' Noah's ark writes for
the first number, said Master Gidney, a small,
corpulent, jolly-looking fellow, in a roundabout
and tasselled cap, grinning and speaking up as
he cocked it on his brow, I'll cut in for a
gross of number one; if I seed his Tale's name
in big letter on the fences, it 'ud give me con
fidence, and I might go in for a couple o'
hundred
;
but that's as many as 'ud do, till I have
a interview with the fireboard makers.
Mr. Bloater, not exactly understanding how a
privity of knowledge between the fireboard
makers and Master Gidney could affect the sale
of the Mug, looked upon the youth approvingly,
and dashed his open palm upon his leg, crying
out that was juicy and just the thing!
I think Busts, of the `Daily Bladder,' is
breaking down, interposed another
news-vender
,
in a suit all shreds and patches, with an
unclean
face, uncombed hair (the prevailing
fashion
of the place), and no covering to his head.
He writes all his editorials in a cheer made
out of the staves of a rum-eask. He loves the
smell of the thing wonderfully; and has to be
tied in by the foreman while he's writin'. Busts
writes a history of his sprees over-night in
somebody else's name, and that fills up the
police
head. I'll take fifty `Mugs,' fresh and
bright with the froth on.
The best thing you can do, my lad! cried
Mr. Bloater, from where he stood, smiling.
That Busts is a poor miserable wretch; a
viper
in the uniform of the rifle brigade, and he
kills character by the platoon. They call Busts
a keen observer of life! so he is, of
animalcul
that live in the kennel. There isn't a
viler wretch on the face of the earth than this
same Busts, if you except Flabby, of the `
Empty
Puncheon!' But how many copies do you
take, Mr, Chairman? asked Mr. Bloater,
turning toward that functionary; I know you
to be one of the longest-legged and
loudestvoiced
of the society.
That's a wery delicate question, sir,
answered
the president, rising with dignity, and
buttoning his coat calmly as he ascended, a
wery delicate questionunless I was informed
of the principles the Mug's to be conducted on;
does it go Captain Kidd or the moral code?
Captain Kidd, decidedly, rejoined Mr.
Piddleton
Bloater. We shall pirate all foreign
tales regularly; and where we can purloin
proof-sheets shall publish in advance of the
author himself; shall in all cases employ
third-rate
native writers at journeyman cobbler's
wages, and swear to their genius as a matter
of business; shall reprint the old annuals
and almanacs, systematically, as select extracts
and faceti, and shall reproduce their cuts and
illustrations, as new designs from the burin of
Mr. Tinto, the celebrated engraver.
That'll dothat'll do! cried the
chairman
,
interrupting the speaker. Set me down
for the balance of the fust edition; it'll be a
fust-rate
paper and conducted on fust-rate
principles
.
There's another thing, said Mr. Bloater,
continuing the subject, another thing to be
distinctly and clearly understood. Whoever
writes the chief article of the Mug is to be the
great writerthe biggest penman in America,
for that week. For instance, if it should even
be Busts or Flabby, Flabby is to be advertised
as an angel, in large caps, and Busts as a genius
of the first water.
Of course! cried the president, of
course! echoed the newsboys to a man, who
understood this policy thoroughly.
With this understanding I'll say good night
to you, said Mr. Bloater, wiping his brow.
I hope you'll be in good voice for the first
day; I'd suggest a little practice in crying false
alarms for a night or two, the length of half a
dozen streets.
We does that regularly, answered Master
Joe Shirks, and some of us goes on amateur
duty as oyster-boys, when shellfish's in season,
and big enough to cry.
With this satisfactory assurance, Mr.
Piddleton
Bloater departed, sounding the natural
trumpet of his nose with all his might as he
went.
Who knows but some of these youth,
asked Mr. Fishblatt, who had been thrown
into
temporary shade by the presence of so
astounding
a genius, wheeling about and looking
Puffer full in the face, may come to serve their
country one of these days in the halls of
legislation
?
Who knows but Nature may be
unconsciously
training in the crier of a `Junk
Bottle,' a future speaker of the house? or in
the street-shouter of the `Empty Puncheon,' a
leading congressional orator? I begin to think
it's the true training for rhetorical talent; and
why should not their ambition be turned in this
direction? My young friends and Mr.
President
,
he continued, elevating his voice, now
that he was fairly roused, and falling back a
step or two, to return to what I was about to
say when interrupted by Mr. Bloater, I would
put it to your patriotism, whether you should
not withdraw for a time from the literary
luxury
of crying the news, and take an active part
in public affairs. Here is a noble opportunity
to serve your country, my young friends; don't
let it pass. Gidney, and Shirks, and Hurley
for such I understand to be the names of some
of youhave now an enviable opportunity of
achieving lasting glory. Think of it; you may
save your country; the conspicuous exhibition
of a placard by your ingenuity, may draw to
the polls, say only a single voter, that voter
casts for Gallipot, and the business is done.
Give up everything to serve your country,
abandon your cherished pursuits, sacrifice your
feelings, and endear yourselves to all the good
and virtuous and public-spirited throughout
this great metropolisthis mighty nation!
For my part, responded Mr. Gidney, who
was the first to rise, I considers it degradin' for
a newsboy to become a bill-sticker; it's
lowerin'
oneself in the scale of society and makin'
a object of hisself for all future times and
generations
.
The woice of fame is agin it.
You are wrong, my young friend,
continued
Mr. Fishblatt, rising again, majestically,
stretching out his right hand and depositing it
on the desk top, while he passed his left behind
his person, and thrust it in one of the nether
pockets of his coat. The vocation of a
bill-sticker
is a highly honorable one, and admits of
a great expansion of natural talent. What
does he do? Why, Mr. Chairman, he makes
dumb walls and dead stones speak; he puts a
tongue in the old thirsty street-pump; and he
causes shutters and bulk-heads to cry aloud and
shout out, at all hours, day and nightnight
and day. Isn't that enough? Where do you
find the bill-sticker? Why, he's at the bottom,
the very prime mover and getter-up of all
public
gatherings, concerts, lectures, balloonings,
ballottings, packet-sailings, fairs, shows, and
spectacles. He's the prompter and bell-puller
of society. Isn't this an honorable calling?
Why, sir, next to the popular preacher and the
popular author, the bill-sticker is certainly the
greatest benefactor of his race!
As soon as Mr. Fishblatt had taken his seat,
after this powerful outbreak, Master Joe Shirks
rose to reply.
We can't do itno how, said Master
Shirks, addressing the chair. We are pledged
contrarywise to the citizens of New York.
What'll they say, I'd like to know, when you,
Mr. Chairman, and I, and Bill Gidney here,
loses our voice, and cry no more papers than if
we was dumb-fish and flounders. Papers must
be cried; and there's the extraswho's to
know anything about that 'ere sudden murder,
where a affectionate husband has chopped his
wife into tender-loins with a new broad-axe?
Or that 'ere dreadful case of explosion, where
the benevolent gentleman has called a
tea-party
over his steamboat-boiler, and blowed 'em
all to atoms, with gitting the fun and the
jollification
up too high? What's to become of
these little things, sir, if we go off duty? It's
easy to see, without a telyscop, or a constable's
peepers, the city 'ud have a shock of the
apoplexy
,
and go into fits regularly till we begun
to cry again. The newsboys, sirand we all
knows it, but we're too modest to say it out of
doorsis the moral lamplighters of this 'ere
city. The ge'mman talks about public affairs;
that's a good 'un, as if we didn't keep the
public
mind straight about all that 'ere! If the
Englishers
go up into the bowels of China, and
drink up all the old hyson, that's been laid
away there, drying and gitting strength for four
hundred year, I guess we knows it! What's
the use of all our private interviews with the
pressmen and clerks about extras, if it don't
come to that? By private advices we learns
that the Florida Indians all waded in a body
into a large swamp, and committed soo-cide by
holding each other's heads under water, on the
nineteenth instant; where do you get all that
from, old fellow?why, from newsboy Tom,
or newsboy Bill, or Joe Shirks, your sarvant.
I'm agin the motion, Mr. Cheerman, and
move we stick to
our
business and lets
everybody
else stick to theirs!
Another young gentleman followed who
couldn't think of the proposition, as he had
been assured, from good sources, that there
were to be four powerful extras issued in the
course of the month, containing a vast deal of
inflammable information in advance of all the
regular packets, steamers, and stages; and, for
his part, he wouldn't lose the chance.
Theatre-money
was low in his pocket, he hadn't seen a
mellow-drama for a week, and it was asking
too much of him.
Another was willing to do all
he
could to
forward
the proposition; but he'd like to know
why the gem'men didn't stick the bills himself;
he seemed to have good legs of his own, and a
very respectable pair of reachers. At this
suggestion
the chairman cried order, and there
was a general shout of disapprobation at the
line of questioning adopted by the young
gentleman.
After a pretty thorough discussion of the
subject
,
when no satisfactory result seemed
possible
,
the chairman himself arose.
Ge'mmen! said he, This'll never do.
These ge'mmen come to us with the very
highest
recommendations, and from the very most
respectable quarters. We mustn't let 'em go
away without a lift. We can help 'em, and
we must. Now there is in this very meeting,
and I'm not afraid to say it, certain young
gentlemen that had better go to be bill-stickers
afore their healths is ruined and entirely
broken
up. There's one of usI don't mention
names, ge'mmenthat bursted his voice on
extra
Junks last week; he was entirely too
wiolent
on the China question. His voice is gone.
Then there's another of usyou recollect him,
ge'mmenwho broke down (there was a sight
for you) in the wery middle of the street, with
a wery exciting number of the `Puncheon'
(containing all them pleasant particulars about
the two dead bodies found in a gen'leman's
iron safe) under his arm, tryin' to do justice to
it. How many wictims of weto messages there
is in this room I wouldn't like to say; but I do
know that a weto message from the presidin'
chief of these United States and a influenza, is
equally fatal to the woice of the newsboy.
Then there's you, Ikey Larkins, continued the
chairman, addressing a lumbering, overgrown
fellow that stood shouldering a post in the
corner
;
haven't I told you more nor twenty
times that you'r beyond the newsboy age. It's
immoral of such a weteran as you to be cryin'
papers about New York streets; don't you see
that you're too big a build, that your'e lame of
one leg and short of an eye; and yet you will
keep hanging about the offices, and cutting in
as if you was born to the business. Ge'mmen,
let's give Mr. Fishblatt six to begin with (Ikey
Larkins for one), and throw 'em in one a day
as fast as they break down. It's carried!
And in this summary way the mission of
Puffer Hopkins and Mr. Fishblatt was
accomplished
,
and amid an uproar of cries, among
which they heard above all others Three
cheers for the cheer! and Ikey Larkins is a
extra follish!they left.
CHAPTER XVIII.
STRANGE MATTER; PERHAPS NOT WITHOUT
METHOD.
At
early morningthe very hour, or nearly
so, when Puffer Hopkins was holding an
interview
with the two womenan aged figure,
wild and distracted, wandered about the fields
beyond the city. His steps were uncertain
and his whole look and action full of confusion
and doubt; he seemed to be seeking something
that was not to be found, and wherever he cast
his eyes, wondered that it was not there.
Where he had passed the night, God only
knows; but now that it was morning, he came
abroad, drenched, disordered in dress, and
wavered and groped about in the clear sunshine
as if it had been mist. Bewildered and with
troubled steps, he crossed the low hollows and
meadows; straggled more perplexed than ever
through a crowded orchard; and at length
stood on an ancient highway, the old Post
Road. The moment his steps touched the
road they seemed on a familiar track; his look
brightened, and with a gleaming countenance
he glanced about, till his eye fell on an old
faded country house. What joyful and happy
gleams broke through the old man's features
as he looked upon that old faded house! His
eyes sparkled, his hands trembled for joy, and
he raised them up and stretched them forth as
if he could grasp that building, as a familiar
friend, by an outstretched hand. Then the
brightness passed away from his look, he was
deeply moved, and in his agitation could
scarcely drag himself to the spot where his
eyes were fixed. With trembling hand he
lifted
the latchet of the gate; and as he walked
up the path he shook like one in a spasm.
Many times he walked round and round the
house before he entered. Then he went to the
rear, raised a door that led to a ground cellar,
and peered for a long space down into the
gloom of the earth before he would descend.
Through heaps of lumber, old decaying casks,
and other ancient fragments, he picked his
way; holding his breath and spreading out his
arms before him. He soon found stairs that led
into the upper chambers, and climbing these,
he was in an apartment all dust and darkness,
still as death, barren and silent as the grave
itself
.
He paused and listened, as if he
expected
the approach of some well-known tread;
the greeting, perhaps, of a familiar voice. No
voice answeredhow could it at that lapse of
time, unless it had lingered in the corners and
recesses of the chamber, years after its
owner
was laid in the earth?
Shall I let the morning light in upon all
these? said the old man, who called up in his
mind a vivid image of all that this chamber
held; not yet; I think I could not bear it
yet! I know that broad day is without, he felt
it more because of the darkness, but I dare
not let it in this chamber yet.
With this he moved about the apartment,
touching everything with his handgently and
kindly as a bliad man, features and faces he
would knowuntil he had gone through every
article about the room, save one, and that was
a chaira simple, old-fashioned armchair, that
stood by the hearth. He many times
approached
this as if he would know it as he had known
whatever else was there; but his heart gave
out and he fell back, leaning, in the darkness,
against whatever chanced to be nearest.
Wrought upon by his own fancy and these
acts of association, finding these many
endeavors
to no purpose, he rushed to a window, burst
its hasp, and casting its shutters wide back,
turned about and straining his gaze upon the
empty chair by the hearth, he fell down like
one in a fit.
Recovering, when the mid-day began to pour
its warm beams into the chamber, he looked
about the apartment, dwelling for a long time
on each object; but when his eye fell on a door
which led into a small chamber in one corner
of the room, a change came over his
countenance
,
and he turned aside as if he dared not
look that way again. Presently, however, and
seemingly moved thereto by some sudden
impulse
,
he proceeded to the door, which was
closed, drew it open, and clutching the door-post
to hold him up, he leaned forward and looked
within. There was nothing there but a narrow
truckle-bed with a single tattered blanket upon
it, and the cords, such as were visible,
mouldering
and dragging upon the floor; and yet what
a shuddering horror crossed the old man's face
as he gazed upon it, how he trembled and bore
heavily against the door-post, as if he had been
smitten blind and helpless by the shock of a
sudden blow.
He could neither enter nor retire, but stood
there like one rooted to the earth. His mind was
dwelling on what had passed there twenty years
before; a little hideous old man, older than
himself, lay, shivering under that blankethe
saw every line of his countenanceresting on
his elbow, straining his ear to catch what
passed
in the neighboring chamber, and chuckling
like a fiend, as he listened.
Consciousness and some power of motion
by degrees came back; he went away and sat
down for a time, lost in a deep revery; then
he rose, and going forward cautiously, as if
under the horrible belief that that other old
man was lying in wait withinhe closed the
door, turned the key in the lock which groaned
aloud, and caused him to start; placed a chair
with its back against the door, dropped into the
seat and fixed his eyes, as if he would never
remove them thence, upon the old armchair
standing by the hearth. Sometimes he wept
as he looked there; then smiled, as if he would
cheer some one that filled its seat; and then a
keen anguish, an imploring lockfull of
sharpest
desolationshot into every feature, and
blinded his eyes with grief.
In this way he sat there for an hour or more,
suffering with pangs that spake aloud in every
line of his face, every muscle of his tortured
old bodybut immovable. He strained his
eyes forwardShe is goingGod help us all
she is gone! he cried, and broke from the
chamber. He speeded swiftly into the hall;
unfastened the doorthe old bar crumbled as
he pulled it downand was in the open air.
Much as he was moved, his feet yet lingered
about the place; and while he wavered in his
mind whether to stay or flystanding and
looking
by turns back upon the house and out upon
the road that stretched away into the country
his attention was fixed by a young figure that
approached. It was a fair creature that he
saw, not yet grown to the full age of care;
but, nevertheless, pale, travel-stained, and
partly
borne down by a burden (it was a plain
willow basket) which she carried, and which
she held close to her side.
She was hurrying by when the old man
accosted
her.
Stop me not, for Heaven's sake, stop me
not! she cried, as Hobbleshank stood in her
way, Life and death are in my steps. Death
behind and death before me, and life onlya
little lingering lifein such speed as I may
make. I must be gone at once!
The old man stood, for a time, gazing at the
pale young creature, and wondering what her
meaning might be. Recovering from his
surprise
,
he presently laid his hand in hers (which
was cold as marble), and said:
Come in with me, you are sick and weary
that you can not denywith long travel.
You need rest, and may find a little here. I
once had a good right to say to all comers,
`Welcome here!'that was many, many long
dreary years agoit was then a cheerful,
merry
house; and now, we who are both stricken
in sorrow, have a privilege anywhere where
darkness is, and dust, and lonely gloom. Come
in and rest.
As he spake, he drew her gently toward the
house. She hesitated at first, and when she
cast her eyes up at the old building, shuddered,
and started back as if it had been a prison; but
when she turned and saw tears streaming in
the old man's eyeshe had watched her with
a sad constancyshe smiled sorrowfully, and
at once entered in.
Why did
she
pauses as she paced that broad
old hall? What were those crumbling old
walls, and those fading figures, painted to the
ceiling, saying to her? She looked about like
one restored to a world she had known before,
and could not tell where nor when.
Wondering
more and more, and on the watch at every
step, like one that looks for a surprise, she was
led by Hobbleshank, whose steps seemed moved
that way by a force he could not control, into
the chamber where he had suffered so much.
He would have closed the door behind them,
to shut off the cold airs that dwelt about the
hall.
In God's name! cried his young
companion
,
P
do not shut this chamber up so tight, you
will stifle me. I had rather suffer all the
unkindness
of winter than see anything more of
closed doors and darkened windows. I have
seen enough already! She looked uneasily
about as she spake, sighed as in spite of
herself
,
and was silent.
You have had heavy troubles, for one so
young, said the old man, I know you have,
for your eyes seem to be looking not at present
objects, but on what is behind and far away!
Don't speak of them now, she answered,
drawing her breath short and fast; but go
out and look back upon the road, whether any
travellers are coming this way in great haste.
There will be a dark, deadly carriage close
behind
them.
Hobbleshank begged her to be seated, and
went forth as she requested. He soon came back
and answered that there were none to be seen.
I strained my gaze, said the old man,
the whole length of the road. Be comforted,
there is no one in pursuit.
In pursuit! she answered, lifting her eyes
upon him with a broad look of surprise and
wonder, then you know that I have fled; do
you know from whom?
How could I fail to know? answered
Hobbleshank
,
whose heart softened toward the
gentle
questioner; you have fled from tyrants.
I see no stripes upon your person; you do not
wear a prison-grab; and yet I will swear that
you are flying from the most cursed, cruel,
relentless
despotism, that could be laid on a
young spirit like yours. Some one that may
have spared your fair flesh, has been cutting
your young heart to the quickhas been
breaking
your beautiful hopes, one by one; and you
feel the sunshine and the free air to day, for
the first time, perhaps, in many a long year.
Give an old man credit for some spirit of
sorrowful
judgment, and say I am right.
Could the earnest truth with which
Hobbleshank
spake, out of the very bosom of a great
inner world of sorrow in himself, fail to touch
the other pale sufferer?
I have had some troubles, she answered,
feigning to smile. But what of that? I am
only grown old a little before my time. I will
try to forget what is past; would God grant
me strength to bear up against what is to
come! As she uttered this, a deadly paleness
blanched her cheeks, and her eyes brightened
into a vague splendor, that was almost fearful
to look upon.
The old man sat fixed in his seat, gazing
upon
her; while there came floating into his
mind, and assuming form and color, as he
watched her haggard look, her features white
as the tombstone marble, and her thin,
trembling
form, the memory of one just so troubled,
shrunken, and sorrowful, that faded away from
that old armchair a lifetime ago.
Each lost in their own wandering and
troubled
thoughts, they sat there dumb and silent as
two images in a cold vault.
Do you dwell here? she said at length;
but seeing the dusty walls, from which the
hangings tumbled piecemeal, and how dull
cobwebs
had engrossed the corners of the room,
she added, but I know you can not.
And yet I do, answered Hobbleshank, in
the spirit. My mind has lived in these
chambers
for many years; but this poor old body
drags itself along in yonder city. This house
is mine, and yet not mine; rather it belongs to
a child of mine, whether in his grave or no, I
can not tell.
Then he may be happy! she said. I have
looked down into many graves, and used to
think them dreary. But now I know there are
graves on the earth gloomier than any dug in
the soil. Why do I stay here, talking so, when
I should be abroad on my journey? I would
not have tarriedthough I am glad for your
sake and my own, now, that I didhad I not
wished, most fervently wished, to cross the
threshold of the city with some strength and
spirit to meet my task. I must go.
She rose, possessed herself of the willow
basket
,
which she had laid on the ground at her
side, and took the old man by the hand.
I am sorry that you go, he said, looking
kindly upon the gentle creature. You know
not what guests and fancies you leave me to.
Can I go with you to the great city in no
friendly
service?
In none whatever, I fear, she answered.
My task is a simple one, and asks only a
kindly spirit to fill it well. I go to tend at the
bedside of a dear friend who is sick. I must
hasten, or he may have bid the world goodby
already. I think, she added, laying her pale
white hand upon the basket, I have some
comfort here for him.
An old man's good wishes shall go with
you every step! Cheer up, and speed, then,
if such be your errand: the city darkens apace,
and I shall be alone again, as I have been, and
shall be, how long Heaven knows.
He led her through the old broad hall; she
looked at the dim old figures with the same
strange interest as before; and in a moment
they stood upon the door-step.
Remember, said Hobbleshank, though
we have met but once, we are old friends.
She pressed his hand closely in her own, and
proceeded on her way. Once forth upon the
road again, she strained her eyes with painful
earnestness toward the city, as if she could so
call up, out of all the great and turbid mass,
the little bedside she wished to see; pausing
only once or twice to look back at the old man,
who at last fell within and closed the door.
CHAPTER XIX.
THE PALE TRAVELLER ENTERS THE CITY.
She
had not walked far, when a sudden turn
brought her where the road plunged down with
a swift declivity at her feet. She stopped and
trembled. Underneath her troubled eye lay the
mighty metropolis, with its thousand chimneys,
its blackened roofs, its solemn church-turrets
and glittering vanesspreading out wherever
she gazed, and filling her mind with an
indescribable
awe.
How dark, how cold and chill, seemed that
multitude of houses to her! They suggested
to her no thoughts of neighborhood and
fellowship
by their closeness, but rather one of dumb
creatures huddled together by sheer necessity,
to shut off the shivering airs that beset them
from the rivers on either side. When she
looked for broad and cheerful ways, and found
only narrow streets that yawned like chasms
and abysses along the house-fronts; when her
eyes sought waving trees to gladden the air,
in vain, her heart shrunk within her: it seemed
to her a wilderness of dungeons, and nothing
more. A dark, dismal mist, formed of dust,
smoke, the reek of squalid streets, the breath
of thousands and hundred thousands of human
beingscrept, like a black surge, along the
housetops.
The hoarse murmur deepened as night drew
on; the moaning of one vexed with pain and
confinement, of prisoners pining to be free. If
the whole broad shadow of the city, cold and
vast, had fallen on her spirit, it could not have
chilled her more; but when the thought came
to her again of the sacred errand on which she
was bound, her heart was renewed, her eye
brightened, and, clasping her burden anew, she
hurried on. And now the great city which she
had wondered at, in its entirety and vastness,
met her, part by part, and bewildered her with
its countless details. There were country
wagons
hurrying out; sulkeys, stanhopes,
barouches
,
flying past as if desolation followed fast
behind
.
Then great carts and trucks, loaded to
the peak with heavy merchandise. All these
she regarded with a wandering eye; but when
she caught sight of dark foundation-stones,
still clinging to the earth, where an old
penitentiary
had been lately razed to the ground
she felt the uses it had served.
Whenever she passed houses with closed
shutters, she shuddered and quickened her
pace; to some there were barred windows
these she regarded with a sidelong glance of
curiosity, as if she expected to see pale faces
peering out between the irons. Once she
passed an old stone building, with every
casement
from cellar to garret closely ironed; it
was only an old sugar-house, and she speeded
past it as if it had been a jail.
Full of vague fears, startled at every object
that crossed her, suggestive in any the remotest
degree of that she dreaded, and had good
cause to dread the mostshe hastened on. A
green wagon, close and dark, passed herthe
prison carriage, plying between the city prison
and the islandand she felt it like a cloud as
it hurried by. The very streets, murky as they
were, seemed to close upon her in the distance,
but opened again constantly as she advanced;
new houses, new sights and objects, springing,
as from a perpetual womb, out of the cloudy
haze that lowered in her way. As far as her
eye could pierce, the roads were dark with
vehicles of one sort and another, crossing and
recrossing, rushing tumultuously in every
direction
;
some driven by boys, some by men;
some sitting under shelter; others, the cartmen
standing up in their professional frocks, with a
firm hold upon the reins, darting rapidly from
one side of the street to the other. Above the
whole throng and procession, a great coach or
stage at times towered up, over-topping the
street, and swarming to its very summit with
passengers.
All along the way, people poured into the
streets in uninterrupted succession, out of
damp, dull rooms; out of narrow alleys; from
work-shops; from cellars; from churches; and
the way was perpetually choked and glutted
with the throng. What multitudes went past
pent up in carriagesa pleasure to them, a
hideous bondage it seemed to her!
She saw no one, not one, with gyves and
irons on their limbs; and yet, how care-worn,
and bowed, and convict-like they all looked to
her!
She passed along, looking anxiously at dark
doorways, at iron gates and steep areas, and
heavy churches oppressing the earth with their
massive granite or marble; smithies, where
men were busy forging vast chains and cables;
shops, where great locks and bolts leaned in
the windows. A long way after all these, she
came upon a grim, ill-dressed, smoke-stained
man, who bore in his hand a bunch of keys,
which he grasped close and clashed together as
he walked; and she shrunk from him as if he
had been the deadliest and fastest of all the
jailer race. Gazing fearfully about in this
way, she espied far off, through a side street,
dimly seen moving through the dusk that grew
every minute deeper, a hearse and funeral
trainat that distance it seemed scarcely more
than a shadow, and a cold shudder crept
through her frame. What if it were her friend,
her dear friend, whose burial she thus
regarded
?
Her first impulse was to hasten after it;
but ere she had taken many steps in this
resolution
,
it had glided away, and she returned to
the path she had been pursuing. Night now
came swiftly on; the black shadows fell in
broad masses in the streets; the confusion, the
hurry, the press of life in every direction
deepened.
She moved along as speedily as she could,
consulting from time to time, at a window
lamp, a chart she had borne in her hand all
along. At intervals, as if by chance and no
design, a public light broke out, sometimes in
one quarter, sometimes in another, and
glimmered
with a feeble ray. This only made the
gloom deeper and drearier than before; and
she kept, while she could, in the streets where
the shop-windows blazed upon the pavement.
It was not easy for her, with all her care,
her painful scrutiny of the paper she carried,
and study of the signboards at the corners, to
shape her course aright. There was a
street-fight
once; then a crowd gathered at the door
of a show; then a poor woman who was doling
forth, from the steps of a gentleman's domicil,
a piteous tale of poverty and suffering. Once
there was a hideous cry, a light rose high in
the air, and she looked about and saw, more
plainly than ever, how darkness had stretched
his mighty arms abroad and held the city in
his grasp.
Not a whit fairer or freer did the houses
show to her now at night, than when she first
beheld them, and ever since; they all seemed
like graves, or tombs, or prison-fastnesses.
Striking through thoroughfares that diverged
from the main path she had been travelling,
she was gradually approaching the point she
sought. She passed a thoroughfare, little
frequented
,
where the unfed lamps winked and
blinked at each other across the street, like so
many decayed ghosts. Then another, where
all the lights had gone out. Then others;
until
at length, by what she saw around, she felt
that the object of her wish was near at hand.
There was a square, so her chart informed
her; here it wasa discolored yellow house;
here tooonly it seemed more golden and
precious than the description allowed; and
thereyes, there, where her eyes were fixed, as
on a star, shone a little light, just at the height
she might have looked for. The house, the
home, the shelter of her sick friend was found.
The door stood open to receive and welcome
her. She looked around; the tall houses
that guarded the square, growing blacker every
minute, seemed frowning on her and gathering
about her, closer and closer, as if they would
shut her in: she glanced timidly up to them, as
if they had been in truth cruel living creatures,
and, trembling with fear and joy, fled into the
house for shelter, like one pursued.
CHAPTER XX.
FOB AND HIS VISITER FROM THE COUNTRY.
The
stairs were steep and narrow; and as she
clambered up, a thousand visions thronged
about her and crowded in her way. At one
time she was oppressed with the gloomy thought
that
he
might be dead and gone; not to be
found any more in that house, or any other of
mortal habitation. Then all the great city, in
the many dreadful and oppressive shapes it had
taken in her mind, whirled past, filling the air
with darkness, and confusion, and boundless
tumult. It was a gloomy way for a poor
lonely
woman to travelthat ill-arranged stairway
lighted only by the chance flickering of cheap
candles, where the doors stood ajar; or by
whatever of the public light strayed in through
the entry windows. Every step brought her
nearer to the chamber she sought; and although
there were many others under that same roof,
children, and women, and aged men, dwelling
in many apartments (for they were all poor, and
poverty straitens itself to a narrow fold), she
seemed to know that chamber only, among
them all.
At length she stood at the door; she knew
it, even in the dark, as her hand passed over
it; she paused a moment, to gather strength
and spirit. While she lingered in a deep
conflict
of many emotions, she thought she heard
the murmur of gentle music within; it was
fancy, only, associating with the place an
incident
that raised it out of its low estate. She
entered; there was the room, lighted by a
single
candle, gleaming from the corner where it
stood, as cramped and narrow as ever; the
asparagus
in bottles; the chain of birds' eggs
against the wall; the pot of plants brought in
and stationed on the shelf; the blackbird in
his cage, removed from his old lookout at the
window and hung upon a beam inside; and
underneath these, where his waking eye could
command them all, lay the little tailor, poor, wan,
wasted with sickness, and slumbering from
very want of strength. She looked upon him,
scarcely believing it was he; she looked upon
the objects which carried her mind far away,
and she knew it was, indeed, no other. She
sank into a chair by the wall, and looked
around. How strong was the sympathy of her
fancy with the fancy of the sick man! While
she gazed upon them, the room broadened into
wide meadows; the asparagus-springs shot up
into fair, green trees; the birds' eggs, in the
instant, swarmed with many beautiful and
melodious
lives; and the single blackbird
darkened
the air as if he had been a whole flock in
himself. There was more freedom to her in
that little room, than in all the broad streets
she had wandered through.
Then she watched the sick man himself; so
thin, so pale, he seemed to have come to her a
long way out of the past, divested of all the
clogs and shackles that had held him from her
so long. He smiled; by that she knew him
again. It was meant, she was sure, for herself;
and her heart lightened at the thought.
Dwelling
upon it, remembering how often such a
look had brightened that pale face in old days,
her thoughts were led by degrees to the basket
she had laid down at her side. Unclasping it
with trembling hands, she brought from its
bosom
a slip of the wild-rose which she carried
gently and laid on the pillow by his brow, with
the hope that it might suggest to his dreams
scenes dear to him as life. She was right;
mingling with his own willing thoughts, what
his sense reported to him, there sprang up
before
him a fantasy of other days, so sweet, so
life-like, so lively, that he smiled on it as if it
had been reality. His lips moved, and
murmured
softly, as to a listening ear. She glided
quickly forward, and bent down to catch what
he uttered. She would have given the world
had his wordsshe thought she knew what
they would saybeen audible.
Presently the poor tailor wakened from his
charmed slumber, sat up in his couch, and
looked about. His eyes, which wandered as in
search of something not present, no sooner fell
on the pale visiter than they were fixed at
once. So unreal they seemed to each other,
and yet shadows of what both knew well, they
sat gazing each into the other's eyes, without
motion or utterance.
Martha, at last said Fob, whispering the
name, in doubt whether he would be answered,
or whether the vision would be dispelled,
Martha
Upland.
She started up and rushed to his bedside.
I thank God for this! she cried, casting
herself upon his neck; I had not hoped to see
you alive!
You should scarcely think of the living,
answered Fob, with an inexpressible anguish
in his look; you who have been dead and
buried three long years.
Little better than that, she observed, or
not so good. A close, silent bondage in one's
father's
house, with eyes, colder than the
graveworms
,
ever fixed on you; all the motions of
nature
going on about you, so that you can hear the
murmur and not share it; on the same earth
with friends you love, and yet sundered, in an
everlasting parting from them, this is death.
There can be no other, and no worse.
I could not, dear Marthait was madness
for me to dream that you would come, or could,
when I sent for you. I was going to the grave
you have prayed for so often; and tarried only
to shake hands and part.
It was only by long watching, and at last,
by stealth, that your message came to my hand.
Yesterday at daybreak, the cruel guards who
have watched me so long, grew, for once,
drowsy
with sleep; I found access to an upper
chamber
;
clambered to the roof; down upon the
old outhouse (you remember it well), and at
length leaped to the ground. In an hour, an
hour sacred to you, I was on my journey, and
now, foot-weary, as you may guess, but glad of
heart, I am here.
Three yearswhat yearssince the awful
interdict that divided us was pronounced. It
was folly that I, a poor, outcast, landless tailor,
should lift my heart to you; but, with God's
blessing, what I then gave has prospered (I
know it has) in your silent prison, as well as it
would with all the summer's sun and the
autumn's
bounty shed upon it. Three years;
and now I look upon what my eyes have
wandered
through the whole firmament in vain to
behold. I have toiled, God knows, for this
sight, and have failed till now.
I saw you once, dear Fob, she answered,
returning his look of truthful fondness, once
only, and that was a year ago, yesterday, at
dusk, gliding by the garden wall; they seized
you and dragged you away before my sight, and
ever after,
that
window was closed. The
morning
light, that came that way (they said) was
too strong for my fading eyes.
For many long days, said Fob, I was the
ghost of that dwelling; I haunted all the ways
that led to itsometimes in the orchard,
sometimes
in the meadow, sometimes, as you saw,
under the very caves of the house itself. But
to what purpose? I had been driven, you know,
by the iron hand that no man can resist, the
relentless law, from fields that were mine; and
men followed in its scent, and yelled on my
steps like so many hounds. I was buffeted,
reproached
,
driven off like a dog, till I came to
curse the very house that held your enemies
and mine. I have failed not, as you learned
by what I wrote, to visit our old haunts, and
to dream you back again to the life we once
led in woods and meadows, and by the
margins
of smiling streams. How has the time
gone with you? he asked, in a choking voice,
for he knew the answer too well. You have
had no free air for three weary years.
No breath whatever, she said, and a
deeper
paleness struck through her features as she
spoke, closely housed, stealthily watched all
that time; while the story has gone abroad
that I was deadly sick, of a sickness so frail and
delicate, that nearest friends could not see me
without endangering life. A physiciana false,
corrupt villain, as God ever madecame at
studious intervals as if to my bedside, and went
forth with a piteous sigh, shaking his head
over the sad malady that could not be cured.
So they thought. They deemed that disease of
horrid bondage would never be conquered;
but, thanks to Heaven, thanks, never too many
nor too devout, I am a free child of the air and
the open light once more!
Even while she spake, swift, copious tears,
gushed into her eyes; she fell upon her knees,
and, bowing her head upon the couch of her
sick friend, felt that her heart was bursting
with thoughts of past sufferance and present
joy! Could Fob behold this, and fail to be
moved? He looked upon her a moment; a
pang writhed his countenance, and clasping
one of her pale hands in his, he wept like a
child. The wild slip with which she had soothed
his sleep, lay where all their tears fell upon it;
and if it had budded that moment, and shot forth
there, in fair green leaves and brighter flowers
than bush or tree ever bore, would it have
been less than a true testimony to the beautiful
and gentle spirit of the hour?
When they looked up again, the sorrow had
passed from their brows, and they smiled on
each other, with something like the gladness of
a happier time.
I have brought down all of the old
homestead
that I could, said Martha, who had her
willow basket at the bedside; and it is here.
She unclasped it; and as Fob glanced down
into its fragrant womb, his eyes shone with a
new light. He saw whole tracts and acres
there.
15
These, you know, continued Martha,
producing
a handful of green cresses, I plucked
them from the Mower's nook, in the wood, so
calm and shady in the summer time. You
remember
it?
I think I should, answered Fob, who could
not fail to detect a ruddy tinge that crossed the
questioner's countenance. Had that nook a
memory of its own, and could echo what it has
head, how many gentle stories it could tell:
that
you
know as well as I.
Here is clover, too, said Martha, you
know that?
To be sure I do, answered Fob, quickly,
The sweet, red-blossomed clover, that grows
by the great rock in the laneyou found it
there, I know. Is the shadow of the old rock
as broad and cheerful as ever?
You forget, my dear friend, she replied,
I have not seen its summer shadow for three
long years. Boards and casements, thin and
frail, have held me in faster than if I had been
walled round with rocks as massy and cold as
that.
What a fool I am! said Fob, I knew
that wellbut herewhat is this? taking
up a green plant that she had produced, and
looking on his pale visiter in wonder, you
have not, truly, trusted yourself in the dark old
hollow, always so full of midnight and gloomy
thoughts to pluck this for me?
From no other place has it come! answered
Martha. It was the first I sought after my
escape. Dark, dreary, cheerless as you think
itthough we have had many a pleasant
ramble
in its waysit glared as with sunshine to my
long darkened eye. The dismal pines that
dwell on its sides, seemed to laugh in my ear,
as the wind whispered with them; the dark
bats and ill-omened owls glanced about as
glorious
as eagles!
Our gloomy old friend, the Hollowyou
think so hardly ofsee what he has yielded,
said Martha, after a moment's pause, lifting
in her hand a bunch of sparkling red berries,
and waving them before the little tailor till
they danced again, and shone brighter than his
own pleased eyes.
Then there were buttercups, gathered from
the heart of a meadow, where they had often
lingered together, gathering them before; green
rushes, from the brook; feathers of the
bluebird
,
that had moulted where they were found.
On each they dwelt, babbling over old
memories
and associations like children; and finding
a solace and joy in those simple treasures,
that the costliest banquet might have failed to
yield.
All the green and fanciful treasures she had
brought, lay spread about him, and his eye
gleamed with a tearful joy as it passed from
one to the other.
I have something more here, said
Martha
,
dipping again into the basket, something
to please you for the sake of others and not
yourself.
I shall shed no tears, even if it be so, said
Fob, smiling. Let us see.
She brought forth, from the very bottom of
the basket, an old, tattered, patched-up
parchment
,
and held it up exultingly before his eyes.
He no sooner caught sight of it and learned
what it was, than he clapped his hands and
stretched them forth to pluck it gently from
her. It was the deed, the very deed, rent in
pieces so long agowhich he thought lost for
ever, rescued to the light by bright eyes that
had peered for it amid dust and tumbling
fragments
,
because she knew it would pleasure
him. Here was joyjoy for Puffer Hopkins;
joy for Hobbleshank; and as he held it close
to his eye, it seemed, as every good act and
record should, to have a fragrance of all the
sweet and fair things among which it had
lurked in the basket of the fair fugitive. So
they sat there many hours, in which Fob
gathered
new strength and spirit, talking over
the recovery, past times, scenes, occasions
too sacred for a record. If unseen angels, as
some have fondly deemed, watch in our
chambers
,
linger at our bedsides, and bless us in act
of doing well, how must they have swarmed in
that little chamber, and through the holiest
hours of night, held joyful watch over two
spirits
so like themselves!
CHAPTER XXI.
ISHMAEL SMALL MAKES A DISCOVERY.
Angel-guarded
as a generous faith would
fain persuade us, were the little tailor and his
country friend, withinan eye, by no means so
kindly or auspicious in its gaze, watched all
their doings from without. Perched in the
very gutter of the Fork, clinging to the
casement
of the dormer window, as he best could,
and holding his head obliquelysat or couched
Ishmael Small. His turned-up nose against
the window as close as he could press it, he
kept a hungry look fastened on every glance,
or gesture, or motion, that passed within. He
could not catch their voices where he sat, but
seemed to know all that passed as if he had
heard it slowly uttered, word by word. When
the deed was produced, could they have caught
sight of that sharp gray eye, piercing through
the very centre of the bull's-eye with which
the cheap casement was glazed, they would
have both shrunk back and said, What ugly
spirit is thatthat glares like a sunglass upon
us?
Up to that moment, Ishmael had looked
calmly
on; but when he saw the old shivering
parchment brought forth, and clutched so
greedily
by the poor tailor, he gnashed his teeth, and,
turning about, with a glance downward at a
stout man in jolly health, who passed in the
street below with a market-basket on his arm,
as if it would afford him a most exquisite
pleasure
to topple himself down upon him, and crush
all that manly vigor out of himhe crept up
the roof, and espying a narrow rentscarcely
larger than his handwhere a single ray came
through from the chamber, laid his ear close
down, and, with his chalky visage turned to
the sky, he held his breath, and listened to
what passed. He was right. All the hours
he had spent in tracking Hobbleshank from
place to place; all the vague rumors that had
crept into his mind, as, from time to time, his
acquaintance with Puffer Hopkins grew; all
his long vigils about the Fork (whose evil
genius
,
as night and day, but mostly by night, he
hovered round it, he seemed)all confirmed
and made true. When this conviction shot
through the brain of the deformed little
eavesdropper
,
his knees shook, his eyes dimmed for
a moment, his grasp relaxed, and, had he not
summoned at once with desperate force his
ebbing strength, he would have rolled into the
street. Recovering himself, he paused not a
minute to listenhe knew enough and more
than enough alreadyclambered the roof again
plunged into the open scuttle by which he
had at first emergedand divedso swift was
his descent of the narrow stairs, it seemed, from
top to bottom, a single actinto the open air.
Buttoning his coat close togetherfixing his
cap firmly on his head, and thrusting in his
straggling pocket-handkerchief behindso that
not a single fluttering rag might check his
course, he started off. Like lightning he sped
along, bounding over obstacles; winding his
way through crowds that crossed him; and
gliding between vehicles that seemed rushing
together from opposite directionsin a fashion
that was perfectly miraculous.
It was only a few minutes, and he stood at
the broker's door. He stopped an instant to
recover his breath, listening if he were astir;
then, thrusting his arm in at a concealed
opening
in the wall, he drew back the bolt and
stepped in. Closing the door behind him, and
cautiously crossing the room, he knocked at
the broker's closet.
Hold back, cried the old man, in a
suppressed
voice, like one engaged in a desperate
struggle, what are you choking me for? Take
it back, take it all back; but let me go. There,
curse it, thereshe glides by again. It was
your own fault.
Ishmael knocked again.
Let me go, or I'll beat you, shouted the
old broker, who seemed to be vexed and
goadon
by the sound, mingled, as it doubtless was,
with the subjects of his dream. What did
you cross me for? She is mine, I tell you, as
much as yours, Hobbleshank! Marry her, and
I'll grind you to powder; ha! ha! and he
laughed, with a broad chuckle, in his dream.
That fixes you. Buy bread if you can; a
cord or two of wood; I'm sorry the poor lady's
so sickly. Take the boy away; smother him,
choke him, drown him! ha! ha!
Wake up, wake up! whispered Ishmael,
whose spirits, to tell the truth, were not a little
subdued by what the restless slumbers of the
old broker seemed to point at. I have news,
great news for you!
I know you have, continued Fyler, who
seemed bent on pursuing his dreaming thoughts
at all hazards. That was well done, Jack
Leycraftexcellent! the little fellow fainted
away, did he?so far that he wont come back
again, I guess.
And Mr. Fyler Close, wonder at it as the
world may, such was the flow of his spirits,
went off, chanting Old Hundred; to be sure, in
a somewhat dissonant and imperfectly
developed
vocalization. This divertisment had the
effect of restoring him to the familiar use of
his organs, and availing himself of his ears,
quite readily, he heard a quadruple rap, which
Ishmael was now practising on the door; and
asked who was there. Ishmael made himself
known, and the old man, sliding rapidly into
his garments, unbarred his closet door, and
stepped forth.
Well, what word, Ishmael? he asked, as
soon as he was disinterred.
Come this way, said Mr. Small, taking
the broker by the arm, and leading him toward
the window. As they stood where the light
fell from a neighboring chamber, in which
watch was kept with one disordered in his
reason
,
and whose cries could be heard where they
stood, and Ishmael saw how haggard and
withered
was the broker's look, he doubted
whether
to utter his news now that he was there.
He paused awhile and looked at Fyler.
You heard nothing, he said, eying Ishma
el in turn. Did I disturb you? I was
running
over a long sum in compound interest. I
got the figures wrong, and that put me in a
passion. You saw that?
Ishmael professed to have seen nothing.
What's your news? asked Fyler.
Nothing
terrible, I hope. Is it a thunderclap, or a
burst of music?speak quick!
Before he answered, Mr. Small went to the
door, thrust forth his head into the hall, and,
opening wide both his ears, listened to catch
any sound that might be stirring. The whole
house was dead and still, and he returned.
A cross between the two, answered
Ishmael
,
subduing his voice, they have found
the deed.
What deedHobbleshank's? asked the
old man, gasping for breath, and drawing
Ishmael
close up to him by the collar, so that their
faces almost touched.
The very same, sir, answered Ishmael,
yaller with age, and patched up like a old
bed-quilt.
If the blackest thundercloud hovering in the
sky had settled down that moment, and become
part and parcel of the features of Fyler Close,
they could not have scowled more darkly than
they did. He let fall his hand from its hold
on Ishmael Small; and turning away, he paced
the chamber; at every turn, as he came near
the light, glaring like a wild beast on Ishmael,
and showing his teeth firmly set together, in
the extremity of his passion.
After travelling the apartment in this wild way
for twenty times or more, he suddenly stepped
aside, and leaping into his closet, bolted it
within
.
Ishmael waited till the clock struck
midnight
,
sitting on a broken chair, listening to
the disordered sick man's cry from above; but
not a breath or sound denoted that any other
living creature was in that chamber but
himself
.
The closet might have been the broker's
tomb, for all he heard. At the end of that time
the closet-door was again opened; Fyler Close
came forth as if nothing unusual had passed,
and, bringing a chair, took his seat, calmly and
pleasantly, directly opposite Mr. Small.
Where is John Leycraft, of late, Ishmael?
asked Mr. Close, as though his mind was
entirely
disengaged, and free to any general
subject
that might come up. He doesn't come
here now-a-days. Have you kept track of
him?
I have, answered Ishmael. Last week
he was busy in a cardin' mill; week afore last
he was journeyman to a stun-mason; this week
he's a rope-walker; where he'll be next week,
and the week after, would puzzle a jury o'
Solomons
to guess. His mind's distempered,
judging by what he says to me when I sees
him, about that old business of the farm-house.
He can't rest a day anywheres, but flies about
like a signed pigeon over a conflagration, or a
dove what's got sore feet.
Will he blab, Ishmael? answered Mr.
Close, in a perfectly calm and dispassionate
tone. He's got a first-rate memory, and
might turn it to account with the magistrates.
Don't you think so, eh?
By no manner o' means, rejoined Mr. Small.
It's his own mind that unrests him and keeps
him wake o' nights. He wants to find the boy,
and clear his conscience with the yolk of the
egg; that's all.
If he's got an eye that can look through
the crust of the earth, six feet or more, perhaps
he'll find him, perhaps he won't, said the
broker
,
smiling on his companion, and twisting his
shrubby whiskers in his fingers. So you've
seen the deed? he added, as if that had just
occurred to him. You couldn't borrow it for
me to look at for a few minutes, eh? Was it
in good preservation, in a fine state of health?
Capital, answered Ishmael, considerin'
it hadn't a sound square inch on its body, and
was a little bilious in the face: if there had
been a hole two inches bigger in the roof, I'd
have brought it round for a interview.
Whereupon
,
Mr. Small indulged in a gentle laugh;
but not so as to disturb the neighborhood.
Where, in the name of Heaven, have you
been to-night? continued Mr. Close,
running
about citizens' roofs, like a cat?
To be sure I have, answered Mr. Small;
and a wery agreeable time I've had of it I
can tell you; overseein' the city, and lookin'
out that the watchmen was on duty, and the
lamps lit. Church steeples and tops o' public
buildings, is spruce beer at twopence a glass,
compared with it. Then there was a wery
charming young 'oman, that brought the
parchment
out of the country where she found it,
inside, sitting like a wax figure to be looked
at, and Fob, the little tailor, actin' like mad,
kissing 'spragus-sprigs and mock-oranges, like
a hero, just for greens. I can't say I ever had
a more agreeable night of it in my life, where
there was only three of the party!
Ishmael, said Fyler Close, withdrawing
the attention of his companion from these
delightful
prospects, we must distrain in the
Row to-morrow.
Out and out? asked Ishmael.
Out and out, answered Mr. Close, down
to the plant-pots and Dutch oven. No
nonsense
,
but a clean sweep; here's the warrants.
Go down to Meagrim, at the very earliest hour
in the morning. And he handed Ishmael a
bundle of documents filled up and ready for
use.
No delay? asked Ishmael.
Not a minute; and tell Meagrim to move
the goods off, sell at the shortest notice, close
up at once, and bring me the result in gold.
He must throw off interest on his commissions:
mention that to him when you see him
to-morrow
.
Ishmael promised it should be looked to the
very hour the court opened; and was about to
leave.
You'll stand by me, Ishmael? asked
Fyler
,
regarding him with a look that Ishmael did
not recollect to have seen him ever wear
before
.
You'll stick to me through all?
I will, Uncle Fyler, answered Ishmael,
taking the old broker's proffered hand. I'll
be a stren'thin' plaster to your back; a pair o'
double magnifiers to your eyes; and a patent
truss to your hip-jints. Losin' the use of your
legs, I'll be crutches to you; and when you
come to give up the ghost
As to that last particular, interposed
Fyler
Close, suppose we adjourn conversation
twenty-five years. That isn't too long? But
when it does happen, as I suppose it must one
day, I'll leave you an old chest or two to
rummage
,
that's all I can, you know; and if you
find anything it shall be yours.
Mr. Small shook hands upon the
understanding
,
and was moving off again.
Come this way, Ishmael, said the broker,
as Mr. Small was at the door. Listen!
At that moment, a fearful cry issued from
the chamber where the disordered man lodged;
voices in supplication or menace were raised
upon him; and presently a dead silence
followed
,
as if the struggler had been finally
subdued
.
There's close quarters up there, said
Fyler
,
looking first at Ishmael, then lifting his
meager finger, and shaking it in the
direction
whence these sounds had come. Stout
chaps, brawny fellows; and not a word uttered
by the poor sick devil that's believed. He
dropped his voice to the lowest whisper, and
added, I'll drive Hobbleshank to
that
pass
yet! Ishmael renewing his promise to
execute
his orders promptly, on the morrow, and
smiling in answer to the hideous grin that
lighted the old broker's countenance,
withdrew
.
The broker himself sat by the window,
listening
to the cries of the lunatic, and waiting for
the break of day that he might hear the
blacksmith's
mortgaged hammer sound, and fix his
eyes once more on the securities spread about
him.
CHAPTER XXII.
MR. FYLER CLOSE INVOKES THE AID OF MR.
MEAGRIM
AND THE LAW.
Pursuant
to his engagement with the
broker
,
Ishmael at the proper hour, having first laid
aside his cap, and substituted in its place a
round-rimmed hat, embellished with a strip of
crapeset forth to carry the wishes of Mr.
Fyler Close into effect. Getting by an easy
road into Chatham street, which was his
favorite
promenade, he pursued his course, not quite
so gaily as usual, but with sufficient exuberance
of spirits to indulge in an occasional sportive
sally, as he pushed his way along the crowded
street. Once feigning to be taking a leisurely
walk, a mere after-breakfast stroll, with his
hands crossed quietly behind him, he suddenly
brought one of them forth, and letting it drop
gently on the crown of an errand-boy, fresh
from the country, and who was gaping and
staring at the various street sightshe left the
young gentlemen ssaggering about as if under
the influence of a sturdy morning draught.
This, and a few others like it, were, however,
mere prefaces and flourishes of his humor; but
when he got to the declivity of the street, where
it forms a cheerful perspective of mouldy
garments
and black-whiskered Jews, Mr. Small
knew that he was in a province that his genius
had made his own. He slackened his pace a
little, as he began to climb the street; and
keeping his eye fixed on its other extremity,
waited a moment till he espied certain figures
turning into it out of another thoroughfare;
his eye kindled, and smiling, and touching his
hat gracefully to the young gentlemen who stood
in the shop-doors, many of whom were his
particular
friends, he strolled on. It was
alms-house
morning, Wednesday, when the public
charities are distributed at the park office to
the poor; and as Ishmael rambled on, he met the
various creatures of the city bounty hobbling
forward in every variety of gait, aspect, and
apparel, and bearing their alms in every kind
of characteristic utensil and implement; poor
women bringing theirs in broken baskets,
concealed
with woman's shrinking care, under old,
tattered cloaks; and the men bearing theirs
openly on their backs, or tied in soiled cotton
handkerchiefs.
As he approached these parties, Ishmael
assumed
a benevolent aspect, and proceeded to
put in practice the philanthropic purpose with
which he was inspired. The first that he
encountered
was a glazier carrying his arms in
an old glazier's box: drawing near, Mr. Small
accosted him with Stop a moment, my friend
don't trouble yourself to set it down;
lifting
the lid and depositing within what seemed
a liberal donation in moneyThere; go home
as fast as you can, and invest that little deposite
in a couple of tender steaks and two twisted
rolls: you're hungry and they'll do you good!
Ishmael passed on to another (amid the smiles
of his acquaintance in the shops, who seemed
to admit it was well done), who might have
been a great traveller in his time, for he
sustained
his burden in a faded carpet-bag, slung
from his shoulder at the end of a walking-staff.
Ishmael begged to know what was his favorite
dish, which the beggar modestly declining to
answer, Mr. Small said, I know what it is
it's turkey done brown, with sauce of oysters;
here's a couple of quarters,placing in his
hand the apparent coin,and there's a extra
twenty-five center to treat yourself to the pit o'
the the-a-tre after dinner. And Ishmael drew
another from a pocket, the issues of which
seemed to be as free and unlimited as those of
any modern bank.
Mr. Small claimed to be no banker or
financier
,
but he had certainly managed to create a
currency which diffused a pleasure and
satisfaction
wherever it flowed. Was it any fault
of his if his pensioners should afterward chance
to wake from a delusion, and find that what
they took for a legal mintage, was nothing
more than a fictitious currency of
electioneering
silver, bearing on one side the device of
an attractive donkey, with his mouth full of
political labels, and on the reverse that of a
man in a cage, starving in consequence of the
times brought upon the country by the party
against whom it was aimed? The silver was
a purchase of Ishmael's from one of the
churches
to
whose plate it had been contributed by
certain liberal-minded politicians, who were
pew-holders therein.
Spreading his largesses in this way on every
side, with the unqualified approbation of his
Jewish friends, and maintaining for the time
at least the character of a large-souled
philanthropist
,
Ishmael reached the court, with more
sincere good wishes and blessings sent after
him, than ever, in all probability, accompanied
a traveller in that direction before.
A rarer or more curious gathering of mortal
creatures than compose the posse of officers,
marshals, and litigants, that haunt the Small
courtthe Twenty Pound jurisdiction, it has
been no man's fortune to see. In the first
place, the Small court is held in a square room
of very limited dimensionswhere the court
itself in triple majesty sitswith its purlieus
in the rear of the city park; the purlieus
consisting
in part of another square room, where a
very red-nosed man roams about inside of a
railed cage, opening great ledgers and closing
them, and holding no other intercourse with
the barbarous world without, than to accept
from time to time small tributes of coin, which
he carefully deposites in a yawning drawer,
wide and deep enough to swallow all that may
be cast in.
A further purlieu of the Small court adjoins
this sacred precinct, and consists of two small
dens to which the worshipful judges withdraw,
at certain seasons of the day, and brood over the
wickedness and corruption of mankind; which
they avenge by giving wrong-headed verdicts
against parties who venture to molest them in
their retirement. Through these various
purlieus
and avenues, there circulates from ten,
morning, till three, afternoon, a constant tide
of unclean, unwashed, and wrathful humanity,
in at one door, out at another, making noisy
friths and creeks, as it were, all over the place,
and whirling round and round in a perpetual
vortex. The tide was not quite at its height
when Ishmael entered; and the retainers of
the court who had assembled were therefore
not too many to be observed apart. It was
the clerk's room that Ishmael enteredwhere
the officers and others are in waiting till they
are calledor transacting such business as
may be put in their charge.
There was one man sitting in a corner,
stout-built
and heavy, with a great red noseeven
much larger and fierier than the clerk'sthat
seemed to throw a glow over the newspaper
he held before him, and which he was reading
through a pair of coarse horn spectacles: while
a spare man of a pale aspect was hobbling
across the court-room on unequal legs, bearing
a process to the clerk's desk within the rail.
Another ruby-nosed officer, much taller, but
not as stout as the other, was sitting in the
doorway, looking out steadily, and with as
much keenness as his brandy-stained face would
permit, for the approach of one of their high
mightinesses and supreme disposers of Twenty
Pound casesthe justice himself. There was
a constable with one eye gone, but
concentrating
in the other sufficient spite and small
malice to light up the organs of four-and-twenty
rattlesnakes or more: and another, a huge,
overgrown man, in a dirty gray coat, with a
great wen on his forehead, who sat upon a stool
at a high desk, leaning over a paper and painfully
casting up the interest on a very small sum for
a very short time, and due and accruing from
a retail grocer, both stout and small; and
furthermore
,
at this time, sadly invalid from want
of funds.
Presently there was a bustle at the door;
a great rapping on a desk in front of the bench,
on the part of an impudent-looking man, who
directed his eyes steadfastly toward the door as
he knocked; a tumultuous shout of hats off
from all quarters of the room, a rush from the
side rooms to the door of that where the chief
court was held, and along came a little
weazen-faced
,
crop-haired gentleman, shuffling through
the press, and making his way toward the
judge's seat, into which he presently dropped;
and after wriggling about uncomfortably for a
few minutes, as if he had got into the prisoner's
dock by mistake, and was on trial for
non-compos
or something corresponding, he called
to the crier, over the desk-rail, for the day's
calenddar.
Recovering a little, as he became better
accustomed
to his station, he began shortly to call
order, and in very doubtful English required
people to make less noise in the outskirts
of the court-room, where a great hubbub was
rapidly engendering, to which the offenders
listened with the most profound respect, while
it was uttering, but as soon as his voice had
fairly ceased, proceeded with renewed
animation
,
and as if it had been the purpose of his
honor to cheer them on and encourage them in
what they were about.
Immediately in the heels of the judgehe
had walked down with that functionary, that
he might enjoy an opportunity to color his
mind to the right complexion for a case that was
coming on that morninga marble-faced man
came in, dressed in clean black from crown to
toe, with a pair of vicious black eyes, and a
chattering smile as he entered. This was Mr.
Meagrim, the marshal; and glancing about to
recognise his customers and acquaintance, he
glided out of the court-room into the clerk's
purlieu, where Ishmael waited his coming.
Ah! Mr. Small, he said, recognising that
gentleman where he stood, in a corner, talking
with one of the brandy-painted constables,
what is it, now? And he drew Ishmael
aside, and dropping his voice to a stealthy
whisper, inquired what he needed. They
whispered
apart for a short time; and Mr.
Meagrim
,
gliding away again, promised to return
in a minute, as soon as he had seen the oath
sworn against a brass-founder defendant, that
he might levy on his cart and harness as they
passed along.
When Mr. Meagrim had left, the
brandy-stained
gentleman returned, and renewed the
discourse the marshal had interrupted.
What did you say this crape was for, Ish?
asked the constable, glancing at Mr. Small's
round-rimmed beaver.
That crape, answered Ishmael, is a sign
o' mournin' and lamentation for the juryman
that was killed in the box last week, by
Counsellor
Boerum's speech, which was slow in its
operations, you know, but sure. Where's your
weeper, and Crany's and Jimmerson's? Why
han't all the officers got their weepers on?
There's no occasion that I can see,
answered
the constable; nobody's lost any
relations
here that I know on, this week; has
there?
Hallo!what are you dreamin' about,
cried Ishmael, in well-feigned surprise, I
thought your judges was all dead. I understood
this courtand who'll deny it I wonderwas
under the jurisdiction of judges' ghostsnot
live judgesbut judges in a state of
semi-anymation
and imperfect witality!
By the time the subdued laughter which
prevailed
among the officers on the occasion of the
ingenious observation of Mr. Small had
subsided
,
Mr. Meagrim returned, quietly
interchanged
a word or two with the clerk, ordered
Messrs. Crany and Jimmerson to follow, and
set forth in company with Ishmael.
When they got into the street, Ishmael and
the marshal led the way, and Messrs. Crany
and Jimmerson, who were a pair of ill-matched
constables, greatly dilapidated by use and age,
trotted after. Presently Mr. Small, suggesting
to Mr. Meagrim, that he had a slight
commission
to execute by the way, dropped behind,
with a promise to overtake them in the course
of a block or two. Soon after, and when his
companions were well out of sight, he began
to cast about, with an impatient and ominous
look; and in a moment, hastening to a spot on
which his eye had rested with unbounded
satisfaction
,
he stood at a baker's window; a
minute
after he was in the baker's shopand,
allowing
him a minute more, and he was
strolling
forth, holding in his hand a delicate
amalgam
,
formed of a slice of fresh bread and a
slice of pound-cake laid close together.
The wickedness and desperation of the
world is such, said Ishmael, as he cut into
the amalgam, that it exhausts one's
ingenuity
and wits to make it go down. It's not
bad, however, and he cut again, if one could
only wet it with a drink of pure gin, without
being put to the vulgarity of payin' for it!
Now it is pretty generally known that there
is a body of thirty-four gentlemen, recognised
and described as the corporation of the city
and county of New York, whose sole business
it is, according to popular belief, to sit as a
board of brewers; and whose constant
employment
it likewise is, for which they are chosen
by the people at large and held in great honor
therefor, to brew and distil a well-known
popular
beverage, which has gone into extensive
use. Ishmael, faithful to the promise he had
made to himself, paused at one of the public
stills, where this drink is distributed, and
lifting
a long wooden arm in the air, bending his
head forward and drawing the wooden arm
after him, with a good deal of dexterity and
manual skill, took a large, copious, and
exhilarating
draught of the beverage in question.
He then gracefully wiped his mouth; and
restoring
his handkerchief to his pocket, leaving
a small segment only exposed for the public
admiration, he followed on.
Hurrying along, now that he was thoroughly
refreshed, Ishmael reached Mr. Meagrim at the
square, where he was busy bargaining for the
services of a cartman, who being at last
retained
,
galloped forward up the street, while
Mr. Meagrim and his followers, keeping him
in view, swept on.
When they reached the neighborhood of
Close's row, Mr. Meagrim ordered the cart to
halt without, and entering slyly with his train,
took but a moment's glance at the building,
and fell to business.
Ishmael was despatched to the roof, with a
handful of nails and an upholsterer's hammer,
produced from the marshal's pocket; Mr.
Jimmerson
to the lightning maker's garret; and
Mr. Meagrim himself, with the cartman and
Mr. Crany in his train, proceeded to the
recusant
cobbler's. Such was the nimbleness and
dexterity with which Mr. Small executed his
portion of the business, that by the time
Meagrim
and his followers reached the garret, they
found the cobbler knocking his head and fists,
like a madman, against the closed scuttle, and
threatening to pitch his besieger from the roof,
if he could once get out. When he found
himself
hemmed in by other tormentors, in the
persons
of the officers and posse, his rage was
greatly increased, and he danced about the
apartment in an extempore hornpipe, more like
a Huron chief than a franchise citizen.
Notwithstanding
he saw that he was overpowered,
when the officers seized one end of his corded
bale of valuables, he fastened on the other,
and tugged at it, till they had fairly dragged it
down stairs, the cobbler asseverating that
marshals
and all such cattle were a nuisance in a
civilized community; demanding to know what
right they had to touch his property, and
pointedly
aspersing the legislature for presuming to
pass such laws.
Sweeping everything in in their course, chairs,
tables, stair-rods, Dutch-oventhey descended
into the precinct of the bereaved mother; the
cobbler shouting lustily after them all the way.
Here their proceedings were quite as
summary
although
they were impeded not a little
by the levity of Mr. Crany, who clapped his
hands upon his knees, and, bending almost
double, burst into a horse-laugh, every time
his eye fell upon the wooden quadruped and
crape-dressed vase on the mantel; for which
extravagance he was sharply rebuked by Mr.
Meagrim, who told him he'd better stick to
business; while the cartman, who seemed to
have a woman's soul under his cart-frock,
privily
thrust what was equivalent to his whole
day's wages in the mother's hand.
In the meantime, Mr. Jimmerson, pursuant
to order, had proceeded to the
lightning-maker's
quarters, but coming in at an unlucky
moment, when the artist was in one of his
absent
moods, he had scarcely had time to disclose
his business, when, by some cursed mischance,
a large bottle slipped off, and striking him in a
most sensitive part of his person, he was
unceremoniously
thrown on his back. There he
lay, agitating his hands and feet, like a great
green turtle in a spasm, until the
lightning-maker
,
who was up to his elbows in a vile yellow
mixture, rushed toward him, and, expressing a
profound regret for what had occurred, began
chafing his temples, beating his hands, and
punching his body.
The lightning-maker was bending over Mr.
Jimmerson, when Mr. Smallwho had lingered
on the roof, watching a market-sloop that was
sailing down the rivercame down, and
adding
his own endeavors to the artist's, the
constable
was soon put upon his legs, and they
proceeded in their business. Acting in the
self-same spirit with the others, Ishmael and
his aid cleared the house, down to the very
cellar-floor
,
of all that came, by the most liberal
construction, under their warrant. Two wide
gates that led into the yard were thrown open;
the cart driven in; the goods piled on in a
threatening pyramid; and perching on the very
top, whither he had climbed, with saucepans,
broken candle-stands, and rugged tables, for the
steps of his arduous ascent, sat Mr. Ishmael
Small, presiding over the whole, like the very
genius of distress-warrants and chaotic
chattels
.
Men, women, and childrenthe tenants
of the rowgathered in the windows, looking
upon the wreck, pale-cheeked and hollow-eyed;
the cobbler alone, holding his station in a
door-way
,
and manfully vociferating against the
iniquity
of the whole proceeding.
The cart was driven off; Messrs. Crany and
Jimmersonthe last with a dolefully bilious
complexiontrotting along, and keeping watch
on either side; and Mr. Meagrim,
smoothbrowed
and unruffled, following with a hawk's
eye in the rear.
CHAPTER XXIII.
PUFFER HOPKINS INQUIRES AGAIN AFTER
HOBBLESHANK.
Day
had scarcely dawned when Puffer was
called up into the chamber of the little tailor.
As he entered, in quick answer to the summons,
dreading some fatal crisis in his disease,
Martha
was at the bedside, dwelling upon the
countenance
of Fob with a fixed earnestness,
watching
every look and turn, and ministering to his
wish before it was uttered; and Puffer, who
knew that Fob had had the whole house, in
every one of its chambers, for a nurse, and yet
none so gentle as this one, wondered whence
she came, and turned toward the little tailor,
with a question in his look. Fob, busy with
other thoughts, held spread out before him, as
wide as his thin, feeble arms would allow, the
old patchment, on which his eyeswide apart,
toowere steadfastly fastened. He greeted
Puffer as he drew nearer to his couch, and
requested
him, with a knowing smile, to stand
off.
You shan't come so near! said Fob, still
with a grave smile, I can't allow it. There
stand where you are and tell me what you
see?
Puffer, who had been driven back by Fob's
urgency, to almost the other wall of the
chamber
,
confessed that, with the doubtful light,
he could see nothing worth mentioning.
Well, well, pursued Fob, rising upon his
elbows in his bed, and shifting the position of
the parchment so that it fronted the window,
I must allow you a sunbeam or two; what
do you see now?
Still Puffer averred nothing. Then Fob
permitted him to come a foot or two nearer,
still without effect; and at last, in a sort of
pleased impatience, he threw the deed toward
him, and told him to read for himself.
He wants to show off his scholarship,
Martha
,
that's all, said Fob, who stretched his
neck forward and watched the countenance of
Puffer. A glance had sufficed to show him all.
There it was written, in a good bold hand,
Hobbleshank
; and there was the clause,
word for word as Fob had recited it, touching
his child, and showing, clearly enough, the
tenure
by which he held his right. And now
something of the old man's hopes began to
break upon him; as his mind ran back, with
inconceivable swiftness, he found he held the
key by which to interpret his sad snatches
of talk; his wild, melancholy cry that all was
lost; and then returned upon him, too, the
pledge he had proffered to his aged friends.
He clasped the little tailor in an earnest grasp;
thanked him that he had borne in mind his poor
wish that he might do a service to the kind old
man; and, returning the deed again to Fob,
for present custody, he set forth in a renewed
search after Hobbleshank. There was not a
spot nor place where he had but heard the name
of Hobbleshank mentioned that he did not visit.
Till noonday he was busy going about from one
place to another, following out an imperfect
clewwhen having learned that the old man
had been a constant lounger upon the wharves,
spending whole days in looking up and down
the river (with what purpose nobody could ever
guess), Puffer spent several hours more, in
going
from pier to pier, watching the sloops and
other river craft as they arrived, with the hope
that he might have wandered away into the
country and would choose this path back. Then
he crossed the city to the piehouse, where they
had passed their first night together. Being told
that he never came there till toward dusk, he
waited about, questioning every one that
entered
;
but dusk and broad night, even, failed
to bring the one he sought. He then aimed
for Barrell's oyster-househe had reserved
this, with a strong hope, for the last. When
he had reached the oyster-house his heart smote
himthe cellar-doors were closed and a faint
light streamed upon the walk and up into the
faces of passers-by from the glass bull's-eye in
the door. It might be shut for the night. He
knocked; no answer was returned; knocked
again, and the glass eye grew dull; he bent
down and whispered his name; the eye
brightened
at once, and he was admitted. Politician
as he was, he was compelled to stop and stand
stone-still on the steps, in wonder and
amazement
at what he saw.
The little stalls about the place, used to hold
one customer with difficultyand not that, if he
grew too fast and stout upon the choice
shell-fish
of Mr. Jarve Barrellnow swarmed with
damp, dripping faces, as thickly set as dewy
cauliflowers on a wall; the fire was out, and
the rear of the cellar shorn of its benches and
small square tables, had passed through a
remarkable
transformation; the chief
circumstance
of which was, that Mr. Nicholas Finch,
the indefatigable agent, was seated on a stool,
his legs spread apart, and between his legs, so
spread apart, the head of a kneeling gentleman,
of scant apparel, bent down. Upon the head,
Mr. Finch was most industriously employed,
in spite of the remonstrances, entreaties, and
contortions of the catechumen. Lounging
against the end of the oyster-stand, picking off
oysters from a plate with a delicate touch, and
surveying this proceeding from time to time, as
his leisure permitted, stood a young gentleman
chastely apparelled in white jean pants of a
fashionable cut, an elegant blue coat, and
bushy whiskers.
Hallo! cried the oyster-eater, at an
unusual
spasm on the part of Mr. Finch's
gentleman
,
you're a purty feller, ar'n't you, for
a feller-citizenwhen you know towels and
soap is the price of freedomblow me tight
if it a'nt, Nick. The oyster-eater had small
eyes and stout chaps, and he smiled, with an
oyster on his fork, as he uttered these words.
Mr. Finch was silent, but plied his arms with
wonderful diligence.
I'll take another, Mr. Codwise, said Mr.
Finch, looking up. The kneeling gentleman
jumped to his feet, rubbed his eyes, and
walking
off to a corner of the cellar, took his seat
on a bench, the second in a row. The
oyster-eater
laid down his fork, pieked his way nicely
to one of the stalls, and taking one of the
ragged
tenants daintily by the collar, led him out
upon the floor; and, giving him an energetic
impulse with his foot, directed him to Mr.
Finch. Upon this gentleman Mr. Finch fell
to work in like manner; and the owner of the
blue coat and bushy whiskers resumed his
oysters
.
This was certainly a lively subject; his
outcries were much louder and his writhings
more frequent, and the raptures of Mr.
Codwise
proportionably heightened; so much so,
that he at last left off his oysters entirely, to
watch the spectacle, and smiled so carnestly
that the tears came into his eyes.
Bear your sufferin's like a man and a
gentleman
,
said Mr. Codwise, whose delivery was
somewhat imperfect, but in a tone of
patronizing
encouragement. Split my vest, but
don't be cast down because the fibre's coarse.
Oh, it's a glorious privilege, an't it, Mr. Finch,
to enjoy the right of votin' an independent
ticket? The consolation administered by
Mr. Codwise was not quite satisfactory, for
Mr. Finch's patient writhed again at a fresh
application, down to his very extremities. At
this moment a plunge was heard beyond, from
behind a faded curtain, stretched across the
rear of the apartment, and through which a
dull light glimmered and painted upon it
shadowy
figures moving within. A voice
remonstrated
a
voice, Mr. Jarve Barrell's, by the
accent, responded, and a second plunge. What
could this mean? Could it be that Puffer
Hopkins
had got into a branch penitentiary,
established
under-ground, where new tortures and
fresh-devised penalties were inflicted on the
criminal?
When he looked at the men about him, there
was certainly something in their gait to
warrant
the belief; and when he saw the secrecy
with which the rites of the place were
performed
,
he might have been easily assured that
these men had been guilty of offences against
God and man that drew upon them the
dungeon
and the rack, which Mr. Finch and Mr.
Barrell seemed to be administering. There
was a smell of the prison in their garments,
and something of the dull fixedness of
prison-walls
in their look.
There seemed, at this juncture, to be a
struggle
behind the red curtain. Don't drown me,
for Heaven's sake, don't drown me! cried the
first voice again, in a tone of earnest entreaty.
Dip your head under, you rascal, cried
the voice of Jarve Barrell. Dip your head
under, you burglary knave!
Petty larceny, sir, whined the other voice,
which savored strongly of thin soup and damp
lodgings.
Don't spare the villain! shouted Mr.
Codwise, who had mounted a stool, and with a
light in his right hand held high above his
head, was peering over the curtain, it's
burglary
,
I saw it on the keeper's books; it's so
on my list. Don't spare him, it's good for his
system, an't it, Mr. Barrell? He broke into a
respectable house in Fourteenth street, and
stole a bottle of Muscat wine and a plate of
anchovies. I'll make a patriot of you, you
villain, don't you want to serve your country,
eh! Tell us that, will you?
And so it was kept up; Mr. Finch dumb and
devoted, heart and soul to the performance of
his share of the service; Mr. Barrell coaxing
and clamoring from behind the curtain, with
the resisters of his authority; and Mr.
Codwise
dividing his time in equal proportions
between
the oysters, the leading out of the men
from the stalls, baiting Mr. Finch's patients
from where he stood, and bantering Mr.
Barrell's
from over the top of the curtain. At
length the noise ceased from behind the
curtain
,
and Mr. Barrell came stumping forth;
Mr. Finch dismissed his last patient from
under
his hand; Mr. Codwise's last oyster had
disappeared. The benches were full; and
there they sat, all in a row, in their sleeves,
their faces of a bright red, brought on by the
spirited exertions of Mr Finch, and their hair
flying all abroad.
Puffer inquired what all this meant. What
did it mean? He didn't want respectable
votersfreemen, freshly delivered from
bondage
,
voting an independent, patriotic ticket
coming up to the polls in dirty facesdid he?
He'd like to have 'em show a clean
countenance
among their fellow citizenswouldn't
he? What was better for 'em than baths and
towels? This was Mr. Barrell's explanation,
and it agreed well enough with a rumor which
had prevailed that prisoners were to be brought
down from the island to vote at the coming
election.
At the head of the row there was an old
window, which, being greatly battered and
damaged by age, admitted such currents of air
as might be prowling about. The gentlemen
in the sleeves murmured at this, and ventured
to hint that the cold was coming it rather sharp
and strong.
Be silent, ye scum of the earth, cried Mr.
Codwise, the moment he detected a glimpse
of insubordination, coming forward and
planting
himself directly in their front, at the same
time gently hoisting his shirt collar, arn't we
making men of you? How do you expect to
be worthy of freedom if you don't fit yourself
for it by a course of trials and tribulations?
Look at me! Didn't I risk my neck in getting
you off the islandwhose your deliverer but
me, you bottle-flies? There's few rich men's
sons would ha' done as muchis there, Mr.
Finch? is there, Barrell? True, I might ha'
been sittin' by my father's parlor fire, eatin'
sandwitches and drinkin' claretand what do
I do? Why, I hire an omnibus at an expense
of three dollars an hour, didn't I, Mr. Finch?
and blow me tight if I didn't wait upon you, you
miserable wretches off the island, as though
you had been so many Broadway promenaders
of the sex, help you into your carriage and
bring you to a friend's house for lodgings
didn't I, Mr. Barrell? and now you grumble
about that winder, do you? May my buttons
drop off, and my boots run down at the heel,
if I don't give up politics and go into the
shades of private life, if I see any more sich
ingratitude and beastliness!
Puffer looked at the speaker, saw how poor
and frivolous he was, in spite of his trinkets
and fair apparel, but when he spoke, in boast
of the home where he might be sheltered, a
feeling wakened in Puffer's heart which he
could not subdue. He thought of himself and
the other together, side by side, and asked
himself
,
almost repiningly, why the vague hope
that
he
might be one day restored to a home he
had not known for years, should not be
fulfilled
?
Why, as in the other case, the trinkets
he wore upon his person were pledges of
parental
attachment, why the little trinket, the
little broken jewel he had treasured so long, as
the sole relic of any parent's love toward him,
should not guide him by some kindly providence
back to the happiness he should have known?
He wakened from his revery, and turning
quickly upon Mr. Jarve Barrell, who stood
by his side, he asked after Hobbleshank. Mr.
Jarve Barrell's information was strictly
professional
.
All he knew or could tell in the
premises, was, that the old man, in company
with a stranger, had stopped a long while ago
and ordered a large supply of oysters to be
ready on their return with sufficient beer to
answer. They had never come back, and the
oysters were kept till midnight, when a party
of sailors luckily coming in swept them up.
That was all. Puffer asked no further
questions
,
but climbing the steps, thoughtfully,
without salutation or farewell of any kind
either to the agent or Mr. Barrell, was in the
open air. There he wandered up and down
two or three by-streets lost in thought.
At last it occurred to him that he would
repair
to the old man's lodgings, and seek
information
of his two old friends; this might only
give pain, and to what purpose? Just then a
drum sounded about the corner, the current of
his thoughts was changed, and he turned into
the next street. A boy, in a cocked paper-hat,
(a brigadier's hat at least), beating a drum
with great energy, marched at the head of a
company of youth, who, fitted out in belts and
sticks, and bearing crickets and hurdygurdys in
their hands, tramped along, assuming the port
of martialists and sticking close to the heels of
their leader. Puffer, with others, fell in at
their wake and followed them down the city to
the front of a public hall, embellished with the
full-length of a tall military gentleman in a
blue coat and yellow breeches, where, forming
a line, they plied their instruments for a
quarter
of an hour, and then marched off. Puffer
Hopkins entered the hall; the great room up
stairs was packed close with citizens, listening
to an excited individual, who walked up and
down the platform, swaying his arms and
foaming
at the mouth, as though he were in a cage,
roaring to be let out. This seemed to be to
the crowd and entertainment of the first
description
;
but Puffer, paying little heed to the
orator, who he knew was going furious
according
to an understanding with the committee
that arranged the meeting, glided about the
room, singling out a man here, a man there,
and whispering a word in his ear. In a few
minutes, keeping clear of the platform and
coasting along the wall out of view of the light,
he got forth into the street again.
Wherever he moved indications of the
contest
of to-morrow were rife. The
oyster-houses
and tap-rooms, everywhere, were full;
the citizens throwing themselves upon oysters
and punches, with infinite spirit, all through
the night, and pausing only every now and
then to form into a group and enter upon a
discussion
of the prospects and chances of the
day. Sometimes a grim boy staggered by under
a fardel of ballots from the printers; sometimes
a bill-sticker paused, and, clattering his
paste-pot
on the pavement, proceeded to embellish
the wall with a pictorial and ornamental
broad-sheet
.
Every street had its public meeting in
the upper chamber of a tavern, whose
windows
glared with light. It was noticeable
that in the neighborhoods of the Gallipot
meetingsthe friends of Gallipot being in
possession of the citythe public lamps were
lighted and burned away in the most brilliant
and cheerful humor imaginable; whereas, in
all the streets lying about a meeting of the
opposition
,
for a furlong or better, they utterly
refused
to afford a single ray to any that might
be in search of such meeting or place of
resort
.
Not only this, but it would not
infrequently
happen that a public well would be
found to be sunk, or undergoing repair, at the
very mouth of the opposition halls, affording a
capital opportunity for curious geological
investigation
to such gentlemen of the opposition
as might be inclined to step in. Even as it
wasas if to supply any deficiency of the
corporate
lightnew lights sprung up on every
hand as the night deepened. In committee
rooms and other resorts all over town, men
were gathered about their tables, mapping out
the work of to-morrow, brooding stealthily
over circumventions and manuvres and
strokes of craft; in others, cutting tickets and
folding them; in others, nursing the patriotic
furor in innumerable punches, cock-tails, and
cobblers. And so from every quarter their
dusky lights streamed upon the streetmaking
the air close and sultryand portending surely
enough the storm that was to break by
morning
.
Puffer, as he hurried about, dipping in
for a minute at a caucus, for another minute at
a tap-room, and again at a public meeting,
where they seemed bent on keeping huddled
together
all night long, seething and reeking and
growing more confused and more determined,
the longer they tarried; Puffer waxed warm,
too, and retired to the Fork, with a head full
of schemes and a heart all on fire with the
sure hope of a triumph.
CHAPTER XXIV.
THE CHARTER ELECTION.
The
April sun streamed upon a city in the
very crisis of a fever, flushed and curtained all
over with flags like a mighty booth or tent of
war. The color had apparently all passed out
of the red brick housesnow pale with
placards
into
the faces of the inhabitants. The
election, rumbling and foretelling itself for
months, had come; and while parts of the
townwhole streets and neighborhoodshad
the appearance of being abandoned and
desolate
,
others boiled and overflowed with life like
so many whirlpools. Each poll or headquarter
of the wards was the centre and heart of
streams that choked the streets and blocked
up all passage through or beyond. Banners
run high up in the air, coiled and twisted and
turned about as often as the politicians over
whose heads they floated; others, stretched
across the thoroughfares, brushed the hats of
the crowds, and, as they wavered to and fro,
helped to fan the fire into a flame. The
excitement
was by no means diminished when the
votersmany of whom had been up all night
long preparing for the contestrubbed their
eyes, and read upon the fences affidavits (which
had just come out) to the effect that Gallipot,
the candidate of the Bottomitesas they were
known at the canvasshad been a smuggler of
British paints through the customhouse for
years; yes, British paints. Mr. Gallipot's
enemies laughed horribly when they read it;
but when they had leisure to turn round and
read on an opposite wall (it had been drafted,
printed, sworn to, and posted up almost while
they were busy spelling out the other), that
Mr. Blinker, the president of the Phnix
company
,
and their own candidatehe had been
put up at the last moment by the opposition
had murdered a traveller fourteen years before,
at Rahway, New Jersey, whose bones he had
kept ever since in a writing desk with a false
bottom, in his own housethey grinned again,
but this time they writhed and twisted as they
grinned.
In the mean time all parties were at work at
their polling places. In all the lower region
of the city the battle went smoothly; the
voters
dropped in one by one, as to a party, with
their notes of invitation in their hands, and
quietly deposited their ballots, and passed
away. Further up, and nearer the heart of the
city, where life may be supposed to be more
rampant and furious, there were constant
outbreaks
,
little playful jets, all day long.
As these bubbled up from time to time and
burst, fragments of timber, branches of oak
and hickory, were thrown out with such
violence
and spirit, as to send voters of a
peaceful
turn of mind trotting up the sloping streets
which lead from this infested region; and
when such voters chanced to be of a respectable
bulk and tonnage, they were watched with no
little curiosity and interest by lookers-on who
stood at the top, and saw with what pain and
anxiety, and redness of face, they toiled up.
In another ward the poll had been
constructed
and arranged a good deal on the principle of
a puzzle, which the voters frequenting there
were required, as an agreeable day's pastime,
to solve. First, you had to go through a long
blind hall, from the street; then out into a yard;
then up a flight of stairs, through a long dark
room; and then up a ladder, when, in an
apartment so small that its inmates must have
been got in by legerdemain, you had the
pleasure
of meeting three gentlementwo of them,
who approved of the juggle which had been
set by their own party, smiling cheerfully
behind
their green box, ready to wait upon you.
Here was a delightful recreation for aged
gentlemen of inactive habits, and delicate
young gentlemen in tight-strapped pants; an
admirable device, and it worked well, for the
plotters polled two votes to oneas they had a
great run of sailors from a government vessel
in the harbor, in the morning, all on their side,
and quite as spirited an accession of
lamplighters
in the afternoon.
But it was at the East river poll where
Puffer Hopkins labored, that the struggle was
steadiest and fiercest; it was the tie ward,
where parties had in the previous election cast
an equal vote, and the whole city now hung
anxiously upon its returns. The poll was held
in an old yellow building, its gable upon the
street, and its front facing the river; the voting
room was an obscure dark corner, reached by
a narrow entry, full of crooks and turns,
through an old-fashioned door-way. Around
this a great number of voters had lodged the
night through, to be in readiness to put in the
earliest vote the first day; among them were
the lightning-maker, whose uneasy slumbers
against the wall had betrayed themselves by
incessant cries of bring the buckets! and
the cobbler, who had not slept a wink,
inasmuch
as he had been engaged with a one-eyed
stone-cutter in an elaborate argument to show
that the only debts a man was bound to pay,
were his grocer's (a line of business his wife's
brother was in), and his shoemaker's. It was
a pleasure to Puffer Hopkins to learn that the
cobblera convert of his ownhad deposited
the first vote, although with such emphasis as
to stave in the cover of the ballot-box, and
cause himself to be taken into keeping by a
couple of officers, who led him, roaring and
remonstrating, to a neighboring watch-house.
Before the morning was half spent the election
was in full progress; there were men running
up and down the streets bringing in voters;
others, housed in small wooden booths or
cabins, distributing ballots; some declaiming,
in high gusty voices; some, farther apart from
the throng, calculating the chances of the
candidates
;
and others, even, who had withdrawn
into by-streets in the neighborhood of the poll,
plotting the distribution of the offices that
would fall to the share of the victorious party.
Toward the evening of the first day, to which
moment, as commanding the largest throng of
spectators, he had reserved himself, Mr.
Blinker came upon the ground, attended by
two or three hangers-on and runners, and
looking
very grand and decisive. There was an
extraordinary severity in his look; although his
coat, a faded chocolate, was something the
worse for wear, and a thought or two below
the usual style of the president. This was
odd; but presently it began to be whispered
about, as all eyes were fixed upon it, that this
identical chocolate garment was the cast coat
of a distinguished senator of the United States,
who had lately made a triumphant tour through
the city. It was soon discovered, too, that the
neck-stock which Mr. Blinker now wore was
of the very same sable and satin texture as
that worn by his eminent model on that
occasion
.
Mr. Blinker had made influence with the
great man; and this was the result. As he was
watched, moving down the walk majestically
making gracious nods and recognitions on either
hand, it occurred to the lookers-on that Mr. B.
emulated not a little the gait and manner, and
assumed, as nearly as was attainable, the voice
of the illustrious senator. The spectacle was
imposing but not conclusive; two loafers, to
be sure, bailed the air with their hats with
such vehemence as to drive the bottoms out;
but the effect of this was entirely destroyed by
a couple of ragged young rascals, who had been
put forward, clinging to his chocolate skirts,
and whining out the paternal appellation, till
they were dragged off by main force, amid the
shouts of the mob, That's a cruel wretch!
What a unfeelin' father! and so forth.
While Mr. Blinker spent his time in this
way, strutting about the pollit was his native
ward, and he had a pride in sticking to ithis
antagonist, Mr. Gallipot, honest Peleg
Gallipot
,
was all over town, in his paint-dress,
making
interest, shaking hands, chewing, smoking,
drinking, as though he had been fifty men
instead
of one. The Gallipot hacks and stages
rushed about, with great linen flags streaming
to the wind, as though the horses had votes as
well as the half-drunken gentlemen inside, and
were anxious to get them in. Puffer Hopkins,
for one, was everywhere; haranguing; folding
tickets; diving into committee-rooms; arguing
on the kerb; was at every man's ear; had
every man by the hand. He seemed to have
multiplied himself; every third carriage-door
that opened, lo! out popped Puffer, leading by
the hand a couple of misty sailors; a
superannuated
old man; a quaker that hadn't voted
for nineteen years, or some other wonder and
miracle.
The first day closed; and at night the
Gallipots
and Blinkerites repaired to their
respective
quarters for an irregular canvass of the
result. The Gallipot party met in the upper
chamber of the poll, of which, as the party at
present in power, they had possession; and
their meeting was sufficiently promiscuous and
piebald. Along benches fronting the raised
platform, were seated, cheek by jowl,
gentlemen
in fine beaver hats, and tatterdemalions,
with no covering but their own matted and
discordant
locks; some in broadcloth coats of the
latest cut, and some in jackets that, judging by
their texture and complexion, seemed to have
been fashioned out of sweeps' blankets. The
room was full, so full that it overflowed, a
loafer or two, upon the stairs; and two or
three men who occupied the platform, and who
had watched the progress of the voting, down
stairs, through the day, called over by turn, a
list of voters which they held in their hands.
As they called, some one or other in the crowd
would answer for each name, good, bad,
doubtful, as the case might be; the answer
being given by such as supposed themselves
familiar with the way of thinking and political
turn of the person called. This proceeding
was kept up till the roll was finished; which
was no sooner done, than an ambitious young
gentleman, who had stood at the doorway
watching its close, rushed off as special express
and postboy, to carry the result to Fogfire hall,
where it was waited for with much anxiety.
Two or three speeches of a highly inflammatory
character were deliveredthe meeting broke
upand the first day's work was over.
The sun, which had been in a fine mood all
the first day, shining like a great eye into all
corners of the city, warming voters into life,
rolled up the sky, on the morning of the second,
apparently as good-humored as ever. The
Blinkerites were delighted; they were the
fairweather
party, and their well-dressed voters
poured in in a steady stream for a couple of
hours or better; but when, toward noon, a
large, ill-looking cloud came looming along
from the northwest, they began to grow gloomy,
and sundry of the Bottom leaders walked round
the corner and shook hands on the prospect of
a good pelting shower.
It was a false alarm; the cloud, a mere gust
of wind, passed off; the Blinkerites brightened
up wonderfully. The tide was running strong
and deep in their favor; two to one, at least,
entering the boxes on their side. Troops of
nice-looking gentlemen were hurrying in;
gentlemen
of doubtful politics were going over
every
minute. Blinker was standing against a
great empty hogshead, on the corner, dividing
the offices to his friends, who were gathered
round him in large numbers, in advance. Ever
since the cloud had blown over (which to be
sure they couldn't help), the Bottomites had
been horribly cast down. What was to be
done? Just then there was a shuffling of feet
in the neighborhood of the poll; a tumult in
the entry; the crowd outside looked inthere
were officers' staves crossing and clashing in
the hall; great brawny arms raised and brought
down with wonderful vigorbodies pushed
aboutand presently the whole melee came
tumbling into the street. The Gallipot
leaders
rubbed their hands and chuckled;
they
knew what it meant. A detachment of the
Bottom Club had been concealed under the
stairway of the hall, all the morning, lying in
wait for an opportunity (in the meantime,
amusing their leisure by tripping up as many
inconsiderate Blinker voters as they could as
they passed in) for a decisive demonstration.
They, like their friends without, had formed
good hopes of the shower; but when the air
cleared up so brightly and provokingly, they
could restrain themselves no longer. A
catcall
had been given, certain members of the
fraternity had forced their way in at the
back-door
of the polling-room, others from the
neighboring
bar, and, first crowning the officers in
attendance, they had distributed themselves
about the hall and engendered the tumultone
of their little plans for reorganising and
reforming
societywhich gave such unmixed
satisfaction
to their out-of-door friends. This blow
was a decisive one; the timid and
peace-affecting
Blinkerites kept aloof; and although the
Blinkerite leaders came upon the ground in the
afternoon, in tarpaulin hats and shag
roundabouts
,
it was impossible to recover themselves.
When the poll was shut, it was admitted on all
hands that they had run behind, a hundred at
least. There was another meeting for a
canvass
,
which differed from the other in no
respect
,
save that in its very midst, a great
political
calculator, rushing in breathless from his
own house, where he had been casting up the
question, averred that they were to have,
unless
their friends made superhuman exertions
to-morrow (notwithstanding present flattering
prospects), a majority of only twenty-five, with
a floating prospect of three more if the
weather
proved foul. He staked his head on this
result
.
Another express was run to Fogfire hall;
sundry speeches of a still more excitable
quality
delivered; and the meeting dispersed,
feverish
and resolute.
The third day brought unexpected relays
from all quarters. The halt, the blind, the
feeble
,
the asthmaticcame wheezing, and
hobbling
,
and tottering, and groping their way to
the poll. Some poor scarecrows that appeared
to have been mouldering away for years, in
their piecemeal garments, in out-of-the-way
holes and corners, were led in by the hand, and
stood around as though they had been just dug
out. Others, reeking and bloated, with
lacklustre
eyes, appeared before the green boxes,
and voted in the same manner as they would
have called for a twopenny pint of spirits.
The caldron had been stirred to its bottom,
and its very dregs were floating up. Those
that now voted were stragglers, coming in one
by one; but presently, a sharp-eyed looker-on
might have discovered that a more steady
stream was setting in, of a somewhat similar
class. This was Mr. Finch's second
detachment
(his first had finished thelr work in the
various wards, stealthily, the two previous
days), his Island volunteers, who entered the
polls at intervals, deposited their votes and
quietly withdrew beyond reach of the officers'
eyes as soon as possiblegoing in, that was
Mr. Finch's device, most frequently on the arm
of some gentleman of known character, who
lent his responsibility for the purpose, and
sharing his good character at the ballot-box.
One of them, a notorious pickpocket, but who
had chalked his face deeply enough to get for
himself the sympathy of being a gentleman in
ill health, had even tottered in, leaning on the
shoulder of a little parson of an earnest
partisan
disposition.
Sometimes, as it happened more than once,
when the volunteer firemen of Blinker politics
gathered in any considerable number about the
poll, waiting to put in their vote, a violent
firealarm
Q
would happen to be rungout from a
neighboring
market, which soon sent them
scampering
away; a fire in New York taking
precedence
of a funeral, an election, and everything
else, but an invitation to a hanging inside of
the prison yard. For these alarms, the
Bottomites
were indebted to the bell-ringer of their
club, who lingered about the market, pulling
the bell at opportune moments, of which he
was advised by a trusty messenger sent down
from the poll. The excitement deepened as
the day advanced; quidnunes and inquirers
came hurrying in from every direction, to learn
how the contest was going.
As the day approached its close the creed of
the two parties broadened; their promises and
professions became more frequent and more
liberal; their affection for the poorthe most
readily reached by such devicesmore devoted
and fraternal. One party threw out the
suggestion
that a poor man should have
two
votes,
in consideration of the hardships and
disadvantages
of his lot. This the drummers and
declaimers of the other party answered by
suggesting
that if gentlemengentlemen of means
and abilityhad the disposition they professed
to serve the poor, why didn't they give 'em
rooms in their three-story houses, with clean
basins and towels and plenty to eat?
Advancing
in this way, in their proclamations and
professions, they at last became so
comprehensive
in their philanthropy, that certain
poverty-stricken
and simple-minded gentlemen, who
stood by listening with greedy ear, flattered
themselves that they and their families were as
good as provided for, for the ensuing year, and
went in and voted for one ticket or another,
according
as they preferred the fare, lodgings,
and accommodations held out by either party.
The concourse about the poll had swelled
steadily for hours; the street was full; the
windows of the neighborhood were packed close
with heads and faces; every lookout place of
the headquarters itself, to the very roof, was
occupied by men, women, and children,
looking
eagerly down, and watching the progress of
the contest. There was a great lumber-pile
hard by, and this, too, the crowd had climbed,
and now swarmed about its top. As the sun
went down, the crowd swayed to and fro, and
there were certain persons in it who seemed to
rock it back and forth as they would a cradle,
when suddenly surging, with a terrible impulse
against the wall, it burst its way into the house,
and there was a cry that the ballot-boxes were in
danger. In a minute the officers came
hurrying
,
pale-faced, into the street, where they were
tossed about in the crowd, the black-and-white
tops of their staves floating about like so many
fishing-droppers; the mob swarmed in at the
windows, over the back fence, through the hall
(last of all), and the polling-room was in a trice
completely overrun.
At this moment Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, who
had prevailed on two or three sturdy men to
lift him on their shoulders, stood up, as well as
he could with such support, and removing his
hat, from which a cloudy shower of
newspapers
fell, presented his face at the broken
fanlight
of the entry-door. His hands were lifted
up in supplication, and his look was an
imploring
one. It was some time before he could
get a hearing.
Gentlemen, I do beseech you, I entreat and
implore you, as you value your characters as
citizens and as men, to restrain yourselves.
From the imperfect character of the support on
which he depended, Mr. Fishblatt's
observations
were extremely irregular in their
delivery
;
one being given, as was this, with his
face at the window, and the next being
entirely
lost in the wood-work behind which his head
descended. I would ask any gentleman
here, remarked Mr. Fishblatt, when he came
up again, if he keeps a snuff-box? Did he
value his privileges? There were a couple of
thousand persons in that crowd, as far as he
could judge, three children to each; there was a
spectacle, was it not? The rights and
immunities
of six thousand of the rising generation
hazarded
by the present outrageous outbreak. He
went down again for a few minutes. The
ballot-box, gentlemen, continued Mr.
Fishblatt
,
on his reappearance, is the ark of our
safety; it's the foundation of our institutions,
board, lodging, and two suits a-year to all of
us. What would we be without the sacred
ballot-box
?
Where would stand your City hall?
Where the old Sugar house in Liberty street?
Where the Fourth of July? Where the
immortal
names of Perry and Hamilton? Where
He went down again; this time for good, for
his supporters, learning that the inspectors had
got off with their boxes through a by-gate
into
the next yard, and so from one yard to
another
,
to a place of safety, had withdrawn, and
Mr. Fishblatt was permitted to fall like a
half-risen
balloon, among the crowd. The crowd,
who had given but little heed to Mr. Fishblatt's
appeal, finding there was no further sport
going
forward, gradually broke up and dispersed.
The election was at an end; the great contest
determined one way or the other.
CHAPTER XXV.
THE END OF LEYCRAFT.
Poor
Leycraft! The belief which his
repentant
soul had cherished for years, lay dead
at his heart. One by one every hope had
crumbled
.
The boy, such was the conviction each
unanswering face pressed upon him, the boy
was dead. To that pale young form, cold and
deathward, as to him it always lay stretched in
the wood, there was no resurrection. It was
gone into another world, and seemed dragging
him, by a gentle violence he could not resist,
after. The remorse which, though sometimes
torpid, had been never entirely subdued,
uncoiled
itself more and more, and pierced him
with strokes which caused him to cry aloud
with anguish. He could not be silent nor at
ease. He had fled from house to house,
lodging
to lodging, where the horrible secret he was
constantly urged to babble, caused men and
women to fall away from his presence like that
of one sick with the plague. Even in cellars
and cheap resorts, where the language of crime
and wrong is a familiar dialect, they avoided
his conversation, and begged him, in God's
name, to ease his soul to parsons and
magistrates
,
and not to them. Even the grim
tenpin-player
had deserted him. Leyeraft's
constant
wakings at the dead of night, and the
dreadful reproaches with which his soul
labored
against itself, were too much for him.
So he flew from place to place; from
employment
to employment. He tried, and in vain,
to quell his unhappy thoughts, to cheat
himself
of that dreadful belief of the boy's death,
by a constant change of work. He was now
alone, in a rope-walk, where Ishmael Small's
prying ubiquity had found him. The walk
was a long, low-roofed shed. It was pitched
in a hollow, on the outskirts of the city, and
was out of sight of human habitation, and
beyond
the sound of human voice. About it
nothing
but rank grass and odious weeds, thick
with thorns and death-white blossoms, grew
and pressed forward to the very door. On
either side the shed was pierced with small
narrow windows, its whole length, looking out
on one hand, on a sluggish vein of water that
oozed through the hard soil, and on the other,
upon the field of shrubs and brambles. Here
Leycraft, at the earliest hour of the dayit was
just sunrise, and the sun, striking the shed on
its eastern end, filled the walk with shadows
stood, his beard untrimmed, and his waist
encompassed
with unworked flax, giving him the
appearance of a satyr.
He stood at the remotest end and looked
down its whole dark length, with an eye which
grew blank and unsettled when it found
nothing
to rest upon. Then it passed from
window
to window back again, more blank than
ever; no friendly face looked in, not even the
miserable picker who used to beg the refuse
flax and ropes'-ends. He would have
given
the world if only Ishmael had come and
taunted him in the old fashion. And then,
with something of prayer and earnest imploring
in his features, he shot his glance into a
corner
,
where two wrens had held their nest for
years, borrowing tow and threads of twine
from the floor to build. The two wrens were
gone. Not a sparrow nor a fly crossed the
unlucky
window-sills. A dread stillness was
present, resting like a cloud upon the roof and
thickening the air. The very walk seemed to
have gone into decay; it tottered and shook
like one in a palsy, as the silent winds hurried
past. What wonder if Leycraft's soul was
appalled
within him?
Lightnings blast me! he muttered,
struggling
against the feeling that crept upon him,
and made him cold to the heart; what do they
mean by leaving me here? Why don't the
sharks and indefatigables come and take me and
hang me? Here he cast a sideway look at the
rope he had begun to twist. I wish they'd
send out the green wagon and treat me to a
ride to the Tombs. Why don't they? What
do they mean? They don't know their duty
that's plain. I ought to be kept in a cell till
this cursed fever's gone off; and then I should
be hung out to dry. He laughed at the fancy;
but it was a wretched, soulless laugh, which
betrayed him more than his words. His thoughts
took a new turn, and, catching his breath, in
the surprise with which another and deeper
purpose than that of yielding his body to the
magistrates glided into his mind, he went on
now faster than ever with his task; drawing
out the flax with a secret satisfactionas he
paced backward along the hard, cold floor
every now and then putting forth his whole
strength, and twisting the strands as firm and
close as iron. It was wonderful with what care
and skill he framed his work, choosing the
cleanest flax in all the bunch, where there was
no spot nor blemishhis eye, in its
supernatural
keenness, could have detected a flyblow
shaping each strand delicately to an equal size,
and twisting them all so cleanly together, that
the cord, as fast as formed, was admirably
round and firm, and not a thread or fibre hung
loose. There was a strange pleasure in
Leycraft's
look when he saw how well he
prospered
in his work; but even in the midst of
his task a shudder came upon him; his face
grew dark and livid by turns; and his eyes
wandered about and seemed to dwell on a
terrible
and appalling company that was present
only to him. For a time his hands refused to
do the service to which they had been
constrained
,
and struggled against it, as if they
too were endowed with a fearful consciousness.
In this pause and agitation of his spirit, he
searched his garments, and brought forth from
his breast-pocket, a small, square parcel, which
he proceeded, tremblingly, to open, fixing his
eyes more keenly and steadily as each envelope
was removed. His hand at length held
disclosed
a half-bracelet, with its clasp; and while
he regarded it he shuddered anew, and writhed
as in sudden pain. What was he to do with
this? He could not bear it about with him
longerit seemed too like the child's voice
whispering in his ear; frail tress as it was, it
held him fast, as a cable, to the spot where the
deed had been done; its brassy clasp glared
upon him like a serpent's eye. It seemed to
him now like the dead boy's legacyfor he had
taken it almost from his hand; carrying with
it, at all seasons of day and night, its own
avenging conditions. What was to be done
with it? At this moment, and while the
question
demanded, every minute, an answer more
loudly, a shrunken and troubled face looked in
at one of the windows of the walk. It was the
face of an old man, who, full of an anguish
different
ah!
how different, from that of
Leycraft
had
wandered in the suburbs, many days,
and many weary, weary nights, too, and who
had strayed, in the vacancy that had come
upon
him, to that place. It was Hobbleshank;
who, when he had gathered thought to peruse
the person before him more closely, and saw
what unearthly look had settled in his features
how white, and trenched with deep, dark
lines as it was, like a scarred coffin-plate it
seemedrecoiled from the window, and gave
signs of retreating altogether.
For Heaven's good sake! cried Leycraft,
in a tone of anguish that went to the old man's
heart, don't leave me now. Stay only an
hour or so, if not so long, five minutes may do;
five minutes, at least. Come, come, you'll
give me five minutes!
The old man returned to the window, but
resisted steadily all entreaty to come in.
This is cruel! said Leycraft, aloud, and
then, partly to himself, the last man with
whom I shall change word; and he won't give
me his company as a Christian, but stands there
gazing through a window on me, as if I were a
wild beast at a show.
At that moment, Leycraft, who had bent
down while uttering these words to himself,
raised his head and caught the eye of the old
manhis neck stretched forward its utmost
lengthfastened on the bracelet which he held
in his open hand. He caught it back at once,
and restoring it quickly to its enclosure, thrust
it into his breast.
There was something fearful in that old
man's face, now that the light fell upon it;
it was the very face that had watched him all
through the night, in the garret of the
farm-house
,
and against which he had contended.
This was another blow that staggered him on
swifter to his fate. He went on stranding and
coiling the rope, holding every feature rigid,
and bracing his nerves with all his will, lest
his purpose should give way. The cord was
finished. Leycraft rose up, wiped his brow,
on which a cold, thick sweat had gathered
went to the window, and while Hobbleshank
could not move in his surprise, he placed in
his hand the parcel he had concealed.
There, said he, take that; it's a bequest
from a man that will never know man more.
It's the gift of a young friend, the dearest I
ever had, and I wish you'd make much of it.
He then proceeded, without another word,
to put every utensil of the walk in its place;
coiled up the rope he had made with so much
care, in the crown of his hat; closed the
windows
,
leaving Hobbleshank without, lost in
vague wonder and alarm; drew to the door,
and putting the key in a safe concealment,
where the other workmen might find it when
they cameas they would in an hour or two
he withdrew from the walk, which was now
dark, and close as a tomb. He shaped his way
toward the river, looking back not once, but
choosing the obscurest paths and bye-ways,
and following them steadily. Once he leaped
a wall, and crouching as he ran, he skirted
along the fence for half a mile or more, and
then he got into an untravelled road, where he
made good speed, and with a comfortsuch
comfort as his condition allowedto himself.
In leaving this he was forced to pass a public
way where there was a constant throng of
travel; and, while in act of crossing,
hearing
the rattling of wheels from the city, he fled
into a blackberry meadow, and there lay hid in
the bushes for better than an hour.
He was now within sight of the woods; and
when, emerging from his ambush, his eye first
fell upon them, he shrunk back, and his feet
for a moment refused to bear him on. It was
an instant only; and then he laughed to
himself
at his folly in spoiling the good gait he had
been travelling.
At the woodsthe black, dull, hemlock
woods, which lay like a dark stain upon the
earthhe did not enter at a point which would
bear him soonest to the place he sought; but
fetched a circuit of better than a furlong, and
looking about him with a trembling eye, he
crept into them, as if by stealth. The sun had
not yet made good his strength, and the woods
still swarmed with bats and birds of darkness,
which kept about, and shut back the light by
the wide-spread wings with which they
oppressed
the air. Under foot the ground was
heavy with a sluggish sweat, rather than dew,
and through blind paths and among tufts of
useless grass, Leycraft picked his way;
winding
about in long circles, and only approaching
the spot by degrees. His eyes wandered
between
the trees, as though a phantom were
walking just before him; if he had cast a look
upward but once, he would have seen how
blue and peaceful was the sky above himbut
this he heeded not. He had come to the edge
of a by-path that cut through the woods; in a
minute more and he would be on the very spot
itself. He paused and sat upon a fallen trunk
to gather his strength. What he had done
and what he was to do came upon him in all
their hideousness, and his heart misgave him.
He would have retreated if he could. At that
moment he heard a step approaching; a man
passed by, and as Leycraft looked out, oh how
his soul begged and implored that he would
come and reason with him, and steal from his
heart the purpose which clung like a dagger in
its very core! The cold sweat stood upon his
brow, in the agony with which he was moved.
The man bore in his hand a walking-stick,
with which, with a determined look, he smote
a tall weed that grew in the path, to the ground.
There was clearly no hope for Leycraft. He
sprung up, and almost at a bound, stood upon
the earth where, more than twenty years ago
he had cast down a young child, as he would a
frail vessel, that all its life might be spilled
and never gathered up again. He knew the
placeknew it at once, down to the smallest
blade that grew about. The rock was there,
under the lee of which the basket that held the
child had been set; the old gnarled branch
stretched over itolder now than when it
shook its young summer leaves upon the ground.
Every circumstance and incident of the act
rushed back into his mind with a fearful
distinctness
.
How he had borne the child from
the farm-house in his armsthe very look of
the nurse who had intrusted it to him in the
belief that a little air would be so reviving and
refreshing to the poor dearhow, when he
heard the laugh and prattle of young children
at play in an orchard through which he passed,
he had repented of any part in the deedand
how, again, when he bethought him of the rage
of the broker, and the spite he would wreak
on him through the debtor's jail, he had hurried
on. There was one good thought, too, that
came back: that when he had laid the child
where he was to be left to diefor his soul
refused
to do it rougher violencehe had lifted
a leaf, shed by the overhanging branch upon
its little lips, so giving it another chance to
live. He remembered, too, how he had severed
the bracelet about its neck, in twain, taking
one of its parts and leaving the other, with the
hope that the child, should it live to escape its
perilous exposure, might be recognised and
reclaimed
.
As he was pondering, the dead child seemed
to spring from the ground, rising slowly upon
him, and growing rigid in every limb as he
rose, until he stood regarding him with a fixed
stony eye, his little arm stretched toward him
in menace, more terrible than if it had been a
mailed hand aimed against his breast. He
staggered before it. The wind, which had been
gathering since sunrise, swept through the
wood with a howl like that of an angry
populace
.
Leycraft, whose face and brow dripped
with sweat, and whose body was as chill and
comfortless as if it had been steeped in the
river, east a fearful glance behind him, and
snatching off his hat in desperate haste, he
stepped upon the rock, and made fast an end
of the cord to the old branch, which the tree
held out like a withered arm toward him. The
tree creakedthere was an awful groan, and
the forfeit was paid. At that moment a crow
flew screeching from a neighboring tree-top
straight through the wood, and, as it rose
toward the clouds that lowered on its flight, it
seemed like the dark spirit of the man, on its
way to the angry heaven whose judgment he
had dared to invoke.
CHAPTER XXVI.
HOBBLESHANK'S RETURN.
Upon
the ground where he had fallen in the
shock of surprise and bewilderment, Hobble
shank sat, with the trinket in his hand, which
seemed to hold him spell-bound and motionless.
As he recovered his powers, and was aware of
the gift in his charge, he would have shouted
to Leycraft, and called him back, but, when he
looked in the direction he had taken, Leycraft
was out of sight.
The clasp was discolored as if often held in
a damp hand; but the tress, its other part, was
fresh and bright, in its auburn hues, as when
first set in its place; and as he turned it over
and over again, his tears fell fast upon it, for
he knew wellwho could mistake it?the
sweet brow, now lying in the earth, from which
it had been shorn. Then he recalled what the
strange man had said. It's the gift of a
young friend, the dearest I ever had, and I
wish you'd make much of it! He repeated
them over and over again. Yes, those were
the words. And then a hope came floating
into
his mind that was like a new life and air to
all his powers; a hope that filled his heart with
a genial noon, in which all old despondencies,
and sorrows, and sadnesses, shrunk away, and
left him glad and happy, beyond measure. The
boyhis childhis young selfso the words
gave him warrantwas not dead. He had
lived to be the companion of grown men; to be
with them, and with them share friendship and
intimacies. So he construed what Leycraft
had said. He bounded up, and choosing out
the fairest of all the roads, he took his way to
the city. It was a green path; and the trees,
which had stepped to the road-side from a
neighboring wood, for that very purpose, bent
over the traveller, and whispered peace and a
pleasant journey to him. Then he came to
bare fences, along which the small-eyed birds
hopped and twittered, making merry with the
old man as he came galloping along. After
this, there was an open tract of sky and field
about which the swallows flew swiftly, writing
their names in the air, and tying all sorts of
hard knots as they skimmed along, backward
and forward, and up and down.
At the pace with which he speeded on, he was
soon in the edge of the city. The bells, for
some reason or other, were ringing a quick
peal; if they had been the voices of angels
hovering
in the air, they could not have sounded
more sweetly to Hobbleshank.
He came to a park or square, in which
children
were at play, and bursting through a gate,
he borrowed from a little blue-eyed ladwho
yielded it partly in fear, partly in lovethe
hoop on which he was restingthe old man
sprang away like the youngest of them all,
and, in the madness of his new hope, drove it
round and round the park, humming to himself,
It's the gift of a young friend, the dearest I
ever had, and I wish you'd make much of it!
Leaving the park, with thanks to his young
friend, whom he had caught in his arms and
blessed with kisses that exploded like so many
squibs through the place, he rambled
breathless
,
but by no means wearied, into a great
16
thoroughfare. Here he found new objects to
feed his rapture. There were caps and canes,
and dainty little Wellington-boots in the shops,
in which the haughtiest parent, the show-bill
said, might be proud to see his son eating
ices and walking Broadway.
How often, ah, how often, during his
twenty
years of sore trial and anguish, had the old
man rambled from window to window, from
shop-door to shop-door, choosing a little
bluetasselled
cap at one, a pearl-tipped cane at
another, and the jauntiest pair of Wellingtons
he could pitch his eye upon at anotherand,
in his fancy, arraying the boy who should have
been so apparelled, and at that moment
walking
,
with a little hand in his, at his side! He
had so taken the child from the day he was lost,
and carried him forward, in imagination,
through all the stages of childhood and youth,
up to the manhood, where, if but now living,
he would have arrived.
He well remembered the very day on which
the child had attained his quizzical, bird-like
swallow-tail, which the doating old man had
picked out and even bargained for, months
before
.
Pondering upon these old pleasures, his
feet had brought him, almost without the
guidance
of his will, to a door in a by-street, the
red and yellow board over which denoted that
a select school for children was kept within.
He opened the gate, the trick of which he
knew well, walked through a paved alley,
and turning in at a door half way up, was in
the very heart and bosom of the select school
at once. The select schoolmistresshis old
friend and who knew his humor wellwas
seated in a well-worn rocker in the middle of
her little room, arrayed in her plain neat gown
and cap, her book open on her lap, her arms
folded upon her breast, and watching, with a
kindly look, through her great glasses, the
efforts
of a tiny white-haired child, to master the
twenty-sixth letter of the alphabet.
Hobbleshank
laid off his hat, took his seat at the side
of the mistress, who had not even turned when
he came in, although the whole row of little
scholars stared in a line from the bench on
which they were fixed against the wall. They
all knew the old man, but it was so long now
since he had been at the school, that they could
not avoid a welcome with their looks. What a
tuneful nest, embowered in its obscure corner,
had that little school been to him! How his
eye had ranged, as his finger would on a
musical
instrument, along the class, beginning at
the least and youngest, and sounding his way
up, fancying each in turn to be his child and
son. They had caught his look and loved him
for it. His joy was too overflowing, too much
in excess, to admit of his tarrying long there
or anywhere; and so, leaving a tribute of
good-will
in the mistress's hand, to be distributed
among the scholars, and begging in her ear for
a half-holyday for the school, he broke away
and was in the street again.
Even the three gilt balls which hung dan
gling over the broker's door in the street
through which he hurried, and which used to
look so hideous to him, now seemed to have a
gleam of sunshine and promise in them. There
was another street, the next to his, through
which he could not fail to pass. Here, years
before, he had formed an intimacy, a very close
and friendly intimacy, with a clothier's block
which stood at the corner (to be sure it had no
head, your finely-dressed gentlemen rarely
have), swelling and expanding its breast in all
the splendors of a blue frock and pantaloons,
with a handsome white vest and ruffles to
match. The intimacy lasted six months,
during
which the old man had paid a daily visit
to his silent friend, when it was abruptly
broken
off, because Hobbleshank was quite sure
his son must by that time have outgrown
garments
of that gentleman's cut and dimensions.
Farther on, and still nearer the heart of the
city, Hobbleshank, hurrying along in a joyous
moodhe had directed his feet that waycame
upon a house in which, even at broad day, there
was a sound of music, a throng of carriages at
the door, and the very house itself palpitating
and quaking with the pulses of the gay dance
that was going on within. The old man had
a good heart to join in on the very flagging
where he stood, for the house and he were old
and early friends. Far back in that past time,
whence dated, in two directions, all his joys
and sorrows, it had been Aunt Gatty's; there
it was that Hobbleshank had first met his young
wife; there had been wedded to her; and there
had spent many a joyous night, when the world
was young with him, and when even old Aunt
Gatty had wealth and kind words more at
command
than now. As he stood by the door,
gossiping
with the drivers and other loungers
gathering what he could of the story of the
wedding that was going forward, and
comparing
it as he went along with the
circumstances
of his ownhis heart reproached him for
tarrying there, and withholding his good
fortune
from his two kind old friends at home.
Casting a bright half-dollar upon the ground
where he left the coachmen, who had been for
a long time scant of calls, scrambling for it
he hurried away. At the good speed with which
he moved, and by dint of running in and out
from street to pavement, from pavement to
streetnot less than forty times, he was in no
very long time at his own door, which he
confessed
to himself had something of an
outlandish
look, now that he had been absent from it
so long.
Bursting in to declare his news, he was
arrested
in the very mid-career of his exultation,
by a deep moan, proceeding from the corner of
the chamber. Looking thither he was
inexpressibly
shocked, and stood rooted at the very
threshold. In the corner of the room, close in
the remotest angle of the hearth, bent nearly
double (ten years at least older in her look than
when he had left her), and gazing into
vacancy
,
sat Aunt Gatty, clad in deep mourning.
even to her small crimped cap, which, jet-black
and fitted closely to her head, gave to her
features
a pale and deathly aspect. At her side
stood Dorothy, tending on her in some office
suited to her condition, and striving to sooth
her with words of solace and comfort.
The aged woman refused to be comforted,
and thrust her companion away from her,
constantly
ejaculating, He is deaddead; and
I am the unlucky woman that killed him.
Is this the way that I fulfilled a deathbed trust?
God! oh, blessed God! and here she moaned
and pined as in an agony that wrung her very
soul. Deal gently with me for thisit was
not my wishhe would go forth; but then, I
should have held him back, even by force. Oh,
my dear, kind playfellownow in heavenis
this the way I have kept my promise? Look
not in God's book of records and see what is
against Gattyyour Gatty, you loved to call
me. Plague me no more, Dorothy, I have slain
the poor old man; go away, in Heaven's name,
and let me die. Go away.
Then, while Dorothy stood by, weeping and
wringing her hands over this mournful wreck,
the aged woman fell away into vacancy,
awaking
only every now and then to utter a
deep moan, and renew her complaint.
Hobbleshank, who had regarded all these
goings-on with a bewildered look, could
restrain
himself no longer, but, hurrying forward,
stood before themhis hat a little to one side,
where he had fixed it that his friends might
know at a glance what mood he was in, and
the great square breastpin, shining like an
illumination
in the front of his bosom. He stood
before themhis doubtful eye closed hard, and
the other opened in full blaze upon them, a
smile on his face, and a hand extended to each.
In this extraordinary costume and posture it
was some time before even Dorothy was
willing
to acknowledge him; and even after she
had admitted it was Hobbleshank and no
counterfeit
there
remained his right hand, still
extended, waiting to be grasped by Aunt
Gatty
.
It was a long time before Aunt Gatty was
willing to look at him; and when she did, at
length, turn her head slowly about and take
measure of his person, she regarded him with
infinite scorn and repulsion.
It's a cheat, she said, after a long survey,
and a longer pondering, you are practising
upon
me; this is not my old friend that I am to
account for; no, no! Don't you think I know
my good friend Hobbleshank? This is some
one that has stolen his garments and is trying
to play tricks with me. She returned to her
old posture, and could be brought by no
persuasion
or entreaty to a further recognition.
We must leave her to herself, said
Dorothy
,
drawing Hobbleshank apart; you
will get back into her recollection by degrees.
It takes days with her now to fix and unfix a
notion. She will presently fall asleep.
They watched her for a little while, when
slumber, coming in to befriend exhausted na
ture, crept upon her, and bearing her to her
bed within, and laying her gently to rest, they
returned to the other chamber. Hobbleshank,
reviving rapidly from the gloom which Aunt
Gatty had cast upon his spirits, took a place
by a small table that Dorothy had drawn out,
and launched forth in a glowing description of
the good luck on which he had so lately
stumbled
.
Dorothy, who could not share in all the
good hopes which he built on the disclosure of
the stranger and the possession of the
half-bracelet
,
did, nevertheless, strengthen and
encourage
Hobbleshank to go on in these
communications
,
by a cold ham, which she produced
from a closet, where it had stood untasted and
inviting the knife for several days; and also
by calling inthrough the ministry of a
ragged-haired
and bare-footed girl, who was
always
on the prowl for small errands in the
great halla pot of Albany-brewed and two
dozen oysters, which, the last being well
peppered
and swallowed at a snap, added not a
little
to the spirit of the old man's narration.
CHAPTER XXVII.
A NOTABLE SCHEME OF MR. FYLER CLOSE.
There
was not a phase of the neighboring
sick man's malady, from the day he
mis-but-toned
his coat in the yardto which pass he
was brought, being a tradesman, by the fall of
wheat from twenty shillings to ten at a clap
down to that when he was laid shouting on his
bed, that Fyler Close had not watched. By
the hour he stood at his windowforgetting
baker, blacksmith, and haberdasher, in the
earnest
gaze with which he regarded every turn
of the disease, while the patient rambled the
yard, in its early stages, or lay strapped upon
his couch at its height. The tears, the groans,
the whims, the flights and wanderings of the
lunatic, were a delicious banquet to Fyler.
He meant to cut with a weapon of double edge,
and this sharpened it, both sides at once. The
deed was foundthere could be no question of
thatwhich helped Hobbleshank back into the
farm-house whence Fyler had dislodged him,
by a master-stroke, many years ago. Should
he succeed in recovering possession, there
would be a long and heavy arrear of rents to
be returned. This would never do. The boy,
to be sure, must be foundmust be proved to
be alive. Notwithstanding the bold and hardy
face with which he gave out that such as would
find the child must grope in the earth, digging
deep, an uneasy conviction that he lived kept
crowding into his mind. Vague rumors to this
effect, traceable to no clear source, it is true,
had from time to time prevailed. He knew of
Leycraft's death; Ishmael had brought in the
news the second day after. He had been found
on his knees, the branch bent and twisted from
its place by an unearthly struggle, his head
turned to one side, as if regarding an object
that stood at his side, just behind himand his
hands clasped firmly together.
Fyler, on hearing these circumstances, had
merely called the man a fool, wondered he
hadn't taken poison, which would have been a
quieter deathand dismissed the subject,
apparently
from his mind. To be sure, he had
had an unpleasant vision the night after, in
which Leycraft appeared, on his knees,
knocking
at the door of his closet, and begging, in
God's name, to be let in. But what of that?
The dream had passed away; and getting up
the next morning a quarter of an hour earlier
than usual, he opened his door cautiously, and
finding no such supplicant thereas, in truth,
he had half expected tohe put himself at ease.
Then there was the bracelet, which he knew
Leycraft had carried on his person for years,
but which Ishmael's stealthy scrutiny had failed
to find there now, another clew to the child.
The cloud, he confessed to himself, began to
thicken a little; and now he meant to clear all
obstacles and entanglements at a bound. In
a few days the forge was silent; the anvil
uttered not so much as a tinklethe broker
had levied his judgment, which had hung
dangling
,
like a great chain, for months over the
blacksmith's head: the blacksmith's fire was
quenched, and his hammers muffled for ever.
A few days more, and the haberdasher
thriftless
womanwas forced to send her children
out privily to beg; Fyler had swept her shop
with a comprehensive bill of sale. The piano
in the yellow house had gone gouty in the legs
long ago; and was now taken to the hospital
in the square, out of a movement of pure
benevolence
in the bosom of Mr. Close. As to
the baker, on a close scrutiny of accounts, the
broker, finding a clear balance against himself
of four-and-threepence, with a fraction, thought
it not expedient to move him just at present.
All that remained was the Row, to show to the
world that Fyler Close was worth a cent; and
Fyler chanted a psalm to the tune of a rattling
song he had heard at a cheap place of
entertainment
when he was a young man, with
great spirit, as he chinked the silver in his
hand and thought of this. He had finished the
psalm, and, getting into a more advanced
stage of pleasantry, was striving, with
whimsical
success, to adapt some common-metre
measure
that he might recall, to the fitful shouts of
his neighbor, when Mr. Small came in,
bearing
upon his left arm a pile of clothes, hung
loosely over, and in his right a crook-necked
staff, with which he had thrust the door open,
and which he now employed in putting it to
again. Upon his head, covering and
extinguishing
the glory of his own individual cap,
rested a straw hat, stretching out before and
behind, twisted up convulsively at the sides,
and discolored and stained in every strand with
sweat. Mr. Small might have been mistaken
by a rash observer, at first sight, as he stood
resting on his crook, for a patriarch gone to
seed. The broker knew him for what he was,
and hailed him at sight.
This is a melancholy affair, Ishmael, said
the broker, shaking his head dolefully.
It can't be helped? asked Ishmael, while
a lurking smile crept upon his visage.
I am afraid it can't, rejoined Mr. Close;
I don't see how I can avoid going out of my
wits.
Anyhow, Uncle Fyler, said Ishmael, I
hope for my sake you'll not go so far you can't
come back again. You'll be good enough to
recollect that.
It's very painful, though, continued
Fyler
;
here am I, Ishmael, this morning in full
possession of all my faculties, according to
human
observation, equal to a calculation in
compound
interest, or the drawing of a mortgage,
with extra conditions and policy-clauses
before
night what'll I be?
I'm afraid to say, said Ishmael, starting
back and lifting both hands, as though to shut
out a disagreeable vision.
But I'm not, answered Fyler, twitching
his whiskers, a miserable wreck, an insane
rag-picker; what'll be my business? To go
about running into gutters, and poking
street-pools
and rag-heapsand I shouldn't wonder
if it disagreed with me so much as to make me
twist my face and beat myself, and do such
goings-on
that everybody'll say, `Fyler has lost
his reason.'
I shouldn't wonder, echoed Mr. Small,
and at the prospect of so cheerful a result,
presented so vividly, both Fyler and Ishmael
broke into a gentle laugh.
Was
he
in his right mind always? asked
Fyler, looking up edgewise at Ishmael from
where he sat, allowing his glance to rest a
moment
,
in its way, upon the garments over his
arm. Was the owner of these always right?
Wonderfully so, answered Ishmael; the
very sanest picker I ever knew. He was a
extraordinary
chap, that old fellow, pursued
Mr. Small, he would pick a couple of
hogsheads
a day, sir, and, with a run, jump over
'em at night, standing on end, as lively as a
grasshopper in the first line o' business. He
had a ambition above rags, and that was the
ruin of him. One morningit was a lovely
onethe baker's winders was all full of
smoking
rolls and fresh gingerbread, the
milk-wagons
was on the jump, and the red-cheeked
chambermaids puttin' their houses into clean
faces, like queens'our friend goes out in
prime spirits to pick a little before breakfast.
There was a big heap in Hanover square to
be overhauled that afternoon, and the thoughts
of that before him put him in such a flow, he
could hardly hold in for joy. Well, sir, he
was a-goin' along all well enough, till he comes
to 'Publican alley, and there he balkedhe
wanted to be an old-clo' man, and there was
something up that alley that tempted him worse
than a evil spirit. He couldn't hold back; so
up the alley he bolts, leaving his basket (which
he begun to be ashamed of), at the mouth; he
comes to a airy, a very deep but very delicious
airy, too, for there, as he peeps through the
railin', he sees that vicious old coat that was
to be his undoin', a hangin' in its old place
over the back of a chair, close up by the
winder
;
the winder was upthe old chap listened
there was nobody stirrin'he laid himself
close up against the rail, and stretched down
his stick till he gets the old feller by the
collar
,
and begins to tug. Tuggin' was fatal work;
he was too wiolent; the gate he was leanin'
agin gives waythe gratin' to the coalhole
was upthe old chap pitches headlong in, and
slidin' on his belly to the very bottom, cracks
his neck. There was the vanity of 'spirin'
above his sphere! He was a bosom-friend o'
mine; and as he forgot to mention me in his
will, I bought his hat and trousers and stick
and basket, from the crowner's man, for a
couple of plugs, to remember him by. They
was cheap at that!
I wonder if they would fit me, Ishmaelit
would be curious to try, wouldn't it?
The broker lifted the garments gently from
Ishmael's arm, displaced the hat, and,
possessing
himself of the crook and basket, placidly
withdrew to his closet, leaving Mr. Small
leaning
against the casement, his cap jauntily
cocked and one leg crossed upon the other,
regarding
the broker as he withdrew with a look
of the profoundest admiration and respect. It
was capitally done, that he couldn't deny.
In a few minutes, during which audible
laughter, kept pretty well under though, had
resounded from the closet, an outlandish
figure
appeared from its concealments, locking
the door carefully behind and thrusting the key
in a pocket. It wasn't the broker. Ishmael,
unbending from the posture he had maintained,
and spreading himself, with a hand on either
knee after the manner of a jockey making
himself
familiar with the points of a horse on show,
said it wasn't Fyler Closehe'd stake his life
on itit wasn't Fyler.
The figure moved out upon the floor, as if to
give Mr. Small an opportunity to confirm his
impressions. They couldn't be shaken; he
clung to his first belief. There was the old
yellow hat, which helped the face underneath
it to a look so small and shrunken; then the
roundabout and trowsers, loose and flaunting,
and washed by a thousand showers and sweats
and stains, out of all color. No reasonable
man could have thought of going out of his
senses (even from an overgrown coat and short
pantaloons), into such an ill-assorted apparel.
Moving up and down, the figure, keeping a
hard, steady countenance, proceeded to fish
with the crooked stick which he carried in his
hand, in various sections of the apartment as
in imaginary pools, and drew up from time to
time supposititious strips of canvass and linen,
which, with great care and skill, he deposited
in the bottom of a basket that hung upon his
arm. Excellent! Ishmael protested that it
brought his friend the picker back so vividly
before his mind, that it was as much as he
he could do to refrain from shedding tears.
After
practising in this way for better than a
quarter of an hour, the figure came and halted
before Ishmael, letting the arm which held the
basket fall its full length, and in the other
holding
the stickas is the established custom of
pickerswith its crook downward, and
regarding
Mr. Small with melancholy steadiness of
visage.
I'm a poor old man, now, Ishmael, said
the old gentleman; very poorworth not so
much as Mrs. Lettuce. By-the-by, Ishmael,
isn't it strange, Mrs. Lettuce has never called
for that balance on the mortgage in the
master's
hand? It was just three shillings and a
penny, and it's very wrong in her not to look
to it. You should mention it when you see
her. It's flying in the face of Providence not
to look after her own. Have you seen the poor
woman lately, Ishmael?
Ishmael averred that he had, in the
market
.
What did she say, Ishmaeldid she seem
to bear her fortune meekly?
She said, answered Ishmael, who was
bursting with suppressed satisfaction at the
masterly manner in which the old gentleman
was carrying it offShe said, sir, that you
was one of the greatest scoundrels that ever
went unhung; that you had robbed her of her
radishes, and 'sparagus, and stockings, and
money, and character, like a heathen
boy-constrictor
,
she called it; and she'd see, sir,
whether
she wouldn't have satisfaction out of you
yet!
I wonder what the poor old woman's
living
on that makes her so savage? asked Mr.
Close, mildly.
As far as I can learn, answered Ishmael,
for the last fortnight on b'iled turnip-tops
not such a very violent species of food.
Where does she get boiled turnip-tops, I'd
like to know? asked Mr. Close, whose eyes
began to gleam a little.
They're given to her by her old friends in
the market, replied Ishmael; but they've
cut off the supply, at lastit sp'ilt the sale.
She'll beg a couple of weeks more, with an
old cloak and red handkercher, they all say,
and then she'll go to the almshouse.
The best thing the poor creature can do,
said Fyler; I thought so long ago. She'll be
much more comfortable there than out of doors
blabbing secrets and ripping up old stories of
no use to any one.
The interview with Mr. Small concluded,
the broker saying that he had a heavy day's
work before himfour squares and better than a
dozen streets to scourpulled open the door, and
went forthIshmael following at a distance.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
THE BURNING OF CLOSE'S ROW.
At
day-wages the broker could not have
toiled more painfully. Early and late he was
busy, with stick and basket, in alley, highway,
and thoroughfare. He groped every kennel,
and questioned every heap in the ward. After
a shower he might be seen hovering about the
street-pools like a buzzard. If he had been a
picker from infancy he could not have driven
his trade with more diligence. He was
especially
careful to ply his business where he
would fall under the eye of certain gentlemen,
pointed out to him by the vigilance of Mr.
Small, as possessing a talent for observation,
and an obliging disposition in coming forward,
which would render them very useful in the
event of any little matter of Mr. Close's being
brought before the courts. This was a class
of sharp-eyed small tradesmen, who were
always
in their doors, or at the corner, or
coming
through a street, or passing to a ferry, or
doing
something or other which enabled them to
be eye-witnesses of more than half the
stage-accidents
,
brawls, frays, and other
street-incidents
of the whole city. As Fyler passed the
doors of these vigilant observers, he would
place his basket on the ground, his crook lying
across it, and proceed to rap his forehead with
great violence with his knuckles; which
performance
over, he would take up his basket and
proceed to his work, knocking his brow
steadily
through the day, at the rate of about three
dozen knocks to a square. There was, among
his prospective witnesses, one in particular
a dealer in crockeryof such an extremely
acute turn of mind, as to have been known, in
a case of manslaughter, tried at the Oyer and
Terminer, to have seen the blow struck,
standing
in his own shop-door and looking through
two bow-windows to the other side of a corner
where the affray had happened; identifying
the prisoner by the color of his hair. There
was a valuable man for Mr. Close! and when
he came along the front of his shop the
knocking
was very violent and long-continued, and
varied by a succession of lively leaps over the
basket, back and forth, as it stood upon the
ground.
Ishmael, in the meantime, performed the
part cast to him, by happening in the
neighborhoods
where Fyler plied his calling, and taking
occasion to point him out to various doctors, as
a worthy old gentleman (reduced in
circumstances
),
a little beside himself, and whom he
would be sorry to see committing any violence,
such as braining a child or the like. They
had furnished him with certificates of his
condition
,
and, learning that he was a friend of
the poor old gentleman's, begged him, in
Heaven's
name, to take him straight to Bellevue.
One nightFyler had been missed from all
his customary rounds that daytoward its
close, there was a portentuous cry sounded
through the city. A flame, no larger than a
man's hand, had been seen to flicker through
the ground window of a wooden building, and
presently the whole city was astir. At first
two or three distracted men in leathern hats
they had been the first to discover itran up
and down the adjacent streets, shouting at the
top of their lungs, Fire! fire! Then a score
or two of neighbors tumbled out of their beds,
and taking it up, with the scantiest possible
apparel for a public appearance, hurried about
the block echoing the cry. Then other
distracted
people, bursting out at front doors,
which went to after them with a crash,
scrambling
up from cellars or down from garrets
where they lodged, tore through the streets.
Presently a reinforcement of men in leathern
hats appeared, rushing in wherever there was
a lane, or square, or alley, and renewing the
shout, Fire! fire! From various taverns and
rooms about the city where dancing had been
kept up to a late hour, certain young
gentlemen
,
casting off their coats and leaving them
in charge of their fair partners, by which it
appeared, when the red shirts came to be
disclosed
that they were volunteer firemen in
disguise
,
broke into the street, rushed distractedly
about for a few minutes, until they had fixed
their gripe upon an engine-rope, when, setting
forward, they aimed with many others in a like
plight, for the spot where the blaze was now
mounting into a beacon-light.
The throng and tumultwhich deepened
every minutecentred about a row of wooden
buildings standing in a back yard. The flame
had a sure hold upon his prey, and coiled round
striking it over and over again, in some new
and vulnerable point with its tongues of fire.
Every bell in the metropolis was now
sounding
,
and new forces came hurrying into the
yard; the engines clattered over the fence
which had been thrown down, and began to
take their orderthe flame seemed to know it
all, thrusting out a broad red face from the
windows to welcome them, skipping with a
nimble step up and down the stairs, and
dancing
about the roof, and in the very eaves for
joy, to see so many friends about. The crowd
swelled till it overflowed, not only that yard,
but the next and the next, and all the
neighboring
streets.
The roofs, stoops, and windows, all about
were filled with faces that glowed in the flame;
and even on the housetops, far away, a single
figure, sometimes more, might be descried
standing out against the sky. The hoarse
trumpets of the engineers soundedthe hose
had been dropped in the cisternsthere was a
thumping of engine-arms, a thin jet of muddy
water rose against the flame, and the fire
bounded up, livelier than ever. The supply
had given out. The river was tried, and now
they would have gone on triumphantly, had
not a discovery been made to the effect that all
the tall men on the engines were wasting their
strength in hoisting up certain short
gentlemen
and half-grown youths, who had fastened
upon the engines, that they, the short
gentlemen
,
might be in reach of the arms to do their
part in bringing them down again. As soon
as this was amendedby ejecting the short
gentlemen and their associates, in a body,
peremptorily
from the yard, from returning to
which they were only restrained by the
officers'
staves that began to ply aboutthey
made head. The inmates now came hurrying
outmen, women, and childrenbearing in
their arms some little worthless trifle, and
casting
a frightened look back upon the burning
row. There was one, a stout man, who
carried
in his arms, as tenderly as though it had
been a child, a glass case shrouded in crape,
which concealed, as might be guessed by such
glimpses as the flame allowed, what seemed
some child's toy or other. Then a lean man,
with great staring eyes, came out with a run,
and looked about him as though something had
happened on a much grander scale than he
had expected. As soon as this person had
recovered
himself a little, he borrowed from one
of the companies a couple of fire-buckets,
filling
which constantly (although some
considerable
rents in the sides and bottoms prejudiced
his labors not a little), he did what he could,
running back and forth, toward extinguishing
the fire. They had now all escaped from
the row except one; and that one (the stout
cobbler), instead of descending quietly like a
Christian and good citizen, was seen tramping
and dancing about the roof like a madman;
throwing his hat into the air and catching it,
with other demonstrations of the wildest joy.
He and the fire seemed to understand each
other well. They shouted to him to come
down, to little purpose; they sent up huge jets
of water, and these he shook from his ears like
a great dog that liked the sport. Even a
fireman
,
who had acquired a great name by his
prowess in bringing old men and women out
of dormer windows, down the long ladder, and
who had been constantly climbing up and down
the same and calling to any that might be
lurking
there, roasting privily, to come outeven
he had gone to the very top round and
besought
the cobbler in vain. In his own good
time, and when everybody thought there was
no escape for hima minute before the roof
tumbled inhe came hand over hand down the
lightning-rod, fixed against the gable, and
reached the ground without a scratch. Once
down, instead of employing his time in
rescuing
what he could, he devoted himself with
extraordinary
ardor to casting such articles of
furniture, bedposts, chairs, or utensils, as he
could lay hands on, into the flames; which,
hurrying from point to point, he kept feeding
as he would a hungry dog that had found great
favor in his eyes for the very force of his
appetite
.
So the cobbler kept the fire alive, and
diminished more and more the stock of
property
whose distinctions it was his pleasure to
loathe and help to level.
Whenever a rafter yielded, or a heavy
timber
fell in, a spare old figure, apparently
availing
himself of the new light that flamed up the
sky and fell back reflected on the earth, was
seen stealing about, bearing a basket on his
arm, and in his hand a crooked stick, with
which he drew from the heaps small, charred
bits of wood and worthless cinders, and filled
his basket.
At times he paused in his painstaking task,
and going about to the circle nearest to the fire,
he removed his hat, and, extending it to each
in turn, begged piteously, both with look and
voice, for almsa penny onlya penny for a
ruined man. Whenever they refused him, as
they often did, not knowing him as the owner
of the burning row, he would turn away and
mutter in answer to questions which no one
had addressed to him.
You are right, sir, he would say, the
man's leg was out of joint, and General
Washington
thought a potato poultice just the thing.
Then, going a few steps forward, he would
pause at a heap, and begin counting cinders
into his basket, as though it had been so much
solid coin. Such as knew the broker heaved
a sigh of compassion. Fyler Close was
certainly
distractedgone mad, beyond all
controversy
.
No wonder, they said to
themselves
;
such a blowmeaning the burning of
his buildingswas enough to unsettle any
man's senses.
Ishmael, too, was on the ground, displaying
a praiseworthy and astonishing activity in his
endeavors to save what he could from the
wreck, so as not to bankrupt the Phnix
company
at once! Every other minute he was
diving into the row, at the seeming peril of his
neck, but taking good care to emerge at an
early opportunity by means of an outlet on the
other side, which he knew of, tarrying in the
cellar only long enough to whistle such a tune
as might lead the by-standers to scamper off,
dropping whatever they had in their hands and
protesting that there was a goblin in the vault.
And when, at length, the flames reached the
lightning-maker's loft, there were a dozen
reports
or more in succession, a broad sheet of
all colors, blood-red and lightning-blue
predominating
,
shot up into the skythere was an
involuntary clapping of the hands on the part
of the juvenile portion of the crowdIshmael
stood by, as ardent, but more secret, in his
applause
than any. At the moment of the
illumination
which
had been duly announced in
advance by the explosionthe
lightning-maker
,
who was still busy with his impracticable
buckets, paused in his labors, and, looking up,
a smile crossed his pallid face. His works had
gone off to the satisfaction of his audience, and
he was almost content, although his wife and
children stood in the next yard with scarcely a
rag to their backs.
This brilliant display seemed to have a
peculiar
effect upon Mr. Close; for he ran about
while its brightness lasted with extraordinary
nimbleness, pointing it out to every one in the
yard, and saying, in a wild way, That's the
man, his name is John Augustus Jones, and
he owes me one and ninepence for tapping his
heels.
How mad the poor broker was! The fire
kept burning, although it began to yield
rolling
up smoke and flames, which, mixing
together
,
passed off in a turbid cloud toward the
river. The night itself was dark and gusty;
and the flames, at one time driven hither and
thither by the wind, laid eager hold of houses,
and sheds, and churches, so that had not men
flitting about with buckets driven them back,
the whole neighborhood would have been in a
blaze.
But now it began to yield, and the broker
moved about in its flickering light. He was
suddenly accosted by a person of a bluff
physiognomy
,
strengthened with huge black whiskers,
who, taking him by the arm, would have drawn
him quietly aside. Fyler turned, and,
regarding
him with a look of great steadfastness and
severity, requested his arm to wither. The
arm did not wither, but, on the contrary, seemed
to acquire, by the very behest, a greater
tenacity
of gripe; which, when Fyler discovered
it, he attributed to the circumstance of his
having
touched it with the wrong hand.
This will do, old chap, said the other,
transferring his hold to the collar and drawing
the broker about with very little regard to the
established usages of society; we've had
enough of this. These buildings were heavily
insured, and you're wanted down town on
business
.
Come, I know you well enough, Mr.
Fyler Close.
You lie, sir, allow me to say, rejoined the
broker, turning upon his assailant. I am
Barabbas, the king of the Jews, and my
mother's
Mary Scott, the clear-starcher, in
Republican
alley. I am Barabbas, I tell you, and you
owe me for the whiskers you've got on.
It won't do, Uncle, said the officer, it's
a capital fetch, but your primin's wet; you
must come. Whereupon, folding the broker's
arm closely in his own, and putting on the air
of his bosom friend, taking him out on a
pleasure
excursion against his will, he drew him
along. Some of the by-standers, who had been
moved by the affecting manner in which Fyler
had conducted himself through the evening,
murmured a little, but refrained from active
interference
.
Ishmaelwho had held himself
aloofand who, to tell the truth, had observed
the eye of the black-whiskered man more than
once fixed on his friend, during the fire, and
who noticed that he went off and returned,
whispering with another before he left (which
observations there had been, however, no
opportunity
to make known to Fyler), Ishmael
now stole close by his side and pressed his
hand.
Fyler knew the hand, and felt its pressure.
In that there was some hope yet.
CHAPTER XXIX.
THE ROUND-RIMMERS' COMPLIMENTARY BALL.
From
the point where the peninsula of brick
puts forth upon Chatham square, running or
walking along its base on the Bowery, a mile
or better out of town, and shooting along its
oblique side on Division street, gliding
gradually
off toward the East river at Scammel
street, or thereaboutslies the mighty province
of East Bowery. And over all the region of
East Bowery is spreadholding it in close
subjectionthe powerful clan of
Round-rimmers
;
a fraternity of gentlemen, who, in round
crape-bound hats, metal-mounted blue coats,
tallow-smoothed locks, and with the terrible
device of a pyramid, wrought of brassy
buttons
,
standing square upon their waistcoats,
carry terror and dismay wherever they move.
It isn't the crape-bound hatsgiving out to
the public, as they do, that the gentlemen who
wear them are dead to the great world of
watchmen and indefatigables, preachers and
practitioners of peace and amity. Nor is it
their strait-skirted blue coats, nor their brazen
pyramids, that make them a terror to all ages
and both sexes. Nor is it their independent
carriage in public, and the extreme freedom
with which they sway their arms. The true
secret of their power rather lies in the
circumstance
that they always rove in bands; that,
like the wolf, when one only is seen on the
prowl, the herd may be guessed to be close at
hand, ready to rush in and bear their brother
through whatever peril he may encounter
from the clandestine kissing of a woman to the
tripping-up and desecration of the corporate
person of the mayor. Now, it is well known
that these classical gentry have haunts of their
own, where no small-heeled boot or mustached
face is permitted to intrude; that they drink at
their own resorts; grow temperate and moral
in churches or chapels of their own; and that
they break-down or pigeon-wing, where a white
kid glove would, at a single wave, raise an
insurrection
.
And yet the Round-rimmers condescend to
join the common world in certain of their
observances
;
they have committees among
themselves
,
where small men swell into great, by
dint of volubility and intrigue. They make
presentations, after their fashion, to
distinguished
men; and give complimentary balls,
where they get a fever to a boiling pitch. It
was, in fact, with these very objects in view,
that the mighty brotherhood of Round-rimmers
resolved on irradiating the head of Mr.
Ambrose
De Grand Val with the splendors of a
grand complimentary ball, for the accuracy
with which he had chalked their floors and
mixed their punches, and the skill with which
he had guided them and their fair partners
through the mazes of a winter's dances. Of
course there was the calling of a meeting; the
passage of resolutionsvery tender and
affecting
as they touched upon the relations which
had existed between the parties, and very
flattering
when they came to mention Mr. De
Grand Val; and the appointment of a
committee
to preside over the arrangements. The
arrangements were made; the night had
arrived
.
The committee, on which were several
resolute
men, had determined on a bold stroke.
They meant to have this known, through all
coming time, as
the
ballthe grand
complimentary
ball, before which the lamps of all
future
balls should wax dim, and all future
committees
of arrangement stand abashed. It
should be a double-headed balla ball with
two great, overwhelming attractions. One of
them would be Mr. De Grand Val, the
distinguished
beneficiary, whose head was already
engraved on the ticket, with an entire
wheatsheaf
in one corner, in lieu of the more regular
accompaniment of a chaplet for his brow, and
a pair of long-legged doves, billing each other,
and going through a duet in the other. So far
good. In looking about for another, they
determined, in the abstract, that it should be a
politicianan eloquent, distinguished, and
popular
politician, of prepossessing manners and
agreeable address. Puffer Hopkins, who had
won such honor in the late contestwho was
hand and glove with several of the leading
members of the committee, was the very man;
and Puffer was invited to be present, which he
graciously acceded to, and requested to be in
readiness by a certain hour, to be put in a hack
by a branch of the general committee, who
would wait upon him to the ball.
Puffer, who was not sorry to avail himself
of so capital an opportunity to extend his fame
among the members of a powerful body, was
apparelled
and ready to a minute, having
approached
as nearly as was prudent to the costume of his
constituentshe dared not adopt the pyramid,
nor the flat locks, exactly, but he laid aside his
straps, and garnished his hat with a broad belt
of black riband. With the aid of the
committee
,
who called for him, he entered the
carriage
,
two aiding from within by seizing his
arms, and two from without by placing a hand
against his person, and thrusting it gently
forward
with a respectful pressure. The
supernumerary
committee-manfour inside
mounted
the box with the driver; the coach whirled
away; and, at a rattling pace, they were soon
at the mouth of the Bowery, or Vauxhall
gardens
the
royal pleasure-ground of the
Round-rimmers
the
extreme limit of their territory
on the westwhere the grand complimentary
ball was to be given. Two large variegated
lamps blazed in the front of the gate, to the
admiration of one or two hundred observant
boys; the blast of a trumpet, evidently blown
by a short-winded gentleman, from the
intermittent
nature of its peals, burst forth; and
Puffer, entering, was overwhelmed with the
gorgeousness and splendor of the spectacle that
broke upon him. In the first place, the
garden
,
to which he was a stranger, was filled
with treeswhich was a novelty in a New
York public gardensome short and bushy,
others tall and trim, hut actual trees. Then
there were a thousand eyes or better lurking
and glaring out in every direction, in the shape
of blue and yellow and red and white lamps,
fixed among the trees and against the stalls.
Then there was a fountain; and then, through
two rows of poplars, commanding a noble
perspective of two white chimneytops in the
rear, there stretched a floorthe ballroom-floor
itself. He had no further opportunity for
observation
,
for the committee, hurrying him away
lest he should be seen before the proper time
for his presentation to the company had
arrived
,
bore him to a small room aside, where he
found a separate pitcher of lemonade and an
honorary paper of sandwiches devoted to
himself
,
partaking of which, and being allowed
time to smooth his locks and dust his pumps,
he was carried forth into the air again. This
time he was borne by the committee, who stuck
close to his person, into a private path, so dark
and shady that a deed of blood might have
been quietly done upon him; winding in and
out among the shrubs whenever any of the
company
the
more tender-hearted of whom
affected
the place in couplescame in sight, until
they reached the extremity of the garden
opposite
that at which they had entered. The
chairman
of the committee gave a low whistle
there was a burst of music from the orchestra,
who swarmed in a box midway among the trees
like so many robin-redbreasts, and Puffer found
himself upon a platform, his hat in his hand,
his hand upon his waistcoat where his heart
lay, bowing to a large assemblage of both
sexes
,
who stood gathered upon the floor waving
handkerchiefs and shouting, shrieking, and
hallooing, a whole menagerie of welcomes. An
acute ear might have detected, in the pauses
of this tumult, a sound arising in a remote
quarter of the garden, resembling not a little
the blows a stout-handed cooper deals upon his
kegs, when he is anxious to fix or unfix their
hoops; thither two ambitious members of the
committee, who had been unable to agree
which should have the honor of attending Mr.
Hopkins upon the platform, had, by the advice
of mutual friends, withdrawn, and in a stall,
by the light of three or four blue and yellow
lamps, were proceeding to settle the point
according
to the established custom and usages
of Round-rimmers.
From his elevated position Puffer
commanded
a view of the entire spectacle as it moved
forward. Upon the floor, arranged in sets of
eight each, which had been momentarily
disturbed
by his reception, and which were now
re-formed, were a great number of young
gentlemen
in fancy pantaloons, of corduroy, white
jean, and nankin, close at the knee and
flaunting
at the ankle; collars rolled tight under the
chin over parti-colored neckerchiefs of
emphatic
blue or red, the smooth locks cropped
close behind, and the customary
brass-mounted
coats; ornamented with cauliflowers, or
large monthly roses at the buttonholes, and at
their sides an equal number of young ladies,
some of whom were red-nosed and
flat-breasted
,
and others of a rounded form and great
beauty of feature, in dazzling calicoes,
dangling
earrings, that shone through the night
like fireflies, kerchiefs of an equally emphatic
hue spread upon their breast, and ringlets
disposed
upon their brow with a glossy
smoothness
that emulated their partners. The
gentlemen
stood with their arms a-kimbo on their
hips; the ladies doing homage to their lieges
with faces turned smilingly upon them. The
band struck up, the couples dashed off,
throwing
out limbs with an unexampled vigor in
every
directionthe gentlemen thumping the
floor with their heels at every descentthe
ladies
mounting into the air and whizzing about,
till the dangling rings buzzed through the
trees like fireflies on the wing. Sometimes a
gentleman in the furor of his zeal, came
spanking
upon the floor; sometimes a lady, losing
balance
in the heat of her motion, dashed
headlong
into the ruffles of one of the stationary
young gentlemen off duty, who were gathered
in groups about the edges of the dance.
Suddenly
there was an abrupt pause in the
orchestra
,
every instrument down to the triangle
stood still, and the company, looking up in
wonder of the cause, saw that the orchestra to
a man was standing, and that every eye was
fixed, with painful earnestness, upon the other
end of the floor. The beneficiarythe
illustrious
De Grand Valhad come in sight. He
was in the hands of the committee; and the
committee were coming along as fast as the
crowd that hung upon their progress would
allow
them. Every now and then, a face,
smiling
and black-whiskered, was just visible for
a moment and disappeared again in the throng.
Then a hand might be discovered touching the
smiling face and flying off from it, as in a sort
of playful or affectionate spasm. This by no
means helped to abate the enthusiasm; the
orchestra
was excited beyond bounds. The
trombone
had climbed a tree, and was shaking down
lamps and green caterpillars ever so fast, in a
disordered state of mind brought on by
over-excitement
.
With many pauses, by slow
stages
,
they had reached the head of the floor,
where certain gentlemen, with blue ribands at
their buttonholes, who had restrained
themselves
with difficulty, rushed down the floor,
and seizing Mr. De Grand Val, whose body
was springing back and forth, in a series of
remarkable
congees at the rate of forty a minute,
tore him away and bore him to the foot of the
platform, from which Puffer and his committee
hung, watching their proceedings with a
wonderful
intensity of interest. De Grand Val was
at length got upon the stairs, so that he was
just above the heads; and then when those
immortal
legs burst into full view, the ardor,
which had kept in some sort of limits, burst
into demonstrations of affectionate admiration
that were touching to behold. The young
gentlemen clapped their hands, and made
inward
comparisons with their ownthe young
ladies sighed and threw up their
pocket-handkerchiefs
.
Once upon the stage, a most
agreeable
and imposing interview passed between
the master and Puffer Hopkins, in which each
bore himself to the entire satisfaction of the
company. Mr. De Grand Val advanced a step
or two, a gentleman in a blue riband suddenly
appeared from the other side, advanced a step
or two and paused. Something was coming;
for Mr. De Grand Val hung his head and
produced
his pocket-handkerchief.
There was a dead silence; every eye in the
placeeven the cross-eyed waiter's that
always
served the creams in one box and the
spoons in the oppositewas fixed upon the
gentleman in a blue riband. He had a small
parcel in his left hand and his right was
advanced
.
Respected sir, began the gentleman in the
blue riband, securing the parcel with a fresh
hold, I beg, on behalf of my associates and
self, here he looked hurriedly about to other
gentlemen in blue ribands at his side, to
present to you the gift enclosed in the wrapper
which I hold in my hand. The pair of satin
smalls which I now present to you, are the
medium through which we wish to convey to
you our sense of the delicate and distinguished
manner in which you have performed the
arduous duties you have undertaken for our
benefit and our advancement. We present
them to you as they came from the hands of
that ingenious artist, James Jones of 143
Cannon
street, unaltered and unsullied. We give
them to you as emblematical of the many hours
we have passed together in similar and kindred
garments, beguiling life of its tediousness and
dissipating the midnight winter-strained. The
smalls are three feet in length, have two feet
six inches breadth of beam and front, and
carry one person. Other causes than the mere
desire of seeing you clothed, have led to the
construction of the great work now before us;
they have been built not only to warm your
limbs, but also to gratify the eyes of your
affectionate scholars and friends. The
importance
of having the seams made secure and
the buttons well fastened, was awfully
demonstrated
in the case of Mr. Wail, whose
pantaloons
,
being inadequately constructed, burst
open, as you may recollect, the season before
last, in the presence of one hundred and eighty
scholars, in no less than five distinct rents. The
late Mr. Larkin was also a sufferer in the same
way; but not to quite the same extent. In
presenting you these smalls I wish to call your
attention to some of their peculiar and
characteristic
features. Examine themthey are not
breeches, they are not trowsers, they are not
slops. They have neither open-bottoms nor
straps; but what is most singular, they have
neither a hind pocket nor side pocket, not even
a place to put a watch in. I desire now to
express
an individual wish. As boy and man I
have witnessed the devotion and personal
sacrifices with which you have flown about
your ball-rooms, rending your linen for the
pleasure and gratification of your
fellow-citizens
.
But I have witnessed too, with sorrow,
what individual mortification and discomfort
you, with others, have brought upon yourself
by sitting thoughtlessly down on dusty chairs
and unclean benches. The wish which I
ardently offer is, that while you employ these
smalls in dancing to the delight of our whole
community, they may be associated in your
mind only with what is pure and agreeable,
disdaining
any familiarities with windsor soap and
washing-tubs. In conclusion, I take the
liberty
on behalf of our company generally, in
saying
that we feel ourselves honored by the
presence of Puffer Hopkins, Esq., our
distinguished
friend and fellow-citizen. We do not
show him sky-rockets and bengola lights, but
we show him that James Jones has been busy
in the arts of peace with a view to promote the
comfort of our beloved preceptor, Mr. De
Grand Val. Accept these smalls.
The gentleman in the blue riband advanced
a step or two again, Mr. De Grand Val
likewise
advanced a step or two. Mr. De Grand
Val was in possession of the parcel. He cast
his eye down upon the wrapper, then he turned
enchantingly and looked about with a
comprehensive
smile which opened his whiskers and
disclosed his teeth and embraced all parties
present, on the platform and off, both sexes,
and even an interloper who stood gazing from
the remotest end of the floor. There was a
dead silence again. Mr. De Grand Val was
about to reply.
Ladies and Gentlemen, said Mr. De
Grand Val deeply moved, I accept this token
in the spirit in which it is given. I regard it,
and shall always regard it, as an evidence of
your devoted attachment, tried principles and
prompt payments, as long as I live.
Whenever
I look at them, whenever I wear them, I
shall call to mind the spirit with which you
have availed yourself of my instructions, the
promptitude with which you have cashed my
quarterly bills. They and I shall be
inseparable
,
provided, as I have an abiding conviction,
they fit. They will servehow happily!to
recall to me the purity of the young ladies
whom I have instructed, the manliness of the
young gentlemen. Here there began to be a
movement of applause. By saying this,
however
,
ladies and gentlemen, I do not mean that
I shall always wear these satin smalls. No,
no. God forbid that I should ever be seen
performing the ordinary duties of life in these
precious garments, your affectionate gift.
Distant
be the time when it shall be said that
Ambrose
De Grand Val was known to have had
on his smalls riding a trotting match on the
avenue, or mixing slings at Fogfire hall, or
climbing a sloop's mast on the East river. I
shall reserve them, ladies and gentlemenand
I think you have anticipated me in this
statement
for
more select and dignified occasions.
I think I may venture to wear them at a
wedding
?You
may, from a large portion of
the audiencebut not on a fishing
excursion
?No,
no, shrimps and salt-water is
fatal!On the shady side of the Bowery?
To be sure!But not to churchthat
wouldn't do. And Mr. De Grand Val laughed
aloud as much as to say, That's a good one!
But, ladies and gentlemen, I am afraid I shall
be compelled to make an exceptiona single
exceptionas to the rule I have laid down for
myself in the use of these smalls. I have a
friend, ladies and gentlemen, a dear friend, a
former pupil of mineknown to some of you
who, in a moment of unrestrained hilarity,
playfully thrust a caseknife, which he
happened
to have about him, a couple of inches or so
into the body of a thick-headed watchman;
this trifling circumstance has called the
attention
of the state toward him; the state wants
him up the river, and when he's called for he
asks, as a favor, that I will go up with him. I
know how gratifying it will be to our friend to
see me in these smalls, and now, ladies and
gentlemen, as a parting favor, I ask to be
permitted
to use them on that occasion! At this
there was a universal response, In course
By all meansand so forth, to which Mr.
De Grand Val bowed in his best manner, and
ended by laying his hand upon his breast, and
uttering in a heart-broken voice, Ladies and
gentlemen, I thank you! There was
scarcely
a dry eye in the garden. At the moment
when Mr. De Grand Val was discovered with
the wrapper under his arm, descending the
platform with the committee, twelve cotillions
spread along the floorburst into a dance
expressive of tumultuous joy. Puffer kept his
station on the platform, surveying the dance,
his thumbs thrust, politician-wise, in the
armholes
of his vest, and his eye ranging along
from set to setwhen suddenly it came upon
an object which fixed it as firmly in his head as
if it had been an eye of stone. A dark-eyed
young lady, only three sets from the stage, of
great personal attractions, stood facing a great
sturdy-shouldered fellow who seemed to be her
partner in the dance, (although Puffer would
not believe it), and where the light of more
than a dozen lamps fell upon her face. He
could not be mistaken. It wasit must be the
dark-eyed young lady he had met at Mr.
Fishblatt's
entertainment. He stepped from the
platform and lounged down the floor in
company
with a member of the committee. He
thought he would like to confirm his
impressions
by her voice; in that he could not err,
for he recollected, now that his head swayed
that way, there were tones in it that could not
be counterfeit or delusive.
Fine weather for young ducks, said the
dark-eyed young lady.
Not bad neither for heifers and bullocks,
said the sturdy-shouldered young gentleman.
Speaking of bullocks, if Bill Winship don't
keep inside his chalk I'll cut his plumb for
him. And he glanced at a young gentleman
of a brawny build, who was working his way
with might and main, through a complicated
figure.
Bill!Bill Winship, come over here!
cried the dark-eyed young lady across the floor,
as soon as Mr. Winship had achieved his
position again. Joe Marsh's distributing
knuckle soup to-night, and he wants you to
take a sup.
Never mind quite yet, cried the
sturdy-shouldered
young gentleman, Mr. Marsh
himself
;
only don't you throw your legs quite so
much ox-fashion or knockin'-down time 'll come
afore to-morrow daylight! That's all!
The dark-eyed young lady and the
sturdy-shouldered
young gentleman laid their heads
together and conferred in a dialect which was
in a great measure unintelligible to Puffer
Hopkins, but having reference, as he saw by
their glances, to the young gentleman across
the floor who kept dancing beyond his chalk in
spite of the friendly warning of Mr. Marsh.
As soon as he could address the young lady,
without rashly invading the privacy of her
interview
with Mr. Joe Marsh, Puffer came
forward
and, begging her hand for the next dance,
took the place of the sturdy-shouldered Marsh,
who withdrew, tugging very fiercely at the ties
of his neckcloth, evidently meditating
summary
death, either to himself or his brawny
opposite. The dark-eyed young lady
immediately
entered upon conversation with Puffer;
referred to the entertainment at Mr. Fishblatt's,
not forgetting Alderman Crump nor Mr.
Blinker
;
touched pleasantly upon their wanderings
on the way to her residence; came down to the
present ball, glanced at its striking points, and
all in very chaste, appropriate, and elegant
language, which startled Puffer not a little
when contrasted with her discourse with Mr.
Joseph Marsh. Who was the young lady?
What was she? There was evidently a
mystery
about her. She had two tongues like the
double-headed heifer at the show; and now
that he looked more closely, she was dressed in
a style quite as singular and composite. A
part of her dressher gown and shawl, folded
over the breast, were in the very height of the
Round-rimmer's fashion; but, then, about her
neck there was a delicate necklace of pearl
and her hair hung from her brow, in fair glossy
curls that leaped like the young tendrils of the
vine in the spring breeze, at every motion of
the dance.
The ball went on with unabated spirit.
Puffer
Hopkins and his partner bounded forward,
chassd, dos-a-dos'd, and balancd with a vigor
and accuracy that were the delight of the
whole set.
I balanc for you, said the dark-eyed young
lady, as soon as it was their turn to rest. I
chassz and forward across for my father.
What could this mean? The mystery was
deepening and the dark-eyed young lady
brightened
into clearer and fairer beauty every
minute. He ventured to ask if her father was
in the gardens. Oh, no; he was at home
studying the gazetteer. There was no
opportunity
for further questions, for at that moment
a figure encased in white came bounding up the
floorthe dancers opening and forming a line
on either side and clapping their hands with
great earnestness as he came along. There
seemed to be no point or pitch at which you
could say, the excitement is at its height. De
Grand Val had come upon the floor (having
privily withdrawn for that very purpose) in his
presentation satin smalls! How well they
fitted him! What a figure! What motions!
De Grand Val begged them, if they loved
him, to re-form at oncehe couldn't bear to see
them idleand taking his place at the head of
the first set, at the very top of the floor, he
struck into the dance. Were there ever such
leaps, such pirouettes, such graceful turnings
of a partner, such pigeon-wings! Every eye
was upon him, and when, in the enthusiasm of
art he sprung into the air, tossing his skirts
almost
over his ears, there was visible on the
waistband of his smalls, an inscription worked
in with black silk, Presented to Ambrose De
Grand Val by his affectionate and admiring
pupilsthere was another thrill, deeper,
stronger, more like electricity than any yet!
The excitement
was
now at its height. The
orchestra was in a state of extraordinary
fervor
;
the base-drum roared and rumbled out of
all bounds; the violin snapped a string in its
excessive agitation and hurry; the trombone
and triangle were beside themselves and
wouldn't keep in tune. The young ladies
threw off their kerchiefs upon their armsthe
gentlemen their coats upon the bushes and
benches behind them, displaying red
undershirts
,
and a great variety of hoists,
embellished
sometimes with a great black heart of
leather in the middle, or with mystical creeping
vines, breaking out all over in sheepskin
blossoms
.
At intervals the company rushed down
from the floor into the stalls at the sides of the
garden, and falling upon various refreshments
there set out, acquired so much vigor as to
return
to the stage in astonishing force of wind
and limb. At the end of every third dance or
so, the gentlemen, resigning all care of their
partners, marched in a body to the bar at the
other end of the garden, fronting the floor,
where the bar-tenders, standing in a row in
their sleeves, wrought constant miracles in the
mixing of slings, punches, and cobblers. And
so they kept it up by the hour, beyond
midnight
,
when some slight abatement in the
spirit
of the entertainment began to show itself.
Every now and then a set fell off, one by one,
until there were only a few stragglers about
the floor, kept together by almost superhuman
exertions on the part of the gentlemen in the
blue ribands. At last there was no one left
but the gentlemen in blue ribands themselves,
who wandered hither and thither, gathering up
shawls, combs, and other stray articles
abandoned
by their owners.
The lights were out or smoking in their last
remains, the waiters asleep upon the benches,
and the great De Grand Val roamed about the
paths and bowers of the garden, in his satin
smalls, unattended and unobserved.
Pufferto whom she had been courteously
resigned by Mr. Joseph Marsh, who had
attended
her thither, and who went off in search of Mr.
Bill Winship, the obnoxious dancertook the
dark-eyed young lady's arm in his, and had long
ago set forth. He knew the way now, and it
was a very different oneso it seemed to him,
although it remained untouchedthan when he
travelled it before. The crossings were as
broad, the roads as crooked, the squares as
long; but how miserably short and narrow,
how provokingly straight they seemed! It
would have been a pleasure to him to have got
into Doyer street and wandered about all night
long. The door was reached before he had
thought of it; an old woman came with a
nimbleness, the very recollection of which took
his breath away, and then, when the dark-eyed
young lady entered in, how cruelly quick she
was in closing it, with her ugly old face in her
very hood, and hurrying her away.
CHAPTER XXX.
MR. FISHBLATT'S NEWS-ROOM.
Through
all of Puffer's dreams that night
there glided a graceful form; a pair of bright
dark eyes glanced hither and thither like
meteors, in all the motions of the dance;
sometimes
he was moving by its side, sometimes it
parted from him, and when she left his hand,
ah! how keen a pang shot through his heart!
But gliding, and glancing, and full of cheerful
images as were his dreamswhatever the mazes,
whatever the turns, the pirouettes, the long
country dances, the perspective always closed
with the fair dancer's wearing a great green
hood, and an old woman's head thrust inside,
chattering and bobbing up and down. He had
danced a score or more cotillons, reels, and flings
always with the same ending, when, at length,
the old head seemed somehow to get fixed upon
the young shoulders, the old body without a head
galloped off, and the fair young form was left,
chasseing, double-headed, among the trees.
This was too much for mortal patience to bear,
and Puffer waked up. His first business,
when he had fairly recovered himself, was to
recall the dark-eyed young lady, in all her
agreeable proportions, one by one, and replace
her in his mind as she had been when he had
stretched himself to sleep. Lately as he had
looked upon her, it was something of an effort;
at one time he would fix her in a graceful
attitude
bending forward to move, her head
slightly turned back toward him, but then the
eyes, or the motion of the arm, or the smile
that had played upon her lip, would escape him,
and he would begin again. He went puzzling
on in this way, even till he was dressed, though
this did not prevent his appareling himself
with great skill and judgment; drawing out,
from the very bottom of a drawer, where it had
been laid religiously aside for some select
occasion
,
a bright blue neckcloth; arraying his new
buff vest, which he had worn to the ball to
marked advantage, and disposing of his
handsome
blue coat so that every wave and plait
should tell. With the two tasks, his mind, it
must be confessed, was sufficiently engaged;
and when he had laid the last lock in its exact
place upon his brow, and succeeded in
recalling
the dark-eyed young lady, in all her beauty,
even down to the neat shoe-tie (that his
dreams had not forgotten), it came into his
head, as opportunely as one could wish, that
he ought to go down to Mr. Fishblatt's at whose
entertainment he had first met the dark-eyed
young lady, and have a little gossip, just by
way of relief! The day had, in this way,
glided past dinner-time, and he thought the
pleasing
idleness of the morning had fairly purchased
the afternoon as an extension of his holyday.
When he reached the house of Mr. Fishblatt,
the door, in compliment to the pleasant
weather
,
stood wide open; and Puffer, having
established
a sufficient friendship to warrant it,
proceeded
at once to the small supplemental room
in the rear, where Mr. Halsey Fishblatt held
his lair. Here he found Mr. Fishblatt in his
arm-chair, holding, in a firm gripe, a wet sheet,
which he regarded with a steady gaze. At his
side there was a wooden stool, on the top of
which lay a pile of damp newspapers. The
reading of the wet sheet seemed to move Mr.
Fishblatt greatly; his teeth were firmly fixed,
and a thick sweat, as though it had steamed up
from the newspaper, stood upon his brow. His
attention was so entirely engrossed, that
notwithstanding
the unusual gloss and neatness
of Puffer's apparel, he merely nodded to him as
he came in, and, unfixing one of his arms,
waived him to a seat. As soon as one side of
the paper was finishedvery little, apparently,
to the satisfaction of Mr. Fishblatthe gave
the sheet a gentle shake, and, letting it fall
into a current of air which set in from the
entry
,
he turned a leaf, and folding it back, fixed
himself upon the fresh side.
Glancing aside not once, but ranging up and
down the solid columns as steadily as a
plough-horse
in a furrow, Mr. Fishblatt finished his
acre or half acre of print.
This is certainly an astonishing
circumstance
,
he exclaimed, folding his paper,
laying
it upon his knee, and smiting it with his
open palm, breathing now for the first time
R
freely; an astonishing circumstance; on
Monday, Busts of the Bladder made that
pungent
sally, and here it's Saturday, and no
rejoinder
from Flabbywhat can this mean?
At this moment a series of shouting boys
streamed by in the street, whose voices, at
their very top, were broken in passing through
the long hall and up a flight of stairs. Mr.
Fishblatt, however, whose ear was better
practised
,
started up with a stern smile upon his
face, and proceeding to the stairhead, called
down. Shuffling feet were heard in answer,
and tossing down a coin of small dimensions
upon the entry-floor, merely said, The
Puncheon
,
and returned to his seat. In a second
or two the frowzy-headed servant-girl, with
her hair all abroad, appeared at the door, and
presented to him a fresh sheet, which he
fastened
upon with great eagerness.
As I thought, said Mr. Fishblatt, glancing
rapidly down the columns. An `Extra
Puncheon
,'
pretending to give late news from the
Capitol, but containing, in reality, Flabby's
long-expected reply. Capital! capital cried
Mr. Fishblatt, as he hurried on; Flabby's
called Busts a drunken vagabond, in the
Puncheon
of Wednesday-week; Busts called
Flabby
a hoary reprobate, in Monday's Bladder, and
now Flabby calls Busts a keg of Geneva bitters
says the bung's knocked out and the staves
well coopered. Capital! this alludes to a
thrashing in front of the Exchange, in which
Busts had his eye blacked and a couple of ribs
beaten in. Give us plenty of newspapers!
pursued Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, starting from
his chair in the furor of his enthusiasm. They
make a people happy and intelligent and
virtuous
.
The press, sir, the press is the
palladium
of liberty, and the more palladiums we
have, the freer we areof course. See here,
sir, here's a big palladium, and here's a little
palladium. At this he held forth to Puffer's
gaze, first the mammoth sheet, and then the
dwarf, and brandishing them in the air,
proceeded
:
Thisreferring to the small sheet
is edited by a couple of overgrown boys in
Williamsburg, who do their own press-work
this by an undergrown man in Ann street, who
does his thinking on the other side of the
Atlantic
.
Never mind thatgive us more. This
people can never be free, Mr. Hopkins,
thoroughly
and entirely free, till every man in
the country edits a newspaper of his own; till
every man issues a sheet every morning, in
which he's at liberty to speak of every other
man as he chooses. The more we know
each other, the better we'll like each other
so let us have all the private affairs, the
business
transactions, and domestic doings of every
man in the United States, set forth in a small
paper, in a good pungent style, and then we
may begin to talk of the advancement of the
human race. That's what I call the cheap
diffusion of knowledge; a pennyworth of
scandal
on every man's breakfast-table, before he
goes to business.
Mr. Fishblatt having refreshed himself and
his hearer with a tumbler each of lemonade,
from the mantel (the probable remains of a
last night's entertainment), was about to
resume
,
when he was brought to a pause by the
sudden entrance of the frowzy-haired
servant-girl
,
who brought him a parcel from the
postman
who was distributing the southern and
western mail.
Ah! what have we here? said Mr.
Fishblatt
,
taking the parcel from her hand. `The
Nauvoo Bludgeon,' `Potomac Trumpet,' `
Western
Thundergust,' something rich in each, I
will warrant. `The corporal,' says the
Nauvoo
Bludgeon, pursued Mr. Fishblatt, reading
from the newspapers, as he unfolded them;
`the corporal, we are glad to see, has resumed
his editorial chair. There are few men in the
press in the United States, that could be better
spared than Tomkins; there is a raciness about
his paragraphs, his humor is so delicate, his
good taste so marked and prominent in all he
writes. In a word, we couldn't spare
Tompkins
.'
Mr. Fishblatt unfolded another paper,
remarking that the corporal edited the Potomac
Trumpetand here it was, a day's date later
than the Bludgeon. `Our friend Smith of the
Bludgeon,' continued Mr. Fishblatt, reciting
from the Trumpet, `has our thanks for the
handsome manner in which he has alluded to
our recovery from a critical sickness. Smith,
we owe you one, and will pay you as soon as
you
are on your backif not sooner. We
were passing down Market lane, yesterday,
when we heard a voice. `Tompkins,' said the
voice; `Hollo!' We looked upit was
Grigsby
our
old friend Grigsby, of Clambake point.
He understood us, and we passed on. Do you
take, Smith?'
Having despatched these, Mr. Fishblatt
came to the Western Thundergust. The
Thundergust
was in a furious rage; they had been
purloining his jokes, and he wouldn't tolerate
it any longer.
We have submitted long enough, said the
Thundergust, to the unbridled plunderings of
the Nauvoo Bludgeon and the Potomac Trumpet.
We mean to put a stop to it; and, to begin at the
beginning, we would like to ask the
man
of the
Bludgeon where he got that phrase, `In a word,
we couldn't spare Tompkins?' Does he
recollect
the Thundergust of Wednesday, the 15th
of July? If he doesn't, we can refresh his
memory. `In a word,' said we, speaking of
an article of furniture in our late office, `we
couldn't spare our cedar-wood desk.' There
we think we have pinned the Bludgeon man to
the wall, and now we'll dispose of him of the
Trumpet, by suggesting whether it wouldn't be
better for him to buy a copy of the works of
Mr. Joseph Miller at once, rather than be at
the trouble of stealing his jokes from all the
newspapers in the country? We only suggest
it;while we are on the point, we might as
well say that the anecdote of Grigsby, in the
last Trumpet was stolen as it stands, from the
first number of this paper, where the reader
will find it printed at the head of the first
column of the second page. Paste-boy, scratch
off the `Trumpet'it'll be your turn next, Mr.
Bludgeon; so you're on your good behavior!
Just then, and before Mr. Fishblatt could
dive deeper into the beauties of the press, an
indifferently-dressed
gentleman in a heated face
and damp hair, rushed in, stumbling at the
threshold in his haste, and pitching forward,
but taking the precaution to knock his hat
tight with one hand as he stumbled.
Heavens and earth! exclaimed the
damp-haired
stranger, as soon as he recovered
himself
,
it's passed!
It is? echoed Mr. Fishblatt, in a hollow
and sepulchral tone.
It is, sir, responded the stranger, wildly.
What! you don't say, sir, continued Mr.
Fishblatt, gazing steadily at him, that the
bill for clearing the navigation of the upper
Wabash
has
passed?
The stranger did; and he had in his hat an
accurate report of the debate. It had been
brought in by special express for the Junk
Bottle
.
An express-rider, by-the-by, had broken
his neck in coming through New Jersey, and
the messenger had pitched into the office of the
Junk Bottle with such precipitation with his
parcel, as to have struck the senior editor
where he knocked all the wind out of him; so
that they needn't look for any leader
to-morrow
.
He would take off his hat and they
would get at the particulars. The damp-haired
stranger did so; set his hat upon the floor
planted one foot upon a chair-seat near by,
and bending forward, so that the sweat dropped
on the paper as he read, proceeded to furnish
the following account, which was heralded in
the Junk Bottle with the portrait of a small fat
cherub, flying at the top of his speed, his
cheeks distended, and a trumpet at his mouth,
from which issued the word Postscript! in a
loud, bold type. It was from the Washington
correspondent of the Junk Bottle.
I can hardly hold the quill in my hand with
joy at the news I am about to communicate
news that will, I am satisfied, thrill the whole
country from one end to the other.
The bill
for clearing the navigation of the upper
Wabash
was passed last night between eleven
and twelve o'clock, after a most animated and
stormy debate, in which the emissaries of
power
put forth their utmost strength. Their
subterfuges
,
their cavils, and cries of `Order' were,
however, of no avail. The bill had a clear
majority
of five, and the country is safe. Of the
true-hearted men who distinguished themselves
on the side of justice and patriotic principle,
Peter Alfred Brown, of Massachusetts, was
pre-eminently conspicuous. He was seen
everywhere
during the debate, animating,
exhorting
,
encouragingfrom his place in the house;
sometimes, in the energy of his extraordinary
powers, standing up in his chair, and sometimes
addressing the house from his desk-top, where
he took his station at last, and maintained it
for better than an hour, during which he
delivered
one of the most remarkable and
wonderful
speeches of the present epoch. There
are few men, in any age or country, to be
compared
with Peter Alfred Brown. I subjoin a
hasty outline of a few of the most striking
passages
in the debate.
Mr. Buffum, of Kentucky, in opening the
discussion, remarked that the country was in
imminent danger, much more imminent than
he was willing to confess. The people
expected
much and they got nothing. A crisis
had arrived which must be met. He need not
describe to them the present condition of the
whole region around the upper Wabash. It
was little better than a desert; trade, by the
obstruction of navigation, had fallen off to
nothing
the
grass in the neighboring meadows
was four feet highvessels of transportation
were sticking, absolutely sticking in the mud
at the wharves, and the cartmen went about
the streets whistling dirges and psalm-tunes.
Mr. Woddle, of South Carolina, who rose in
reply to Mr. Buffum, would not answer for the
consequences, if the bill before the house
should become a law. His (Mr. W.'s)
constituents
were in a highly inflamed and excited
state of mind on the subject of the proposed
clearing. If the upper Wabash (they asked)
was once made navigable, what would become
of the Little Pedee? Why, it would sink to
a third-rate stream, and in the place of the
honorable gentleman's whistling cartmen, they
would have a stagnant marsh, full of musical
bullfrogs. He (Mr. W.) respected the
constitution
of the country, and so did his
constituents
;
but, should this bill pass, he could not
promise that a flag, with some terrible device,
would not be seen flying, in twenty-four hours
after the news, from the walls of Charleston.
It was at this juncture, that Peter Alfred
Brown, of Massachusetts, rose. Every eye
was upon him; and, without faltering for a
moment, he entered upon the subject. He
showed clearly, in a masterly effort of better
than two hours, that the constitution had
manifestly
contemplated the object in the proposed
bill. He showed, so that the blindest and most
jaundiced eye could not fail to see it, that the
framers
had provided for the very contingency that
had now arisen. He would not occupy the time
of the house in pointing out the express clause in
the constitution covering the present case;
but he proved, by an ingenious and elaborate
train of reasoning, in something less than an
hour, that the entire scope of that instrument
went to such an effect. In a peroration, never
surpassed in the house, he begged them to stand
by the constitution. His arms trembled, as he
held up to their view a printed copy which he
held in his hand; and when he sat down, the
universal conviction was that he could not be
answered. Notwithstanding this feeling, he
was immediately followed by Marc Anthony
Daggers, the notorious member from Virginia,
who poured out upon the head of the
illustrious
Brown the vials of his wrath. There was
no epithet of denunciation he did not heap
upon
the head of that distinguished man. `Sir,'
said Daggers, turning so as to face Mr. Brown,
who sat complacent and unmoved, writing a
letter at his desk, `sir, you are a disgrace and
a contumely to the American Congress; a
pedlar
of logic, and a wholesale dealer in
falsehood
and fable. Where you were born, sir,
the land, in sympathy with you, breeds
nothing
but copperheads and toadstools; the soil is
rocky as your bosom, steril as your brain.'
Here there were loud cries of order, but
Daggers
went on without heeding them in the least.
Brown was a buffalo, ready to plunge his horns
into the vitals of his country; he was a
volcanic
fire, a monster, a doting idiot, and a
political
mountebank.
At nine o'clock in the evening, to which
hour they had been kept listening to the tirade
of Mr. Marc Anthony Daggers, Mr. Blathering,
of Missouri, obtained the floor. His effort was
in every way worthy of his matured powers
and reputation. For fourteen years he (Mr.
B.) had labored, single-handed and alone, to
obtain justice for the citizens of Indiana,
Illinois
,
and Missouri. For fourteen years he had
cried at the top of his lungs to the people of
the United States, to render their right to the
residents on the Wabash. The Wabash was
still obstructed, and if he, like Curtius of old,
could, by casting himself headlong in, reverse
the spell and open the river, he was ready, at
any moment, for the sacrifice. All he asked
was an hour's notice, and an opportunity to
say `Farewell,' a last farewell, to his wife and
children.
The upper Wabash, Mr. Speaker, is a
stream rising in the interior of Indiana, at
about the latitude of 40, &c. (Here he
produced
several maps, and quoted freely from
two piles of books before him, which occupied
about an hour and a half delightfully.) He
closed with an appeal to the house, which
surpassed
anything ever heard before within its
walls. I need only give you the concluding
sentence, to show you the magnificent stamp of
the whole.
`If I were now standing upon the summit
of the Chippewavan mountains, instead of the
floor of this house, and were suddenly and
unexpectedly
seized with the icy pangs of death,
if I saw that my last hour had come, and
that but one more breath was left me to draw,
I would say with that last breath, so that I
might be heard by every man in America,
Clear the Wabash! in Heaven's name
careen
its mighty bottom, and let its waters flow
in a mercantile tide into the Ohio at
Shawneetown
,
and into the Mississippi at Big
swamp!'
The bill was engrossed at twenty minutes
past eleven, and at twelve was sent to the
senate
for concurrence. There was an
unexampled
rush toward the stalls in the lobby and
the hotels on the Avenue, the moment the
house was adjourned. This tended somewhat
to allay the excitement. Thank God, the
country is safe!
Curse that Junk Bottle! cried Mr.
Fishblatt, who had watched closely the
reading
of the Washington letter, it's always
bringing unpleasant news by express in
advance
of the mail. Our trade is ruined, sir.
New York is a dead herring. All Kentucky,
Indiana, Illinois, will flow into the Wabash,
the Wabash into the Ohio, the Ohio into the
Mississippi, and the Mississippi makes a mouth
at New Orleans. Where does that bring us?
Not an Indiana turkey, nor a Kentucky ham,
nor an Illinois egg, reaches the New York
market
henceforth for ever. In ten years you may
expect to see this mighty metropolis a heap of
ruins, and auctioneers going about knocking
down the rubbish in lots to suit purchasers.
What do they mean by passing such bills?
Mr. Fishblatt turned to Puffer; the
damp-haired
stranger, released from the steadfastness
of his gaze, hastily resumed his hatto the
crown of which he restored his paperand
escaped
to dispense his news in some other
quarter
of the town. Puffer, who had stood aside,
pondering in his own way, on the subject of
the upper Wabash, and, turning it about in his
mind till he got it in a light that pleased him,
looked at Mr. Fishblatt, but made no answer.
But when Mr. Fishblatt added, I'll go and
see my friend, Mr. Samuel Sammis, and have
this explainedwill you join me, Puffer? he
started from his revery and said it was the very
best thing they could do. In a moment he
threw down the newspaper, with which his
fingers had been toying, held his hat in his
hand, and was ready to issue forth on the
instant
.
Now, this alacrity on the part of
Puffer
must
we confess it?was owing to an
unavoidable accident: Mr. Samuel Sammis
was the father of the dark-eyed young lady!
CHAPTER XXXI.
PUFFER HOPKINS IMPROVES AN
ACQUAINTANCE
.
A half-hour's
walk, in which Mr.
Fishblatt
harangued and expatiated, without limit,
upon the iniquity of the bill for clearing the
upper Wabash, brought them to the
Great-kiln
road, abutting on the Hudson, in
Greenwich
.
And there, with a flaming red front,
and a couple of apothecary's bottles staring
from the first floor like two great blood-shot
eyes, stood by itself the domicil of Mr. Samuel
Sammis. Beyond, standing upon the river,
and just visible across the angle of the house,
arose a pair of hay-scales, with an inscription
to the effect that Samuel Sammis was
weigh-master
and president of the same.
They were led to an upper story, for Mr. Sam
mis, like his friend Fishblatt, possessed the
second floorand, being ushered in, they
came upon a party of old and young ladies,
scattered about the apartment, in the very
zenith
and ecstacy of a full-blown litter of
work-baskets
,
sewing-silk, and small-talk. The first
object that fixed the attention of Puffer as
they entered, was the dark-eyed young lady
herself, busy fashioning portentous capitals,
in white thread, upon a long red banner or
bunting; and, at her ear, that everlasting old
woman, whispering away, apparently, at the
rate of a page a minute at least. There were
other young ladies, each diligent with her
scissors
and needle, clipping, binding, patching.
None seemed to be engaged in the literary
department
but the dark-eyed young lady; and
not one, in Puffer's eye, was half as fair as she!
There was one small and gentle, with auburn
hair and lucid, blue eyes; another round and
plump; another quite stately, with a wild,
flashing look. There seemed to be a mould in
his heart, and no other image would fit it but
that one.
The dark-eyed young lady smiled a welcome
to Pufferturned to the old lady at her side,
and whispering the words, My aunt, as an
introduction, invited him to a seat. Mr.
Fishblatt
,
who was quite at home, was already in
a chair.
You are quite a stranger, Mr. Fishblatt,
said the aunt, who was a little, prim old
woman, dressed with exemplary neatness, and
with a pair of dancing eyes. You haven't
been to see us since last election. What's kept
you awayrheumatics?no; perhaps it's been
the winds that has blown down the city for the
last month and better. You was afraid of
getting
a mouthful if you walked up this way.
Wasn't that it? Ah! ah! And the little old
woman broke into a clear, joyous laugh which
rung through the room and was echoed by the
whole company of stitchers and sewers.
Oh, no; nothing of that sort, I promise
you, upon my honor, answered Mr. Halsey
Fishblatt, gravely. My whole mind, soul,
heart, and body, have been engrossed with
public
affairshorribly engrossed; so many
exciting
,
and important, and weighty questions.
One's no sooner well disposed of than another
pops up. I only despatched the other day the
question about the aqueduct, and, curse it,
here's another water-question. I am borne down
with anxiety and excessive thinking. Where's
Sammy?
To this question the old lady made answer
that Samuel was at the scales; that he was
very busy at this season; that she would call
him in if Mr. Fishblatt would like to see him;
and jumping up, in a minute more, would have
put her head forth toward the river and
summoned
him; but on Mr. Fishblatt's entreaty
she refrained, and he went out to seek him for
himself.
Finding the field clear for conversation,
Puffer addressed himself to the dark-eyed young
lady to the effect that she seemed to be a little
in public life as well as Mr. Fishblatt, judging
by the use to which she was putting the
bunting
on which she was at work.
Oh, I only do as I am bid! answered the
dark-eyed young lady, I'd as leave write one
thing in here as another; my thread and needle
are neutral, I assure you.
How can you say so, Fanny! exclaimed
the aunt, smiling upon her, she is one of the
most arrant little politicians in the city, Mr.
Hopkins; she keeps this whole ward in a
constant
ferment with her political tea-drinkings,
and dances, and complimentary balls. You
know something of her there, I guess; and
now she's corrupting the alphabet itself.
Aunt, I detest politics, and
you
know I do!
answered the young lady; I'd rather, any
day, walk down the sunny side of
Hudsonstreet
,
than carry the state for our party!
You see she has a partyah! ah! Now,
Fanny, I shall expose some of your tricks.
What do you think, Mr. Hopkins? This young
lady, here, is so much of a demagogue, that,
though her own tastes run in favor of broad
laces and net-work gloves, she tramps, three
times a week, the whole breadth of the city,
and spends the morning in running up and
down the stores in Division streetyou've
seen them, the little square shops with a back
entry and a glass door, and a green vine
dangling
against the fence, and a young lady with
twisted ringlets sitting between the two?there
she goes, and, with the aid of the
two-and-forty
milliners of that street, gets up dresses
and costumes to catch the cartmen's daughters
and the young mechanics! Now don't deny it,
Fanny!
During this narrative, Fanny glanced
stealthily
at Puffer, and blushed as deep a red as the
silk she was at work upon. Before Puffer
could enter upon a vindication of the young
lady, which he fully meditated, the little old
lady sprang up from her chair, ran into the
corner of the room where a green shrub of
some kind or other was vegetating in a blue
tub, and called Puffer after her.
Here's something great for you to look at,
Mr. Hopkins; what a stem! did you ever see
such a stem to a seven months' tree? What
leaves! The lemons are every bit as big as
plumsthey'll be twice as large this time a
year! There was no limit to the eloquent
praises poured out upon this domestic lemon;
which was steadily exhibited to all visiters.
This was Fanny's tooshe had brought it up
from a sprig. Then the old auntwho seemed
to have taken a sudden fancy to Puffercaused
a sampler to be unhooked from the wall,
carried
it to the light and expatiated upon it at
equal length. Then she bustled to the door
and whistled in a short-legged yellow dog, who
stumped about the room, looking up in every
body's face in the most comical fashion. He
proved to be the property of Miss Fanny too;
and his birth, parentage, history, and past
exploits
17
(especially the incident of his drinking
gin out of a bottle, in his infancy) were dwelt
upon with edifying particularity. By the time
the short-legged dog had finished the circuit of
the company, a savor of supper began to
creep through the key-hole of an adjacent
folding
door, and the aunt, breaking off her
discourse
abruptly, hoisted the window and
shouted
to Mr. Samuel Sammis that tea was ready.
Having delivered this summons she closed the
window; but presently hoisted it again to say
that he had better come at once. Mr. Sammis
failing to appear as soon as she desired, she
raised it a third time to suggest that he had
forgotten they had short-cake! The appeal
was not in vainMr. Sammis's soul was
touched at last, and he came in with Mr.
Fishblatt.
Mr. Samuel Sammis was a foxy-looking little
gentleman, in drab pants and a
weather-washed
blue coat, his hair was thin, his linen
questionable
,
and when he came forward to greet
Puffer, his face was a cobweb of smiles.
I'm very happy to see you, sir, he said;
I knew you well by reputation, although I
hadn't had the honor to be personally
acquainted
.
It's always a pleasure to become
acquainted
with gentlemen of tried patriotism, Mr.
Fishblatt?
Mr. Fishblatt assented to the postulate, and
the folding-door being cast openthey
marched in to supper. The opening of the
folding-door disclosed a table spread with a
liberal variety of dishes, and steaming with a
cloud of tea-smoke that hung aloft. The chairs
were placed, and the company were about to
take seats at random, when Mr. Sammis begged
them to pause.
This table, said Mr. Sammy Sammis,
evolving a little piece of pleasantry which he
had elaborated in secret, with great care;
This table, said he, is the empire State,
with the various products of its soil. The
chairs, of which you see there are eight,
represent
the eight senate districts or divisions.
Aunt, addressing the old lady, will you be
good enough to sit for Dutchess and Orange
here, opposite the butter, for which Goshen,
you know, is famous. Mr. Fishblatt, I'll send
you up the river as far as wheat-growing
Albanythere, that's it, abreast the
short-cake
.
Mr. Hopkins, you're the member for
New York, and must take your place at the
bottom of the table and catch what you can
from the river-counties as it comes down. Will
you take charge of the salt-springs of Salina
I mean the salt-cellars, pointing two of the
young ladies to chairs at the corners of the
board; and you, motioning the third to a
seat in the centre, Miss Erie, famous for
your fruitshave the region of the peaches
and preserves. I'll take the Oneida
sheepfarms
under my care, settling into a chair
opposite a plate of cold mutton. And for
you, Miss Fanny, who are always babbling and
making a noise, there's the teaboard for you
the district of Trenton falls; you may pour the
tea, but don't put
too
much water in it. You
may begin as soon as you please.
They were all in their places; the dishes
were passed rapidly from hand to hand; the
tea poured, and they were fairly launched
upon
the meal. The weight of responsibility
heaped upon them by Mr. Sammis did not seem
to have impaired their natural powers a jot;
but each oneyoung ladies and allfell to as
though they were in reality so many great
public
characters, each eating for a county.
After a half-hour's sturdy devotion to the
products of the Empire stateas represented
by the tablea pause sprung up, and Mr.
Sammis
availed himself of it for a little
professional
talk.
Fanny, my dear, said Mr. Sammis, how
far have you got in your lettering of the
banner
?
The whole inscription, she answered.
`BottomitesUncompromising friendship to
the clearing of the Wabash.' That was it.
How
could
you make such a mistake?
exclaimed Mr. Sammis, in a rapture of
surprise
.
It was `hostility,' not `friendship.'
I'm sure you told me `friendship,' father,
retorted the young lady, and to use the
longest
letters I could for the word.
It was wrong, my dear, answered Mr.
Sammis, calmly; absence of mindyou'll
alter
it after tea, if you please.
The Bottomites had cried aloud in favor of
the clearing as long as they thought it wouldn't
pass; now that it had unexpectedly passed,
they changed their cry. The relettering of
the banner, was the result of an elaborate
conference
of Messrs. Fishblatt and Sammis, at
the hay-scales.
You think it all-important, said Mr.
Sammis
,
addressing Puffer, after a pause, during
which the business of the table had been
diligently
prosecuted; you think it
all-important
to carry our next state-election?
Certainly! responded Puffer.
We must come down to Cayuga bridge,
proceeded Mr. Sammis, with four thousand,
or we are done for in the next presidential
campaign
.
The river counties are all right, I am
told; Dutchess gives us five hundred, and
Albany
county is safe for at least three hundred
and seventy-five.
How is the Fourth ward of the capital?
asked Puffer, having in mind a political
commonplace
which he was quite sure Mr. Sammy
Sammis would quote upon him.
We must have it! averred Mr. Sammis,
as goes the Fourth ward so goes Albany, and
as goes the Fourth ward so goes the state, you
know.
To be sure! echoed Puffer, and we must
make what we can out of the upper Wabash,
at the first election that's held.
By all means, said Mr. Fishblatt, with
enthusiasm
,
we must rouse the popular mind
with strong appeals; we must show them the
enormity of the measure; point to the results,
if the bill is allowed to pass into effect, to this
city and state.
Yesand call upon them in the name of
the lamented Decatur, to save the country from
ruin! added Mr. Sammis. Decatur was a
man of tried patriotism, I think?
It was not easy to keep Puffer's mind to the
subject; his eyes wandered constantly to the
quarter where a certain young lady was
seated
;
so that he was soon dropped out of the
discourse
,
leaving Messrs. Sammis and Fishblatt
to keep it up in their own way. Puffer's
glances
were not entirely unnoticed or
unrewarded
.
Miss Fanny, too, had, somehow or other,
grown pensive and uncommunicative, with a
marvellous coincidence as to time and
circumstance
.
When they had returned to the
sewing-room
,
she exhibited to Puffer another flag,
on which she had wrought the words, For
Congress, with a blank underneath for the
name of the candidate.
I wish I were allowed to fill it up, she
said, looking at Puffer.
Puffer felt his heart beat quick, but did not
venture to ask whose name it would bear.
They seemed to understand each other better
from that moment.
My aunt was right, she continued, after
a pause, speaking now without reserve. I
put a restraint upon my feelings to please my
father; you understand now what I said at the
ball. For my own part, and on my own account,
I would rather lead a quiet life, aside from the
bustle and face-making of politics. Have you
ever had such a feeling in your busy life?
Many and many a time! answered
Puffer
,
calling to mind his poor neighbor, and the
gentle quietude of his little chamber. The
life that glides away, like the stream that clings
to its bed, I sometimes think may be happier
than if it had foamed and brawled, and was
broken in pieces in the clamor of a waterfall.
And yet, I don't deny, continued Miss
Fanny Sammis, that I would like to have my
carriage, with one sleck horse, and ride through
Broadway once a week. I would not care
about it oftener.
Come, Miss Fanny, we must have some
music! cried Mr. Sammy Sammis, stepping
out upon the floor, leading out one of the young
ladies by the hand. We have rested long
enoughJohn, take a partner, to one of a
swarm of young clerks that had come in after
tea. Mr. Fishblattaunt. AuntMr.
Fishblatt
.
Start up, William, to another of the
young clerksand to the last of them. Mr.
Jones, there's another young lady leftlead
her out!
Puffer had walked with Miss Fanny into the
other room, where, in a recess behind the door,
stood an old red piano. Miss Fanny ascended
the stool, and Mr. Sammis cried out to his
partners
in the dance, Now, recollect, it's the
northern and western districtshis head
was still running on the political divisions of
the state. It's northern and western against
eastern and southern. The first couple that
breaks down is in a minority, and incapable of
taking partners for the next three dances.
Strike up, Miss Fanny!the Governor's
march, if you please.
Miss Fanny, with Puffer at her side, struck
the first few notes with a bold hand, as Mr.
Sammis desiredbut presently, as in spite
of herself, a gentler air crept upon the keys,
and, instead of a cotillon, she was playing a
pathetic ditty.
Louder and livelier! shouted Mr.
Sammis
.
We want the Governor's marchfour
thousand strong!
She essayed the tune; but the notes came
again softened from her fingers, and seemed
sighing back to the words that Puffer breathed
gently in her ear.
With constant remonstrances on the part of
Mr. Sammy Sammis, who was dancing for the
whole northern tier of counties (the six
war-dancing
tribes included), and constant relapses
on the part of Miss Fanny, the evening wore
away.
At a late hour, Mr. Fishblatt, who, being a
slow and solid dancer, had, to the surprise of
all parties, carried the day, called for his hat;
had Mr. Sammis aside in a whispered
conversation
,
with occasional glances at Puffer, for a
quarter of an hour; and, gallantly kissing the
old aunt, summoned Puffer, and left.
Miss Fanny thought the travel of the
stairway
so perilous, as to bring a light even to the
very front door; what passed there, between
the dark-eyed young lady and the young
politician
,
while Mr. Halsey Fishblatt stood in the
street calling to him, remains a profound
mystery
.
The spectacle, could he have looked
upon
it as an observer, would have doubtless
seemed to Puffer infinitely more agreeable than
that of the old aunt with her wrinkled visage
inside of the dark-eyed young lady's hood.
Marching arm-in-arm with Mr. Fishblatt, it is
well known that Puffer put several pointed and
searching questions to that gentleman, the
answers
to which were to the effect that Mr.
Sammy
Sammis was an incessant letter-writer to
all parts of the state; a wire-puller and
waker-up
of counties and villages. That Miss
Fanny
was his only child; the old lady, his aunt,
and Fanny's grandauntand being an
unincumbered
woman, with a round sum out at
interest
,
Fanny was her favorite. After
procuring
which results, Puffer fell silent; and
although
Mr. Fishblatt addressed him in several
most elaborate and animated harangues, he
kept on musing, till they parted for the night.
CHAPTER XXXII.
THE DEATH OF FOB.
It
was all a cheat. The lustre in his eyes
was false and treacherous as the glittering
whirlpool. The bloom upon his cheek was of
the hue of the rose with the canker at its heart.
Fob was dying. Martha had procured a little
lodging directly opposite his chamber, and there
she stayed when driven from his bedside by the
considerate poor neighbors, who saw how her
strength was wasted in efforts to preserve his.
Even on such nights as she was not allowed
to be a watcher in his chamber, she would
hover
about the door and through the halla
gentle
spiriteager to catch the slightest cry of
pain, and taking keen note if he but turned in
his couch. Spring had gone: summer had
come, and was ebbing fast; and, as its gentle
breath died murmuring by the window of the
little tailor, his pulses faltered more and more.
At first he had been able to rise at times, and,
going to his dormerthat precious window of
all the Forkhad cheered himself with the sight
of the sun at its risingthe slow-lapsing
motions
of the vessels as they glided down the
river. Now that he was stretched all day long
upon his couch, he made Marthaa service
she was skilful to performstand at the
window
,
and report to him, day by day, all that
passed. The little street-sights, the crowds
that gathered about the blind flute-player, the
color of the horses and carriages that went by,
the shape of the country-wagons that clattered
into town, with guesses whence they came.
But, most of all, he made her dwell upon the
aspect of the country beyond the river. From
her look-out she had followed the farmers
through all their harvesting, from the first
glance of the sickle among the grain to the
garnering in the old red-roofed barns. She
had told himno more faithful chronicler than
Marthathe color the fields had put on in all
their changes, from green to brown, and back
again to green; and how the woods grew
bright, and ruffled and swelled with their palmy
leaves; and then, when the yellow crept among
thembut this she did not dwell on as the
other
,
for Fob's heart fell when he heard that
summer, the sweet, calm, gentle summer, was
leaving the country. She had watched his
fancy
,
and served it even in bringing him cider to
drink, pressed from the old orchards in
Westchester
,
where his youth, and hers too, for
that, had climbed and frolicked. One day, he
called to her to bring all his country treasures,
his plants, his birds'-egg chain, his asparagus,
and the fair addition she had made herself, and
lay them on his bed. Martha came and sat
down at his head. As his look passed from
one to the other, tears gathered in his eyes
and fell, like the summer rain, upon the
pillow
.
His heart was full, and he began to
babble of old times. He spoke of his youth,
and asked Martha if she remembered how he
used to come riding into the country, seated
gravely on the coach-seat, high in the air,
making
a show of helping the driver with his
horses? She did, of course she did; and how
she, with her mother, now dead and gone, used
to run and help him down. Then, there was
the visit to the garden, to see her robin that
she had been feeding sleek and plump all the
latter spring and early summer, against his
coming. Then the blackberrying, and the
grape-hunting, and the bird-nesting.
So summer after summer had passed; his
fatherthe cousin of Martha's fatherhad, to
the surprise of all the country round, come, by
the will of their whimsical grandfather, into
ownership of the homestead, which Martha's,
as the expectant and favored heir, had
occupied
before. Then, fortune turning once again
(a little law and a little doubtful practice
helping
her to turn), Martha's father had reinstated
himself. Fobhis father had died of vexation
and a broken heart, it was saidyoung and
penniless, was pushed forth upon the world
was driven upon the unpropitious craft he had
lately followed. Martha begged him, when he
came to this, to pass it bythough her father
had been her cruel jailer for yearsto pass it
by, as he loved her. How dark and unnatural
the little tailor's features grew as he came
upon
these recollections. He felt that his
countenance
was changed, and turned to the wall
that Martha might not learn how keen was his
sense of the wrong her fatherher unkind, her
unpaternal fatherhad done him. He had
done her, too, a cruel wrongbut she showed,
by no change of look or color, any
remembrance
of it whatever. When this cloud had
passed, and he could speak again, Fob dwelt
upon the old haunts he had visited while she
was in her dark dungeon at home, how she
had been with him in all.
In the lane, the meadow, the orchard,
said Fob, I lingered, striving to tread in the
very tracks we had made together when the
world went right with us. But it was all by
stealthat early morning or by the dull dusk;
and, in the indistinct light, how often, Martha,
did you seem to me to be gliding about, pale
and breathless, but still lovingpaler than
even now. As it wascautious and secret as
I could be in my watch, the laborers or boys of
the farm, crossing the paths on their way home
at night or back at morning, sometimes came
upon me, and started aside as though I had
been a spirit of evil.
I knew that it must be so, answerd
Martha
,
for these were days (it was when report
of yourself, the strange wanderer, had reached
my father's ear) when they said my illness was
deepening upon meI was moved to an inner
chamber, gloomier than the other, the
curtains
drawn close, the shutters sealed, and
secretly
nailed, toofor I heard the dull sound
of the hammerand light was shut from me as
if it had been a wicked thing.
Was that the result? cried Fob, with a
piteous look. What a fool I was, to bring
such a hardship upon you.
I do not say it was a hardship! said
Martha
,
I loved the darkness they thrust upon
me, deep and deadly as it was; it was full of
voices and bright eyes, like your own, telling
me of your love and faithful constancy. They
said the darkness made me more cheerfuland
they were right.
And what followed to you, continued Fob,
when they seized me as I was stealing along
under the garden-wall?
Fob stopped at once; the countenance of
Martha was whitening with a look of
sorrowful
entreaty, and her eyes filling with tears.
He understood it at a glanceshe wished to
have her father spared, though he had never
thought of sparing herand Fob turned at
once to talk of other things.
Do you remember the old orchard
burying-ground
,
he asked, and the uses to which we
were wont to put it?
To be sure I do, answered Martha,
recovering
her composure. The old
burying-ground
,
full of fruit-trees, with the little
school-house
pushed in at one side, as if it meant to
be a good neighbor. Toddling infants, dear
Fob, we strayed there to gather blossoms and
flowers, brighter than we could find anywhere
else. As we grew older and more learned,
you know, we loved to read our letters there
upon the tombstones; and, older still, and
wiser, were we not?we began to pluck the
red and yellow apples, the earliest ripened of
the neighborhood.
And then, said Fob, taking up the theme
as Martha paused, when our hearts ripened,
and our cheeks flushed like the fruit above us,
we used to sit in the summer noon under the
broad shade, leaning upon a grave, it might
be; and while the country round, for a wide
circuit, was steeped in a listening stillness, the
little burying-groundswarming with bees and
crickets, and melodious locustswas filled
with a gentle murmur, which seemed like the
undersong of the spirits that slept beneath its
turf.
Martha bent above Fob, as he spoke,
hanging
on his words.
And when, said Fob, rising in his couch
in enthusiasm, the little brook between the
schoolhouse and the graves, swelled by its
tributes
from the woods, babbled above them all
the gentle hum died away toward nightfall,
and the children came tumbling out of school,
you know, they used to cross it, and letting
their feet rest a moment on the graveyard's
edge, they escaped into the road and scampered
to their homes, leaving a sound of cheerful
young voices far behind. There, where little
feet tread every day, so that they may say
`Fob lies here!'lay me there!
He had spoken beyond his strength; and
these words were no sooner uttered than he
fell back upon his couch. Martha seized
his pale hand passionatelyas though she
could so hold him back from the world to which
he was hasteningand, bending above him,
begged him to speak again. Presently his eyes
opened, and he dwelt upon her face with a
bewildered
gaze. Was he among angelsthis
at his bedside the first he was to know? There
was not a word spoken, but their eyes were
busy interchanging their lustrous light, a calm,
bright, spell-bound gazewas this the talk of
the spiritual world?
At this moment the door opened; a young
gentleman of an ashen aspect, sandy hair,
and a look of strenuous cunning about the
eye, came in, and behind him, treading
lightly, and with a mournful look, Puffer
Hopkins
.
The young gentleman bore under his arm a
great bundle of papers, tied in a red string,
which he was at the pains to carry about, to
notify the public that he was a lawyer in
practice
a
good, brisk, chopping practice, as they
might infer from the size of the bundle. While
Puffer looked sorrowfully upon Martha and
Fob, the young gentleman busied himself in
slashing the feathers of a quill which he had
brought with him, and in peering about the
apartment for an inkstand.
He's going fast, said the young
gentleman
,
calling in his glances from their
unproductive
search, and fixing them upon the quill
which he was trimming. Didn't he gasp,
then, or was that a cat sneezing on the roof?
Puffer avoided his question, and asked
whether it was absolutely necessary to disturb
him now; he seemed to be in great pain.
To be sure it is, answered the young
gentleman
,
poising his papers in his two hands, to
show their weight. You couldn't have a
better
.
Testimony
in extremis
is the finest in the
world. Mr. Mouldy says he must have it;
and what Mouldy says is law!
Mr. Mouldy thinks he ought to be
identified
as the person that had the deed in his
possession
,
and who destroyed it. I so understood
him.
You understood him right, then, said the
young gentleman, turning calmly on his heel
as soon as he had made this answer, and
breaking
into a subdued whistling.
You attended to getting the old man here,
I believe? suggested Puffer.
I asked Mr. Mouldy about that before I
left the office. One of the boys has gone for
him; he will be here in a minute. With
which answer the young gentleman stepped
across the floor, and unfastening the blackbird
from where it hung upon the beam, took it to
the window, and began to make it hop about
in its cage by pricking it under the feathers
with his quill. Puffer, standing aside, dwelt
upon Fob and his pale companion, holding his
breath lest he should disturb them. Quick feet,
clattering up, were heard upon the stairs, and
Hobbleshank came hurrying in. At first he
started in surprise when he saw Martha, but
recovering himself speedily, he stepped about
the chamber, shaking hands with the young
gentleman, then with Puffer, and, last of all,
accosting Martha.
This, then, is your friend, said he,
smiling
upon her. She glanced at Fob, with a
look that went to the old man's heart, and he
was answered. Fob lifted his eyes, and
regarded
Hobbleshank with curious interest. Was
this another risen from the dead? Changed as
he was by years, the furrows on his
countenance
ploughed in, his hair grizzled and
gray-sprinkled
by timehe could not mistake him.
It was the old wanderer of the Scaresdale road.
The melancholy midnightthe raging seathe
rent deedall came up before him. A chair
was placed for Hobbleshank, and he took his
station by the bedside, where Fob could look
upon his countenance with the light streaming
upon it. The young gentleman had drawn up
the curtain; led Martha and Puffer aside, to
get rid of their shadows upon the bed; and
himself retreated behind a little screen at the
head of the bed, from which bower there
issued, from time to time, a scratching sound.
You have had troubles, sir, said Fob,
bearing in mind what he had seen on the
memorable
night.
A few, answered Hobbleshank, rubbing
his hands. A few, but they are all clearing
away. Have you had none?
Yours are older than mine, resumed Fob.
They have followed you to an old age; but
they are leaving me while I am still a young
man. Martha knew what he meant, and
turned and wept. You have been eighteen
years a sufferer, at least.
Let me see, said Hobbleshank, taking
the square breastpin from his bosom and
referring
to its back, which was graven and
lettered
.
Quite as long as that; but I'll soon
be young again. Fortune is my friend, and all
is coming right. An old parchment or soa
clew or two moreand I shall find my child,
and have a home to bring him to. In a day or
two all will be right.
They all smiled, the clerk evea laughed
aloud in his bower, at the earnest hopefulness
of the old man.
How a deed, all torn in fragments and
parcels
,
can come back, said Fob, smiling with
the others, it would be hard to guess. Won't
you admit that?
It seems so, at first, answered
Hobbleshank
;
but a good Providence, I am sure
I feel it whispering in my ear this very
minute
is
putting it together. It will be ready
when I want it.
And that is now! said Fob, reaching
backward under his pillow. And here it is!
Hobbleshank held in his hand the parchment
he had scattered on the seashore a lifetime
ago. He would not believe it, but, springing
from his chair, ran to the window, where he
would have read it, but his hands trembled and
made it waver, all blurred and confused before
him. He called Puffer to his aid, who, going
over it slowly, line by line, made known its
contents. When Puffer came to the passage
relating to his child, he made him pause and
read it over twice, looking up into the reader's
face with a look of indescribable satisfaction.
It was his old deed, and no other.
Where did this come fromwhere was it
foundby whom? asked Hobbleshank,
looking
toward the little tailor.
Eighteen years ago, said Fob, as soon as
Hobbleshank could be brought to take his seat
again by the bedside, there was an old
sorrow-stricken
man, travelling by the shore of
the sound. Eighteen years ago this deed was
rent by his hands in a hundred fragments.
Wherewhere is he now? asked
Hobbleshank
,
from whose mind all recollection of
the occurrenceso fast had troubled thoughts
and times huddled upon himhad entirely
faded. Where is this man?
You are the man; older, but happier, it
would seemand I am the other, your
fellow-wanderer
that night. Live and grow in
happiness
,
while I pass beyond the sphere of
earthly
pain or pleasure. You are the man!
His strength was utterly gone, and ere
Martha
could reach his side, he lay, his arms
stretched out, his head fixed and rigid on the
pillow. They all thought he was dead. In a
little whileMartha ministering what she
could to bring him backa faint color came
into his cheek, his eyes opened again upon the
light; but now their expression was changed.
They wandered from face to face with a
hopeless
and bewildered glance. His mind was
gone astray. He babbled incoherently of the
green fieldsthe old coachthe homestead.
Sometimes he repeated the name of Martha
then he had another upon his tongue, but,
shuddering, it died away before it was uttered.
Whenever his hands, straying about the
covering
of his bed, fell upon any one of his
country
treasures, he came back and talked of early
times. News had spread throughout the Fork
that Fob was dying, and they thronged up, and
holding the little children in their handsFob
had always been a friend of theirsthey stood
at the door, looking on with sorrowful respect.
At this moment the young gentleman came
from behind the screen, pressed his quill upon
his coat-skirt, and thrust the new paper he had
been framing among the others in the bundle.
He then scrutinized the deed curiously for a
minute, and handing it to Hobbleshank,
advised
him to roll it up and put it in his pocket;
and, clapping his bundle of papers under his
arm, he walked off.
As the sun waned away in the sky, the
brightness
faded from Fob's look, and he spoke only
at long intervals; murmuring what he would
say, so that no one but Martha, whose face
was always close to his, could gather what he
uttered.
A little while after sunsetthe room was
growing dark in all its cornershe began to
talk aloud again. He called, over and over
again, for an old serving-man of the
homestead
,
whose name he mentioned, to come to
his side; fixed his look on the poor blackbird,
whose cage had been restored to its place
upon
the beam, and clasped, tighter and tighter,
Martha's hand in his. With the gentle motion
of the wind upon a field of autumn grain, his
spirit stole away; and at an hour past sunset
Fob was dead!
CHAPTER XXXIII.
PUFFER IS NOMINATED TO THE AMERICAN
CONGRESS
.
It
would be a great wrong to Puffer
colored as were all his acts by some hue of
his tradeto suppose that the death of his
poor neighbor had not touched him nearly.
The genial spirit of the Fork was gone; the
kindly sunshine which had flowed from that
little dormer through all its chambers, was
darkened. Puffer felt that a dear friend was
dead. He would have helped, with other
ready hands, to lay him in a quiet grave; but
when he would have offered aid, the body
which Martha had watched alone, refusing,
even angrily, all aid or companywas gone,
no one could tell whither. It had been borne
forth secretly at dusk; and one of the children
who had been out at play upon the meadows,
brought news that he had seen it upon the
shoulders
of two men, in the suburbs, gliding toward
the country, with Martha watching and
following
it alone.
With the kindliest remembrance of his poor
friend, Puffer was not permitted long to rest;
the pressure from without forced upon him
other thoughts. His fortunes were on the
advance
,
and he would set apart a quiet hour,
at some better day, to think of the little tailor
and his virtues.
An unlucky accident at the Capitol required
that an election should be held for a single
member of Congress. The late city
representative
the
lamented Slocum, he was entitled
in the newspapershad lost his invaluable life
under a surfeit of Potomac oysters and long
speeches, and his place was now to be supplied.
To carry on the contest with spirit, and any
chance of success, it was necessary that an
issue
should be raised; it didn't matter greatly
what or which side either espoused. The
upper
Wabash presented itself and was adopted.
The excitement rose to an unexampled pitch.
The orators of Puffer's party, the Bottomites,
having mastered their cue, went all lengths in
denouncing it as an infraction of the rights
of citizensan invasion of the constitution
an act of the most high-handed despotism;
and foremost and conspicuous among these
was Puffer himself. He was the very
imbodiment
of the anti-upper-Wabash feeling; and
he was nominated to the vacancy. Was there
ever a more extraordinary character known
in history, ancient or modern, sacred or
profane
than
Puffer Hopkins, now that he was
nominated to Congress on the eve of a decisive
contest? The newspapers, morning, noon,
and night, teemed with his praises. Little,
obscure, out-of-the-way circumstances in his
history, were dragged forth and made the
occasion
of the most flattering comment and
allusion
.
Some one or other had discovered his habit of
visiting the city cellars in quest of oysters; he
was immediately styled the Patriot of the
Piehouses
.
He had caught, one afternoon, in
company with a crew of political cronies, a
small carful of striped-bass and Lafayette fish,
in the East river, and was declared the Hero
of Kipp's bay. He had saved an
omnibus-driver
from being beaten to death by a crowd,
for riding over the legs of a boyand he was
the Champion of Conveyance. His very
head was taken off his shoulders and put in
plaster; delegations of tradesmen were
constantly
waiting upon him, or writing
complimentary
letters, humbly soliciting the honor
of crowning him with a new hat, or arraying
him in a clean dickey. The Bottomites
being
staunch friends of free-tradeinsisted on
clapping him in a coat of Thibet wool, fancy
pants of French jean, boots of Poughkeepsie
leather, and a palm-leaf hat, so that he should
be a representative of the unrestricted fabrics
of the four quarters of the earth.
On the other side, the illustrious Insurance
President, Mr. Blinker, being a bitter foe to
fire, and quite as close a friend to the opposite
element, and having recovered his popularity
in the interval since his defeat, by insuring two
poor cartmen's sheds at his own risk, and
adopting the son of a disabled sailor as one of
the secretaries of the company (though the
young gentleman was as innocent of pot-hooks
and ledgers as a Kamschatkan), Mr. Blinker
was nominated by the advocates of the Upper
Wabash.
To carry out his principles, Mr. Blinker
having discovered that a second-hand senatorial
coat and a sable and satin neckcloth were not
always triumphantassumed a round-crowned
hat, and a homespun coat and breeches of the
plainest texture; in which array he went about
diligently, drinking incessant glasses of
gratuitous
water at the grocers', in furtherance of
his Upper Wabash principles.
He also proceeded to an active canvass of
the churches, by attending a new one every
Sunday, and rattling in a donation of half a
dollar at least, at each.
Puffer, not to be outdone by Mr. John
Blinker
,
canvassed the markets in opposition to the
churches; and having drilled a small company
of young vagabonds, he made a circuit of the
market-places on Saturday nights with these
their rags flying to the wind, and an expression
of doleful gratitude in their facesrunning at
his heels; Puffer keeping in the advance, and
from time to time ordering a cutlet, or steak,
or tender-loin, to be cast in. This was so well
enacted, that he had not made a tour of the
markets more than twice before he had the
butchers in tears, and swearing by
liver-and-lights
,
their own tender-loins, and all that they
hold holiest, that Puffer was an angel, with a
heart as big as an ox.
Everything gave token of a close and furious
contest. Appeals, fresh and frequent, were
made to every possible interest and every
possible
voter. It was shown conclusively, in more
than one harangue, and a hundred leaders, that
every trade and denomination in business
laity
,
clergy, law, medicine, merchandisewere
particularly and vitally affected in the questions
presented at the coming election. And, as the
time drew nearer, a forcible address was made
to that one voter in particular, by whose
deportment
,
as is well known, the fate of every
contest is determined. There was not a
device
for creating or securing electors that was
not brought to bear; and the one party or the
other was constantly startled into unheard-of
exertions, by learning that its opposite was
strengthening itself with fresh recruits from
quarters that could have never been dreamed of.
There was one that toiled in Puffer's behalf
more like a spirit than a man; a little shrunken
figure, that was everywhere, for days before
the canvass; a universal presence, breathing
in every ear the name of Puffer. There was
not a tap-room that he did not haunt; no
obscure
alley into which he did not penetrate, and
make its reeking atmosphere vocal with his
praises. Wherever a group of talkers or
citizens
were gathered, the little old man glided in
and dropped a word that might bear fruit at
the ballot-box. At nightfall he would mix with
crowds of shipwrights' prentices and laborers,
and kindle their rugged hearts with the thought
of the young candidate.
He stopped not with grown men and voters,
but seizing moments when he could, he
whispered
the name in children's ears, that, being
borne to parents by gentle lips, it might be
mixed with kindly recollections, and so be made
triumphant.
It was given out that the Blinkerites had
established
or discovered, in some under-ground
tenements that never saw light of day, a great
warren of voters. When the toilsome old man
learned of this burrow that was to be sprung
against his favorite, he looked about for an
equal mine, whence voters might be dug in
scores, at a moment's notice, should occasion
demand. With this in view, one afternoon, he
entered Water street, at Peck slip, like a skilful
miner, as though a great shaft had been sunk
just there.
And a strange climate it was that he was
entering; one where the reek and soil are so
thick and fertile, that they seem to breed
endless
flights of great white overcoats, and
red-breasted
shirts, and flying blue trowsers, that
swarm in the air, and fix, like so many bats,
against the house-sides.
Tropical, too, for there's not a gaudy color,
green, or red, or orange-yellow, that the sun,
shining through the smoky atmosphere, does
not bring out upon the house-fronts; and for
inhabitants of the region, there are countless
broad-backed gentlemen, who, plucking from
some one of the neighboring depositories a cloth
roundabout, a black tarpaulin, and white slops,
sit in the doorways launching their cigars upon
the street, or gather within.
Hobbleshank, a resident of the inland
quarter
of the city, certainly came upon these, with
his frock and eye-glass, as a traveller and
landsman from far in the interior; and when
he first made his appearance in their
thoroughfare
,
looking hard about with his single eye, it
could not be cause of surprise that they
wondered
aloud as he passed, where the little old
lubber had come from, and that more than one
of them invited him to a drink of sheep's milk,
or a collop of a young zebra, that one avowed
they were chasing in the back yard for supper,
at that moment.
But when, as he got accustomed to the place,
he accosted them with a gentle voice, said a
complimentary word for their sign-board, with
its full-length sailor's lassHope upon her
anchor
,
or sturdy Strength, standing square upon
his pinsthey began at once to have a fancy
for the old man.
He passed from house to house, making
friends in each. Sometimes he made his way
into the bar-room, where, seated against the
wall, on benches all around the sanded floor,
with dusty bamboo rods, alligator skins,
outlandish
eggs, and sea-weeds plucked among the
Caribees or the Pacific islands, or some far-off
shore, he would linger by the hour, listening
with all the wondering patience of a child, to
their ocean-talk. And when they were through,
he would draw a homely similitude between
their storythe perils their ship had crossed
with the good ship of state; and then tell them
of a young friend of his, who was on trial
before
the ship's crew for a master's place.
Before
he left, in nine cases of ten, they gave
their hands for Puffer, sometimes even rising
and confirming it with a cheer that shook the
house, and brought their messmates thronging
in from the neighborhood, when the story would
be recited to them by a dozen voices, and new
recruits to Puffer's side enrolled.
Then, again, he would be told of an old sick
sailor in an upper chambertied there by
racking
pains in his joints, answering, they would
say, each wrench to the trials his old ship's
timbers were passing through on the voyage
she was now out uponand mounting up, he
would find him busy in his painful leisure,
building a seventy-six, razeed to the size of a
cock-boat, for the landlord's mantle. Gaining
upon him by degrees, Hobbleshank would sit
at his side; and by-and-by, when he saw it
would be kindly taken, gathering up a thread
of twine or two, and helping to form a length
of cable or rigging. By the time a dozen ropes
were fashioned, he would have a promise from
the old sea-dog that he would show his teeth
at the polls when roll-call came.
There were some, too, engaged in boisterous
mirth and jollity in back parlors, just behind
the bar; where a plump little fellow, in his
blue roundabout, duck trowsers supported by
the hips, and tarpaulin hat, with a flying riband
that touched the floor and shortened him in
appearance by a foot, broke down in a
hornpipe
to the sound of an ancient fiddle, that
broke down quite as fast as he did. In the
enthusiasm
that held him, Hobbleshank even joined
in, and with some comic motions and strange
contortions of the visage, carried the day so
well that he won the back parlor's heart at
once; and they promised him whatever he
asked.
The little old mantrue to the interest he
had first shownbent himself with such hearty
good will to his task, that when, after many
days' labor, he left Water street, at its other
extremity, there was not a ripe old salt that
was not gathered, nor a tall young sailor that
was not harvested, for the cause. And so he
pursued the task he had set to himself without
faltering, without a moment's pause. For days
before the contest came on, he was out at
sunrise
,
moving about wherever a vote could be
found; nursing and maturing it for the polling
day, as a gardener would a tender plant;
watching and tending many in out-of-the-way
places, and by a skilful discourse, a chance
word, an apt story, ripening it against the time
when it was to be gathered.
Late at night, when others, who might have
been expected to be stirring and making
interest
for themselves, slumbered,
Hobbleshank
,
taking his rounds through the city with
the watchmen, with more than the pains of an
industrious clear-starcher, smoothed the
placards
on the fences; jumping up where they
were beyond his height, as was often the case,
and brushing them down, both ways, with
outspread
hands, so that they should read plain
and free to the simplest passer-by. Was there
ever one that toiled so, with the faith and
heart of an angel, in the dusty road that
time-servers
use to travel!
CHAPTER XXXIV.
HE DINES WITH THE MAGISTRATES.
In
the very midst of these silent labors of
Hobbleshank, Puffer was at his desk,
meditating
a letter from an imaginary constituent to
himself, and had got as far as, To the
Honorable
Puffer Hopkins, M. C., when there filed
into his chamber three gentlemen, who,
looking
about for a moment and discovering that
there were not chairs enough to hold them all,
drew themselves up in a line and stood before
him. Puffer, quite equal to the emergency,
rose from his desk and faced his platoon of
visiters
.
One of them, the head of the line, was
a tall gentleman, in a segar-ash complexion
and a rough frock-coat, in the pockets of which
he deposited his hands; the centre, a stout,
rosy personage, whose head was propped up by
a shirt-collar, of alabaster purity and stiffness,
under his ears; and the other, a little
black-haired
man, with a large mouth, and arms of
an extraordinary length. Mr. Hopkins
inquired
,
delicately, into the object of their
mission
.
We have come, sir, said the long-armed
gentleman, reaching forth convulsively to the
chair from which Puffer had risen, drawing it
before him and fastening both hands firmly on
its top; we have come, sir, to express our
respect
for your past public careerour
admiration
of the unflinching fortitude with which
you have adhered to objects
Yes, sirto objects, interposed the stout
gentleman, cutting in as if he thought the
long-armed man was getting more than his
share; yes, sir, to objects of a profoundly
patriotic character; and, sir, we feel the
honor
of being delegated to wait upon you for the
purpose of testifying the interest with which
your course has been watched, not only, sir,
he pursued, thrusting his left hand into his
coat and spreading it upon a ruffled bosom;
not only, sir, by the friends of good order
and correct principlesof advanced agebut
also
By the rising generation; continued the
tall gentleman, groping earnestly in the
bottom
of his frock-coat pockets, and drawing
himself up to his full height. You will not
be surprised, therefore, sir, to learn that we
are authorized to ask you, in the name of the
common council of New York, to partake of a
dinner with the magistrates of this city
At the almshouse, said the long-armed
gentleman, this afternoon
At five o'clock, said the stout speaker.
The three orators had put Puffer in
possession
of their errand, and he had a shrewd guess
as one of them was an alderman, and the
others assistantsthat this was one of those
cases where a committee had been unable to
agree upon a mouthpiece, and had
compromised
the difficulty by distributing the speech,
as fairly as they could, in three parts.
The invitation was not to be slighted; and,
having appointed to call for him at four, they
filed out of the apartment in the same order in
which they had entered. At four o'clock they
reappeared, coming up in a body to wait upon
him to the carriage, as if determined that no
one should enjoy a crumb of honor more than
the other. The vehicle into which the party
mounted was an old corporation hack, and the
horses, having travelled this road any time for
ten years past, jogged along at an easy gait,
knowing well enough that an alderman does
not like to be disturbed in his agreeable
reveries
on the way to dinner. Leaving the streets,
in less than half an hour they were out upon
the avenue, where, as they glided comfortably
along, they were constantly passed by
gentlemen
in rough coats, just like the tall
assistant's
,
who, bending over in light wagons, gave
the rein to long-legged, dock-tailed horses, and
emulated the speed of other gentlemen with
long-legged nags and rough coats. Sometimes
one passed, perched in the air upon an invisible
axle resting between two huge wheels, and
who held himself suspended, it seemed, by a
constant miracle. Not more than fifty of these
gentry had whirled by, tearing up the avenue,
and losing themselves in clouds of dust in
the distance, when the three aldermen, looking
unanimously out of the coach-window,
exclaimed
in a breath, Here we are!
Puffer looked out, too. A great gate opened
silently from within; their carriage glided
through; and, rolling gently down a broad
way, they found themselves at the East river's
brink, shut out by thick walls from all the city
world. The buildings that stood behind them,
and with which they were fellow-prisoners in
this silent realm, were dark and gray.
The air and place were tranquil as midnight,
and in strange contrast with the incessant
motions
and shoutings of the busy road they had
left. The old almshouse, resting on the very
water's edge, sat as silent as a stone; the
water
,
calm and smooth, seemed to stretch away
before its dark old front, to furnish a glass in
which it might view itself and learn how it
bore its age. The sun poured a full afternoon
into the yard, and, sitting in its very centre,
his face against the river, in the porch of the
building as they entered, was an old beggar,
who, with a countenance of marble firmness
and locks white as the unhetchled flax, seemed
to be the image and god of the stillness that
reigned about.
The moment they ascended a few steps and
opened a door, a peal of laughter burst, like a
cloud upon the silence, in their very faces, and
passing through the hall, they were in a room
where the chief guests were assembled. In the
centre of the group stood Mr. Gallipot, the
mayor, in an entire new outfit, so ill-adjusted,
and disproportioned to his person, that there
could not be a doubt but that it had seen
Chatham
street in its infancy, and while it was
growing into the dress of an adult mayor.
How are you, Hopkins? cried his honor,
from the midst of his guests, Let's have you
this way! Open the ring, Jenkinsstand
back there, Tom Smith; and, falling away as
they were bidden, Mr. Gallipot came forward,
and seized Puffer cordially by the hand.
Messrs. Jenkins and Tom Smithtwo noted
bottle-holders of the mayor'soffered him as
hearty a welcome, with others, the chief
politicians
of the city, who were there; and a short
fellow, in a poorhouse gray roundabout and
poorhouse cut hair, coming in and giving the
summons, they marched across the hall to
dinner
.
The table was spread in a large square
room, with delicious windows upon the river,
and under the auspices of a stout gentleman,
who hung in a great frame upon the wall, and
gave warranthaving been a noted haunter of
the room in his lifetimeof the good cheer that
there abounded.
There was no quarrel for precedence; the
mayor, with Puffer at his right hand, seized the
head of the table; the others fell into chairs,
whose locality they seemed to have pitched
upon
long before, and, seated at once, they filled
them so happily, one might have sworn they
were born, each man, for the particular
windsor
or rush-bottom he occupied. The three
stickling committee-men, even, had adjusted
matters, the stout one sitting at the foot of the
table, in its centre, and each of the other two
at his wings. And when, speedily and in
solemn
order, the dishes began to appear, as one
after the other came in at the head of the
apartment
,
a whole galaxy of eyes rolled that way,
and fixed upon them with a lingering fondness
that would have moved the soul of a pagan.
And now the table was full, Puffer was not
a little surprisedbut quite as well pleased
to see his old friend Hobbleshank, handsomely
laid between a couple of aldermen, with whom
he seemed to have a good understanding, at
the other end.
Imperfect and obscure is the experience of
any one who has not eaten a poorhouse dinner.
The highest happiness allotted to manat
least in his imperfect and sinful state of
existence
as a New-Yorkerit would seem, is to
dine at the old almshouse. Jupiter restored
to earth, would make his first call there; and
there Bacchus, if allowed, would undoubtedly
bespeak lodgings for the rest of his immortality.
For two weeks, in anticipation of the
present
banquet, the garden had been hoed, and
harrowed, and forced; the neighboring river
had been anxiously searched for certain
delicate
fish that were known to lurk in the rocks,
holding themselves in reserve for an alderman,
for an equal fortnight; and two sharp-eyed
paupers had been off on an excursion up the
Sound, in watch for duck and pigeon. Nothing
could be more perfect, more delicious, and
grateful, than the dinner spread upon the
board; and nothing more artful and ingenious
than the arrangement of the diners. The
cooks and servants of the establishment moved
by a sure instinctmost of the guests were
habitual frequenters of the placeseasoned each
dish to a turn, and each gentleman was now
found seated directly opposite whatever a
well-practised
appetite most earnestly coveted. For
better than an hour, a silence profound as death
reigned through the hall. The waiters, in their
poor-house livery, and licking their chaps,
moved about on tiptoe; it would have cost
them their standing as paupers to have broken
the charm by a word. Dishes were brought in
and removed, in a mysterious stealth, which
lent a piquancy to the proceeding; and the
very feeders themselves, absorbed in the sacred
rites of the place, only ventured now and then
to look off, for a minute, and smile to each
other, and then started afresh.
This at an end, wine was brought in, a basket
at a time, and being placed near his honor the
mayor, he proceeded to uncork, but so
unskilfully
,
it seems, that the corks took a blank
range down the table, and, what was singular,
they always fell into a line that caused them to
strike, dead-point, the sconce of a little
quidnunc
,
who was said to be a butt of the
mayor's
.
Then the bottles were distributed down
the table, one to each man; which, being
planted upon the board, stood there, a sort of
tipsy ninepin, to be bowled down by the
evening's
mirth. When it was known that every
glass was loaded to the brim, Mr. Gallipot
sprang to his feet; every eye was fixed upon
him with intense anxiety; and when he
announced, Our Country, they started in
like manner to their feet, and fell upon their
wine with such patriotic ardor, that no one could
have in the least suspected that country or its
institutions of being in any way the bottom and
main supply of the present festivities. But
when Mr. Gallipot followed this with The
Public Charities, a faint surmise might have
dawned on the beholder's mind, that the
enthusiasm
was real, and that they meant all
they did when they drank a bumper to these
excellent corporate contrivances for such as are
a hungered and athirst. And when, further
on, his honor, allowing scarce a breath
between
,
followed this up with, Our
distinguished
guest and next memberPuffer
Hopkins
a
fearful tempest swept the table from
end to end; and one or two of the lighter
quidnuncs
were even lifted from their feet, and
landing upon the table, shook the glasses and
bottles till they danced with them with joy.
They felt grateful to Puffer for furnishing
them so plausible an opportunity to investigate
the economy of so excellent a city charity.
Puffer was bound, of course, to respond to
these admirable sentiments.
Really (this was the train of his
observations
)
he never felt so oppressed in his life, in
rising to speak. He was surrounded by kind
and generous friends. He was their creature
they had taken him, a poor friendless youth,
and made him what he was. Little had he
dreamed, when making his first humble effort
at Fogfire hall, of attaining an honor like this.
If any one had told him the time would arrive
when he should partake of canvass-back and
champagne with his honor, the mayor, and the
common council of New York, at the almshouse,
he would have laughed at their folly.
Canvassback
and champagne!they might as well
have talked to him of a steam-carriage to
Chimborazo, or a balloon-ride to the first fixed
star!
While Puffer was speaking, two or three of
the inmates of the place were drawn to the
door, and as he advanced in his speech, and
looked off in that direction, by way of
illustration
or gesture, he observed that two of them
had fixed their attention keenly upon him
himself
.
One of them was a woman, of a stout
person, into whose face some color was
creeping
,
through easy living and good fare, and the
other a man, thin and sorrowful of look.
By the time he was done speaking, one of
the poorhouse attendants had touched
Hobbleshank
upon the shoulder, and he now
helped to make the group that gathered in the
doorway.
When Hobbleshank and the woman met, it
was, as their looks told, as those who have
been parted for yearsbetween whom some
mighty secret is kept, and who have some
great trouble in common. They talked
earnestly
togetherthe woman and the
forlorn-looking
pauper asserting something over and
over again, it seemed, to which the old man
would not yield, nor would he, altogether,
withhhold belief.
The dinners were, meanwhile, fairly
embarked
;
the stream of mirth was full; as it flowed
up and down the board it sometimes attained
a rapid head, carrying all before it in a
general
glee; or paused in little eddies and islets of
drinkers, where it tarried and circled round
and round within itself. There was one, a
roaring whirlpool of jockeys from the avenue,
who, with loud jokes and broad gusts of
anecdote
,
kept up a constant pother where they sat.
Then, farther on, there was a more quiet fry
of ex-sheriffs, fine, rosy fellowshanging and
jumping of the rope are your healthiest
exercises
,
it would seem; and then, in a stormier
latitude, a shoal of aldermen, who kept up in
their drink windy discussions without end.
Among these, Puffer, as the jollity grew apace,
was called down from his station near Mr.
Gallipot, and it brought him within earshot of
the group in the passage, who had watched
him so strangely in his speech. They were
still there, their heads close together,
Hobbleshank's
central, and busiest of all; and
they still turned, from time to time, in their
talk, and regarded Puffer with the same strange
gaze. Whatever Puffer, with an ear sharpened
by a curiosity he could not control, caught, was
so straggling and disjointed, that it conveyed
to his mind no distinct impression of their
purpose
.
Their conference seemed, at length, at
an end.
I think as you do, he heard Hobbleshank
whispering to the others, looking from the
woman to the stranger, and then toward
himself
;
I thought so from the first; but I have
been too often mistaken, I could not bear to be
wrong againit would kill me, Hetty; let us
be cautious.
He muttered something in a broken and
earnest tonePuffer could see his lips grow
pale and quiver as he spokeand, leaving
them, he hurried up the room and took the
place at the table among the friends he had
left.
There was no pause in the mirth of the
magistrates
and their guests; fresh baskets were
broached every minute, a tipsy song roared
out, and the adults there present attached
themselves to the long-necked flasks as if they
had been brought there to be nursed on claret
and champagne at the city charge. It was a
relief to Puffer to hear what passed among the
nurslings in their probation. Obliquely from
him up the table, an arm's-length or two, there
were a couple whose nursing seemed to try
the constitution to an alarming pitch; and
instead
of being benefited, in any degree, by the
dark spirit with whom they held so many close
and earnest conferences, they always got back
from the interview less robust in person and
demeanor than ever.
You know very well, Bill, that I o'rt to
have thatplace if anychap has it, said
one of them, a fine, large, sturdy-looking fellow,
for a nursling, speaking slowly, out of respect
to the understanding of his friend. Dn it,
Bill, dep'ty street-inspectorit's chalk for
cheesefor one what's donewhatwhat
what
His chin knocked upon his breast, and he
kept asking himself, for five minutes or more,
what it was.
I'm the man that's got up twelve public
meetings in the course of an humble life, said
the other, at the top of his voice, and, looking
around to call the attention of the company;
carried banners in five processions;
pall-bearer
to the late devoted Alderman Smith;
you know me, Mr. Gallipot? Did you ever
know a more ardent friend of his country than
William Scraggs?Who'll sign this 'ere roll,
for Billy Scraggs? And Mr. Scraggs
produced
,
from his breast-pocket, a soiled scroll,
which he unfurled across the table, and
holding
an end in his hand, he tumbled into the
same slumber that had already ingulfed his
rival.
After an interval of half an hour they
wakened
,
one getting the advantage of the other
by not more than a minute, and renewed the
dispute for the inspectorship; and after a brief
and slightly confused statement of their claims,
they lapsed back again into their dreams.
There was no abatement in the spirit of the
almshouse dinner. Even till midnight,
speeches
were made by aldermen and laymen and
ex-sheriffs
.
Healthssometimes of individuals,
sometimes a broadside of the table against
broadside
were
drained, and Puffer, finding that a
sadness had crept upon him, out of all
harmony
with their mirth, quietly withdrew, leaving
his three committee-men on their feet together,
and at an advanced stage of champagne,
delivering
speeches against each other; and his
honor, the mayor, with his bottle-holders,
squeezing lemons vehemently, at each side of
him, brewing a drink for which he was
famous
.
In the open air, he found the doorway and
high steps thronged with paupers, who had
kept themselves from bed that they might
listen
to the uproar and jollification of their
masters
.
It was such precious fun, one of them
said, to see the corporation feeding its corpo
ration, and getting high on taxes and brown
bread. Puffer thought he had escaped
unobserved
,
but, as he entered the carriage, he
found Hobbleshank at his side, asking to bear
him company.
To be sure, answered Puffer, I would
rather ride back with one like you than the
three I came up with.
The old man smiled, but was silent, and this
silence he maintained till they were half down
the city. And when he began to speak, Puffer
observed that his discourse was not of that in
which either had an interest, but of remote
and indifferent things, like one unwilling to
speak of that which is nearest his heart, and
who trifles in this way lest he betray himself.
CHAPTER XXXV.
THE TRIAL OF MR. FYLER CLOSE.
Two
months from the burning of Close's
row, a large-nosed man, with brandy-colored
cheeks, was busy, at early morning, locking
the hall gates, when a small old man shambled
up, and, holding on the outside, accosted him.
Does the trial come on to day? he asked.
To be sure it does, answered the other,
looking up, didn't you know that? A man
with a augur-hole for an eye might see that.
Look at them wagons over there, pointing
with a key through the bars, into Chatham
street. When you see 'em taking in pies at
that rate in them shops, there's a capital
offence
coming on up stairs. Them
shop-keepers
is growing blessed rich on murders and
hommycidesthe Oyer and Terminer demand
for pies sells 'em out twice a day while the
court sits.
How did he sleep last night? asked the
old man. He did not mention him by name,
but the other knew that he meant the prisoner.
Oh, beautiful, sirvery beautiful, sir!
answered the large-nosed gate-fastener. We
ha'n't had a lovelier prisoner sin' Johnson's
day.
An inexpressible spasm convulsed the
countenance
of the questioner, which, being busy
at the lock, the officer did not observe.
No dreams, resumed the old man,
holding
hard upon the bars. Wasn't he troubled
a little in his sleep, sir?
He watched the answer with a breathless
look.
Not a bit of it; not as much as 'ud stir a
eye-lash. I was in the passage by his cell the
better part of the night, and his breath comed
and went like a infant's.
The old man's features fell; he had
evidently
expected a different report. The gates were
by this time all fastened close and surethe
gate-fastener hurried away, clattering his keys
and, going round where an opening was left
for passers in and out, the old man went in.
Climbing the winding stairs, he proceeded
along the upper passage, and took his station
by the court-room door, where he hoped the
prisoner would pass. For a long time he stood
there alone, starting at every sound that broke
through the hall. By-and-by they began to
come in, one by one, and cluster about the
door; and by ten o'clock the passages were all
filled. Presently, black-topped staves were
seen bobbing up and down in the press, and
forcing their way, with much jostling and an
occasional oath, the officers reached the door,
and thrusting the crowd back, held them in
check till the door was unbarred from within.
The crowd poured in in a flood-tide, bearing
the officers every now and then from their post
at the door, into the very-centre of the
court-room
.
In less than a quarter of an hour the
room was overflowed, crowded in every corner,
all the seats back, from the rail to the ceiling,
all the passages, and some stood perched in the
window-seats and about the cornices, holding
on by what they could. The prisoner was
already
at the table inside of the bar; he had
been got in by a private stairs; and when the
first rush of the crowd broke in, he started in
his chair and looked wildly round, supposing,
for the moment, they had been let in to tear
him in pieces.
He soon recovered himself, and turning his
seat about, watched them as they came in, one
by one. Among the first to enter was the
small old man, upon whom, from the first
moment
,
Fyler fixed his eye, and turning from
time to time, watched him in the crowd. Was
that man abroad yet? his look seemed to say.
Fyler thought he had driven his plans so
keenly
,
that he must have been, by this time, clean
out of his wits, and pent up in some cell of
madmen or other.
Presently the judge entereda long,
withered
man, with a face as dry and yellow as a
mummy, and a shrub of dusty-looking hair,
standing off from his crown in every direction.
Fyler looked up into his face as he passed,
and smiled; the judge, without taking the
slightest heed of the prisoner, proceeded to his
place upon the bench, where he busied himself
with a newspaper. In a couple of minutes
more he was followed by a large, red-cheeked
man, in a predominant shirt-collar, and a
supple
,
small man, who, bestowing themselves
upon
chairs on either side of his honor, looked as
judicial and dignified as a pair of weazel-eyes
and a highly-starched shirt-collar would allow
them. The court was in session; and, order
being demanded by the presiding judge, there
was, for five minutes, an incessant running
to and fro of officers through every part of
the court-room, crying, Hats off! and
waking
up every echo that had slept over-night
in the angles and cobwebs of the chamber.
One rushed into the outer passage, shouting,
Silence! with such vehemence, that one
might have supposed he was calling, in his
distraction, for a personal friend instead of a
genius or spirit with which he was on such
doubtful terms of understanding. The court
was duly opened by proclamation, and at the
judge's bidding a crier of the court, a
white-haired
old fellow, began turning a wheel, and
drawing ballots on which were written the
names of the persons summoned for the present
trial.
One by one, as they were summoned, they
emerged from the crowd and were sworn. Some
had read the newspapers, and couldn't sit on
the jury without hanging the prisoner. One
had a theory about heads which would compel
him to acquit the prisoner; and another a
theory
about faces which would oblige him to
convict. There was a keeper of a
livery-stable
that never knew a man nor a horse with
such an eye as the prisoner's, that wasn't
vicious. More than a hundred were dismissed
in this way. At last, by dint of baffling the
point, and hunting scruples in at a needle's
point, and out at an eyelet-hole, they
succeeded
in obtaining twelve men, who, though they
read the newspapers, didn't believe a word of
them; who knew the facts of the case, but
hadn't formed an opinion; and who, though
they had conscientious doubts about hanging,
in any case, thought they could string a man
up if the law required it.
The case was calledthe prisoner was
arraigned
and
being helped to his feet by two
officers at his side, was asked for his plea.
I'm a ruined man, sir! answered Fyler,
looking wildly around, and I'd like to have
a pint of beer!
Saying which he knocked his head through
his hat, and, winked out at the top, at the
judge, with all his might.
I see how it is, said the judge, coolly;
remove his hat, officergo on, Mr. District
Attorney.
The district attorney, who was for all the
world just such another looking person as the
judge, cut down two sizesthat is, he was as
dry, as hard-featured, and thin-haired, but not
so tall by a headpulled down his waistcoat
and opened the case.
The crime of arson was a dreadful crime; it
had prevailed to an alarming extent in this
community, and he called upon the jury in that
box to say whether a stop ahould be put to it
or not. Was there a more dreadful crime
conceivable
,
gentlemen of the jury, than the one
with which the prisoner at the bar was
charged
?
Who was safe in this community if such
things were allowed? Fire, that terrible
element
,
whose wing scathed wherever it swept
(he detected in the jury-box a Presbyterian
gentleman, who smiled at this allusion, and he
worked it out at great length). Firethe
accredited
agent of Omnipotence in balancing
accounts
with the world; the element by which
temples, and palaces, and warehouses, were to
be all wrapped into everlasting nothingness. He
would be able to show the circumstances under
which the buildings in question (he meant
S
Close's row) were fired; that it was an act of
cool, fiendish, and black-hearted villany. That
it had been premeditated for a long time, and
that a moment had been chosen to put it in
execution
when a terrible loss of life must have
ensued. He would show that jury that the
prisoner at the bar was inspired by the spirit
of a fiend, and had acted true to the spirit by
which he was inspired. It was to be seen
whether this community would countenance
such a spirit. He sat down, and the moment
he struck the seat called out for J. Q. R. Sloat.
Mr. J. Q. R. Sloat thereupon stepped
forward
,
and proved to be a gentleman with
staring
eyes, a pair of thickset whiskers, and
extraordinary
coolness of deportment. He took
the witness's stand, and, sucking his teeth
sonorously
,
was sworn.
You are an officer of police, Mr. Sloat?
said the district attorney.
I am, sir, answered Mr. Sloat.
What do you know of the firing of the
buildings called Close's row, on the 19th of
June last?
I was a-walking about that time, at nine
o'clock in the evening, answered Mr. Sloat,
coaxing his whiskers with his hand, and
addressing
himself to the jury, along Madison
street, in company with officer Smutch, when
we brushed by a man in a gray overcoat.
`Smutch,' says I, when we had passed him a
step or two, `I smell brimstone!' `So do I,'
says Smutch, putting his fingers to his nose;
and here let me say, gentlemen of the jury,
there isn't a more indefatigable officer
Never mind that, interrupted the attorney
for the prisoner; you needn't puff the police,
we all know what they are! And the
prisoner's
attorney smiled knowingly upon the
jury.
As I was saying when I was interfered
with, resumed Mr. Sloat, rather
impertinently
,
`It's that man in the gray overcoat,' says
I, `and we'll track him.' The smell was strong
upon him, and as Smutch and I's both quick of
scent, it wasn't much to do that. The gray
overcoat turned a corner, and went into an
alley
in Scammel street. Smutch and I followed.
There the gray overcoat got down into an
area, crept into a window, which was too small
for Smutch and I to go in at, and we saw nothing
more till there was a blaze in the middle of
the floor, and the gray overcoat along-side of it,
feeding it with shavings out of a basket.
Well, sir, said the judge, hurrying him
along, you waited till the person came out,
and then seized him?
No, sir, begging your honor's pardon, no
such thing, answered the heavy-whiskered
witness, bristling up; Smutch,' says I, `we'll
walk away for an hour, and then be back and
see what comes of this.' Smutch said `By all
means;' and we went off to a porter-house and
played a couple of games of dominoes, and then
walked back quietly, so as to come upon the
prisoner unawares.
Did you now arrest the prisoner? asked
the judge, sharply.
We did not, sir, answered the officer; but
as luck would have it, when we got back there
was a grand blaze of light; the buildings was
all in flames. `The best thing that could have
happened,' said Smutch to me, `for now we'll
be able to catch the prisoner when we see
him.' `You're right,' says I, `and there he
goes!' A man at that minute went by the
alley
,
and run down Scammel street at the top
of his speed. `Now for it!' I cries to Smutch,
and we started off. We run him pretty keen
around four blocks, and got him at last into an
engine-house.
Well, sir, you took him prisoner? said
the judge, again.
No, sir, it was a watchman, running to
give the alarm, rejoined the witness. But
we chased two or three other men, in the
course of the night, on suspicion; when luck
would have it, we thought of going back to the
fire.
Where you took the prisoner, I believe?
said the district attorney.
Not quite yet, sir; there we saw the
prisoner
,
and there we watched him on suspicion;
and seeing what I did, I felt justified, at last,
in taking him into custody. He tried gammon,
some, but Smutch and I was too much for him.
I takes no credit to myself, concluded the
witness, turning to the judge, please your
honor; it was Smutch that planned the whole
thing. If it hadn't been for that indefatigable
manBut he was cut short again.
The attorney for Fyler was a square-built
man, with iron-gray locks, a determined eye
and look, and sat confronting the witness
through his evidence, with his coat-cuffs rolled
back.
Now, sir, said he, leaving his seat and
taking a place where he could put his face
close to the witness, do you mean to say that
a police officer has sufficient knowledge of law
to know how to arrest a criminal in a case of
arson? Answer, on your oath!
Police officers know some things, as well
as other folks, he replied, looking about the
court to the constables on duty, for approval.
Now, tell me, sirdidn't the prisoner tell
you, at the time of his arrest, that he was
Barabbas
,
King of the Jews?
Yes, sir.
Yes, sirand didn't he tell you that his
mother was Mary Scott, the clear-starcher, in
Republican alley?
He did.
And you knew his name was Close. One
more question; didn't he, when you seized
him, order your arm to wither?
Yes, sir, he did, but I thought
Never mind what you thoughtyou forgot
to mention these rather material circumstances
that'll do.
Mr. Smutch being next called upon the stand,
corroborated Mr. Sloat with a single
exception
;
he said it was owing to Mr. Sloat's
unparalleled
exertions and ingenuity that the
prisoner
was arrested, and not to himself.
During the testimony of these witnesses,
Fyler
was restless and uneasy, constantly
murmuring
to himself, putting on and taking off
his dilapidated hat, and dancing his feet upon
the floor. Having at length drawn the
attention
of the court upon him, the judge asked
whether there was not some way to restrain
the prisoner. Fyler's counsel answered that
he believed there was a young man in court
who was familiar with his ways, and who
might perhaps be able to pacify him.
Whereupon
Ishmael Small being summoned, came
forward from behind a pillar, whence he had
watched the proceedings of Fyler with
unbounded
delight.
Do you know this man? said the judge.
A little, sir, answered Ishmael, scraping
the floor with his foot, and waving his
crape-bound
hat. Ishmael always wore a weed in
public; it was more respectable, and made the
public sympathize with him as a bereaved
young gentleman.
Can you mention anything to make him
quiet?
Nothin'll make him comfortable,
answered
Mr. Small, with the air of an oracle, for the
eyes of the whole court room were upon him
but givin' him a small bag of gold to look
at, containin' about five hundred dollars.
A small bag of gold was accordingly sent
for at a neighboring broker's, in the name of
the Oyer and Terminer; and being brought in
was set down in front of Fyler.
You'll have to shake it, sir, added
Ishmael
,
appealing to the court, to satisfy him
it's the full sum.
An officer was directed to put him at rest on
that point. As soon as he was assured it
contained
honest metal to the proper amount, he
fixed his eyes upon the black brand on the
outside
of the bag, and was quiet.
The cobbler, one of the tenants of the row,
was called to the stand. He set out in his
testimony with a protest against the
organization
of the court; avowed a hostility to all
courts and forms of lawagainst all
proceedings
,
officers, sheriffs, and appurtenances of
law; and was at last brought to admit, which
was the gist of his evidence, that with his wife
he was in Close's row on the evening it was
fired.
The lightning-maker proved a much more
exuberant and productive witness. He
expatiated
upon the domestic comforts he had
enjoyed
;
shed tears when he spoke of his two
children and his lame wife; and concluded by
saying he never was more taken aback in his
life, except once, and that was when
Commodore
Decatur was struck in the pit of his
stomach
with a couple of quarts of lightning, off
Algiers. When called upon, in his
cross-examination
,
to explain this incident in Decatur's
career, he stated that it occurred at the thea
tre, by mistake, when Mr. Smirk, an
intemperate
gentleman, performed the part of the
commodore.
Two or three other tenants of the row were
brought forward, who showed that they were
at home in the row when the fire occurred;
and the district attorney, raising his voice,
said, We rest!
Springing from his chair at this summons,
Counsellor Blast unslipped the knot of his
tape-tied
bundle of papers, and dashed them
sidewise
with his hand so that they spread out over
the table. Confirming the backward roll of his
coat-cuffs, and dotting the floor with a discharge
of tobacco pellets, he addressed the jury, in a
manner peculiar to himselfsometimes starting
forward with double fists, as if it were his
purpose
to challenge the twelve respectable
gentlemen
before him to a personal encounter, and
sometimes ranging up and down their front,
discharging a broadside of invective into the
jury-box as he passed.
He had never risen, he said, under so great
a sense of embarrassment in his life, as in the
present case. His client, the prisoner at the
bara poor, friendless old manlooked to him
as his last hope, the final wall and barrier
between
himself and the grave that yawned for
him. It had never been his fortune to present
to a court and jury a case like this one, so full
of all that appealed to the noblest sympathies
of our nature. They beheld before them, in
the prisoner at the bar, a melancholy caseone
of the most melancholy he had ever known
of mania in a subdued form. The unfortunate
prisoner was
non compos mentis
, as he meant to
show, at the time of the alleged crime; and
they now saw in him a wreck of what he had
been.
Fyler Close, gentlemen, the prisoner at the
bar, was once blessed with peace, and health,
and competence, like you; but now what is
he? Behold for yourselves! (Fyler was busy
eating the end of a pipe-stem which had been
handed to him by his counsel before he rose to
open the case.) His faculties are all in
disorder
;
his eye has lost its lustre; in a word,
reason has left its throne. By a series of
misfortunes
,
gentlemen, which it is out of the
power
of the best of us to foresee and guard against,
this unfortunate prisoner has been deprived of
all he possessedand at one time it was
considerable
.
It was not necessary to go into the
particulars of this loss; it was enough to say
he stood before them that day pleading in
behalf
of a starving, a penniless, and a houseless
lunatic. And how was this lunacy brought
on? Why, gentlemen, as you have doubtless
anticipated me, by the peculiar state of his
pecuniary
affairs. It was four weeks and four
days, as they would show by competent
testimony
,
from the commission of the alleged act
of firing, since the belief first entered the mind
of the prisoner that he, the prisoner, was an
angel of light. We will show you, gentlemen,
that he acted up to the belief; and we will
show you further, that he, the prisoner, was of
the opinion that when he had served out a
brief apprenticeship of four weeks and four
days as a rag-pickerbeing all this time an
angel of lighthe would become a regularly
licensed angel of Fire, empowered and
authorized
to burn buildings and kindle conflagrations
wherever he chose, throughout the city of New
York. It does not appear that his patent
extended
beyond that. And now, gentlemen,
continued the learned counsel, raising his voice,
after a visit to his papers at the table; and
now, gentlemen, how is this borne out? Why,
gentlemen, by the most incontrovertible proofs
that all his habits were regulated on this
belief
,
that he conformed, as far as it is in sinful
man to conform (this was for the Presbyterian
juror, in offset to the prosecuting attorney's
appeal), to his angelic calling. He had from
that time forward led the life of a pure spirit
in all his private acts, serving out only his
probation
as a rag-picker. If he succeeded in
showing thisif he succeeded, as he believed
he would, in proving that the insane belief had
taken entire possession of the prisoner's mind
how much soever it might conflict with the
policy and interests of insurers, increasing the
risk, as it did, of fireshow much soever it put
to the blush the religious portion of the
community
,
who had had in this poor, aged
rag-picker
,
an example of true and beautiful
humility
he
was sure of their verdict.
Mr. Clerk, call Ishmael Small.
Counsellor Blast retreated to his chair, and
Ishmael, emerging from a knot of officers with
whom he had been conferring, passed Fyler,
casting a mournful look upon him as he went
by, and appeared in the witness's stand, with
his crape-wreathed hat upon his head.
The clerk presented the Bible, and hinted a
removal of the hat.
Conscientious scruples, your honor, said
Ishmael, looking toward the judge, and laying
his right hand upon his breast. The
'pocryphal
give
me the 'pocryphal.
It being found, on investigation, that the
Apocryphal books were not included in the
court version, Mr. Small consented to
compromise
matters by spreading his palm upon the
blank pages between the Testaments, and was
sworn.
Be good enough to tell the court and jury,
Mr. Small, said Fyler's counsel, what you
know of the belief that has got possession of
this unfortunate prisoner's mind. When did
you first begin to observe symptoms of his
malady
?
I'm inclined to think, answered Ishmael,
it's a long time since he thought he was a
angel of light; but it's only latelyabout four
weeks and four days before the fire, as you
mentioned in that eloquent openin' of yours
since he took up the business regularly.
He seemed to consider himself a sort of
angel
a long time ago, did he?
He did, sir, judgin' by his conduct, con
tinued Mr. Small. He seemed to despise all
sorts of plain food; and as for roast beef and
baked 'taters, the very smell of the family
dishes from the baker's down stairs, almost
drove him mad.
How was it about fire and clothing?
Worse and worse. To see how he 'ud sit
in that room o' his in the sharp, blowy nights,
countin' the bare bricks in the fire-place, one
would ha' thought there never was such a an
gel for standing low temp-ratures; and as for
clothing, he thought flannels was invented by
a man out o' work. He was a great advocate,
when he was himself, for cut-down shoes and
round-jackets. That was Mr. Close's model
for a well-dressed angel.
Did Mr. Close ever assume such a dress
himself?
He did, sir, when he began to turn out as a
rag-picker. He was to be a rag-picker four
weeks and four days, and then he was to be a
angel of fire.
That will do, Mr. Small, said Counsellor
Blast; you may go down.
Stop a minute, cried the prosecutor, as
Ishmael was stepping from the stand. Do
you say, sirrecollect you are in a court of
justice
I do, sir, interrupted Ishmael, and I feel
a veneration for that plaster-head over there
that I can't express.
The audience turned in a body toward the
nondescript bust fixed in a niche of the
opposite
wall, and laughed. The court ordered
silence
;
the officers shouted silence; and an
echo, to the same effect, came from the niche
where the cast in plaster stood; and the district
attorney put his question directly
Do you say that this prisoner's conduct has
been, since the time you speak of, that of an
angel?
Not havin' the pleasure of a personal
acquaintance
in that sphere of life, answered
Ishmael, I wouldn't say.
I will ask you, continued the district
attorney
,
if you don't know that he was in the
habit of taking heavy usury on money which
he loaned?
If he did take twenty or thirty per cent.
from a seedy feller, now and then, he learned
it from a church-member that he knewand
he was the most angel-like gentleman that ever
come to see him. The church-member used to
tell Fyler he felt the cherrybim's wings
a-fanning
him.
Then you consider the prisoner an angel,
do you?
All things considered, answered Ishmael,
pondering and turning his hat in his hands, I
do. If there ever was a angel on earth, he
was one.
It's a lie; he was a thumping villain!
cried a voice in the crowd.
The court started to their feet; the lawyers
sprang up and turned around; the officers ran
to and from, shaking their staves, and on the
lookout for the offender; there was a universal
commotion.
Bring that man up! shouted the chief
judge. The officers echoed the order from one
to the other; every eye was hunting for the
culprityet he was not found.
The prisoner knew the voice well, and would
have named the peace-breaker if he had dared.
It was the little old man who had been the
first at the hall gates in the morning. After a
while the excitement subsided, and they
resumed
business.
I'd like to have that gentleman as a
witness
,
said the state's attorney to a brother
counsellor, in a whisper; and then to Ishmael,
who was withdrawing from the standAre
you related, in any way, to the prisoner, Mr.
Small?
I call him uncle, sir, sometimes, answered
Ishmael, falling stupid, suddenly, at the
question
;
I'd call you uncle, sir, if you'd let
me.
Has it ever been suggested to you that
there's a family likeness between you and the
prisoner?
A family likeness, exclaimed Ishmael,
between me, a sinful eater of cutlets, and
that pure-minded old gentleman that lives on
fresh air and sea-biscuit! Don't mention sich
a thing again, sir; you hurt my feelings!
I see how it is, said the district attorney;
you may go down, sir.
Ishmael touched his hat to the judge, and
making a graceful bow to the court-room
generally
,
descended to common life, and resumed
his post as an observer, as before.
The next that appeared in behalf of the
defence
,
was a sharp-eyed little man (the dealer
in crockery, whom Fyler had foreseen as a
witness
),
who hopped upon the stand, and was
very uneasy till he was sworn; a rite which
he seemed to enjoy.
You know the prisoner, I believe,
suggested
Fyler's counsel.
I do, sir, answered the crockery-dealer,
fastening upon the rail before him with both
hands, and jerking his body back and forth as
he delivered his testimony. His name is
Fyler
Close; he lives in Pell street, up one pair
of stairs; there's a bakery underneath, with a
back yard; there's a cistern in the yard, but
the water isn't goodthat's owing to
pigeonhouses
in the next street; there isn't a finer
collection of pigeons in the city, howeverthe
owner's a potter baker in Doyer streeta large
man, with a wen on his nose
Stop, stop! cried Mr. District Attorney
Pudlin, as he would have done to a runaway
horse; you must come a little nearer the
case; we don't want Longworth's Directory.
Be good enough to tell the court, resumed
Counsellor Blast, what you know of an
aberration
of mind on the part of the prisoner.
Answer
directly, if you please.
I will answer directly, said the
crockery-dealer
;
and I know this much: I was stand
ing in my shop-doorif the court pleasein
the month of June last, looking about me, as
is my custom, when about two blocks off I
saw
Two blocks? interrupted the district
attorney
.
Yes, sir, two blocks! retorted the
crockery-dealer
,
rather angrily; I saw a man
engaged
he
was about five feet high, a little
under, perhapsthe sun was setting up the
streetand I saw his face was as pale as a
white china dinner-set; he had on a blue
round-about
,
a broad straw hat, and he was running
backward and forward in the gutters at a
terrible
rate, stooping down and raising up like
whalebone. `I see how it is,' said I to myself;
`judging by the rate at which he's at work,
that's an insane rag-picker.' Presently he
works his way down directly opposite my shop
I keep in Division street, gentlemen of the
jury, No. 19, chinaware, earthernware, and
everything, of the first qualityand by that
time his basket was brim-full and running over
the top of the handle; and I saw it was the
prisoner at the bar.
Well, sir, was there anything peculiar in
his look at that time? asked the judge.
There was, sir; he looked sidewise out of
both eyes at once. I saw the mania was
coming
on him strong, for he began to fumble with
his jacket buttons, and whistled for an
invisible
dog.
What was the dog's name, sir; perhaps
you'll be good enough to give us that, said
the prosecuting attorney, looking at the jury
and then at the witness.
He didn't whistle it quite slow enough to
make it out, answered the omniscient dealer
in crockery; but as soon as he whistled, and
the dog didn't come, I know he dashed his
basket upon the ground, and running backward
first, came back to the basket again with such
a supernatural leap as I shall never see again
while I live; and this he kept doing till it was
broad dark, and when I went in to strengthen
myself with a cup of tea and a piece of toast
(I like my toast done brown, please your honor),
against the shock of such a pitiful sight,
leaving
my shop-boy to keep an eye on it. When
I got back, the basket was gone, the prisoner
at the bar was gone; and when I came to
question
the boy, I found out
That will do, sir, interrupted the district
attorney, bringing him to a dead pause; we
don't want to know what your boy said, or
what your boy saw. Now, sir, if your friends
can spare you, I'll put a question or two to you.
He's your witness, sir, said Counsellor
Blast, waiving his hand over the table.
Now, sir, you say you judged the prisoner
to be insane from the rate at which he was
picking rags into his basket when you first saw
him. How fast would that be, sir?
Why, sir, rejoined the witness, not taken
by surprise in the least, a sane man might
pick a ton a day.
18
Then an insane one would pick a ton and
a quarter, perhaps?
No, I don't think that would be conclusive
of his insanitya ton and a half might.
Will you be good enough to account for
the remarkable observation you have made;
how do
you
explain it? smiling to the jury.
Why, sir, if the court will pardon me, I
should say it was owing to an increased
nervous
vitality in the fingers
You needn't go any farther, interrupted
Counsellor Blast; We are done with you,
and much obliged. We have a medical
gentleman
here, Mr. District Attorney, who will
perhaps be able to put your mind at ease on
that point. Will Dr. Mash be good enough to
take the stand?
At this request a stout gentleman in a red
face, a red camlet wrapper, as much overrun
with frogs as the land of Egypt itself, and
bearing
in his hand a burly cane with an ivory
head, came forward, and climbing into the
witness-station
,
propped himself with both hands
upon the cane, and looked steadily at Fyler's
counsel, in waiting for a question. He was
evidently loaded to the very mouth.
Dr. Mash is so well known that I will not
put the usual questions as to how long he has
practised, &c., said Fyler's counsel; will
you be good enough to oblige the court, Dr.
Mash, with a definition of insanity?
Insanity, I would say, sir, answered the
doctor, swelling till he strained his very red
camlet coat-fastenings, with professional pride;
insanity, I would say, sir, is a general
looseness
or incoherence of ideas, brought on by
the overaction of the brain. For instance
Ah, interposed Fyler's counsel with
deference
,
you will favor the court by giving
an example.
I will, sir, rejoined the doctor; for
instance
,
if the district attorney, there, should
become so engrossed in his duties as a public
officer, as to put the fines he collects into his
own pocket, instead of carrying them to the
city treasury; that would be a case of
limited
mania, or partial insanity.
There was a general laugh at this view of
the case.
That would be an example of looseness of
ideas brought on by overaction of the brain,
would it? asked Counsellor Blast, grinning.
How would that apply to the case of the
prisoner
?
Very clearly, sir, answered the doctor;
the sudden loss of fortune, fixing the mind
upon one point constantlythat of the loss in
questionwould exhaust the recuperative
powers
of the other faculties; and the
consequence
would be, that, in a very short time,
the brain would go by the board.
Have you had opportunities of observing
the deportment of the prisoner before to-day?
I have, sir; and I am decidedly of
opinion
,
as I was then, that he is disordered in rea
son. I have seen him in the public streets,
and such were my convictions as a
professional
man, that I thought the public safety
required
that he should be lodged in an asylum.
That's all, Dr. Mash.
Stop a minute, sir, cried Mr. Attorney
Pudlin; perhaps you will be good enough to
tell us who first called your attention to the
lunacy of the prisoner?
I think it was the young gentleman on the
stand this morning, answered the doctor.
You think?you
know
it was, Dr. Mash,
pursued the district attorney; and now, tell
me, sir, hadn't you a suspicion all along that
this was a got-up thing between the prisoner
and that young gentleman?
Not the slightest, said the learned doctor.
He seemed to be a benevolent young person,
who meant well by the communityand I gave
him a certificate of prisoner's lunacy.
At this there was another general laugh
through the court-room; everybody that had
seen Ishmael seeming to be pretty thoroughly
satisfied that he was badly treated when he was
called a philanthropist.
You did, eh? said the district attorney;
then the sheep was wronged that was killed
to furnish your diploma: we are done with
youyou are not wanted any more.
Dr. Mash went down, clinging to his cane
in his vexation till the sweat poured from his
brow.
As it may be as well to set the jury right
on this question of insanity, I'd like to put a
question or two to Dr. Parsley, if he is in
court, said Mr. Attorney Pudlin.
Dr. Parsley, being called, came forward
briskly. He was a little bald-headed man,
with glasses, and a nose as red and shining as
a cherry. He hopped into the witness-stand
smartlyand having his coat buttoned, and a
slight shrub of hair brushed away from either
side of his head, to give him a more
formidable
appearancehe stood ready for
questioning
.
Dr. Parsley, will you be good enough to
give the court your definition of insanity?
asked the district attorney.
With pleasure, answered the bald-headed
doctor, speaking up; insanity, according to
my notion, is a general concentration, not a
looseness, of ideas, superinduced by the apathy
or imperfect action of the rest of the brain.
Do you think the prisoner insane, from
what you have heard?
I do not, sir.
Will you be good enough to tell the court
and jury, Dr. Parsley, why you think the
prisoner
not
insane?
I will, sir, with great pleasure, answered
the doctor. It appears, from a part of the
testimony
,
that the prisoner, in his supposed
attacks
of the disease, jumped backward and
forward
over a basket. It does not appear that
he ever jumped into the basket. Now, insane
menas far as my observation extends, and it
has been by no means limitedalways jump
into a basket, when they get a chance.
He is your witness, said the district
attorney
.
One question, only, doctor. How does
that agree with your definition? asked
Counsellor
Blast.
Well enoughin this way, sir. If his
mind had been concentrated, or overtasked to
an insane degree, he
must
have jumped into
the basket.
The case was now mainly closed, and a clerk
of the Phnix company being called only to
show that the buildings in question belonged
to Fyler Close, and had been insured for a
handsome sum in that company, rather more,
in fact, than their real value; the court
suggested
that it was ready to hear the
summing-up
of the prisoner's counsel. The plea for
Fyler was brief:he was an old man; he
had lost his all; he was before them a
melancholy
spectacle of dethroned reason; a
verdict
of guilty would be a judicial murder; and
he appealed to them as humane menmen
having grandfathers and old uncles, to deal to
the prisoner justice tempered with mercy.
The district attorneyhoisting and
lowering
his waistcoat incessantly, in the intensity
of his eloquencefollowed at greater length.
He had proved the arson beyond all
question
;
the prisoner's counsel had yielded that
point; and now, as for the insanity, he
regarded
it as a fetch from beginning to endthere
were certain eccentricities in the prisoner, to
be sure, but not more than an old
apple-woman
exhibited every day in the year. There
was cunning, he was inclined to think, mixed
with the prisoner's madness. Did you observe,
gentlemen, in openin this case, how silent
the prisoner was when his own counsel was
before you? and yet, when I addressed you,
you recollect he was as busy as he could well
be, crushing his teeth and kicking the table in
the legs. You can draw your own inference
from that, gentlemen. I had expected to prove
that the young gentleman who appeared on the
stand, was more nearly connected with the
prisoner by ties of blood than he was willing
to admit; that a corrupt understanding existed
between them in relation to the circumstances
of the present case, there could be no
reasonable
doubt. I have now done my duty,
gentlemen
of the jury, as prosecuting officer, and it
only
remains for you, as good citizens, to do yours.
Calling an officer to him, and whispering
him to bring a tumbler of brown-stout, by the
private stairs, and place it in the folds of the
erminethe red curtain behind himto be
ready when he was through, the long judge
rose from his chair, drawing himself out, joint
by joint, and proceeded to charge the jury. As
the sole object of the long judge seemed to be
to wrap the case up in a swathing of words
and generalities, to prevent its taking cold, it
would be impossible to do him anything like
justice in a report. The result was, that
after
he had been on his legs better than two
hours, when the clock numbered toward
midnight
,
the juryall abroad as to the facts, the
law, and the equitywere put in charge of an
officer and led off through a door into a small,
dusty, cobwebbed, candle-lighted room, where
they were locked in, in company with a small
square table, to meditate upon the case.
CHAPTER XXXVI.
THE JURY-ROOM.
For
the first few minutes after they entered
the jury-room, not a word was spoken; they
sat around the square table, which just held
twelve, with their heads toward the centre,
watching each other's faces sharply for the
first glimpses of a verdict.
A spider's thread fell from the ceiling and
hung dangling above the table, bearing a fly
struggling at its end.
Guilty, or not guilty, gentlemen? said
the foreman, a close-shaven, blue-faced man,
with glittering eyes, glancing round the board
as he put the question by way of breaking
ground.
Guilty, for one! answered a fat citizen
on his right hand, sweeping the struggling fly
into his hat, which he produced suddenly from
behind his chair. We must have an
example
,
gentlemen. The last three capital
indictments
got off, and now it's the sheriff's turn
for a pull. We must have an example.
Three for breeders and the fourth to the
bull-ring, spoke up a gentleman with a deep
chest and brawny arms. That's the rule at
the slaughterhouse; we always follow itand
so I say guilty, if the rest's agreeable.
But the rest were not agreeable; and they
launched into an elaborate and comprehensive
discussion of the case, led on by a high-cheeked
gentleman in a white neckcloth, who begged
to ask whether any one there was prepared to
say whether angels could, under any
circumstances
,
become rag-pickers. That was the
gist of the case. There might be angels of
firehe had heard an excellent discourse on
that subject in the Brick churchand that
would account for the prisoner's burning the
buildings. He had been rather pleased with
the district attorney's calling Fyler Close the
demon of that element; but then, would it be
in character for a demon to go about with a
basket and a hooked stick? He couldn't see
into it just yethe would like to hear the
opinion
of the other gentlemen of the jury on that
point.
It isn't always easy to tell them insane
chaps at first sight, pursued another, a short
juror, who, resting his elbows upon the table,
looked out from between them with flat face
and saucer eyes, fading far away in his head,
like the hero of a country signboard. There
was one of 'em got into our house in Orchard
street one day, and when he was caught he
was at work on a stun' lemon with his teeth
like vengeance. Now, that was insanity at
first view, but when we come to find his
pockets
full of silver spoons and table-knives, that
was
compos mentis
and the light of reason.
How many stun' lemons would you have a
feller eat, I'd like to know, retorted the
deep-chested member, to make it out a
reg'lar
case?
One full-grown'd satisfy me, answered
the signboard, other gentlemen might require
more.
The board was unanimous on this point, one
would be enough.
I'd have you take notice of one thing,
gentlemen
,
said a thin little man, starting in at
this moment from a corner of the table, with
a nose like a tack, and eyes like a couple of
small gimlet-holes. There was a point in
the testimony of that Sloatthe police officer
that's very important, and what's better, it
escaped the district attorney, and the
prisoner's
counsel, and the very judge on the bench.
Now, I want your attention, gentlemen. You
will recollect that Sloat testifies to a man in a
gray overcoat going into an alley in Scammel
street and getting into the basement of Close's
row. That was the incendiary, no one doubts
that. Very good. And then Sloat goes a
little
further, and says he is gone long enough to
play a couple of games of dominoes; and when
he gets back, he says a man went by the alley
mark thatwent by the alley and down
Scammel street. That wasn't the incendiary,
was it? By no means, gentlemen. Where
was he then all this time? I'll tell you. He
drew his breath hard, and turned quite pale as
he looked around. It's my opinion,
gentlemen
,
the incendiary was roasted alive in the
basement of them buildings.
There was a shudder through the jury-room;
the jurors turned about to each other and
said, Who would have thought of that?
and it was admitted on all hands to be a very
plausible and acute conjecture and well-worthy
of the gentleman in the eyelets and tack-shaped
nose.
It can't be, said the fat citizen, balancing
his hat in his two hands, and looking sternly
at the fly in the bottom of the crown. If you
could only make that out, we might let this
prisoner at the bar off. I can't believe he was
so nicely caught. No, no, if that had been
the case, somebody would have found the
bones done brown and a pair of shoe-buckles.
Don't give way, I beg you, gentlemen, to the
pleasing illusion.
And so saying, he knocked his hat upon his
head and smothered the fly.
I have great faith in that china-ware
witness
,
said the gentleman in the signboard
face. He was right in that observation of
his; a man out of his wits always talks to peo
ple a couple o' hundred miles off, and
whistles
for a invisible dog. I had a cousin,
gentlemen
of the jury, that went mad as he was
coming through this 'ere Park one day; he
was a boat-captain, and was a comin' from his
sloop, and he asked the liberty-goddess a-top
of the hall to take snuff with him. On
reconsiderin'
,
I think Fyler Close's is a case of
lunat-ics
.
Two or three other jurors thought as much.
That mug of beer satisfied me, said one.
Would he ha' sp'ilt a new hat that his
counsel had bought to give him a respectable
first appearance in court with, do you think,
Bill, said another, appealing to the last
speaker, if his head hadn't a been turned
clean round? It's a gone ninepin, that head o'
his.
Now, gentlemen of the jury, you must
excuse
me
a few minutes, if you please, said a
stout, rugged, hard-headed gentleman, with
heavy eyebrows, rising at one end of the table,
and thrusting back his skirts with both hands.
This is a great moral question, whether the
prisoner shall be hung or not. Am I right?
You are! you are! from several voices
at the upper end of the table. A great moral
question, I say; and it's owing to a great moral
accident that I am with you this day, for if I
hadn't eaten too many tomcods for my supper
last night, I should have been off in the seven
o'clock boat this morning, to the anniversary
of the Moral Reform at Philadelphia. Now the
community looks to us for action in this case.
If this man escapes, who can be hung? Where's
the safety for life and property if we can't hang
a man now and then? Hanging's the moral
lever of the world, and when the world's grown
rotten by laying too much on one side, why, we
hang a man and all comes right again. If we
don't hang Fyler Close, he'll hang us
morally
,
I mean.
This was a director in a fire company, who
had smuggled himself upon the jury by giving
out that he was a gentleman, and blinded
Fyler's
counsel by hinting that he was doubtful
of the policy of hanging; what he said
produced
a sensation in the jury-room. The
twelve judges began to put it to themselves,
some of them, whether premiums wouldn't go
up if this house-burner escaped; others, that
New York might be burned to a cinder if this
wasn't put a stop too, somehow or other (there
had been a brilliant and well-sustained series
of fires for better than a twelvemonth); and
others, that as he had failed to turn his
insanity
to the best account by hanging himself, they
would take it off his hands and attend to it
as he was a decrepit old gentlemanfor him.
Pardon me, gentlemen, said the foreman,
at this stage of feeling; I think this is a clear
case for the sheriff. The prisoner is an old
man; he has no friendsnot a relation in the
world, one of the witnesses said; he's lost his
propertyand as for his wits, you see what
they're worth. Now, the next candidate that
comes along may be a fine black-haired, rosy
young fellow, who may have tickled a man
with a sword-cane, or something of that sort,
with a number of interesting sisters, an aged
mother, and a crowd of afflicted connexions.
You see what a plight we would be in if we
should happen to be drawn on that jury. Are
you agreed, gentlemen?
There was not a little laying of heads
together
;
discussion in couplets, triplets, and
quadruplets; and in the course of two hours
more they agreed, and rose to call the officer
to marshal them into court.
Stop a minute, gentlemen, if you please,
said the fat citizen; this is a capital case,
you will recollect, and it wouldn't be decent to
go in under five hours.
He's right, said the foreman, and you
may do what you choose for an hour.
Two of the jury withdrew to a bench at the
side of the room, where, standing close to the
wall, one of them planting his foot upon the
bench and bending forward, entered upon a
whispered interview. Two more remained at
the table; while the others grouped
themselves
in a window looking forth upon the
Park, in the rear of the hall, and amused
themselves
by watching a crowd that had gathered
there, under a lamp, and who began making
signs and motions to them as soon as they
showed themselves. The most constant
occupation
of the crowd seemed to be passing a
finger
about the neck, and then jerking it up, as
though pulling at a string, with a clicking sound,
whichwhen once or twice they lifted the
window, and as it seemed to be the most
popular
and prevailing soundcould be distintly
heard.
This is the luckiest thing that could have
happened in the world, said one of the two
jurors that had taken to the wallthe
gentleman
in the sharp nose and weazel eyes
addressing
himself to the deep-chested juror with
brawny arms, who was the other; I wanted to
speak to you about that black-spotted heifer,
and this is just the chance.
You couldn't speak on a more agreeable
subject, retorted the deep-chested gentleman;
but you mustn't expect me to take off the
filing of a copper from the price; what I asks
at Bull's Head this morning, I asks now.
I know your way, rejoined the other;
you never come down even the value of a glass
of beer to bind the bargain; but it wasn't that
what grass was she fatted on?
Short blue, answered the deep-chested
gentlemen, firmly.
Any salt meadow near? asked the other.
Not more than twenty acres, responded
the deep-chested juror, with the air of a
gentleman
carrying all before him; and
swimmin'
a healthy run o' water, a rod wide, give
the critter a bellyful any time.
Two years old the next full moon, and a
cross of the Durham in her, I think?
Not a cross of the Durham, I tell you,
answered the deep-chested gentleman, raising
his voice a little, but the Westchester
bottom
,
and hasn't known a dry day nor a parched
blade since she was calved.
No Durham blood? I'm sorry for that,
said the sharp-nosed gentleman. If you could
throw me in that lamb I took a fancy to, we
would close.
Throw you in the lamb? that's a good
one! cried the deep-chested gentlemen,
bursting
into a laugh of scorn. Why, I wouldn't
throw you in the singeing of that lamb's wool.
Only five-and-twenty for the prettiest heifer
that ever hoofed it down the Third avenue
and throw you in a lamb! That
is
a good one!
And he burst into another scornful laugh.
Well, well, said the sharp-nosed
gentleman
,
soothing him with a prompt compliance.
Drive her down to my stable as soon as the
verdict's in.
Meanwhile, the two that remained at the
table
were employed.
Have you got that 'ere box in your pocket,
Bill? said one of them, a personage with a
smooth, clean face, from which all the blood
would seem to have been dried by the blazing
gaslights under which he was accustomed to
spend his time.
To be sure I have, answered the other, a
gentleman of a similar cast of countenance,
but a trifle stouter. Did you ever catch
Slicksey Bill a travelling without his tools?
He produced a well-worn dicebox from his
coat, and began rattling. What shall it be?
The highest cast, `guilty' said the other,
and three blanks shall let him go clear.
That'll do, won't it?
Jist as good as the best. It's your first
throw.
The other took the box in hand, gave it a
hoarse, rumbling shakethree fours. The
other shook it sharplytwo blanks.
Guilty, by , they both said together.
They then indulged themselves with a
variety
of fancy throws, as to the state of the
weatherthe winning horse at the next
Beacon
coursewhether the recorder (a
gentleman
in whom they felt a special interest), would
die first, or be turned off the bench by the
legislature. Every now and then they came
back to the case of the prisoner, andwhat
was singularthe result was always the same.
The hall clock struck threethe legitimate
five hours were upand the jurors gathered
again around the table.
Gentlemen, are we agreed? asked the
foreman.
We are! answered the jury.
Yes, and what's queer, we've been trying
it with dice, and every time it's turned out
three twelves again the prisoner; so the result's
right, any way you can fix itisn't it so, Bill?
Exactly! answered the gentleman
appealed
to. The officer was summoned, and,
putting himself at their head, they marched
into the court-room with the air of men who
deserved well of the newspapers for their moral
firmness; and who, at the sacrifice of their
own feelings, were rendering a great service to
the community.
The court-room was nearly a blank. The
judge and the two aldermen had waited with
exemplary
patience the deliberations of the jury,
and were now in their places to hear the result.
Fyler's counsel, with a clerk, was there also;
and the district attorney, and the clerk of the
court, and two or three officers and
underlings
,
loitering about. The prisoner himself
sat at his table, a little pale, it seemed in the
uncertain light, but unmoved.
The crowd of spectators had dwindled as
the clock struck teneleventwelve. Mr.
Ishmael Small, after tarrying an hour or two,
had gone out with the others, and disposed of
his leisure in playing a new game of ball, of
his own devising, in the west side of the Park,
with a crew of printers' boys from the
neighboring
offices.
In the whole outer court-room there was
but a single spectator, the little old man that
had been the first at the hall gates in the
morning
,
who looked on, leaning against a remote
column, at the judges, who, from that distance,
seemed, in the dusky shade of the unsnuffed
candles standing about them, like spectres
gradually
fading into the red curtain that hung at
their back.
Mr. Clerk, call the jury! said the chief
judge, in a voice which great usage on the trial
and the incidents of the place made to sound
sepulchral.
The jury was called, man by man.
Arraign the prisoner! in the same
unearthly
and startling voice.
The prisoner was arraigned.
What say yougentlemen of the jury
guilty, or not guilty?
Guilty!
Fyler started for a moment, but instantly
recovering
himself, smiled vacantly upon the
judge and jury, and began whistling as
described
by the crockery-dealer. The little old
man clasped his hands firmly together, and
breathed an earnest thanksgiving from the
dusky corner where he stood alone. In a few
minutes it got abroad that the prisoner was
convicteda shout shook the air without,
and, presently, a crowd rushed in that filled
the hall afresh. The prisoner was to be
taken
out by the private way, but the little old
man was not to be cheated this time. He had
urged himself through the press, and stood
against the lintel of the door through which
he must pass. In a few minutes he came
along. When Fyler saw who it was that
watched his steps, he glared upon him.
Hobbleshank
gazed after him, as he passed away
to his doom, with a look of unrevengeful
triumph
.
CHAPTER XXXVII.
MR. CLOSE'S LAST SPECULATION.
In
the Tombs' prison, where he lay under
sentence of death, Fyler Close maintained, as
far as the limits of his cell allowed, the same
sports and humors he had practised in the open
air. The turnkey, who had charge of this
range of cells, whenever he looked in or
brought his food, never failed to come upon
him in the very ecstacy of a new device or
gambol. This was in the day, when Fyler
would place himself in the middle of the floor,
and sit, huddling his limbs together, gathering
the sun that streamed in at the window of the
cell at certain hours, in his outspread hands
like so much fire. But with the night he crept
into a corner, and stood shivering and driving
off with the self-same hands, shapes that
swarmed thicker than the sun-beams by day.
He cursed the darkness; it was no friend of
his. The very first night he had lain there
after the trial, he got into the corner furthest
from the door, and while he crouched there, the
jurors glided across the floor, one by one, and
whispered in his ears, Guilty, then after
them the judge, with the same word in his
mouth, then the haberdasher, the poor
blacksmith
,
Hobbleshank, and whoever else he had
dealt with, and muttering the word so that it
hissed in his ear, passed away.
One night the two lamps that light the
prison-yard at the rear, and lend a ray or two
to the condemned cells, went out; and Fyler,
vexed beyond measure, dashed his hands
against the door, and shouted for lightlight!
They left him alone, supposing it was some
new freak, until he fell down in his agony, and
was found in the morning pale and trembling,
his eyes starting from his head, and his hair
bristling up. The keepers wondered what he
had seen to stamp such a horror in his look.
With the day he recovered his strength, and
tried his gambols afresh. It was the second
morning after this that the turnkey entered his
cell and placed his food before him, standing
aside while he despatched it if he chose.
This officer was square and heavy in his frame;
but with one of his lower limbs so far beyond
the other in length that he had the appearance,
as he came along the gallery, swinging his
long arms and stretching it out before him, of
working a great wheel the revolutions of which
drove him on. He stood against the door, his
long limb planted before him like a table, and
on this he rested his elbow, and regarded Fyler,
who made it a part of his scheme to devour
such food as was set before him with the
ravening
eagerness of a wolf.
I suppose you're aware the hanging comes
off next Friday? said the turnkey, by way of
sharpening his appetite.
That's a capital idea! answered Fyler
Close, looking up from his meal, I hope I'll
have flitters and fresh biscuit for breakfast
that morning: whose to be hung, eh?
You are the queerest chap! pursued the
turnkey, slapping his long leg with his knuckles.
Why, next Friday's your dayyou own it
and can do just what you please with it till
twelve o'clock. It's only a half apple, after
all. Next Friday's got no afternoon to you,
old chap. Now, between ourselves, ain't you
afeard to die?
This interrogatory moved Mr. Close's
mirthful
feelings greatly; he rose from his bench,
tossed his knife and fork high in the air, and
marching to the basket that had brought his
food, and which was at the turnkey's side, he
cast in the great blue plate from which he had
eaten, as if it had been a huge coin, and said:
There, sir, there's two hundred and fifty
thousand dollars for the bread and steak. He
broke into a dance which extended through the
cell, and occasionally included his bed, upon
which he mounted, by way of interlude.
The turnkey was answered; he gathered the
basket under his arm, turned for a look at
Fyler
,
shaking his head, and locking the door, set
his wheel in motion and moved away.
A week only. Fyler began, in his mind, to
see the gallows-tree rising in the yard. Instead
of sleeping now, as he had done all along,
with some comfort, he spent the better part of
the night, standing upon his bed, which he had
drawn there, stretching himself up his whole
length, and gazing through the narrow window
of his cell, to catch a sight of men moving in
the yard below, or the stars, or the line of
dusky light that rose beyond the prison-wall,
where men were free and walked the streets
unchained. A week only. The chance of a
commission to inquire into his madness, with a
hope of which he had toiled so hard and long
in his freaks, seemed fading fast and leaving
him manacled more than ever. One trial more
and he would fix his mind. The next day
when the turnkey came in he took him apart,
as though there had been a great crowd
listening
to catch every word that dropped, and in a
mysterious whisper made known that he had
great news for the keeper, and begged him to
be brought at once. The turnkey turned about
and stared at Fyler, but not knowing what
there might be in his wish, went away and
presently came back announcing that the
keeper
was at hand. This was no sooner made
known than Fyler, standing out upon the floor
and fixing his hand, bent up after the fashion
of a horn, began blowing furious blasts. The
keeper was a stout personage with an
inquiring
nose and dark brows; he stood in the
door, filling it to a hair, and looking doubtfully
at Fyler, asked what this meant?
That's what he calls his final trump,
answered
the turnkey; he was blowing
trumpets
all last night.
When he had blown not less than forty
peals, Fyler came down his cell, and taking the
keeper by the collar, led him into the middle
and turned him about so that he faced a
blanket
pinned against the wall. Having provided
him with this eligible point of view, he pulled
down the blanket and disclosed a great number
of rude figures, sketched upon the stone in
chalk.
What's all this? asked the keeper, again.
You know he's a angel of fire, sir, as was
shown at the Oyer, answered the turnkey;
and these is his victims!
On a closer inspection one of them was
found to resemble not a little the long judge;
there was another, a little shambling figure
with one eye out, and another, heavy-browed,
and solid of port as he could be made to
appear
in rude chalk. This the turnkey thought
was a juror who had pressed matters against
Fyler at the trial. They were all scarcely
more than scrambling lines upon the wall;
about them was a great pother of shrubby
marks and scratchesthis was the fire.
Well, sir, said the keeper to Fyler, when
he had studied the lines a while; what are
you going to do with these gentlemenwith
this one for instance? pointing to the long
judge.
He's in for a couple of hundred years,
only, answered Fyler; but it's a slow fire,
and it'll roast him tender before his time's
out.
You don't give a juryman as much as a
judge? asked the keeper.
Fyler feigned to be all abroad for an answer
till the question was renewed by the turnkey,
when it appeared that he had allotted to the
juror for special reasons, a fire that was to last
three hundred and twenty-five years and a day.
But the fire seemed by all odds to rage
hottest
in the neighborhood of the little figure
with the single eye; he seemed to have never
tired of piling on the fuel, and as far as chalk
could represent, it was all a live coal. At first
Fyler said that was to burn a week, then
he added a year, then a hundred years, and so
kept on extending his term, till the keeper, out
of all patience, broke away.
A clear lunacy case as ever was! said
the turnkey, appealing to the keeper with
deference
.
Hold your tongue! rejoined the keeper;
there will be no more lunacy cases. The
governor was gammoned in the last case.
Wearing spectacles without glasses and eating
sticks for beef-steaks wont go any longer.
Lock the door and come along!
Fyler pondered on what fell from the
keeper
.
Another rivet held his prison doorhow
should that and all others be drawn at once?
That same afternoon he read in his cell, by
close stealth, although no soul was present, a
paper which had got there, Heaven knows
how. Late the night before a mysterious
figure, more like a goblin with interminable
legs than any thing else (it might have been
Ishmael Small), had stalked in the street at the
back of the prison; some said afterward it had
climbed the wall. As the paper fell through
his window, dropped from above, this might be
so. Whatever it was, and whoever might be
its sender, it quickened his thoughts not a
little. It was clearly expedient for him to get
back into his wits at once. Accordingly when
the turnkey brought his supper that night, he
found Fyler quietly seated and looking about
him with the air of one just wakened from a
dream.
Where am I? who am I? said Fyler.
How long have I been in this place?
Why, old fellow, you're in the Tombs,
Centre-street, answered the turnkey, where
you've been these four weeks and better; and
as to who you are, you're Fyler Close as you
was yesterday, and the day afore, and the day
afore that. That's who you are.
You must be wrong, rejoined Fyler, quite
calmly. I have been asleep twenty-five
years or so, I think. What a dream I've had!
Angels about me in swarms, dressed in
handsome
red dresses, and beautiful cherubs
carrying
sticks with gilt tops.
Oh, ho! cried the turnkey, slapping his
long knee like one that makes a great
discovery
I
see how it is; them red angels
that was about you so thick was volunteer
firemen
;
and as for the cherubs they're nothing
else but the indefatigables that you see in court
on your trial, with their staves. Oh, ho, that's
a very good one, Mr. Prisoner. I see you're a
coming-to.
So I think, too, continued Fyler, placidly.
And now that I have got back to this sinful
world, I'd like a slice or two of the bread o'
life, just to cheer me up and keep me from
fainting.
Something in the way of a parson, eh?
asked the turnkey, looking curiously at him.
Fyler gave him to understand it was; If
that's it, you can have a whole loaf; we have
a wonderful run of blackcoats to this prison.
They come here to get moral texts for their
sermons; you'll be a capital oneand when
its known, won't there be a competition! I
guess not! The turnkey laughed disdainfully
at himself; and Fyler hoped he might be made
a good text, and be a comfort to some poor
creatures in that way. The turnkey took his
basket and keys and went away; but presently
returned and, putting his head in at the door,
asked Fyler, What he'd begin with?
You may send me a presbyterian
gentleman
,
if you please, said Fyler.
You shall have one fresh and first-rate,
answered the turnkey. I'm glad you're
come-to
,
old feller, you'll hang so much cheerfuller.
Good night! He locked the cell and
propelled
himself at an increased speed along the
gallery, making known to the other keepers,
as he passed, that the old prisoner was in his
wits again.
The presbyterian came. Fyler eyed him
sharply; he was tall and narrow-faced. After
a very brief interview he left, finding the
prisoner not open to his counsels. Fyler
confessed
he didn't like his views of predestination
at all, and called for another parson. The
next was large and stout; and Fyler
discovered
an irreconcilable difference in their
notions of total depravity. Then there came
another, a short square man, who
broached
such doctrine on the subject of infant
baptism
that Fyler almost drove him from his cell.
What a delicate conscience this prisoner had,
and how hard to please! He had but three
days more to live, and they would give him
such comfort as they could. At last there
came along, after so many trials, a snug little
man, about Fyler's size, who wore a wig, and
whose religious views harmonized so entirely
with Fyler's that the broker took a fancy to
him at once, and made him spend hours with
him in his cell. Fyler spared no pains to
cultivate
an intimacy, and was not backward in
showing his affectionate regard for the little
parson. One night, after a long and delightful
interview, in which the little parson had
inculcated
a great number of excellent principles,
Fyler said to him, Did it ever occur to you
how much we resemble each other in look?
The little parson confessed it had not.
Now I'll show that it is so, said Fyler;
let me take your wig a minute.
He accordingly removed it from the parson's
head and placed it on his own.
It would be so odd, said Fyler laughing,
if any one should come in nowI guess I'll
fasten the door.
He drew a string, which was somehow or
other hanging there, and the door was held
close.
Now let me have your coat, said Fyler.
The little parson yielded it with some show of
reluctance. Then he took his vest, his
pantaloon
,
his shoes; then he put on his neck-stock
and his plain black hat.
Isn't the resemblance wonderful? asked
Fyler, giving the parson, who stood shivering
by, a look that made him shake a little more.
Fyler then invited him to another quarter of
the cell, where he insisted it would be to his
advantage to have a bandage put about his
arms and waist, to keep him from catching
cold. The little parson might have made some
trifling objection, but he saw that in Fyler's
look which silenced him.
It must be death to one of your tender
constitution, said Fyler, if you should get
into the gallery in your present state. He bound
him to a ring in the floor, and fastened an end
of the cord to the water-fascet, so that the
least motion on the part of the parson would
flood the cell. He then placed in his hands
the pocket-bible he brought in with him, and
opening it at the book of Job, and commending
patience to him, as the best virtue under
present
circumstances, he left himshivering and
bald-headedupon the floor, and stepped
lightly
forth.
Moving smoothly along in his parson's dress,
and catching as much of the parson's gait as
he could, he reached the prison-yard. When
his feet struck the ground he felt freebut
looking up, with the high prison-walls about
him, he breathed hard again, like one at the
bottom of a well. The sky was strangely
overcast
,
and a chill crept through his frame. The
officers of the lower door were away, and he
was obliged to pass through the Sessions
courtroom
.
He stole up the steps, and looked
through the glass door leading from the
prison-yard
into the court. A trial was going
forward
,
and the court-room was thick with
people. He looked on for a moment with a
curious eye, remembering his own; and then
shrunk back, shuddering at the prospect of
passing through. With a keen sense in
himself
of what his parson's dress concealed, he
feared they might seize him and hurl him back
to the cell he had left. He opened the door
the officers glanced at his black coat, and
tapped the nearest of the crowd to give him
way. With a respect for the errand of charity
on which they supposed he had been bound,
they fell back, leaving a wide space through
which he must pass to the outer door. He
would rather they had stood close packed, and
treated him in that regard like the meanest of
themselves. At length, with a heart fifty
times at his throat, he was upon the outer
stairs; creeping stealthily down from column
to column, he reached the street. He started
forward at a swift pace, but becoming presently
confused, he halted and looked about. There
was a trouble in the skya darkness, not of
tempest or customary clouds; an eclipse was
brooding above him. A cold shadow filled the
air, and Fyler was bewildered and alarmed.
At first he went to the right, and coming upon
an object that told him he was wrong, he
returned
upon his track and went as far astray
on the other hand. He had lost his way, and
seemed to have forgotten, all at once, the
bearings
of the streets. While he wandered in
this uncertain mood, the cold drops starting to
his brow, there came upon the wind a loud
clamor of drums and trumpets and marching
feet. Torches flashed upon the darknessas
a long procession turned a cornerand Fyler,
aided by their light, crept along a coal-yard
wall.
In a minute more he was at an opening of
the great sewer, which was undergoing repair;
falling flat upon his face that no eye might
watch him, he crept down its mouth, holding
on to the broken stones and fastenings of iron
with his hands, till he reached the bottom.
He heard the tread of feet above hima gleam
of lightand all was silence and darkness.
How far within he ever groped his way was
never known, nor what scheme he had in view,
unless it might have beenwild and bold
enoughto escape in this way to the river,
where Ishmael Small, it was said, had been seen
for many hours hovering in a boat about that
mouth of the sewer.
Nor was Ishmael himself, who had the
morning
after the arrest borne away an old trunk
or two from the den in Pell street, seen after
that night. The last act that could tell where
the broker stopped, was, that passers-by had
heard at a certain place, as they crossed the
street, a sharp and dreadful cry for help, riving
the very earth beneath their feet. The
broker's
body, perishing thus amid all the
foulness
and infamy of the city's drain, was never
found.
CHAPTER XXXVIII.
THE NIGHT PROCESSION.
The
unparalleled outrage of clearing the
upper
Wabash, being sufficiently insisted upon,
answered the purpose as well as any device
they could have contrived. The triumph of
Puffer was complete. He had carried his
election
by a handsome majoritybowling down
Mr. John Blinker, majestically as he carried
himself, as easily as a ninepin with a rolling
bottomHobbleshank's strong recruits (of
which Puffer had just now heard) coming in to
give the decisive blow. The popular mind, still
heaving and surging, searched for a channel
through which to vent the enthusiasm (in such
cases there's always a little over) which had
not been exhausted in the contest itself. The
Bottomites resolved to make a public
demonstration
of their victoryone to allure new
friends and terrify old enemiesand a
street-parade
,
a grand procession by torchlight, was
fixed upon as most imposing. The newspapers
began immediately to trumpet the show; the
wire-pullers and busybodies in every direction
were on the alert, dusting their banners and
waking up their retainers. In a week from
the election the preparations were concluded,
and at sundown of the day appointed, the forces
of the procession began to assemble in the
Houston street square, East river. Two men
were seen with highly flushed faces, the dawn of
the procession, to roll off a couple of barrels
around a corner from a neighboring pump, and
hoist them upon a truck behind a canvass
banner
,
which denoted that these were two
genuine
and unadulterated barrels of the water of
the upper Wabash, in its aboriginal condition
before the clearing under the new bill. A
few minutes after, two other flush-faced
gentlemen
came around another neighboring
corner
with a couple of rolling barrels, which
were duly planted on a second truck, and which
were, in like manner, given out as so much
pure fluid drawn from the mighty Hudson by
an aged sailor, who would ride in one of the
barouches. Presently, a body of horsemen,
with new beaver hats and blue ribands at their
buttonholes, came seampering distractedly
into
the square, and rode about issuing
enthusiastic
orders, and inspecting with military
activity
the condition of the square, from one
end to the other. These were the marshals
of the procession; and in less than a couple of
minutes they were followed by numerous
detachments
of one kind and another, dropping
in at different points. In an hour the square
was full of horsemen, pedestrians, barouches,
carts, bannersand, for a time, there was an
unbroken hubbub of shouting voices, and an
inextricable confusion and entanglement of all
classes and orders of society.
By dint of driving up and down at the top of
their speedriding every now and then over
a child or an old woman, assailing a
detachment
of clamoring clerks in a high voice of
command, or imploring, with bended knees in
their saddles, a squad of mounted cartmen
they succeeded in forming the line. A
gentleman
in a dirty round jacket, filled his trumpet
till it overflowed; a short-legged drummer
dashed his sticks against the parchment; the
crowd gave three cheers, as they do when a
ship breaks from her stays, and the great
Bottomite
procession was launched upon the streets.
There was a barouche, containing a
standard-bearer
,
with two committee-men to fill up, that
led the van; then a barouche bearing two
ancient
residents on the Wabash (brought on
expressly
for this occasion), extremely pale and
sicklyas might have been expectedand
obliged to be fed out of a bottle, by a boy in
the carriage with them, to keep the breath in
their body. This device the crowd approved
of, and gave three cheers more as they trotted
in the wake of the procession. Then there
was a barouche with two fishermengreat,
sturdy, grampus-like fellowseducated, of
course, on the banks of the Hudson, and
chewing
pigtail in evidence of the holiness and
majesty
of the anti-Wabash cause.
But when, behind these, the crowd caught
sight of another barouchewrapped round and
round with bannersthe very horses trotting
forward in trowsers made of striped bunting,
there was no limit to the popular enthusiasm.
In this, the Hero of Kipp's baythe
redoubtable
Champion of New Yorkthe illustrious
Hopkins himself, stood up, and removing his
hat, waved it pleasantly to the crowd, at full
arm's-length, as though he was bailing up their
cheers, and pouring them out of the hat into
the barouche. High above his head danced the
banner wrought by the dark-eyed young lady
the blank filled as she had wished
Uncompromising
hostility to the clearing of the
Wabash
.For
Congress, Puffer Hopkins, the
Hero
of New York!
In the carriage with Puffer rode Mr. Halsey
Fishblatt, who had assumed a clean ruffle, of
extraordinary
dimensions, and whose very
waistcoat
seemed swelling and ready to burst with a
speech, with which he was no doubt prepared
to explode the moment he should be touched.
Then there were the fire companiesthe
earnest
and ardent friends of the successful
candidate
all
in their red shirts and leather caps,
dragging their engines by the rope, and joining
in the cheerings of the crowds with lusty voice.
A throng of sailors, surging and swaying along,
twelve abreast and arm-in-arm, in duck
trowsers
,
blue shirts, and hats of tarpaulin; and
then, in an uninterrupted line, in seventeen
carriages, the seventeen wards of the city,
represented
by as many emblematical gentlemen;
the first second and third being solid,
substantial
old fellows, with well-fed persons, and a
cross of the Dutchman in their look; the sixth,
a strapping, raw-boned genius, with a cane in
his hand quite large enough for a club or
shillelah
;
the seventh, a plain citizen, evidently,
by his dress and aspect, rising rapidly in the
world; the fifteenth, a dainty gentleman, with
a well-plaited ruffled shirt, and copious rings
upon his fingers; and so throughout the
seventeen
.
In strong contrast came a shoal of
wo-begone
,
unhappy-looking gentlemen, who called
themselves, in a portentous banner which they
bore above their heads, the Proscribed
watchmen
(they complained that the public offices,
to which they had acquired a legal right, by
ten years' uninterrupted possession, had been
taken from them), and they wore their caps
hind-foremost to denote the depth and agony
of their bereavement. With thesea
fellow-sufferer
in a common cause, there rode, in a
single gig, a lady of a venerable aspect, who
had for fifteen years dispensed at one of the
public watchhouses, pigs'-feet and coffee to the
watchmen, as they came in from their rounds.
She was the mother of five childrenher
husband
,
now dead, had lost an arm in an election
riotand she, a widow, had been ruthlessly
thrust from the watchhouse. All this was
expressed
in the banner which her eldest boy
carried
above her, on which were painted the
goddess
of liberty, with a crape around her
libertycap
(to denote the lady's widowhood); a
one-armed
ghost, appearing from a neighboring
tomb (her late husband); and a table spread
in a corner of the standard, at which five small
skeletons were represented as feeding on
peasoup
out of a large blue bowl.
This division of the show was received by
the crowd with an outbreak (as it was described
in the newspapers) an outbreak of irrepressible
indignation. Public opinion is always
outraged
in such cases, and follows the
perpetrators
,
they said, as surely as the shadow the
sun; and here came public opinion itself.
Through all the length and breadth of the
United States there is, at all times, supposed to
be rolling a great sphere or ballpausing
sometimes
at villages which it takes in its way, then
at cities or hamletsbut ever rolling on, on,
along the seaboard, up mountain-sides
bounding
and rushing through valleysgrowing
steadily
larger, larger, and keeping up a horrible
rumbling and tumult wherever it moves. The
knocking to and fro of this mighty ball is a
favorite
sport of congress-men, editors, and
others
,
who find a great diversion, in their
sedentary
and arduous labors, in racketing it about.
It was this mighty ball that was set in
motion
in behalf of the lady in the single gig;
and typifying thispublic opinion, which rolls
and gathers like an avalanchea great
canvas
wheel was now pressed forward at the rear
of the single gig, by an axle, at either end of
which toiled a dozen or two sallow gentlemen
with rickety legs, who, in the present case,
stood for Congress and the public press.
Directly
behind public opinion, and taking such
advantage of its motions as he could, in a
special
hackney-coach, to preserve his invaluable
health from the assaults of the night-air, came
Colonel Clingstone, a venerable revolutionary
veteran, whose patriotic ardor had been
incontestably
established by his eating an entire
British
ox (the property of a cowboy) during the
first week of the war, which proved to be so
substantial diet that he was able to live on the
very name or shadow of it ever afterseasoned
with a rumor of some gunshot wound or other.
In the rear of the venerable colonelwho did
not fail from time to time to show his frosty
head at one window or the other, just to see
how public opinion got alongthere swarmed
a lean, cadaverous, deadly-looking troop, in
soiled garments and battered hats, and headed
by our electioneering agent, Mr. Nicholas
Finch, with a banner representing a group of
citizens greatly cast down and with
pocket-handkerchiefs
at their eyes, weeping profusely
at the tomb of Washington. It was observed
of these gentlemen, who had chalked their faces
to an interesting paleness to create public
sympathy
,
that whenever the revolutionary veteran
thrust his portly person into view, one or other
of them would mutter between his teeth, Cu's'
that old chap! he's had fat pickings forty years
from a pin-prick! The sympathies of the crowd
were evidently with the cadaverous followers
of Mr. Finch.
I know them fellers, said a squint-eyed
bar-tender, who was on the look-out; them's
Finch's hunters; they're wonderfully ill-used
gem'menthey wants berths in the
custom-house
,
for the sake of their country, and their
country wont let 'em take the berths! Ain't that
a hard case, Joe?
Crueller nor the anaconder! answered
Joe, a dependant of a neighboring bakery;
I say let every man bake his bread in the
gov'ment oven, if he likes to. Don't we own
the gov'mentand what's gov'ments good
for if they can't do a man's private washing,
and ironing, and bread-baking? That's my
views?
The lean gentlemen, in a word, were
office-seekers
,
ambitious to serve the public on any
terms; belonged to either side, or both sides,
as occasion required. It
was
a great wrong
to keep them out of place, for if they expended
half the ardor in serving the public which they
did to serve themselves, public affairs must have
been managed with extraordinary prudence and
despatch. Poor fellows! they were in a sad
plight; no bread nor beef at home, and their
ungrateful country refusing to cash their bills.
It was as much as Mr. Finch could do, moving
about and whispering cheerful promises in their
ears, to keep them in spirits to go through their
parts in the procession.
Behind these, comfortably quartered in a
series
of light wagons, followed a body of
gentlemen
in high glee, rosy-gilled, laughing and
making merry of every object on the road.
They seemed entirely at their ease, and to have
nothing to do in this world but to carry certain
torches which they waved and flaunted about
their heads as in pastime, and merely to show
the world how comfortable they were. It is
hardly necessary to add, that the gentlemen in
the light wagons were office-holders; and that
in evidence of their grateful remembrance of
the man who founded
such
a government, they
carried a full length of the Father of his
country
.
On a closer inspection, certain members
of the Bottom Club might have been discovered
settled in the light wagons; they had doubtless
left off ameliorating the condition of society in
order to devote their undivided attention to
their own comfort and the public service, on
which their outcry had quartered them.
Behind
these, singling himself out from the
common
herd, a little man marched about a
platform
,
which he had caused to be built at his
own private expense, and borne up on the
shoulders of four sturdy partisans, blowing a
small brass trumpet, of great depth of wind,
from time to time, and waving a small white
flag with great earnestness about his his head.
This gentlemen, too, was ambitious of office,
and by no means inclined to have the
magnificence
of his claims confounded with the
demerits
of the gentry who plodded on foot.
And then came scampering forward, Mr.
Sammis at the head of a hundred and fifty
mounted cartment; and as they rode in their
frocks, tottering and tumbling in their saddles,
they resembled not a little a hundred and fifty
clowns in an equestrian pantomime, slightly
beside
themselves with strong drink.
There was a part of the line obscured by a
cloud of hangers-on, from which a report of
lusty voices constantly broke in cries of Here's
the extra infantry! Terrible murder, sir,
don't tread on my toes! Only three cents,
and full of pipin'-hot soocides and seductions!
When, in turning a corner, the cloud broke,
it disclosed, in their usual undress uniforms of
baggy caps, half coats, and inadequate
breeches
,
a detachment of newsboys, bearing aloft,
with an air of haughty defiance, numerous
paper
ensigns, on which were inscribed
Freedom
of speech and plenty o' pies!
Longnines
and liberty! and other decisive axioms
of the newsboy creed.
At the heels of the news-boys, there fell in
great swarms of citizens, in long coats, short
coats, hats, caps, badges, and locked arms; and,
when every joint was set, it began, at first
slowly
,
but afterward with increased motions, to creep
like a three-mile snake, along the streets. As
far as the eye could reach either way, there
was a tumultuous flow of faceslighted up
by torches, borne on high shadowed by banners
and emblems, seeming to fill the city, and hold
possession of the night at every point.
The drum beat, the trumpet sounded, the
marshals in an ecstacy of excitement, hurried
up and down the linethere was one in
buck-skin
breeches and military top-boots, who did
immense execution in clearing the line of the
kerbstone by riding over loafers and women
who stood in the guttersthe procession moved
on. With flaring torches they filed through
the streets, turned the distant cornersand
swept in in their course whole armies of recruits.
About the chief divisions of the line the
populace
clustered in swarms, and the rear-ward
was swelled with a great crowd of laggards,
who in tattered garments, many of them
shoeless
and hatless, shambled after. Wherever
they passed there were innumerable faces at
the windows, peering out; and the sidewalks
were thick with gazers. Like a turbid stream
it rolled on, street after street, staying itself
only for an instant, at different houses, to heave
a great cheer in compliment to some friend of
the party who dwelt within, or a portentous
groan in condemnation of an enemy. When
they arrived at a narrow street that crossed
their way, they came to a dead halt. A
stumping
noise, in the deadly silence, was heard upon
the steps of an oyster-vaulta jolly face
presented
itselfthe crowd burst into a cheer of
recognitionMr. Jarve Barrell laid his hand
upon his breast, waved his hatand the crowd
passed on.
At length, in an overwhelming flood of a
thousand tributaries, they poured down upon the
great square in front of Fogfire hall. At a
given signal, and as one man, the vast
gathering
bellowed forth cheer after cheerthe very
air rocked. The torches were gathered in a
ring, shedding a gloomy light upon the Park,
and on the tall gaunt buildings hard-by; a
gallows-tree was brought from a neighboring
deposite. As soon as it was planted in the
centre of the square, the red-shirted firemen
swarmed in from every direction at its foota
chain dropped from its summita blazing fire
kindled beneath, and a hoarse voice shouted
through a trumpet, bring him forth! The
crowd shuddered involuntarilybut when they
saw what it was that hung dangling from the
chain, they burst into a huge laugh. All the
uplands and winding ways of the city,
whereever
the eye could reach, were set thick with
faces, fixed upon the gallows with its iron
fingers ready to pounce upon the victim. It
was a portly little figure with a white head
and green coata pair of supercilious eyes,
(these they couldn't see), altogether not more
than eighteen inches high. Such as were near
enough said it was the great insurance
president
Mr.
Blinker, the late opposition
candidate
,
reduced half a dozen sizes or so, and it
was given out that he was brought to his
present ignominy by the firemen, who may be
supposed to have harbored a special ill-will
against one who, by his constant presence at
burnings and conflagrations, caused their sport
to be stayed half way. However this was, he
had been brought thither in an engine
chamber
,
and was now swinging above the flames
which crackled up and lovingly licked his feet,
while the engine men stood grinning about.
For a long time he hung, swaying to and
fro, toying as it were with the fire, to the
infinite
delight of the crowd, who gathered in
masses upon the wagons, barouches, trucks,
even upon each other's shoulders, watching the
progress of the immolation. At length fire
took upon his person. It's caught his right
boot! cried one. There was an uproarious
shout. It's caught his left! There was
another still louder. But when the flame
began
to invade the vital parts, there were no
limits to their satisfaction, which they
expressed
by ironical calls to the firemen to put him
out.
Why don't you play upon his second story
and upper-works, you fellers! Give him a jet
in th' abdomen! Why will you let the cruel
flame take the venerable man by the nose in
that way! It was to no purpose; and though,
as the blaze twinkled in his eyeslooking
mischievously into their very socketshe
seemed to frown scornfully upon them, in the
course of half an hour, during which the
volunteers had given the fire many an ugly
stir, the great insurance president, with all his
dignity of person and majesty of look, was a
cinder, picked up by a quidnunc, and in less
than an hour deposited in the neighboring
museum, among the bears and alligators, and
potted beetles there preserved. Some say that
this was Crump, the secretary of the Phnix
company, who had made himself active in
feeding
the flame by which the president had been
burned.
This business overMr. Blinker done to a
turnto the entire satisfaction of everybody
present, there was a loud call upon Puffer
Hopkins for a speech; which call his associate,
Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, was quite anxious to
respond to.
Let me answer it! said Mr. Fishblatt;
I'll tell them a thing or two about the old
villain
we've just burnt. I know him from his
cradle
.
They expect something about him. And
while Puffer kept his seat, Mr. Fishblatt
mounted to his legs in answer to the summons.
A broad, universal sibilation or hissing,
admonished
Mr. Fishblatt that his orations were
not, just then, in request, and he dropped back
into his seat like one stricken with a ball.
There was the broad sky above themthe
surging sea of headsthe goddess of justice,
in snow-white wood, at his backthe
streaming
banner and refulgent transparency of
Fogfire
hall in front, and, by no means least of all,
the two pure barrels of Hudson, and two of
reeking upper Wabash, under his very eye,
upon the trucks; could Puffer fail out of all
these to frame a triumphant speech? He
could not, and, as he concluded, three peals,
four times renewed, rent the circuit, and made
the very pennons rustle in the air.
Re-forming as soon as they could recover
from the bewilderment of the harangue, and in
much less order than they had set out, the
procession
returned up the city in the direction of
the Tombs. Though the music still sounded,
and the torches still flared against the sky, a
sudden depression seemed to have fallen upon
the crowd. Many of the standard bearers
dropped their standards, and allowed them to
trail in the dust; great numbers left their
places in the ranks and skulked away. A
change had come over the very heaven itself;
the face of the sky was darknot with
accustomed
clouds or shadowsthe great shadow of
the earth itself was spreading over the
firmament
;
an eclipse was at hand. At this
moment
,
and while yet there was some show of
triumph and rejoicing in the crowd, Puffer's
attention was withdrawn to a dark figure,
which, scudding away from the glare of the
procession, coasted along the walls, turned
a corner and disappeared, as though it had
dived into the earth. The contrast of this
single silent figure, and the great tumultuous
crowd, was so marked, that Puffer's mind was
strongly fixed upon it.
The darkness deepened, and multitudes kept
falling off; among others, Puffer descried Mr.
Sammis, as he left his place and passed by,
looking up and smiling as he passed.
Then Mr. Fishblatt ordered a sudden halt,
and without a word of explanation disappeared
from his side. What could this mean? Were
all things coming to an end? He was
meditating
upon the incident, when a small, spare
figurewhich he had noticed throughout the
night hovering about the carriage, and keeping
its face turned constantly toward his own, on
whichever side he looked, but which, in the
uncertain light he could not more closely
discern
leaped
upon the wheel and twitched him
by the sleeve. How like it was to a similar
summons at the very outset of his career! A
voice was at his ear entreating him to leave
the carriage.
You know you are mine, now! said the
voice.
It sounded other than it ever had before.
To see your friends at the farm-house, I
know, answered Puffer, bending toward the
questioner; but why not come into the
carriage
with me, and ride out together?
No, no, you could not get out of the line,
answered the other quickly. You will not
deny me this wish? Come quicklyit darkens
apace.
Puffer did not hesitatethe pageant was fast
growing to an endbut seizing a favorable
pause, escaped to the ground and followed the
other cautiously through the crowd.
CHAPTER XXXIX.
HOBBLESHANK AND PUFFER HOPKINS VISIT
THE FARM-HOUSE.
In
a few minutes they were beyond its skirts,
and moving at a good pace toward the suburbs.
Hobbleshank led the way at such eager speed,
looking forward to his path and back to Puffer,
constantly, that it was some time before the
young steps that followed reached him, and
when they did, Puffer found him so pale and
shaken by fatigue, it seemed, he begged him to
borrow his support.
Hobbleshank accepted it at once, and, with
a smile of hope and trust in his look as he
turned to answer, leaned upon Puffer, and they
pursued their way. The old man's guidance
and the young man's strength bore them
swiftly
on. When they looked back, from an
eminence
they had reached in travelling up the
city, the procession, they saw by the flaring
torchlight, was crumbling in pieces;
detachment
after detachment falling off in flakes, and
with drooping banners, melting in the
neighboring
streets.
As the old man and his companion moved
along, there crept out upon the air a thick
darkness
the
earth's shadow lay, every minute,
closer and closer to the pale moon above. The
houses seemed, in the ghastly light, like ghosts
or spectres of their former selves; the
church-steeples
,
quenched in the dim atmosphere,
were broken off at the top.
The passengers they met as they advanced
came toward them, wrapped in the strange
darkness, like travellers from another world.
The great heart of the city itself seemed to
grow still and be subdued to a more quiet
beating
under the heavy air that oppressed its
church-towers and its thoroughfares.
Hobbleshank
and Puffer drew closer to each other's
side at every step.
You had not forgotten that you were mine
to-night? asked Hobbleshank.
Not at all!how could I? answered
Puffer. I am yours now and at all times.
You are? interrupted Hobbleshank,
quickly
;
thank Heaven for that!
To be sure I am, continued Puffer. You
have made me what I am (I know this in more
ways than one), and I am your creature as
much as the pitcher is the potter's to carry me
where you will, and to put me to what uses you
choose. I am not sorry that the farm-house,
now your own again, is the first to visit.
Never mind that, returned the old man.
But now that you have grown to be a great
man, no matter how, won't the world be
asking
questions of your early life and history?
What can you tell them, eh?
Although this was spoken in a cheerful tone,
he drew a hard breath as it escaped him.
Not much, answered Puffer; I don't
know that I would tell the world anything, let
T
them ask as much as they choose; but to you,
my good old friend, always true, I may say that
I had no early life.
You don't mean, interrupted
Hobbleshank
,
quickly, that you ever suffered from
want of food, or lodging, or warmth? In God's
name, you don't say that!
Puffer was startled by the old man's
eagerness
,
and seeing with how anxious a look he
hung upon him, he answered at once:
Oh, nonever thatI meant merely that
my childhood had neither father's nor mother's
care; and can there be life without them? But
I ought not to repineI had kindness and some
friends. As I meant to tell you, my first seven
years were passed with a boatman, who lived
on the edge of the North river, near
Bloomingdale
;
where I came from at first, I dont know
although he used to tell me I was found by
him in the woods when an infant.
In the woods? said Hobbleshank,
cheerfully
,
Go on, go on, you couldn't have been
found in a better place.
The boatman's wife or some one that was
near to him died, continued Puffer,
wondering
at the old man's enthusiasm. His heart
broke, his affairs went into decay, and I into
the Banks street asylum, as an orphan. When
I had been there some six or seven years, one
day there came into the room where we were
all seated, our faces just shining from the
towel
,
a stout, white-headed, rosy gentleman, of a
middle age; and pitching his eye upon me,
after
ranging up and down the bench, said,
This is the boy I spoke of? The matron
answered it was.
Very good, said the rosy gentleman.
His name is Puffer Hopkins; and when he's
of age let him draw this check. He handed
a paper to the matron, and, smiling upon me
once more, went away.
What does this mean? asked
Hobbleshank
,
anxiously. He was no relation of
yours.
I don't believe he was, answered Puffer,
laughing. Although I learned on inquiry
in the neighborhood, years after, when I had
drawn the money he had left me, that he had
been a bachelor who had married late in life,
and been much mocked and joked at for
having
no children. He had given out that they
might be mistaken, and, by frequent visits to
the asylum and this goodness toward me,
succeeded
in getting his gossips and aspersers off
the scent. He was dead, and his wife too,
when I inquired, and that was all I ever knew
of him.
It was a joke, then; a mere joke? said
Hobbleshank.
I suppose it was, answered Puffer. This
answer seemed to be a great comfort to the old
man, for he breathed more freely, and they
hurried on at a quicker pace.
The mighty shadow of the eclipse deepened
and grew heavier upon the earth.
Foot-passengers
paused and stood still in the
road. The trees in the fields looked like solid
shadows; the sound of wheels died away in
every thoroughfare. All life and motion were
arrested for the time; everything was at a
pause but Puffer and Hobbleshank; they were
moved by impulses, it would seem, not to be
stayed or dampened even by a disastrous
darkness
,
or the obscuration of the sky. The blue
heavens, they knew, lay beyond the apparent
shadow, and they pressed on. They came to
a steep road, and as they climbed this,
Hobbleshank
clung closer than ever to Puffer. At its
top was an old country house, from the
windows
of which cheerful lights gleamed upon
the darkness. The moment they came in sight
of this the old man trembled as with an ague,
and fell upon Puffer's arm for support.
They were almost at its threshold, when,
Hobbleshank arresting Puffer, they paused,
and the old man turned so as to look him full
in the face. It was evident there was
something
on the old man's mind he had reserved
to this moment.
Was there nothing, he said at length, like
one who lingers to gather resolution, was
there nothing the boatman gave you as
evidence
of the place you were found in?
To be sure there was! How the old
man's look was renewed to youth, by these
few words, and shined in Puffer's. To be
sure there wasI forgot to mention it, but not
to wear it with me always in my breast, with
a hope. His hand was in his breast, but
Hobbleshank
stayed him, and told him not yet
not yetit will be time presently. He would
not trust himself to look at it.
Puffer knew something of the old man's
mood, and followed him silently as he led the
way. There had been cheerful voices from
within the house, but when it was known that
Hobbleshank and Puffer were at hand, a dead
stillness fell upon the place; it was as if the
old house itself listened, in expectation of what
was to be told.
They were no sooner within the hall than
Hobbleshank, pointing to a door at the left
hand, said, In therego in quicklyGod
grant that all may be right!
While Hobbleshank walked the old hall, the
dim figures on its walls, watching him, as he
might regard them as so many good spirits, or
evil spectres, Puffer found himself in a small
room, an antechamber, with two persons, one
a woman, stout, hale, and of middle age; the
other, a man, spare of person, and of a
sorrowful
and forlorn look. They both stood before
him as he entered, with looks riveted upon
the door with a steady gaze. The moment he
crossed its threshold, a swift change crossed
their featurestheir whole expression was
shifted, like a scene, from that of dreadful
doubt to one of certainty and confirmation.
It's Paullittle blackberry Paulalthough
the berry's worn out in course of time, said
the woman, speaking first and closely perusing
Puffer's features; do you know us?
Puffer's mind was sorely vexed and troubled;
he knew them, and yet it seemed he knew them
not, for he could call neither by name.
If I dared to hope it, he answered at
length, scrutinizing his countenance, I might
say this is my early friend, who brought me
to be a boy seven years old; but I don't
believe
it!
The man seized his hand quickly, and told
him he must, for he was no other.
You don't recollect
me
, then? said the
woman, somewhat cast down by the inequality
of Puffer's memory; you sartainly haven't
forgot HettyHetty Simmons, it was then,
Hetty Lettuce nowyour old nurse? Ah, me!
I can't be changed so sadly since then!
After a while Puffershe pressed him to it
admitted that he caught now and then a tone
in her voice that he ought to know.
Now, to tell the truth, said Hetty, a little
vexed, I didn't know your face either; but I
knew your voice the minute I heard it at
Bellevue
the other night; it was me that fastened
that bracelet on your arm the night you were
stolen away.
What bracelet? said Puffer. You don't
mean the one I wear in my breast?
Sartainthe very one, answered Hetty;
Let's see; I guess it's a match. Hetty held
in her hand a half bracelet; in a minute more
she had Puffer's;they were matches, as she
had guessed; the same auburn hairthe same
golden clasp. She threw open the door.
Hobbleshank
stood there like one in a swoon
white and trembling, his two hands hanging
like dead branches at his side.
Come in, said Hetty; good heavens,
it's all as we thought!
At this bidding Hobbleshank staggered across
the door-sill, and casting himself upon Puffer's
neck, muttered brokenly, My sonmy son!
The tears fell from his old lids like rain. Mrs.
Lettuce, and the other, laying the broken
bracelet upon a table by the side of the great
breast-pin which was there already, took each
other by the hand and silently withdrew,
leaving
father and son to know each other, after a
lifetime's separation, in peace. With halting
words, with tears and passionate embraces,
Hobbleshank made known to Puffer the
chances
of his past life, how his mother diedhe
did not tell him all, there were dreadful words
he could not trust himself withhow he was
losthow in twenty years he had often thought
his child found again, but was so often sore
baffled and almost broken in hope. From the
first he felt that Puffer was his child and no
other; he dared not claim him till the last
rivet fastened him back, as it had to-night.
For many hours they had lingered together,
dwelling upon the past, so full of hope and
fear and strange vicissitude, when
Hobbleshank
,
starting up as though it had just come
into his mind, said:
What will they think of us? Come,
Paul, we have friends hard by that must not be
forgotten.
He led him along the hall, and, with his
hand in his own, they entered another room,
larger than the first, where a company sat, in
an attitude of expectation, looking toward the
door, and watching it as it opened. They
knew, without a word, what the story was. It
was Hobbleshank and his long lost, new-found
son. They looked upon him whom they had
all known as Puffernow that he was Paul,
and the old man's childwith new eyes. How
kind in Hobbleshank, to bring together such,
and such only, as he knew Puffer (for so we
love to call him still), would most desire to
meet. There was Mr. Fishblatt, standing
with his skirts spread, in the middle of the
floor, ready to open upon the case at the first
opportunity; and at his side Mr. Sammy
Sammis
,
whose face, from being a cobweb of smiles
on ordinary occasions, was now a perfect net,
in every line and thread of which there lay
lurking a gleam of welcome. Then there was
old aunt Gatty, who smiled too, but afar off,
like one who has not quite so sure a hold of
the occasion of her smiling as might be desired,
and seated near Dorothy, who whispered in
her ear, and did what she could to make her
conscious of the change that had come over
the fortunes of her old friend. Not far from
these, something of a shadow in their midst,
was Puffer's early friend, the forlorn stranger;
and Mrs. Hetty Lettuce, who had not
altogether
recovered her spirits from the shock of
not being recognised by her boy and nursling.
But who are nextto whom Puffer gave his
earliest gazewhere his eye lingered so long?
No other than the little old aunt and the
dark-eyed
young lady.
Puffer shook hands with them one and all;
as if he were starting the world anew, and
wished to set out well. There was no lack of
voices, one might be well assured. Mr.
Fishblatt
,
at the top of his, declaiming upon it as
one of the most extraordinary, unparalleled,
wonderful histories he had ever known. (He
had heard but the half yet.) Mr. Sammy
Sammis
corroborating, and Hobbleshank running
from one to the other, and demanding, in a
highly-excited state of mind, opinions upon his
boy. Then he would come back again,
requiring
to be informed whether he hadn't
done wellwhether all had not been managed
with great discretion, and as it should have
been.
Hold there a minute, cried Mr. Halsey
Fishblatt at one of these questionings. Are
you sure of your title here?
Quite sure, answered Hobbleshank.
What, sir! retorted Mr. Fishblatt, won't
the state come in as the successor to the
broker
,
who, as a prisoner, is a dead man in the
law, and seize the farm-house?
Ah! you haven't heard the story of the
deed, answered Hobbleshank, quickly. Who
has kept that back from you? You ought to
know that.
And he proceeded to give him a full and
authentic
account of the marvel by which it had
been preserved, rescued, and transmitted to his
hands by Fob and his pale country friend.
Come and sit by me, said aunt Gatty, in
a voice so affected by age that every other
word was at the ceiling and the next
plumbdown
upon the floor, come here by your old
aunt. Puffer placed a chair by her side; she
seized both his hands in hers, regarding him
steadily for some minutes, and then said, still
gazing, How like his mother!very like
don't you see it, Dorothy?
Dorothy, although she had never seen that
lady, rather than cross her old companion in
her whim, admitted it was marvellous.
That's her eye exactlybut her hairwas
that black or flaxenhow was that, Dorothy,
you remember? How old are you, my child
tenperhaps twelveah, I forget ages
wonderfully
,
and she fell off into an idle
pondering
.
She evidently supposed the world had
stood still for at least fifteen or twenty years.
Dorothy shook her head to the company round,
and soothed her aged friend as she could. She
presently after brightened a little, and asked if
this old man they saw was the Hobbleshank
whom she was bound to watch and guard as a
death-bed trustby a promise at his mother's
bed-side fifty years old at least. It was the
same, Dorothy answered, and this was his son.
Aunt Gatty smiled at the news, and fell into a
new vacancy.
There was a close and whispered interview
on Puffer's part with the dark-eyed young
lady, which, strain their ear as they might,
was pitched in far too gentle a key to be
guessed
at by any round, unless it might have been
the smart little aunt who sat by, brightening
up as it advanced as though it afforded her
infinite
satisfaction to see how close and
whispered
it was.
I buried my only daughter, said the
sorrowful
boatman, when Puffer questioned him,
many months agoyou remember heryour
little play-fellowwhose blue eyes you used to
watch so closely?
Puffer didbut years had changed the hue
of his mind, and with that the color of the eye
that fixed his fancy most.
The sorrowful stranger sighed, and Puffer
turning away with some kindly thought at his
heart, fell into the hands of Mrs. Lettuce, who
stood near by with a candle and motioned
Puffer to follow her. She crossed the room and
led him into a small chamber at its side. The
chamber, unlike the other parts of the house
he had seen, was unfurnished; it held nothing
more than a low, narrow bed, a tattered
blanket
,
and a few broken bed cords, trailing upon
the floor. It was cold and damp, and a chill
struck through Puffer as his companion closed
the door and shut them in, what seemed to
Puffer, from the first moment, a hideous place.
It's strange you didn't recollect your old
nurse, said Mrs. Lettuce, but never mind
that; all your troubles and tribulations began
in this room; and I want to tell what your
old father's heart failed him to speak of. This
was Fyler Close's sleeping-room for more than
a year; all the while your poor mother was
sickwhat snake's eyes that old villain had!
and when he stretched his neck toward that
door, when your poor mother was a dying, and
spread out his old ugly hands, as if he had 'em
hold of her young throat squeezing the life out
but that isn't it. You'll ask what all this
means? The long and the short of it is this.
Fyler Close and your father loved the same
woman
;
and there wasn't a brighter angel out of
heaven than that girl; they both loved her,
Paul, but your father married her; and from
that day to this, he has had the shadow of the
devil, yes the devil himself in the form of that
broker, at his heels. Your father, Paul, was
always quick, and free, and lavish with his
money; and that Fyler Close knew well. He
made believe that he didn't care which married
the girl, but he hated your father to the death;
and as he knew your father's weakness, he
worked upon it; he urged him to all sorts of
extravagance; to buy this, and buy that, and
buy the othertill the tide begun to run back
with himand then Fyler comes in, and like
a dear friend, lends him all he wants. He
was always of a lending nature, more for
spite than gain, I always thought; and so he
went on lending till your father wasn't worth
a cent he could call his own. Then Fyler
began
to call it in by degrees, so that your father
didn't see what he was driving at; first he
had to sell a picture, then an up-stairs carpet;
then Fyler came to board in this house, to keep
an eye on things. He thought plainer living
proper; and the family was put upon a short
allowance.
This is a devil, as you say, said Puffer,
from his closed teeth, while the sweat started
to his brow. A devil with two hoofs!
By-and-by your mother fell sickit was
the presence of the old broker and a change
in her way of living; she grew worse day by
day; it was no seated sickness, the doctors
said, nothing they could name; she was
perishing
,
I verily believe, of hunger, for every
day the table was more spare than before; the
broker himself seemed to live on air, to keep it
in countenance, and all that timeall the while
that poor dear creature was famishing with the
pangs of hunger at her heart, which made her
cry out, though for his sakeyour father's
sake, and lest some direr calamity might be
brought upon him, she said not a word. But
such cries as she uttered, so sharp and awful,
I never heard in my life; and Fyler Close lay
on that couch, that very couch, drinking them
all in like music. The devils must have him,
if any man! Your mother was buried.
Starved to death! gasped Puffer.
Even so, I fear, answered Mrs. Lettuce,
and her grave is just by the house-wall, where
the broker could thrust forth his head from
this chamber window, and gloat upon it any
time he chose. Your father saw her in her
grave, but more like one raving mad than a
rational creature; immediately after the
funeral
he disappeared, was goneno one knows
whither to this day, though it is said he lived
during that time upon the roads and highways
of the country, and sheltered himself in sheds
and barns. The old broker lodged here a few
nights, grew disquieted it is thought, and went
into the city. Paul, Paul, said Hetty,
breaking
into tears, I never thought when you
were a month's infant on my lap, that I should
live to tell you a tale like this. You didn't
remember
me, but I forgive you.
Puffer stood gazing upon the bed with a
blanched face, and glassy eye, and rigid in
every
limb. Hetty would not let him dwell
upon
it longer, but, taking him by the arm, led
him gently back. So pale and unearthly was
his look and action when he came forth, they
all gathered about and asked what sudden
sickness
shook him so?
Nothing, nothing, he answered. Before
they could put further question, Hobbleshank
entreated them to pardon him for a while, and
drew Puffer away. They went into the open
air, and treading gently on the earth, as though
a grave lay under every step, they stood beside
a tomb built close under the wall. It heaved
above the earth, and Hobbleshank, laying his
hand upon its top, said to Puffer, This is
your mother's grave. The swelling vines,
crested with pure white blossoms, broke like a
green wave over its marbled top.
As they recrossed the threshold the trouble
passed away from heaven, and the pale, clear
light lay on all the country round.
Hobbleshank led Puffer again into the little
chamber.
I have a favor to ask of my child, he said,
but one that he will not fail to grantI am
sure, am I?
To be sure he was, let him ask anything he
chose.
I want you, said Hobbleshank, to fix
this breastpin in your bosom and get married
to-night.
To-night! Puffer hadn't thought of such a
thing. Twenty-five years to come would be
time enough. The young lady was in the other
roomthe parson at handhow could it be
avoidedhe'd like to know from Puffer how it
was to be avoided? Puffer could suggest no
practicable means of escape, and proceeded
with the old man to the other room, to be
married
with as good a grace as he could. The
little parson had come; there was the bride,
too, whose consent had scarcely been asked,
in her snow-white dress, the smart old aunt
smoothing the folds and rubbing her hands
alternately
.
In half an hour a change had come
over the aspect of Puffer's sky as great as the
eclipse withoutbrightening, not darkening,
all that lay beneath. Who can tell what
gossip
the old farm-house rung with that night
what plans, what jests were broachedwhat
good cheer went abroad among them all? How
Halsey Fishblatt declaimedhow the little old
aunt chatteredhow Hobbleshank shambled
up and down the room in a constant glow
how it was finally determined that Hetty
Lettuce
and Dorothy and Aunt Gatty should come
to live in the old farm-house (there was a
chirping house full), with Hobbleshank and
Paul and the new wife. How Mr. Halsey
Fishblatt would strike out some grand scheme
or other, by which they should hear and know
all that the city did, or thought, or said; how
Mr. Sammy Sammis and the little old aunt
would come out and visit them, twice a week
at least, in a new one-horse to be immediately
established; and the poor stranger, too,
Puffer's
early friendthere was a pleasant berth
to be thought of for hima nice little office
Mr. Sammy Sammis had pitched upon in
his own mind already, and about which he
would see seventeen influential gentlemen
tomorrow
.
A blessing upon the old household and the
younghaving spun out a long sorrow as the
staple of their life, they have come upon a clear
white thread, which will brighten on in
happiness
and mirth to the very grave's edge!
THE END OF PUFFER HOPKINS.MISCELLANIES.
TRUE AIMS OF LIFE:
DELIVERED BEFORE THE
ALUMNI OF THE NEW YORK UNIVERSITY,
In the University Chapel, July 16, 1839.
Gentlemen, brethren of the Alumni
:
The
occasion which has called us together
to-day constitutes a fortunate pause in our
career
.
Near enough to the period when we left
these halls, to mingle in the cares and conflicts
of the world, and far enough onward in the
active
march of life, it justifies us in looking back
thoughtfully to the past and in considering what
the great future may have in store for us.
Youth, at least, the first freshness and glory
of youth, are gone from us for ever. The gate
of that happy paradise, whose clouds were but
the ornaments of its morning heaven, and whose
sorrow only deepened joy, is closed to our steps.
Threatening and inexorable aspects warn us
from it, and we must henceforth seek, in a
wide and troubled world, such substitutes of
happiness as it may furnish. But the mind
the unconquerable and adventurous memory
breaks every fetter, and, hurrying back, leaps
that old garden wall, and introduces us for
a little hour to scenes, hopes, and pleasures,
that we thought were gone never more to
return
.
Who would not give all that he is and
all that he has to recover his youth, with its
buoyant heart, its cheerful dreams, its sense
of wonder, its full-bosomed and innocent
delights
?
But the future brightens in the distance, and
toward it we are impelled by the progressive
spirit that belongs to our race. What we have
been is chronicled in the great calendar of God.
What we are yet to be lies, in a considerable
measure, in the palms of our own hands, and
will be moulded to honor or to dishonor, as truth
and wisdom, or madness and error, teach us by
the way. What, then, are the true aims of
life? Many so far misapprehend the objects
of existence, as to suppose they are fulfilling all
the duty of life if they pursue some particular
and chosen career with honest and honorable
success. It is a low and cheap estimate of our
nature that regards men as mere merchants,
soldiers, and artisans. These are the accidents
and contingencies of our common life. No man
acquires dignity, in the eye of a sagacious and
comprehensive philosophy, by filling any or all
of these stations with the utmost worldly
success
.
It is not as the followers of business,
war, and commerce, that men are venerable
and noble beings. It is the condition of his
destiny that he should labor; but it is to
improve
and exalt his intelligence, to broaden the
foundations of his intellectual and spiritual
nature
,
that he lives. It is the motion and
impulses
of a soul that compasses earth and time
and transcends physical limits, that make him
the image of the great Mover of the heavens.
These considerations should teach him to
reverence
his nature; to bow down to his higher
and better qualities with respect; and to
cultivate
his mind and affections because their
development
and cultivation is the noblest task
in which he can be engaged. By too many the
intellect is regarded as a means, a mere
auxiliary
and mercenary, enlisted in the achievement
of secondary and common objects.
Instead of regarding and reverencing the
mind as essentially constituting the man, as
something in itself and by itself, without
reference
to its available uses in life, it is held by
many as a lesser servant or menial, in the
large household of human nature, and ranked
only with the hand that hews, and the
shoulder
that bears base burdens and drudges for the
abject and physical wants of man. The mind,
this human mind of ours, if rightly understood,
is a nobler subject of contemplation than
temples
and pyramidshas in itself more durable
greatness and beauty than mountains and the
most glorious carved monuments fashioned by
the cunning of human skill.
Objects and pursuits which we regard in
themselves as final aims, intrinsically full of
worth and moment, are furnished merely as
incitements
and means toward the development
of our higher nature. Many results which we
gaze on as prodigies of human ingenuity, are
the mere outbreak and transitory expression of
this divine fire smouldering within.
To accomplish the true aims of life we must
first know what our nature is and what it
requires
.
Our nature, then, is not a simple element,
like the air, the ocean, or the wind, having a
single
agency to perform, performing it always in
one way and through an established round or
channel of action. It is a compound and
composite
conditiona rude, misshapen, unformed
chaos of moral, intellectual, and physical
ingredients
,
placed in our keeping to be wrought, by
a steady will and enlightened industry, into
symmetry and beauty. To show the vast reach,
the towering strength and altitude of our
nature
,
and its capacity of extension, we know
that it has been the laborious duty of a long life
in some men, to single out some separate
quality
and devote night and day to its mature and
perfect development. Constantly heaping
together
material from every corner of the visible
universe, and piling thought on thought, until
the broad earth seemed to be its base and the
heavens were pierced by its rising summit, we
have seen the majestic fabric of some great
genius
ascend, and just as the structure was
assuming
breadth and proportion, the earth has
opened and swallowed the mighty architect
with all his plans. Think you that sublime
labor was lost? No. He who here toiled at
the foundations in our midst will there be
engaged
in completing the glorious structure of
his nature, and will work cheerfully at its
architrave
and crowning capital in the eye of his
great Taskmaster.
In the whole range of animated beings there
is, I imagine, no creature in all respects like
man; none in the wide circuit of planets and
universes, possessing the same powers, placed
amid the same circumstances, and
accomplishing
the parposes of his being through the same
hopes, fears, trials, joys; under a similar sky,
and impelled by spiritual and physical
influences
of like potency and character.
It is our duty to unfold this vast, complex,
and peculiar nature, by availing ourselves of
every aid within our reach; and aids are not
wanting. Not a star, a stream, a shadow
that does not co-operate with us in this great
ministry. Every mute thing in nature has a
voice to summon forth some faculty of ours and
to cherish it in its growth. The grandeur of
the heavens kindles our imagination, the
stubborn
mountain-ascent evokes the resolute will,
the ocean-flood challenges our daring, and the
decaying blossoms of earth persuade us to weep.
I do not deny that many objects are of
temporary
use and pass utterly away without any deep
and durable impressions on our character; but
I do believe, that in his infinite wisdom and
skill the great Builder has created this world
of ours and all that is in it, for this high
purpose
;
has devised it as the best school for
human
nature, and in his mature and eternal
counsels has chosen it out of innumerable plans,
as the best suited for the composite and
wonderful
being whose inheritance it is.
It is not in the material creation alone that
our nature finds aliment for its highest
qualities
.
The human world, the wide and restless
generation of our own kind, furnishes ample
means and inducements. We are so constituted
as to have our best faculties, our broadest
enterprises
,
our noblest emotions, elicited by the
quick sympathies of our common race. We
are generous, heroic, fearless in trial, and with
countenances glowing from within as well as
from without, amid the fires of martyrdom, that
we may acquire the affections and praises of
mankind. We build our loftiest and most
eurable
monuments that we may live in the
memory
of man. We give up household quiet,
domestic
joy, serene contemplation, life itself, and
wrestle in the stormy conflict for a sudden and
glorious grave, to which men may come and
give their tears. We should therefore preserve
a pure and comprehensive sympathy for our
race, as one of the most precious and
persuasive
instruments in accomplishing the true ends
of our existence. Let man, the living, actual
man, as he moves before us and around us, be
our perpetual study and one of the constant
and worthy objects of our regard. Let us also
bring ourselves in daily communion with the
generations that are past and distant. And
how can this be attained?
Fortunately we are not bound, like lower
natures, to that only which is present and
immediate. Our lives are not hedged in by
a little round of visible and present objects;
we can grasp the remote, the future, the past
that which is above and beneath us, and
far off beyond the range of sense. It is by
literature that we thus enlarge and elevate
our vision; and in no wise plan of life will
literature
be forgotten. The recorded thoughts
of men of genius will teach us to what sublime
heights the human soul may be borne in
moments
of rapture and inspiration; how
cheerful
our human nature may show itself in its
hour of genial and jovial enjoyment, and what
a divinity of sorrow it may express in its
noblest
periods of pure and gentle emotion. Here
we may see great souls wrung and touched and
wrapt away in the glorious agony of deep
feeling
and mighty thought, snatched from our
common
life and hurried from our mortal view, but
casting back a prophet's mantle of many
deathless
hues upon the earth. From these precious
legacies, left to our race by its richest
benefactors
,
we may learn what human nature has
been, what it is, and what it should be. In
them we shall discover pictures to startle, to
bless, to cheer, and kindle our nature. From
them, as from a great fountain, every faculty
may draw that which it thirsts for, and may
there be purified and strengthened.
In all moods of the soul, in every access of
sorrow, depression, and pain; in the tumult of
ambition and in the silent nook of
contemplative
life, some voice, measured to the purpose,
will speak to us from some good and precious
page. A liberal devotion to literature is,
perhaps
,
of all human means, best calculated to
expand and exalt our character, and to
preserve
its great primary elements from being
undermined and swept away in the treacherous
and noisy currents of the world.
One important lesson to be derived from books
I should not omit. They teach us by their
general temper and spirit to regard every object
with interest, and to feel that nothing about us
is beneath our attention or can not contribute to
rational enjoyment. By that magic which
belongs
to genius alone, a charm has been
imparted
to a thousand objects which in
themselves
are barren, trivial, and unprofitable; so
that what in nature has been left unfinished or
unfurnished by the Creator himself, has been
supplied by the creative and liberal hand of
gifted men. Literature has thus lent a glory to
nature herself, and has peopled her void and
desert places with her own cheerful and happy
progeny. Could we keep our souls open to the
pure impulses awakened by genius and nature
how happy would be this brief life of ours!
Could we retain the childish wonder and
sensibility
of youth, and acquire the maturity of
manhood together, how smoothly and wisely
would our days go by! This can not be. The
boy is alive to every impulse from within and
from without; no cloud passes through the sky
without its influence on his susceptible temper;
no spectacle of nature or art that does not
awaken a certain magic sense of wonder and
delight. The man hardens; his mind becomes
rigid, like his body, and all these influences fall
upon him unheeded or with faint effect. It is
only men born with a peculiar tenderness and
beauty of character, who continue through
manhood and age plastic to the various agencies
under which they pass. To preserve
something
of the boy, or at least the boy's feelings
in our haughty and proud manhood, and in our
calculating and selfish age, is given to but few
of us. This is one of the noblest arts of life;
to keep the soul open to the power of what is
great in nature, sublime in humanity, lovely in
beauty, or gentle in feeling.
To most of us this happy susceptibility of
nature soon passes away for ever, but, praised
be Heaven, there is a race of men whose duty
and privilege it is to bear on high the sacred
torch, and lend a new light to mankind by
which everything shall gain back a portion of
the freshness and lustre it possessed in our
youth.
Blessings be with them and eternal praise,
Who gave us nobler loves and nobler cares,
The Poets, who on earth have made us heirs
Of truth and pure delight by heavenly lays.
It is the prerogative of inspired natures to
present old objects to our minds as if they were
new; to make us see more in stars, streams,
mountains, than mere material objects, and to
link one majestic or lovely thing with another
bringing together the remotest and placing them
side by side to illustrate each other and thus
multiply nature itself. Thus, by a high effort
of intellect are the colors, bestowed on nature,
by youth, restored; and thus as we advance in
life, does the creation in the midst of which we
dwell, unfold new elements of happiness and
new materials on which our larger faculties
may labor.
As far as it lies within us, and within the
reach of our endeavor, we should strive to
make this fortunate temperthe most fortunate
that can belong to manour own. Let us
shut out petty cares, low passions, and unworthy
desires, and in the silence of a pure breast,
this kindly visiter may, perhaps, enter in and
bless us, and ere it depart, it may, like the
magician of the eastern story, anoint our eyes
so that we shall thenceforth behold nothing but
splendor and beauty through the earth. To
live is nothing; but to possess a great soul, an
exalted spirit of duty and affection, a noble,
cultivated, and susceptible nature, is an honor
and distinction in any man.
No system of philosophy or morals, it seems
to me, is sound and genuine which conflicts
with this liberal cultivation of the powers;
which depresses some and allows others to start
into bold and prominent relief. The general
harmony of character must be preserved or the
great commonwealth of human faculties falls
into terrible and disastrous confusion; those
which have been degraded and disfranchised
finding cruel avengers in such as have acquired
a fearful and irregular ascendency.
Many, if not all, of the gloomy troubles on
which history feeds, have had their source in
this dictatorship of single and unchecked
passions
or propensities.
Sometimes, imagination obtaining the entire
mastery, the steadfast world has, as it were
been swept from its moorings and rolled about
on a wide sea of speculation, vainly searching
for some unattainable shore of adventure, now
pressing for the holy sepulchre in the east, and
now drifting madly toward the western El
Dorado.
Again, where the strict judgment, the purely
moral powers of man have held the supremacy,
unmated with the gentler sentiments and
unrestrained
by the enlightened intellect, we have
had persecution, martyrdom, baleful fires, and
bloodshed. And when, on the other hand, the
intellectual nature has attempted this solitary
authority, disdaining counsel from the heart and
silencing the great voice of duty, mankind have
lost themselves in the frivolous discussion of
schoolmen and the pigmy literature of Della
Cruscan authors.
In connexion with this broad and ample
development
of our powers, another important
duty resting upon us all, is to select, as far as
in us lies, our own position in life; nay, I would
almost say, the very place and climate where
we shall live. Possessing a nature so
complicated
and so finely sensitive to all influences,
whether from within or from without, man
should render the same justice and grant the
same privileges to his own nature as he
bestows
on other objects of his care. For his
garden he chooses an upland, of a healthy soil,
a pleasant exposure to the sun, and a spot
where the gentle showers of summer may fall
not unblessed. His watch-towers and
observatories
he plants upon an eminence, looking
forth on a wide region of hill and valley, and
summoning by their majestic altitude, all earth
and heaven into the range of their vision.
Shall he deal less wisely and justly by his own
nature than by these? Shall he not choose for
himself a station in life, a condition of
circumstances
,
a range of outward objects which
shall exercise the happiest authority over the
nice organs of sense, and the delicate elements
of character? A man may be said to be the
result of all that be has known, seen, heard,
and felt. It is of high importance, then, that
he should see, know, feel, and hear, that which
will exert the most refined and exalted influence
over his mind, passions, and affections. We
are bound by our nature to no one condition of
action; there is not one business, one pursuit,
and one happiness provided for all men.
Humanity
is given to each of us to make of it
what we can! Lofty natures require lofty
incitements
to action. The ear that is deaf to
the soothing music of the dulcimer may be
stirred by the roll of the drum, or the clangor
of the trumpet. The sky may be the holiest
spectacle to one, and the fair earth awaken the
dearest solicitude of the other. To every man
there is a class of objects, associations, sights
and sounds, that speak to him with peculiar
force and agency.
Hard and stern realities are the best nurse
of some natures, while others grow and expand
in an atmosphere filled with the soft radiance
of poetic light, and peopled by fancy with
innumerable
images of splendor and renown.
One pursues fame, and in fame finds his best
reward and true felicityall his powers brought
into action, his whole being arousedthe
audience
and occasion such as suit the temper of
the man. Another in some secluded nook passes
his days happy in peaceful labors and slumbers
unbroken by dream, vision, or hope. One
character shows to best advantage in the
broad blaze of noon; another, in the milder
splendor of morning; and a third, in a
glimmering
twilight, half way between fame and
obscurity.
There are great influences, too, of city and
of country which sweep over large masses of
men. In a mighty metropolis a man's nature
is fed and excited from a thousand sources. It
is stimulated to action by the loud roar of the
multitude; it is kindled into enthusiasm by the
daily sight of a thousand faces; an inquisition
is fixed upon it from a thousand eyes. Bad
passions can not go long here without a
prompter
;
nor benevolent purposes long without an
object. He stands amid the clash of a Babel,
and a perpetual tumult is stirred within his
breast in which new and newly compounded
motives of action are daily springing up. Noth
ing is done simply as if he stood alone in the
view of Heaven. Then, with an observant
eye, what crowds of strange and curious images
are engendered in the brain by this swift and
varied phantasmagoria of life! Transitions
from fortune to famine; great men toppled
down from their elevation, and little men raised
on a pedestal as if they were gods. Here he
can laugh at one moment and weep at the
next. In the train of sunbright fashion and
beauty, dark sorrow walks as a mourner, and
every man's shadow is but a gloomy monitor of
distress. The picture of life is made up of
startling contrasts; gloom of more than
midnight
darknessjoy of more than meridian
splendor. Here ambition stalks forth and
assumes
a kingly post, and the next moment
occupies
a coffin. This is a wonderful school of
human nature, but is it alone the wisest and
best? I think not; but if it be, and our duty
assign us a station here, let us not forget the
cheerful regions that lie beyond. From the
noise and madness, let the wise man steal forth
at times to other scenes where nature sits alone,
and where he may learn some lessons from her
unpurchased and incorruptible voice.
Among the healthiest influences that can be
brought to bear upon his nature, let him visit
the green fields often! No unwise thoughtno
dark passion rises from the pure bosom of the
earth. There he will have happy meditations,
prosperous periods of thought, and, if his
childhood have been familiar with the scene,
thronging recollections that will swell his heart
and overflow at his eyes in tears of passionate
delight. Let him see the green fields often!
for there he will walk with angelic quiet,
serene
contemplation, and when he returns, if
return
he must, to the crowded and raging city,
these sweet companions will champion him
back, and crossing, perchance, the noisy bounds
will be content to dwell with him awhile and
cheer his heart in the intervals and calm hours
of strife and gain. Let him visit the green
fields often! there he will renew his youth and
acquire a fresh and cheerful spirit that shall be
better to him in his old age than rank, wealth,
or worldly honor.
Let other influences be sought and cherished
as they adapt themselves to the requirements
of each man's nature. If the ocean move him
with a special power, let him visit the ocean
and feel its greatness. Let his mind heave and
expand with the heaving mountain wave,
stretching far onward into the dark distance
and the darker future. If the thunder of the
cataract utter a more audible voice to him, let
him stand by its side while his nature wrestles
and grows strong in the embrace of the great
God of waters. Or if, on the other hand, in
the thronged assemblies of men his soul is
more deeply moved, and the inspiration of high
purposes breathed more fully upon him, let
him seek their companionship and school
himself
amid the multitudinous tumult. These are
higher and worthier objects than fortune,
conquest
,
victory in great battles, or triumph in
the loud senate of nations.
Another great consideration I would urge as
an important aid in attaining the true aims of
life: namely a devout and generous love of
our native land. A sincere and earnest
attachment
to the land of our birth, is calculated to
awaken the whole soul into healthy action; to
appeal to us by a thousand silent sympathies,
and by casting a charm around the scene in
which we dwell, impart to our nature a genial
excitement under which its best powers are
exerted. To love our country is to love life, and
to strive to make that life happy by lending a
romantic interest to the spot in which it is cast.
Our country, if we truly love it, evokes our
feelings, our judgment, our imagination, and
solicits these, by an unseen persuasion, to
employ
themselves in adorning and exalting the
object of their regard, and in contributing to
its well-being with all the strength and
capacity
they possess. Where that country is a
sublime
and noble one, and her external aspect
grand and lovely, we should endeavor to make
ourselves worthy of it, and to show that the
human spirit can be no less great and generous
than the outward objects with which it copes.
Who has not felt, at some period or other of
his life, an ardent wish, a burning desire, to
link himself in some way or other, with the
destinies of his country, to live in his land's
language, and to leave some memorial behind
him in which his country should have a claim?
Who knows not some little spot, some humble
stream, which is nearer to his heart because it
belongs to the land of his birth, the bower of
his boyhood, the shelter and solace of his
declining
years?
By some, patriotism, or love of country, is
regarded as an airy bubble, raised by cunning
statesmen to dazzle and bewilder the multitude.
They speak of it as if there were in reality no
such thing as a genuine and honest attachment
to one's country. Is there, then, no solid
foundation in the constitution of our nature on
which to build such an affection? Are there
no claims that plead in the heart for such a
love? Here we first saw the morning light;
here we drank in the first breath of the pure
air. From its bosom we first beheld the glad
spectacles which cheer and illumine our life.
The first rainbow that we ever looked on
spanned our native land; the first sunset,
whose splendors made our young hearts dance
with joy, was kindled on the horizon of
our country. It is here that we have first
known spring-time and autumn, and the genial
round of seasons. Here we saw the first
odorous flower; and here we first beheld the
distant hill-tops and the broad green wood
tinged with the glory of the sun. From this
chosen scene of our existence we first looked
abroad on the starry miracle of a sustained
and balanced universe. Here dawned upon
our minds our earliest conceptions of duty,
justice, kindred, and fellowship with man.
Here we first felt the warm embrace of a
mother's love and the first pressure of a
friendly
hand. It is here we have shed our first
tears, and felt all the tender emotions that
spring up over the grave of those we have
loved. Here, in a word, we first had life; and
here, in the dispensations of sovereign power,
we shall lay it down. Should not the spot of all
these gentle and affecting associations be dear to
us? Should it be as common earth? We do no
wrong to our nature by a devout and earnest
love of the land in which we live, but rather
render it an acceptable scrvice and aid its
powers in their development by all the impulses
of hope, reason, and affection, that grow from
such a love.
Another important and genuine aim of life
is to regulate the action of our own mind and
character on the mind and character of others.
The influence of man on man can not be
measured. Human nature is so full of startling
echoes and reflections, that a voice can
scarcely
be raised or a light held up in any corner of
the earth without creating everywhere a
thousand
responses, and returning the original
image in innumerable colors of surprise,
indignation
,
horror, and joy. In a narrower circle
mind acts upon mind with fearful force. Lured
on by the mutual voice of man, human beings
have reached their highest fortune or have been
plunged into utter and abject misery.
Sustained
by the generous homage of a few wise and
steadfast friends, one of the great masters of
our age has toiled for half a century and is
now hailed a poet by the general acclaim of the
world. By human sympathy and influence
great enterprises are pushed to a successful
issue; purposes that lurked in the breast have
been matured into large and prosperous results;
conjecture has ripened into discovery, faith
swelled to martyrdom, and out of our common
and vulgar clay an almost angelic creature been
fashioned. So vast are the operations of human
sympathy, that pure natures, by its perversion,
may be brought down to degradation and shame,
and fiendish ones, by its higher influence, be
elevated to beauty and honor.
There are auspicious moments when the soul
lies open, by some natural and imperceptible
movements of its springs, when lofty thoughts
and happy visions glide serenely into the mind,
and when we are gently disposed to receive
sweet influences and grant them a residence in
the breast. It may be in the red twilight of
summer, that the heavenly visitant is disclosed;
it descends, perchance, in the soothing August
shower, or may flow upon us with the invisible
wind that stirs the green blades of the meadow
with life. These are the golden moments when
the influence of man on man is most deeply and
happily felt. We all have these, nor should we
let them pass in ourselves or in others, without
profit. It is these moments of natural
revelation
,
if I may so call them, that can give the
brightest and truest colors to our lives. If we
could always be what we are under the
momentary
inspiration of these divine awakenings,
old Eden would be restored and man would
walk again with his Maker without fear and
without reproach. Let no such momentfor
but a few such are granted to uspass by
unheeded
or unimproved. Then is the chosen
hour to enter the bosom of our fellow-man and
leave there some durable impress of goodness,
beauty, and truth. It is the peculiar privilege
of genius and eloquence to create a condition
of mind, in many respects, kindred to this, and
to win their way to the heart and there plant
the everlasting seeds of truth in a soil thus
genially prepared for their welcome.
Contemporary and co-ordinate with this, is
the duty to sustain great truths, and the
discountenanced
advocates of great truths, in the
midst of doubt, opposition, and calumny. Into
the hands of a few chosen spirits falls,
oftentimes
,
the custody of principles vital to the
best interests of mankind. Scorned, slandered,
ridiculed, it is their generous labor to hold up
the banner of some outcast truth, and carry it
forward amid the clamors of an ignorant and
passionate multitude. A few fearless and
high-souled
men in every generation act the part of
posterity to pure and lofty opinion, and
anticipate
in themselves and by their own sagacious
hardihood, the verdict of that impartial tribunal.
Wherever, then, we see a vital truth delivered,
a noble creation of genius, a suppressed but
struggling thought that belongs to mankind,
let us bring it forth to the light, give it our
countenance and support, and fix it on an
eminence
where the world can not but behold it, and
in the end fall down in worship of its excellence
and grandeur.
Common opinions, of use to the daily
interests
of men, will find friends and patronage
in every street and marketplace; but new,
vast, and sublime creations, unfamiliar to the
vulgar mind, and startling to the trained
criticism
and judgment of the day, require that
such as are capable of comprehending them,
should form themselves into a resolute guard,
and, by union, firmness, and a high tone of
manly and vigorous daring, urge them on the
attention of the world. No great truth, no
sublime
creation, can utterly perish; but the hour
of its triumph may be held back, and a
thousand
hearts be buried in the earth, that would
have been thrilled, refined, and exalted, by the
glorious vision, had it come earlier to greet
their eyes.
How blessed a consolation would it be to us
in old ageyea, even in an old age of poverty,
sorrow, and obscuritythat we have seen in
silence
no good man trampled on, no great
principle
crushed, which we might have saved from
such dishonor; have fled from the advocacy of
no friend because he was poor; have sought
the shelter of no unrighteous error because it
was strong, and might beat off the dark shower
of malice, oppression, or popular madness;
have not fawned on brutal or vulgar pomp;
and can close our eyes on a world which has
had in us no example of time-serving, cunning
cowardice, or a prudent and considerate love of
self and selfish ends. Not to have soothed
the anguish of some broken spirit; not to have
resisted unjust aggression; to have refrained
from upholding the truth through fear, favor,
or hope of reward; to have allowed insolent
magistracy to pervert or dally with the right,
or furious multitudes to invade public
sanctuaries
or private homes; to have shrunk back
from stretching a hand to an overwhelming and
sinking fellow-being because he has sinned; to
have frowned down one honest smile in a poor
man's face, or to have wrung one tear from a
desolate woman's eye; these will be gloomy
attendants
about a death-bed; a horrible retinue
to herald us into a perilous and fearful
hereafter
;
these, these it is that make the grave dark
and terrible!
Finally, if we adopt this broad and liberal
plan of cultivating our powers and affections,
by every faculty developed, we shall expand the
circle of our enjoyments, the grasp of our
minds, and the true manliness of our characters.
Where before we crept along impaired of the
very limbs that should aid our motions, we now
assume an erect and vigorous gait, and an eye
that smiles on the varied scenes and truths of
life with an intelligent joy. We thus provide
for ourselves a wide range of objects on which
to lavish our justice, affection, our observation
and fancy, our whole passionate and thoughtful
nature. Embracing thus many topics, and
enlarging
our minds to the comprehension of a
wide range of duty and affection, we will
become
endowed with a more just judgment, a
keener insight into right and wrong, and a
general capacity for action and meditation
unknown
to us before. Many things which
seemed
distasteful and repulsive to our narrow
vision, will now start up into significancy and
beauty under the authority of some newly
developed
sense of enjoyment. All life will then
be full of meaning. The sad, the humorous,
the imaginative, will need no interpreter but the
faculty furnished by nature, to apprehend them.
From no phase of human nature, no condition
of men, can we then turn away our eyes
without
injustice to the great law written in the
soul. We will glow at the thought of heroic
daring; weep over the sorrows that afflict gentle
natures, and smile at the grotesque and comic
exhibitions of humanity in the ordinary walks
of life. We can then sit with the philosopher
in his cell, and feel a kindred rapture in the
contemplation of the starry vastness and
majesty
of the heavens, and with him weigh out
the glories and planetary masses of infinite
space. Amid the mountains we will wander
with the poet, and listening to the roar of
distant
waters, have the divine particle, the
blessed
imagination, stirred with a deep fervor with
in us. With the humbler moralist and the
shrewd observer of life, we will take our
position
in the thoroughfare and catch, with a
pleased eye, the strange humors, the cunning
dealings and actions of common men. Sky,
ocean, human faces, human thoughts, the
fortunes
of rich and poor, God's anger in the
storm and earthquake, man's lesser rage in
battle and revenge, ambition, love, the finer
and coarser passions of the soul, our destiny
here and hereafter, will pass under the
cognizance
of this organized and balanced intellect,
and each will have its due place accorded to it.
All objects, in such a mind, will attain their
just position, have their peculiar influence, and
be permitted to co-operate together in building
up that noblest of earthly existences, a human
soul. An exquisite harmony will pervade our
life and character. Every passion will enjoy
its due growth and enlargement; every faculty
move in conjunction with its kindred powers,
and none in this well-ordered assemblage, will
venture to usurp an unnatural and unwise
supremacy. The human spirit will then stoop
under no despotism, whether of lawless
imagination
,
harsh reason, or benighted conscience.
The world will not then assume to the eye a
level and repulsive smoothness, clothed in a
single and sombre hue, but will be disclosed in
varied shapes, hills, valleys, ample plains, and
be tinged with a thousand happy and cheerful
colors. Our life will not be single but a
hundred
fold; every object will have many true and
just interpretations, which shall gather around
it like rays, and constitute the brightness and
effulgence of truth whose whole countenance
we shall then behold, as far as men may
behold
it, turned with a full gaze upon our
own. Under this many-colored standard we
shall pursue the triumphant march of life,
while melodious sounds of many measures
cheer us on.
We shall then know how joyous a place is
this world of ours; how many sweet objects it
bears when rightly regarded. We shall then
repent that we have ever uttered one harsh
word against it, and shall weep to leave it with
its varied blessings behind. It will be a hard
thing, after all, to leave this pleasant chamber
of the earth in which we have dwelt so long.
It will be something to give up the bright sky,
and the green woods, and the blue waters, to
go and dwell with the worm. Our old familiar
friends, the forest, the mountain, and the
stream, must henceforth know us no more.
The silent shadow of the tree, the sweet voice
of the bird, and the glowing sunset, must no
longer look upon us, nor make music for our ear,
nor a cool shadow for our feet. We must yield up
the true friend and forget and forego his
embrace
.
The smile, the trust, and the tender
caress of woman must never more be our
portion
or our solace. It is true we are to be
apparelled
in glory and to put on the garments of
angels; but what can recompense us, what
height of glory, what rapture of bliss, for those
purely human joys which made a part of our
lot on earth? We would, if so permitted, bear
something of our mortality with us even to the
gate of heaven, and add it as a worthy ingre
dient to the nobler elements of celestial
happiness
.
We are now, as it were, in the vestibule
and outer court of nature;
before and above us
the solemn temple, the vast cathedral of the
universe
,
towers and broadens into immeasurable
extent. Ere we are admitted let us prepare our
hearts for this mighty habitation; let us lift up
our imaginations, purged of earthly grossness,
to the height and sanctity of that great
structure
;
so that when we enter in, our feeble and
guilty spirits may not tremble at its vastness,
nor shrink back from its holy and enduring
grandeur!
NEW ETHICS OF EATING.
[4]
[4]
Dyspepsy Forestalled and Resisted: or Lectures
on Dfet. Regimen, and Employment: delivered to the
students of Amherst College, Spring term, 1830. By
Edward Hitchcock, Professor of Chymistry and
Natural
History in that Institution. Amherst. Published by
J. S. & C. Adams, & Co.
[New York Review, Oct., 1837.]
The
world is peopled by two classes of
beings
,
which seem to be as cognate and
necessary
to each other as male and female.
Charlatans
and dupes exist by a mutual dependance.
There is a tacit understanding, that whatever
the one invents the other must believe. All
bills which the former draws, the latter comes
forward at once and honors. One is Prospero,
the other his poor slave Caliban. The
charlatan
tricks himself out in a mask, assumes a
deep, hollow voice, and struts upon the stage;
while the dupe sits gaping in the pit, and takes
every word that drops from the rogue's mouth
for gospel truth and genuine philosophy. It
would really seem as if the two parties had
entered
into a solemn compact, that wherever the
one exhibits as charlatan, the other, by an
absolute
necessity, agrees to be present as
simpleton
.
Let the rogue open shop to dispense pills,
the simpleton, as soon as he learns the fact,
hies to the place of trade, and, pouring down
his pence on the counter, takes his box of
specifics
and walks complacently away. The
knaves seem to consider the world as a rich
parisha large diocese of dunces, into which
they have an hereditary and prescriptive right
to be installed. They are never at rest until
they have some subject on which to hold forth
in public; some novel doctrine running against
the grain of the old good sense; some
antiquated
sophism dressed in a new suit, to be put
forth to surprise and startle the community, and
gather around it (as a gay adventurer) an
army of disciples. These men constantly
assume
an attitude of battle. They wage war
upon everything past, present, and to come:
Rather than fail they will decry
That which they love most tenderly:
Quarrel with minced pies, and disparage
Their best and dearest friend plum-porridge:
Fat pig and goose itself oppose,
And blaspheme custard through the nose.
General ignorance, with a smattering of
medical
knowledge; some fluency in speaking, or
readiness with the pen; great tact in
discovering
the disposition, and skill in the
management
of a certain class of persons; an air of
easy, cool impudence in public; an oracular and
self-possessed manner in private, are parts of
that beautiful mosaican apostle of dietetics.
Of such materials are framed those little men
who attempt upon the earth to rival Deity; who
assume his thunder and trident; his power to
shake the heart with fear; to regulate the
human
system; and to denounce penal fires, and
all imaginable and unimaginable tortures on the
head of rebellion. These are the cunning
plotters
who work upon weak minds through their
fancies and doubts. They give a life and
body to their fears. Such men, broken down
in health and dyspeptic, whose whole lives have
been a scene of miserable and false feelings,
engendered by a morbid condition of body,
assume
to become prophets and dispensers of
health. These ruined and ruinous horologues
would give the time o' day to the healthy world.
In every age there has existed some favorite
theory for the regeneration of the race; some
grand discovery (about to be made), which was
to be universal, ubiquitous in its influence and
success. At one time the philosopher's stone;
in the next age a short passage to the East
Indies
;
and now, in a third and less romantic
period
,
all the great objects of amelioration and
amendment are to be accomplished by the
substitution
of unbolted flour in the place of pure
wheat and solid animal food. The authors of
these miraculous discoveries believe that the
human race is to be regenerated solely through
the medium of the palate; that the channels of
access to the human head and human heart are
not, as of old, through the understanding and
the affections, but through the alimentary ducts.
Instead of winding along the shore of the
Mediterranean
and over the shoals of the Indian
ocean, they strike boldly across the Atlantic,
and find the country for which they are in search.
They take for granted that man has no
imagination
,
no heart, no nerves, no soul, nor
arteries
;
but that he is a creature
all stomach;
that
one mighty abdomen is the badge and property
of human kind; and that in it centres the
machinery
,
from it spring the movements, which
build up and overturn states and empiresthe
strong fancy which moulds itself in epics and
historiesthe gentle pathos which melts us from
the pulpit or in the elegythe fierce wrath
and energy divine which shake the stage;
all hold their court in this vast subterranean
cavern, and from it rush forth upon the world.
The first great canon of this code of living,
is, that the flesh of beasts be banished from
the table. Unholy pig, nor stupid veal, nor
silly
mutton, corpulent roast-beef, nor
presumptuous
sirloin, must appear before these chaste,
dietetic vestals. Calf, sheep, ox, fowl,
partridge
they
know them not in animated
nature
.
They have revised the edible universe,
and from it stricken these blots and monsters.
Tender-souled philanthropists! They would
know why these should not run rampant, and
fly on the earth and in the air harmless? They
are joint denizens here; fellow-citizens of ours,
are these, good friends!
These natural feeders have a touch that
makes them kin with us. Let them grow and
multiply. Let them fatten in our meadows, and
spread their pinions in our woods. Like us,
they are for an equitable division of property;
they, too, are humble agrarians; their desires
are moderate. Till your fields until the sweat
pearls upon your forehead; you need not
chaffer
with customersthey will take the crop of
grain off your hands. Gay creatures, they will
frisk and eat for you. They have made us
their stewards; if we plough and plant, they
will, most willingly, gather the increase.
The hog that ploughs not, nor obeys thy call,
Lives on the labors of this lord of all;
While man exclaims, `See all things for my use!'
`See man for mine!' replies a pampered goose.
Yes, these prodigal Pythagoreans, these
vegetable
philosophers, would give the earth up to
the undisputed possession of Messrs. Ox, Hog,
& Company. They would hand the title-deeds
over to that firm. It has, perhaps, never
entered
the heads of these anti-carnivorous
gentlemen
,
these minor omnipotents, who would
change mankind into so many
Nebuchadnezzars
and send the world to eat grass, what
disposition they would make of their fourfooted
rivals in the event of a general adoption of their
principles. We would have to turn back into
heathenism, and offer up a hecatomb to each one
of the forty thousand gods of antiquity, to reduce
the cattle-market within reasonable limits.
Man partakes
, says one of the learned
doctors
of this school,
of the nature of the animal
which he eats!
Here is a reverse system of
metempsychosis. The old doctrine was, that
the soul of a philosopher might possess the
body of a donkey; but it is an altogether
new-fangled
thing for the spirit of a Bakewell bull
or a Merino to take up its residence in the body of
a doctor of divinity, or that of a lecturer on
Hygiene
.
But so it is; and it needs but a little
disorder
of the nerves to make the imagination teem
with frightful consequences of this new faith.
Only to think of our rosy-cheeked friend, the
Englishman, who feeds on roast-beef, in the
excitement of a political argument, suddenly
protruding upon us the horns of an ox! Or
Madame Beauvais, our vivacious and agreeable
French acquaintance, getting animated into one
of the frogs she loves so well! Dear old
Piscator
,
too, who delighteth so in fishing and in
eating
fish, to imagine him jumping from the boat
and turning into one of his own favorite striped
bass! Forfend us, that we should hook up our
bosom-friend, and salt him away for a
morrow's
breakfast!
But the worst of it is, that these attenuated
apostles of bran bread and water-cresses
whose worn-out organs can assimilate no strong
meat, can not be content with feeding their own
way (which, if it be best for them, they have
our free leave to feed as they list), nor be
contented
with simply proselyting by example and
doctrine men of their own kind, but they insist
upon imposing all the pains of moral
excommunication
upon us who have healthy digestions
and cheerful spirits, unless we will follow their
examples swear by their names, and feed by
their rules.
Men must be lean, ghostlike, sepulchral
who know not flesh at their tables. With
them, to be lean is a virtue; to be fat, an
abomination
.
If you fill your garments well,
and keep a running account with your butcher,
they will have an eye on youyou are not to
be altogether trusted. Crimes, in this code,
are regulated by pounds avoirdupois.
An
adherence
to animal food
, says Hitchcock,
is no
more than a persistence in the customs of savage
life
. We are barbarians, all. Now we put it
seriously
to the disciples of this creed, whether they
can call to mind a well-authenticated case of
murder, or any act implying brutality or cruelty
of disposition, committed by a corpulent man.
A fat murderer would be a monster. The earth
could not bear him up. It is true, such a one
may be an accomplice in the second or third
degree; a rosy landlord, who holds the light,
or a stout countryman, employed to watch
under
a hedge for the approach of the victim. It is
a part of our nature, on the other hand, a
Draconic
law of our blood and being, that we should
look upon a lean man with something of
suspicion
in most cases; in many, with pity and
contempt. A corpulent man we may dislike
or detest, but in his broad, open countenance,
there is something so like candor and honest
living, that it would require much to bring us
to believe him a villain. In no case may we
despise him, or charge him reasonably with a
criminal act. It is your starvelings who fill the
calendar of the sessions. It is they who
commit
thefts, burglaries, petit larcenies, and other
contemptible small crimes. It is they who are
seen running down streets with stray pieces of
linen or pairs of pilfered Wellingtons. Who
ever heard the cry, Stop thief! raised at the
heels of a man who weighed two hundred and
upward? It would be an anomaly, a
practical
solecism, to see the hands of a constable
or sheriff's officer on the collar of a coat three
feet across the shoulders. It is your fat, solid
menmen who know the luxury of three full
mealsthat make good citizens, kind fathers,
tender husbands. These men are all fed on
beef.
According to the dietetic system, food seems
to be apportioned in an inverse ratio to the
character
and rank of the feeder. Thus, man, the
noblest creature of the earth, must fatten on
bran bread and spare vegetables; while the
horse, we suppose, is to feed on custards, and
the right worshipful donkey on blancmange and
ice-cream.
Charles Lamb, in one of his essays, has an
admirable battery of masked irony directed
against vegetable feeders. It is a short sketch,
supposed to be written by a lady (Hospita)
describing
a gluttonous visiter. What makes
his proceedings more particularly offensive at
our house is, that my husband, though out of
common politeness he is obliged to set dishes
of animal food before his visiters, yet himself
and his whole family (myself included) feed
entirely
on vegetables. We have a theory that
animal food is neither wholesome nor natural
to man; and even vegetables we refuse to eat
until they have undergone the operation of fire,
in consideration of those numberless little
living
creatures which the glass helps us to
detect
in every fibre of the plant or root before it
be dressed. On the same theory we boil our
water, which is our only drink, before we suffer
it to come to table. Our children are perfect
little Pythagoreans; it would do you good to
see them in their nursery, stuffing their dried
fruits, figs, raisins, and milk, which is the only
approach to animal food which is allowed.
They have no notion how the substance of a
creature that ever had life can become food for
another creature. A beef-steak is an absurdity
to them; a mutton-chop, a solecism in terms;
a cutlet, a word absolutely without any
meaning
;
a butcher is nonsense, except so far as it
is taken for a man who delights in blood, or a
hero. In this happy state of innocence we
have kept their minds, not allowing them to
go into the kitchen, or to hear of any
preparations
for dressing of animal food, or even to
know that such things are practised. But, as
a state of ignorance is incompatible with a
certain
age; and as my eldest girl, who is ten
years old next midsummer, must shortly be
introduced
into the world and sit at table with us,
where she will see some things which will shock
all her received notions, I have been
endeavoring
,
by little and little, to break her mind, and
prepare it for the disagreeable impressions
which must be forced upon it. The first hint
I gave her upon the subject, I could see her
recoil
from it with the same horror with which
we listen to a tale of Anthropophagism; but
she has gradually grown more reconciled to it,
in some measure, from my telling her that it
was the custom of the worldto which,
however
senseless, we must submit, so far as we
could do it with innocence, not to give offence;
and she has shown so much strength of mind
on other occasions, which I have no doubt is
owing to the calmness and serenity
superinduced
by her diet, that I am in good hopes
that when the proper season of her
debut
arrives
,
she may be brought to endure the sight
of a roasted chicken or a dish of sweetbreads,
for the first time, without fainting.
We think one of the rarest spectacles in the
world must be, what is called, a
Graham
boardinghouse
,
at about the dinner-hour. Along a
table, from which, perhaps, the too-elegant and
gorgeous luxury of a cloth is discarded (for we
have never enjoyed the felicity of an actual
vision of this kind), seated some thirty
lean-visaged
,
cadaverous disciples, eying each other
askance, their looks lit up with a certain
cannibal
spirit, which, if there were any chance of
making a full meal off each other's bones, might
perhaps break into dangerous practice. The
gentlemen resemble busts cut in chalk or white
flint; the lady-boarders (they will pardon the
allusion), mummies, preserved in saffron. At
the left hand of each stands a small tankard or
pint-tumbler of cold water, or, perchance, a
decoction
of hot water with a little milk and
sugar
(as
Professor Hitchcock justly styles it)
A harmless and salutary beverage; at the
right, a thin segment of bran bread. Stretched
on a plate in the centre lie, melancholy twins!
a pair of starveling mackerel, flanked on either
side by three or four straggling radishes, and
kept in countenance by a sorry bunch of
asparagus
,
served up without sauce. The van of
the table is led by a hollow dish, with a dozen
potatoes, rather, corpses of potatoes, in a row,
lying at the bottom.
At those tables look for no conversation, or
for conversation of the driest and dullest sort.
Small wit is begotten of spare viands. They,
however, think otherwise.
Vegetable food
,
says the sagacious Hitchcock,
tends to preserve
a delicacy of feeling, a liveliness of imagination,
and acuteness of judgment, seldom enjoyed by
those who live principally on meat
. Green peas,
cabbage, and spinach, are enrolled in a new
catalogue. They are no longer culinary and
botanicalthey take rank above that. They
are become metaphysical, and have a rare
operation
that way; they tend to preserve a
delicacy
of feeling, &c. Cauliflower is a power
of the mind; and asparagus, done tenderly, is
nothing less than a mental faculty of the first
order. Buttered parsnips are, no doubt, a
great help in education; and a course of
vegetables
,
we presume, is to be substituted at
college
in the place of the old routine of Greek
and Latin classics. The student will be
henceforth
pushed forward through his academic
studies
by rapid stages of Lima beans, parsley, and
tomato. Very goodwe like your novelties in
education. Nothing could certainly be more
original, or more happily thought of, than a
diet of greens for freshmen and sophomores,
and, you must have something expansive and
brilliant there, a regimen of sunflowers and
pumpkin for the elder classes. We like this
vastly. This is metempsychosis again. The
soul of Socrates might take up its residence
in a stocking weaver, as the doctrine used to
stand; but now, better still, a man may go out
into the fields and cull just such a soul as he
chooses, in the same way as you select a coat
in a tailor's shop, or a glove at the hosier's.
He has a free range of faculties to draw upon.
If he finds his sympathies begin to flag from too
much use, or to soil from contact with the rude
world, let him but step into his garden and
gather a few of those vegetables which tend
to preserve a delicacy of feeling. We have
here, also, a new specific for the composition
of Shaksperes, Miltons, and Byrons. Poets are
now to be turned into the meadow, and
prepared
for the production of a tragedy or
epic, just as you fat a prize-ox or a piece of
mutton. Such feeding tends to preserve a
liveliness of imagination. Statesmen and
lawyers, who require acuteness of judgment,
will henceforward graduate on potherbs from
the kitchen-garden. Sir Walter Scott must
have been altogether at fault in the opinion
expressed
in the autobiographical fragment
prefixed
to the Life. After one or two relapses,
says he, speaking of an illness he had suffered
from, my constitution recovered the injury it
had sustained, though for several months
afterward
I was restricted to a severe vegetable
diet. And I must say, in passing, that though
I gained health under this necessary restriction,
yet it was far from being agreeable to me; and
I was afflicted, while under its influence, with a
nervousness which I never felt before nor since
.
A disposition to start upon slight alarmsa
want of decision in feeling and acting, which
has not usually been my failingan acute
sensibility
to trifling inconveniencesand an
unnecessary
apprehension of contingent
misfortunes
,
rise to memory as connected with my
vegetable diet, although they may very
possibly
have been entirely the result of the
disorder
and not of the cure. It is clear, however,
which way he leaned, although he speaks in the
most guarded language. It will be observed,
that he attributed to vegetable diet a peculiar
malady, for which the dietetic professors assert
it is a most admirable specific.
The most lamentable aspect of the system
and teachings of these apostles of improved
dietics
is that which regards its moral character
and influence. Not content with a total
revolution
of the whole world by the aid of
abstinence
and fasting, they would turn the same
engines toward heaven, and with them
impiously
,
perhaps ignorantly impious, batter down
the established muniments of gospel, morals,
and truth. Not satisfied with the operations of
their specific on mind and body, they would
incorporate
their wild fantasies in the moral code,
and place the dogma of an itinerant lecturer at
the head of the commandments. These men
have interleaved the Bible, and, scrawling their
own absurd texts and comments upon the blank
pages, put forth an improved version of the
book of God.
They would turn all the denunciations of
scripture against the single sin of inordinate
indulgence of the appetite. They would make
repletion the Anti-Christ, and prove that penal
fires and scorchings of conscience are prepared
for him who dares partake in liberal measure
of the gifts and bounties of Heaven. All things
in the two testaments are, in the misty fancies
of these fanatical dreamers, typical of
intemperance
in eating.
Thus, in the book of Numbers, occurs the
following passage:
So they did eat and were
U
filled, for he gave them their own desire; they
were not estranged from their lust; but while their
meat was yet in their mouths, the wrath of God
came upon them, and slew the fattest of them, and
smote down the chosen men of Israel
. Here,
according
to the dietists, is a vigorous argument
against corpulency and animal food. On the
surface it seems so; and as the philosophical
dogmatists to whom we refer, abhor the labor
of diving, we suppose they are very well
pleased
with such deduction. Because they were
slain while the meat was yet in their mouths,
a judgment is pronounced, they believe, against
animal food. This, therefore, is an argument
for vegetable diet. But, by turning to a verse
in the same chapter, which precedes the one
we have quoted, the learned pundits will
discover
that the Israelitish appetite was as keen
for vegetable as animal diet; so that the
denunciation
was directed as strongly against the
one as the other. Who shall give us flesh to
eat? We remember the fish which we did eat
in Egypt freely!
the cucumbers, and the melons,
and the lecks, and the onions, and the garlic
.
Here is not only fish and flesh, but as select and
delicate a regimen of greens as one could wish.
But the fattest were slain. That is very
true, and it seems to us (no very profound
biblical
critics) that they were particularly
smitten
because they repined against the manna
which had been, to them at least, most healthy
and invigorating sustenance. But with our
new apostles it is no matter. They were
punished
for rebellious murmuring, while their
mouths were filled with fleshtherefore,
flesh-eating
is sinful; not merely eating too much
of whatever it be, nor even intemperate
flesh-eating
but
any, the least degree of flesh-eating
whatever.
Not only (if they are to be believed) is
Grahamism
the great burden of the Scripture, but
it is to be the great auxiliary in spreading
Christianity over the earth. The fiend
infidelity
is to be put out of the way by nothing less
than spare diet and a course of vegetables.
This demon, says Hitchcock, the erudite
founder of the dietetic college, can not be
successfully
met and encountered by the puny arm
and shrinking sensibility of dyspepsy. It needs
the resolution, the assured faith, and the
energetic
action of our pilgrim fathers. And then
again, what but the strong arm, and the
resolute
courage, and unwavering faith, of men
sustained
by
EUPEPSY
as well as the grace of God
,
can urge forward, into the dark and untrodden
fields of spiritual death, the mighty wheels of
benevolence that are in motion?
Sustained by
eupepsy
AS WELL
as the grace of God!
This is
good; it is admirable; a flight not contemptible
at least as high as the
fifth
heaven of
invention
.
Have couragehe will be shortly in the
seventh! Rising on the wing, toward the region
we have indicated, he bursts out in the full
fervor
of Grahamism:
They were eupeptics who
carried the gospel over the east, in primitive times.
They were eupeptics who, in modern times, have
successfully engaged in the same work;
AND
THEY MUST BE EUPEPTICS WHO ARE TO BRING
ON THE MILLENIUM.
We doubt much whether there will be any
human beings extant by the arrival of the
millenium
,
if the dietetic system should be
universally
adopted. It hath a rapid operation in
translating its professors from the smoke and
stir of this dim spot. Their career on this
road to health brings them speedily in sight of
tombstones and family vaults. Pretending by
their false and base empiricism to lengthen,
they absolutely abbreviate life. There is an
amount of moral evil thus committed, which,
but for the ignorance of its apostles, should
place empirical dietetics at once on the list
with murder.
He who, in a time of scarcity, forestalls the
market, and by a monopoly of provisions stints
the people of their proper supply, is held guilty
of treason to the community, and, in some codes
of law, is subject to the penalty of death. But
the dietetic preachers would actually snatch
from the lips the very sustenance which its
possessor has in abundance, or can purchase
with ease. He perishes, deluded by the
sophisms
of pretenders, in the midst of a full
granary
.
He falls surrounded by harvests of the
richest wheat. He starves in sight of a
thousand
platters, smoking with substantial fare.
In truth, this whole system seems to be a
disguised
and ignoble attempt to establish a kind
of monkish creed in the New World. It is a
phantom of the middle ages, revived from its
slumbers, and put forth again into the waking
light to marshal under its tattered and faded
banner, retouched and repaired, all that class
of human beings who, in every age, jump at
novelties, and are willing to go out and join in
a crusade against their own health, happiness,
and peace of mind, provided it is done in
the guise of accomplishing some mighty moral
or national purpose, and provided some special
mountebank appears boldly in the van to lead
them on. In this case starvation has turned
crusader and philanthropist, and by its stalwart
strength promises to banish poverty and crime;
to annihilate acutc and chronic diseases and
nervous maladies; to clear and strengthen the
mind; to elevate and purify the morals; to
brighten and invigorate the religious affections;
and, finally, to bring about the millenium!
Health, morals, and intellect, all hang on this.
Eupepsy is the good principle, the evil one is a
mighty dyspepsy.
We may remark, in passing, that one learned
professor hints that history might be hereafter
written on dietetic principles, and gives us an
illustration of the manner in which it could be
managed, by speaking of England as
presenting
an alarming contrast between the eupep
tic days of Elizabeth and the dyspeptic times
of George the Fourth. Cooks, we suppose,
are henceforward to write the chronicles of the
times, and waiters will take charge of memoirs
and the lighter sketches of manners, morals,
and customs. We may apply to them, in
anticipation
,
the language which the learned
professor
of chymistry and natural history uses in
reference to the wonders which might be
achieved by a phalanx of eupeptic youth:
Oh,
the light and influence which they might thus send
out into the world and down to posterity, would not,
like other emanations proceeding from a centre,
spread and increase in the slow ratio of the square
of the distance and the time; but in a ratio so
high, that the quadratics of the millenium could
alone express and resolve if'!!
Certainly, one
of the most singular and mathematical
emanations
we ever read of! We think the
professor
must have (in addition to his aforesaid
duties) a small class in celestial trigonometry
under his charge.
The dietetic philosophers, whether they
intend
it or not, are practical atheists, for they
rob God of one of his essential attributes, by
supposing that he has created the animal and
vegetable world merely to prey on each other
and encumber the earth. They render it a
shrewd problem, too, to explain why man has
carnivorous teeth.
We consider this system also as the most
pernicious and abhorrent, when we look upon
it as a fanatical attempt to shut out from
mankind
certain sources of happiness and
enjoyment
,
which were clearly provided and
intended
for them in the economy of the earth. We
humbly believe that
all things
were made to be
enjoyed rationally, temperately, and with an
eye to the great Benefactor. The universe
was not only built for the eye, that man might
sit in its midst, like a child at a theatre, and
gaze on its wonderful and shifting scenes, its
strange and grand actings and decorations.
There are also other senses which in their
measure may be gratified. That is a poor
mystery
of gastronomy, which feeds the eyes and
leaves the stomach famished.
If these philosopherlings can not learn from
the constitution and history of their own
species
what is due to themselves and their kind,
let them turn to the animal creation and
gather
an example. They at least remind us of
one class of feathered bipeds. Of all the fowls
of the air, the most contemptible is a mongrel
heron, known familiarly as the
mudpoke
. The
mudpoke we take to be your best natural
disciple
of Grahamism. He feeds little, and that
little does him small good. His digestion, such
as it is, is rapid indeed, but dry.
Lean-visaged
and cadaverous, he sits upon a hard branch
or rail, and looking heaven in the face, with a
pharasaical expression of countenance, he drawls
a short denunciation in loud treble, against
high livers and good feeders. His skin hangs
about his bones like a coat ill-cut. He keeps
good hours, it is trueis never out late at night,
like the nightingaleis never found at a
merrymaking
,
nor high in the air, at morn, with the
lark, singing out his gratitude to the Giver of
all good. He feeds solitary on crusts and
scraps; drinks but little, and that of the stalest
puddle; and is, in fact, a Graham in feathers;
a deliverer of dry lectures, from sapless tree
tops; and his only fault is that
his
digestion is
a trifle too lively.
Those who have advocated in public the
spare system of diet, have generally been men
who have made a previous pilgrimage through
the catalogue of maladies, and who, therefore,
assume to be the most profoundly skilled in the
prescriptions necessary for each. From having
suffered much themselves, they believe they
have an equitable privilege to make others
suffer
in a like degree. They become skilled in
the gnostics of every complaint, and by a
sweeping
specific, purge the materia medica of every
malady save that with which they, as patients,
had been afflicted. Now, of all sorts of
tampering
,
we think tampering with the human
system is the most abominable and pernicious.
There is a class of sciolists, and those of whom
we have spoken belong to it, who believe that
all kinds of experiments are to be ventured
upon
the human constitution; that it is to be
hoisted by pulleys and depressed by weights;
pushed forward by rotary principles, and pulled
back by stop-springs and regulators. They
have finally succeeded in looking upon the
human
frame, much as a neighboring alliance of
stronger powers regards a petty state which is
doing well in the world and is ambitious of
rising in it. It must be kept under. It must
be fettered by treaties and protocols without
number. This river it must not cross; at the
foot of that mountain it must pause. An
attempt
to include yonder forest in its territories
would awaken the wrath of its powerful
superiors
,
and they would crush it instantly. Or the
body is treated somewhat as a small-spirited
carter treats his horse; it must be kept on a
handful of oats and made to do a full day's
work. Famine has become custodian of the
key which unlocks the gate to health, to
knowledge
,
to religious improvement, and the
millenium
!
Unless checked, this wild fanaticism will
sweep through the land, overthrowing every
social comfort, every physical enjoyment,
every
pleasure that springs from sense and refers
to sense. Indulgence in the common luxuries
of air and water, will be soon set down in the
index expurgatorial as a crime; and
punishments
and penalties be attached to every
gradation
of bodily comfort. To feel the pulse
throb with joy, or the cheek glow with delight,
or the heart beat under the genial influence of
springtime or autumn; in fine, to yield in any
way to the generous and universal emotions of
humanity, will next be deemed a damnable
heresy
and perversion of our moral faculties. The
adventurous champions of this dietetical
Quixotism
,
would ride through the country armed
capa-pie
with argument and denunciation, and,
like the Moss-troopers of the Scottish border,
snatch from the peasant's pot his haunch of
mutton or round of beef, and force him to dine
on kale and cold water.
These men know notthey have no dream
of the injury they would inflict on the poor
by depriving them of animal food, and the
little
(what seems to us, at least, little) luxury
of a healthy and savory meal. Their daily
bread is the only comfort that many of the poor
enjoy. They have no knowledge of booksno
musicno pleasant, festive companies, where
care is laughed or danced awayno concerts nor
anniversariesno resources of thought or
conversation
none
of those delicate, refined
sensations
,
which are perpetual inlets to the
thoughtful
and educatedno poetical joy in the fair
shows of nature, and at best nothing more than
a ruder sort of religion, which exhibits itself in
a simple, single, undoubting faith. Their life is
rounded with a meal. In this they are
imparadised
.
Nature has not denied to them the common
and yet sweet enjoyments of the palate. Sitting
at their rude tables, with their clean and
well-cooked
mutton or steak, they are equal to kings.
The most royal of the earth can not enthrone
themselves with a finer sense of sweetness on
golden thrones or under canopies of purple.
Who would rob the poor of such dainties?
Be not afraid! ye poor of the land. God's
bounties flow, in these regions at least, from a
perennial urn. God still walks on the hill and
in the valley, and cheers the husbandman in
his labors. Be not afraid!forward through
many years of household happiness, may ye look
for well-filled boards and hearthstones savory
with daily comforts and consolations. While
God guides your plough and gives the increase
to your honest toil, eat your bread in peace.
No fanatical visionary, no arbitrary and
self-willed
man shall rob you of these. Your own
good sense, the good sense of your friends and
countrymen, will save you from the desolation
which these wild men would bring upon you
in common with all.
The people will not hearken to their mad
appeal
.
There is an instinct above all knowledge.
Guided by that, our countrymen will scorn the
starveling philosophy of Graham, and the wild
theories of Hitchcock. Our broad meadows will
still sustain their noble herds; and still shall the
cool stream and the open sea nurture its kind to
strengthen and cheer the sons of the earth. Our
rich wheatfields shall whiten as of old, and the
pure loaf be called the staff of life, though
ignorant
and reckless men would strike it down
and bring man level with the earth and the
brute that feeds on husks and grass.
Sad and bitter consequences, God knows,
have already flowed from these false doctrines.
Alas! how many pale students, future
ornaments
and defenders of their country, if
permitted
to live; how many fair daughters; how
many mothers, blessed and blessing; how many
merchants, sagacious in business and liberal in
leisure; how many ministers of God, hallowed
oracles and voices of Heaven; how many of
the good, the great, the young, and the aged
the tender-hearted and the learned and wise,
have already fallen before the arm of this hom
icidal and accursed dogma? In pale and
sickly
troops they totter down the road to the
grave and lay themselves on the cold pillow of
their last slumber, emaciated, ghastly, the
victims
of the cunning impostor who used
imagination
as his tool, and with it undermined the
house of life. Upon their ashes we build a
monument, dedicated to temperate enjoyment
of the bounties of the air, the earth, and the
sea!
[
The
author might, in mercantile phrase, evade
legal liability on the two or three sketches
following
,
on the ground that they were produced before
he had arrived at an age when one acquires the right
to
utter paper
. As more advanced life is, however,
glad enough at times to draw upon youth and
habits then acquired, in excuse of older offences,
the author foregoes his plea, with the hope of
showing, by their reproduction, at how early a
period he had fallen upon a vein of writing which
(whether good or bad) he has since wrought
upon in one or two more elaborate works. The
trick of it was, he thinks the reader will
admit
,
in the blood, and not caught from foreign
sources.]
JEDUTHAN HOBBS.
A TRIBUTE TO THE MEMORY OF A
METROPOLITAN
BOOK-PEDLAR.
(Knickerbocker Magazine, April, 1835.)
In
his life-time Jeduthan Hobbs had never
suited himself with a dwelling-place. He was
ever flitting about, like a swallow on the wing,
from garret to garret. He has chambers now,
against which he can never more repine. A
few nails, and boards of lath, have shut out
apprehension, and care, and poverty. No
longer shall rich repasts, and the panorama of
delicate viands, move before his eye, which his
tongue may not taste. No longer shall his
gaunt form traverse the pavement of public
hostels, living on steams and odors. From the
unceremonious touch of catchpoles, henceforth,
the person of Jeduthan Hobbs is sacred.
They laid him according to his wish. He
had prayed, almost to the last hour of his life,
that Providence would grant him the farewell
privilege of selecting a spot for his grave,
which might be his ownthe first and last
cantle of proprety he should ever possess. And
at the moment when death was holding his
final parley for the surrender of his body, a
missive arrived from a deceased aunt, bearing
within a gift just sufficient to purchase the
dying man the luxury of renting independently
his last habitation.
It was chosen strangelyone lone, solitary
strip of green, imbedded in rocks. It were
vain to attempt to fathom this fancy. Perhaps
he wished to leave it as a testimonialthough
dark and difficult the interpretationthat thus
his heart had retained its freshness and verdure,
in the very midst of the rough roads and stony
circumstances of life.
His face, when living, was the very dial-plate
of hope. He lived on glorious expectation. He
breakfasted on hope, dined on hope, and was
even oftentimes forced, for the want of more
substantial food, to make his supper from the
same dish. Yet was he ever uncomplaining.
He was monarch over all futurity. No black
usurper dared intrude upon that ample realm.
He peopled it with his own subjects. They
never disobeyed his kingly authority, but ever
came at his beck. How well I remember the
last time I beheld him! He had just given
poor and lowly as he wasa cheerful volume,
to a pale, thin young man, in a faded black
coat, who had been standing at a book-stall, at
the corner of the street, filching a little mental
entertainment from a meager collection of
dingy tomes. Poor fellow! said Hobbs, he
has seen better days; but he should needs be
happy now, for I have given him a glorious
companion, and I have just read to him these
truth-speaking lines from good old Spenser.
And the kind donor set down his humble basket
upon the flags, and with a benevolent chuckle,
read thus from a thumbed, yellow-leaved
octavo
:
Ah! why doth flesh, a bubble-glass of breath,
Hunt after honor and advancement vain,
And rear a trophy for devouring Death,
With so great labor and long-lasting pain,
As if his days for ever should remain?
Sith all that in this world is great or gay,
Doth, as a vapor, vanish and decay.
Look back who list unto the former ages,
And call to count what is of them become;
Where be those high-born men, those antique
Which of all grandeur knew the perfect sum?
Where those great warriors, which did overcome
The world with conquest of their might and main,
And made one mear of the earth and of their reign?
Thus, with a fine vein of philosophy, would
Hobbs beguile penury of bitter remembrances,
and rob sharp misery of its pangs.
He would sit in his veteran arm-chair, at the
end of a long summer day, and looking through
the dusky panes of a narrow dormer window,
point to the sun melting afar over the Jersey
hillsdropping gently and softly, as a babe to
its evening slumbers. That sun, he would
exclaim, rises brighter to-morrow, because it
rises on a happier man. My friend, I am not
crack-brained nor visionary. In truth, poor
denizens like me have no right to share that
privilege of the titled and wealthy. But I do
believe there is some great blessing in store for
mesome overwhelming joythat, like wine
on the less, is but improving its flavor, by age,
for my palate.
But, Hobbs, how can you revel in such
delights
,
with these wrecks about you? How
can you, from a garret, like Moses from Pisgah,
steal such glimpses of a promised land?
Do you see, was his answer, yonder
flight of birds, fanning the rosy air around the
setting sun? Mark you how their wings are
gilded with royal gold and purple, as they bathe
themselves in the fading day-beams? So,
my friend, every thought, every imagination,
every common object and meaner sight, in
passing through my soul, is transmuted into a
precious and golden reality, that, though it
may have no existence in this world of fact,
transports me into a heaven!
What heaven? The bigot'sthe
sectarian's
?
No, friend, there can be no heaven where
dwells the bigot or the sectarian. I mean his
heaven whose tastes are refined, whose eyes
are as crystal mirrors, reflecting joyously the
Creator's little universe below, the fair scenes
of nature, and the glories of air, earth, and
sea. Such alone can live in heaven. To brute
mindsminds that have no spirit, but are all
sinew and fleshheaven would be but a `worse
hell.'
Thus have we whiled hour after hour, in
pleasant converse, pilfering many a smile from
the wrinkled face of time, and smoothing the
yet untrodden road to the inevitable
church-yard
.
The vocation of my friend was a modest
and humble one. He was a book-pedlar. He
wended from house to housea merchant of
the mindbearing in his basket and pack the
rich products of every clime in which intellect
grows and buds.
He was born with a love for books. The
first object on which his infant eyes opened,
must have been the family Bible, or a copy of
the household almanac. He delighted, as soon
as his feeble hands could lift a volume, to gaze
on its black rows of letters. When his mind
expanded, its first dawnings were spent in
marshaling
words in order, to form some little
composition. He took a kind of military
pride, in drilling the twenty-four letters of the
alphabet, in banding them into petty companies.
As he grew older he assumed his calling. It
was congenial, though lowly. He loved to
pass from dwelling to dwelling, dealing out, as
it were, delight by the handfulhanding over
whole treasures of joy, volumes of fun and
knowledge. And he himself had been at the
festival, he had partaken of the feast.
He came at length to be known, to be loved,
to be welcomed. His face broadened and
brightened into the sun of many a house; and
wherever he threw a beam, some tender flower,
or some happy sentiment would spring and
blossom. He was the sower of good seed, and
he reaped the harvest that follows it.
And thus he spent twenty years. He was
the father of the book-pedlars. Much they
honored him; and, when chance had gathered
a circle of them together, they listened with
eager ears to his tales of the elder days of their
tradehow it had begun from nothing, how, on
20
one bright summer morning, when he had risen
early and saw the milkmen and bakers busy
distributing their comforts, the thought struck
him, what a good and pleasant thing it would
be, if some kind people would thus actively
and alertly serve the aliment of mind to as
needy customershow the thought would every
morning visit his soulhow he gave it
welcome
and,
finally, how he became the pioneer
in the cause, dandling, as it were, the
profession
upon his knee, until it had arrived to its
present manhood, sending its missionaries into
every nook and corner of the heathen city.
Farewell, Hobbs! I had said more and
better
things of thee, but my pen would drop
nothing but tears. Farewell! Thou hast left
this world of book-making, book-reading, and
book-peddling, and art gone, I trust, where
angels chant poetry, and the face of thy Maker
shall be to thee, for perusal, thy brightest book!
THE LATE BEN. SMITH, LOAFER.
(Knickerbocker Magazine, July, 1835.)
I have
wept for the death of the late
Benjamin
Smith until I can weep no more, and I have
come to the conclusion to vent the superflux of
my grief in ink-drops. Ben. was a metropolitan
loafer, and a phenomenon. He was the ruling
luminary of a whole shoal of shag-tailed comets
that used to shoot madly about the terrestrial
firmament of New York. He was not a New
Yorker, though born, bred, and reared in this
town. He had a
spirit
beyond and above it. I
sometimes conjectured that he was stolen in
his infancy from Thomson's Castle of
Indolence
,
or that he was merely a transient visiter
from Rabelais' island, where industrious
sluggards
are paid sixpence ha'penny a day for
hard sleeping. As a faithful historian,
however
,
I am compelled to state, that my hero did
actually come into the world by the connivance
of Susan and Samuel Smith, loafer and loafress
of this burghnot exactly under a favorable
planetbut with the auspicious light of a
brown, sputtering tallow candle.
His education was not collegiate or
academical
.
It was obtained, most of it, in the open
air, without the superfluous expense of books,
ferules, or schoolmasters. In truth, he
considered
flagellation as a serious hinderance to
the circulation of the intellectual fluids. He
could not believe that it constituted an essential
element in education; and he often averred, in
proof of his position, that he was acquainted
with a cart-horse that had been belabored all
his life-time, and yet was as ignorant as an ass
to this day! Ben., however, had a diploma to
show, written on sheepskin, in legible
characters
,
and signed by competent authority. He
offered one day to produce it, before me, by
stripping his jacket. I excused him.
Young Benjamin Smithlike all remarkable
young menhad original views of this world.
He considered it, in the first place, as a large
dormitory, or bedroom; in the second place, as
a stupenduous cook-shop; and, in the third, as
an unbounded loafing-ground. And these views
would he defend with the pertinacity of a
congressman
.
Ask him why the wharves and
pier-heads
were constructed? Fine places to
stretch in the sun! was his answer. Why
was the court of sessions established by the
legislature? To help and further
sleeping
.
Why ministers ordained and
consecrated
?
To encourage somnolence. Why
the corporation opened fair streets, laid
sidewalks
,
labelled the corners? To point out
the shortest cut to the best loafing-grounds.
On ordinary occasions Smith was pedestrian,
but sometimes he could prevail on a crony in
the next grade of life above himself, to give him
an airing to Harlaem. These were his gala
daysthe real holydays of his heart.
Farewell
!
ye foot-pad loafers, he would exclaim,
as he mounted the vehicle, trudge ontrudge
on, and wear out your shoes! I am Christian
henceforth, and believe in Providence, in that
he has created horses! Truly, he was a
great man in his tours to Harlaem, Kingsbridge,
and parts adjacent. He would sit in his friend's
carriage, on a cross-board (for his charioteer
was generally a friendly Irishman, on a journey
for a load of dirt), and bracing his feet with a
most determined air, would grasp the reins with
a fierceness, and draw in his ghost of a steed
with a nerve that often produced an electric
titter from the lookers-on. He was irresistible.
Smith was fond of music, and whistled every
other mile all the way. He took much pride in
this accomplishment, which he had almost
cultivated
into a fine art by his assiduity. He
had carried it to such a pitch of perfection,
that he very often whistled for his dinner. He
told me when I last saw him, that he had been
trying his mouth on a piece of sentimental
music, and that it needed only one quaver and
a bar to make it complete. Alas, poor Ben.!
He is now gone. He fell the victim of an
attempt
to whistle a dull senator's speech in
Congress
.
He was heard late at night, rehearsing;
the next morning he was found lying on his
back, with his mouth wide agape, and drawn
askew by the violence of the attempt. The
result of the crowner's 'quest was, that the
deceased came to his death by a long sentence
in Senator's last harangue.
I have
forgotten thus faran omission
almost
unpardonable in a small novelistto
sketch the person and habiliments of my hero.
I will about it straight.
Benjamin Smith, then, was a tall loafer,
surmounted
with a well-woven and well-entangled
mat of hair, that proved dame nature no
indifferent
hatter. His frame was a bundle of
rods, or straight pipe-stem bones, wired
together
with small ligaments, and swinging easily in
their sockets, to and fro, as he shuffled through
the street. He was tall, nay, gigantic, in an
upward direction; a peculiarity from which he
drew the ingenious inference that if angels
ever
came from above (and here he would look
reverently up), he believed about their nighest
landing place would be his head! This
procerity
,
with his stationary habits, would have
rendered his crown a grand building spot for a
crow's nest, or the little Parnassus of a flock of
singing birds. He would have sold the
fee-simple
for a gin sling, and have never harmed
an occupant in the world.
How shall I describe his dress? 'Tis like
drawing a note for a thousand dollars, with an
empty pocket to meet it. Alas! he had no
dress; nothing that could be considered a
broad-cloth
synonym for the wordnothing that a
tailor would have dignified with the name.
The very alms-house pensioners would have
laughed at his variegated coat and
unmentionables
.
They were patches of color, and shreds
of nothing; the very ghosts of defunct
habiliments
;
indigo blue at the bottom, and red at
the top, the intervals interspersed with an
assortment
of shades. He was a walking
rainbow
,
and an observer might have thought that
he had eyes in every inch of his body, from the
spots of flesh that peeped forth from the
irregular
casements of his looped and windowed
raggedness
.
In the event of a war, in his time,
he would have been a fine mark for small shot.
Possessing these inimitable graces of person
and pantaloontogether with a large amount
of intellect, to which I have not alluded, on the
supposition that the shrewd reader would take
it for grantedI was surprised, and often
expressed
such surprise to the surviving friends
of Smith, that he never was sent to the
legislature
;
for he was one of our distinguished
high-binders, and deserved promotion and a
good office. And from the exhibition of
certain
gushes of genius, I am confident he would
not have spent a winter at the capitol, without
learning the difference between steam and
botany, and that coal-heaving and legislation
are two distinct departments of knowledge.
What
was life to Ben Smith? A mere farce,
during which pea-nuts might be munched, a
nap taken, and a little laughter indulged. Some
might have doubted whether he had a soul, or
if any, a proper-sized one. Such cavillers should
consider that the accommodations for that
ethereal
essence were not ample. There is a test
that brings out one's soul as easily and
certainly
as the knuckle elicits a spark from the
Leyden
jar, a small and inevitable event (for like
death, it comes sooner or later to all), that
shakes up and jostles out a man's spirit into
broad daylight, like a cork from a bottle, or a
bird from its nest.
He loved
. He rehearsed
his little two act pathetic comedy (for love
is made up of laughter and tears), in such
by-corners
and strange places as poverty affords.
To him and his beloved, garrets must needs
be drawing-rooms, and public streets parlors.
Cupid furnished no perfumery or purple
hangings
for my hero and his enamorata. The
courtship commenced in an alley, where the
lover saw his fond one bearing a basket of
cold victuals to a blind aunt. The attitude
was romantic, and the heart can not be always
on its guard. Subsequent interviews were had
at the pump. She stole slyly into his bosom,
and left her little miniature on his heart. It
was better framed than if in gold, and more
wisely; for those who have golden miniatures
of their mistresses, are apt to love gold better
than their mistress. Smith's chosen was a
small, dark-eyed girl, with a neck of snow, and
black tresses that lay upon it in happy contrast.
Her step was light and elastic, and her voice
bird-like, though uncultivated.
I will not insult humble love, by describing
her weather-worn and use-worn garments.
She was clothed in feeling, home-spun, indeed,
but heart-spun, as well, and worth all your
silks and jewels. They were wedded. It was
the very night before his melancholy demise,
which I would fain think I have drawn with a
just remembrance of his virtues. Poor girl!
She knew not that death's high-constable was
so near, and so soon to serve his warrant. She
would gladly have put in bail, but it was not
permitted her. Let me not open the vial of her
sorrows afresh. She is yet living, lowly, and
disconsolate.
A word touching the funeral of the departed.
His demise, for he was a
royal
ragamuffin,
spread universal sorrow through all ranks of
the loafer community. The very beggars' dogs
seemed to be afflicted and cast down, as if they
had lost a father. The hour of his burial was
fixed at four o'clock, P. M., on the day of his
death, in order that his gentlemen cronies might
be allowed good time to arise from bed, and
that they might return from the ceremony late
enough for a fashionable dinner. Supported
by two sturdy associates, his mortal remains
were escorted to a snug corner of Potter's
Fieldthe true Westminster Abbey of New
York paupers. No clergyman was present to
administer the rites of sepulture. A brother
loafer officiated, but not like an ordinary
functionary
.
With his companions, he had inspired
himself with tears at a neighboring temple of
spirits, and instead of the cold, stereotyped
tones of official sorrow, he gave out (in the
moving melting accents of poetical pauperized
pity), verse by verse, as is the manner in
methodist chapels, a talented requiem, of
which the following stanzas were all that I was
enabled to remember:
Toll, toll the watch-house bell,
Sound loud the sad conch-shell,
For Ben. is gone!
He did no harm,all's well;
A-whistling brave he fell,
His loafing's done!
Weep docks, wharves, cotton-bags?
Ben greets no more with rags
Your honored beds;
A little here he lagged
Then to his heaven Ben jagged,
And dropped his shreds!
Let me add one word of eulogy in prose.
Ben was no gentleman, for he had never pulled
any man's nose nor fought a duel; no Christian,
for he never sung psalms loudly in church, nor
disturbed a whole congregation with the
ostentatious
clink of his silver in the plate; no
merchant
,
for he was totally ignorant of that finest
of fine arts, the art of splitting one sixpence into two; no philanthropist, for he was not a
member of the society for the promotion of
self-righteousness
;
and no politician, for he had
two eyes. Neither was he a learned man, for
he could eat pudding without knowing how it
was compounded. He was simply what I
have set forth,
The late Benjamin Smith,
Loafer
.
A SERIOUS ARGUMENT
AGAINST THE USE OF CLOTHING: ADDRESSED
TO TAILORS.
(Knickerbocker Magazine, Nov., 1836.)
Some were for the utter extirpation
Of linsey-woosley in the nation.
Hudibras
.
I trust
I shall not be suspected of the
purpose
,
in this paper, of putting an insult upon
the respectable fraternity to whom it is
addressed
.
On the contrary, I have hopes, built
upon the justice of my object and the purity of
my wishes, to win them over to the view I
intend
to take, and to convince them that a
refined
and nice moral sense, as well as a lofty
and philosophical comprehension of the fitness
of things, requires at their hands an immediate
abandonment of the profession in which they
are at present engaged. I trust to be able to
prove to them that it is their duty to break in
pieces their lapboards, take down their signs,
give their iron geese the wing, and bid a long
farewell to skein and needle.
Beside the urgent necessity resting upon
them of restoring themselves, physically, to that
erect posture from which they have fallen, I
shall bring before them reasons more purely
addressed to their understanding.
It is clear, then, in the first place, that
tailors
came in with the fall. Adam, in his
primitive
condition, ennobled by the complete
development
of every power of the mind and nerve
of the bodya profounder philosopher than
Bacon
superior
(in all probability) in
imagination
to Shakspereas a musician, sweeter than
Mozart, and, in fact, as a universal
handicraftsman
,
to all the world sinceAdamwhat
was the secret, or, at least, the development
of all his power?
He went undressed!
If
I may so speak, without irreverence to the
founder of our family, he was the Great
Shirtless
.
His descendants degenerated. They were
trowsered and coated. And this was the first
sad symptom of the fall. Had not pantaloons
been introduced, there had been hope for man.
The downfall was not completethe
destruction
was not irremediablethe last chain was
not irrevocably bound upon ustill Adam drew
on his first pair of indispensables. Of
immorality
the primitive tradition reaches
As far as Adam's first green breeches.
In making up the account of our depravity, we
must halt here. Farther backward we can not
journey.
Adam, before this, might have perpetrated
the indecency of talking Dutch in the Garden;
but we have no recordsno authentic history
of that absurdity. We begin with the
surmounting
of the articles set forth in the couplet.
He drew them on, not like a modern juvenile,
with exultant eyes and eager limbs (though
they were his first suit), but with sorrowing and
tears. Through the two narrow vistas down
which his legs descended, as through the tubes
of a telescope, he saw the degradation of his
race. Bloody-visaged war and hypocritic peace,
pestilence and famine, disease and death,
peered
at him through those twin openings.
Oh! had that fatal suit never been donned,
how glorious a spectacle would this our world
present! It would have swarmed with tall and
pure intelligences only less than the angels.
But mark the consequences! Cain becomes a
butcher, and Abel a hucksterafterward, the
first a vagabond, the second a carcass.
Such were the disgraces which the first
clothing
put upon our humanity. Everyage, since the
ejectment of our first parent from his territories,
has seen their renewal. If man had remained to
this hour unclothed and unshirted, he had been
still pure and happy. But misery and dress go
together
they
are natural yokefellows.
Whenever
I see a pair of breeches I think of original sin,
and smallclothes remind me of total depravity.
A frock-coat is to me the exponent of damnation,
and a tight-bodied one the sign and token of
eternal torture.
Is it not our duty, then, to put away from us
these mementoes of our shame? to cast to the
winds these daily slaves of Philip, whose ever
business it is to babble in our ears, Thou
must die! Shall we endure these provocative
monitors? shall we put up with these woollen
impertinences?manufactured disturbers of
peace?these hangers-on?
I think not. Better visions dawn upon me.
I see the Naked Age approaching. I see the
time when tailors' bills shall be no more, or
become
mere matters of historyremembered,
only to be classed with the witches and goblins
which affrighted our ancestors.
The argument against clothing assumes, if
possible, a still more serious aspect, when
examined
in its connexion with the
dignity
of man.
It must be confessed, that all objects are pure,
in proportion as they are free from contingents
and adjuncts. The diamond only when
cleaned
from its imbedding earth exhibits its full
lustre, and the pearl shines not forth in its
clear, native whiteness, till disinterred from the
coffining oyster. Sir Isaac Newton was of
opinion that the only sorts of chaste matter on
earth were certain fine particles, or
impenetrable
finite atoms, and that all other matter
was a mere mongrel. He considered the pure
existence of atoms to be in a state of undress.
I agree with the venerable author of the pippin
(sometimes called the gravitating) philosophy.
Man is among the corruptiblethe adulterated
the impure.
There is something to me ludicrous in the
very physical structure of man. He
is
a
forked radish. It always seemed to me some
strange error or accident in his formation, that
he was divided and cleft at the bottom. It
would better fulfil my notions of symmetry, if
he were fashioned column-like and progressed
with
one
leg. By having two, it would seem as
if, in some convulsion of nature he had
split up
.
My notions of a perfect being, gentle reader
to let thee a little into some new mysteries
is (abandoning the columnar doctrine), as a
shapeless and invisible cloud, containing in
itself
the power of motion, and floating about,
guided by mere impulse. I would have it
possess
a full source of harmony, and capable of
breathing music and sweet sounds at will. It
should journey to and fro, in company with the
seasons; it should rest under the shadow of a
mountain in Greece, and melt into crimson and
golden hues in our own far west. Sometimes
it should glide noiselessly amid the flowers, the
rare and pleasant flowers of England, or over
the famed war-fields of old France. It should
possess the perfect power of metempsychosis
or transition; at one time it might cool, far up
in the ether, into all the delicious freshness of
snow, and at another dissolve in all the sweet
summer tenderness of rain.
But mark me; it should be no common cloud,
this perfect creature, this paragon, this phnix
of mine. It should bear about in the heavens
no semblance of garments. It should figure
forth to the clown or the school-boy's brain no
rude monster bedighted in fantastical apparel;
no celestial Dutchmen; no well-breeched
harlequin
;
no valorous chieftains, with black
cocked hats, made of wind, with swords of
vapor
.
No; but there, pillowed on the air, my
human cloud, my immortal fragment of ether,
my animate and beautiful substitute for man,
should sit and become intellectual with thought.
Beautiful cloud! I would I were with thee,
In thy calm way o'er land and sea;
To rest on thy unrolling skirts and look
On earth as on an open book!
By looking at your next neighbor, you will
soon see that he is no such thing as my perfect
and symmetrical being. You will not only see
that he is a little toy, moulded of clay, but that
he is also tricked out in that inhuman absurdity
styled dress. From the chin to the heels, he is
a tailor's ape. What an abasement!how
desperate
a degradation!
Man, it seems, can not be man without this
pitiful adjunct; he is a tree that blooms not
without this foliage. And yet it irks him; it
it is a bondage to him, to be cased up thus
within wooden walls. His soul lives in a double
prison; it is egg within egg; first a shell of
clay, and next an outer covering upon that of
cloth. How is it possible for orators and
divines to reach this doubly-defended nucleus?
Can a refined sentiment make its way through
broadcloth? or will a pointed thought, or fierce
denunciation pierce the solidity of a Petersham?
Man goeth about bearing his own shame as a
burden upon his back; and yet he aspires to
mate with the angels. Think you they stoop to
these appendages? That they walk the
heavenly
avenues, cultivating the cock of a hat, or
staking the happiness of their immortal natures
on the roll of a collar? No: the higher we
ascend the scale of intelligence, the less do we
find of this vain incumbrance.
Even the brute has a lesson for us here. The
horsedoes he wear aught over his leathern
jerkin? And have I not seen Sir Goat strut
forth with only his mohair cloak cast over his
shoulder, with much of native and dignified
simplicity?
Let us sift our notions nicely, then, and with
candor, and we shall speedily learn that we
have an instinct within us which preacheth
against clothing, at least against the modern
modification of that vileness.
Perhaps we may conceive, with some show
of reason, of Alcibiades promenading our
Broadway with a cane and whiskers, or the
Emperor Otho arranging his curls in faultless
mirrors; but what say you, reader, to Socrates
in the Portico philosophizing in a round-about?
or Cicero walking the Forum (forecasting an
oration against Catiline) in a pair of
top-boots
?
or Plato in nankeens? or Pythagoras
in a swallow-tail? Hercules in small-clothes?
or Homer (pauper though he was) in a dicky?
It is beyond youis it not?
Post Scriptum
.When I had laid the first
timbers, as it were of the above essay, I
mentioned
my views (such as I expected to set forth,
and have set forth here), to a bosom friend of
mine, confidentially. I think he must, in some
failing moment, have broken his trust. It
appears
the tailors have got wind of the
forthcoming
argument, and are beginning to take
steps to prevent the dissemination of its
doctrines
.
The following I take from an evening
paper:
Notice.To Tailors
.The tailors of the city of
New York are respectfully invited to attend a meeting
of the trade to be held at Jefferson House, on Monday
evening next,
when business of importance will be laid
before
them
.
The mark at which this points is palpable.
I am farther corroborated in the belief that
some movement is on foot among the Thimbles,
from the circumstance that when the other day
I was taking my customary afternoon's walk, I
was met by a tailor's journeyman, who, in the
usual hobbling style, was hurrying home with
a coat on his left arm. As I passed him, the
fellow, who by some mode or other had become
acquainted with my person, put his unemployed
hand into his 'hind pocket, and shook out his
coat-tail deliberately in my face!
SOLOMON QUIGG; EX-MEMBER OF
CONGRESS.
(Knickerbocker Magazine, April, 1837.)
On
the second step of a stoop in
Broad-way
,
sat QuiggSolomon Quigg, ex-member
of the nineteenth congress of the United
Statescasting about in his mind, like a
melancholy
heron, the means and devices for
procuring
a breakfast. While his large person
expanded
over the solid bench whereon he sat,
his ponderous chin rested on one hand, and the
other reposed in his breeches pocket; his eyes,
meantime, travelling here and there, as if in
search of something to silence the voice of
hunger.
His dress was a congress of absurditiesa
pie-bald court, to which every tailor's shop in
the city seemed to have sent its representative.
While one leg of his blue pantaloons draggled
on the ground, the other, apparently of a more
aspiring disposition, mounted to the very knee.
Half his coat was of a mixed gray, while
the other moiety was of a lively crimson.
His vest, originally the gift of a strolling
player
whom
Quigg had once patronised at
Washingtonhad been so often remodelled
and amended, that, like the constitution of a
small debating society, scarce a shred of the
original articles remained. The countenance
of Quigg had certainly been once expressive;
now, the only feature which retained a claim to
that appellative, was a bulbous nose, which
stood out from his face like the boom of a
vessel
,
with a light run out at its extremity; a
beacon
of warning to all those who sail the sea of
wine, lest one day when they dream not,
shipwreck
may befall them. The mouth, which
had doubtless in days past been bearded with
scorn, and stiff with haughty feeling, now hung
loose and agape, like an old lady's worn-out
purse. On the summit of his head rested an
ancient, bell-shaped hat, the crown of which
had partly given way, and lifted up and down,
like the lid of a pipkin, with every passing gust
of wind. It seemed to be a convenience, by
which the wearer's more devout thoughts might
find a shorter road to heaven.
At times as Quigg sat thus, with an elbow
on his knee, a tear, despite a certain effort at
self-control, would steal from the corner of his
eye, and resting for a moment on a crow-foot
wrinkle underneath it, run down his cheek
beside
,
just so as to escape his mouth, over his
chin, and fall to the ground.
His aspect expressed, to me at least, a certain
regret for the past, and doubt of the future.
Quigg the congressman was now but a ragged
gentlemana loafer. As he sat upon that cold
stone, weeping in tatters, he was,
unconsciously
,
the representative of a constituency larger
than his original political one; namely, of that
vast body known as decayed politiciansa
red-faced
,
tavern-haunting tribe; fishes who live
in an ocean of liquor, and yet are always
athirst; the cast-off leaders of parties;
demagogues
out of favor; office-holders thrust into
that direst Erebus
out-of-office
. The cushion
of state Quigg had exchanged for a more
substantial
bench in the open sunshine. No
longer
a servant of the people, he was the lacquey
of his own sweet will. Abandoning the
dresscircle
of fashionable life, where he had once
revolved a special planet, he looked upon it
from an humble corner in the pit. And yet
hunger was not so easily to be got over. It is
a creditor who takes up its mansion within
ourselves
,
and devours our very seat of life, till it
be paid the uttermost farthing. Quigg was in
a perplexity.
The
room into which Solomon Quigg was
ushered that nightwhen he had passed
triumphantly through the Marengo, the
Austerlitz
,
and the Waterloo of the daybreakfast,
dinner, and supperwas an upper chamber of
an old tavern in the second ward of our
metropolis
.
The tavern had once been the
head-quarters
of a dominant political party. At a
glance, Quigg read its history. On one side,
the remnant of candle which he held in his
hand gleamed on the dusty fragment of a flag
which had erst waved proudly, illumined with
the national stars and stripes. This was rolled
up, and on it, as a pillow, Quigg laid his
unkempt
head. Near his right hand, on the floor,
reposed a broken fiddle, which had once given
forth cheering music to the freemen of the
second ward. Against the instrument, reclined
the relics of a tin-pan, half through the bottom
of which was thrust a mouldering drum-stick,
which in its better days had summoned from the
cold metal sounds that stirred many a voter's
bosom, and filled many an urchin heart with
keen delight. In different corners of the
humble attic, hung from pegs and nails, flags,
banners, ensigns, and devices of a thousand
kinds, setting forth, in monstrous capitals the
virtues and qualifications of favorite candidates.
Butand this struck the somnolent eyes of
Quigg with most forceon the corner of one
of the tattered banners were the figures 18;
the very year in which Quigg himself had been
elected, after a fierce struggle, to the American
Congress. As he stretched himself for sleep,
his hand by some mischance, struck against a
modest pine box, which stood perched just over
his head; it came to the floor, and from its
bowels rolled forth a heap of dusty papers,
folded like doctors' prescriptions. He seized
one of them, and on it found:
For Congress
.
SOLOMON QUIGG.
Here was a theme for thought. Quigg now
lay, as it were, before a wizard glass, over
which passed in gloomy procession the
achievements
,
the glories, and the triumphs, of his
past life. In contrast with that bright
langsyne
,
he felt the double bitterness of his
present
condition. His soul began to stir afresh,
and to feel the throbbings of a revived ambition.
A thousand plans and enterprises crowded his
brain, and all that night he lay restless;
meditating
high schemes, and devising new ladders,
in this his Jacob's vision, by which to reach
the heaven of his desire. Quigg was once
more an ambitious man.
On
the bosom of the East river, cabled to
the wharf, floated a light sloop, with its deck
carefully scrubbed down, and its red flag
floating
gayly in the wind. Gently upon the water
lay its cool image. From its anchorage to the
wharf its tall mast reached, and tipped with
its wavy shadow the countenance of a quiet
idler, whose head rested on a decayed pile,
while his feet hung carelessly over the wharf's
end. On board the graceful vessel, extended
flounderwise, with his twinkling eyes peering
at the water over the sloop's stern, was stretched
Solomon Quigg. A group of blue-fish had
gathered
just before him. Perhaps they expected a
congressional effort. Ever and anon, Quigg
would cast an eye toward the shore, as if
in momentary expectation of the arrival of
some personage or the turning-up of some
matter of importance. About the time when
the guard on board a man-of-war's man, which
lay anchored in the middle of the stream, had
sounded the three o'clock bell, a group of
vagabond
and listless persons began to gather
before
the vessel on whose deck Quigg reposed.
Rapidly, dozen by dozen, their numbers
increased
.
Every moment the collection became
more extended and more motley. Stevedores,
wharfingers, a stray customhouse officerold
gentlemen who had come to the neighboring
market for fishall aided in completing the
human assortment.
Precisely at five, Quigg arose from his
recumbent
posture, ascended the rigging to the
maintop
,
there took his stand, turned toward his
auditory
,
took off his bell-shaped hat, cast it on
the deck, and made a low and solemn bow,
which was received by the vast congregation
with nine cheers. He then addressed them in
a short speech, something in his old style of
eloquence.
He could not resist the temptation of so high
a pulpit. It was better, in that respect, than
the floor of the house; it gave him a more
commanding
view of his audience. He closed his
harangue with a touching allusion to the
difficulty
of obtaining a subsistence, and the
brevity
of lifeand leaped! Through the air, like
an arrow, Quigg descended to the water. His
head cleaved its glassy surface; the lookers-on
beheld his descending form, as, for an instant,
his white feet glimmered above the river and
then disappeared. Five minutes elapsed, and
Quigg arose not. The crowd thought this a
special feat, and gave three cheers. Five
minutes
more passed, and yet Quigg reascended not
to the light. The feat was miraculous; the
assemblage burst into three cheers again,
heartier
and more protracted than ever. A few
philosophers
among the audience began now to doubt
the reappearance of the aquatic diverthe
performance
was too good to be fictitious.
Another
five minutes elapsed; an idle friend of
Quigg's stepped out from the rabble and began
to whimper.
The sun went down, and Solomon Quigg
arose not. He had made his last dive. The
river was searched, but no mortal relic
discovered
.
In the soft river-mud he had found a
ready coffin. In its liquid embraces slept for
ever the person of Solomon Quigg, ex-member of
the nineteenth congress of the United States.
THE UBIQUITOUS NEGRO.
(American Monthly Magazine, Jan., 1838.)
I have
noticed, any time these last ten years,
a singular-looking creaturesome would call
him goblinprowling about the purlieus of
Theatre alley. This is his place of most
frequent
resort, but by no means his only one. In
this region he has established his ordinary
domicil
.
In the dark hall that stretches in the rear
of the Park theatre he stalks most at home, in
a sort of grim, epic grandeur, as if he held that
region as his own. Bell's printing office, or
some kindred place in the neighborhood, is his
castle, the rest of New York his parks and
pleasure-grounds. This very negro seems to
be ubiquitous. Go whithersoever you will,
Rumbout is there. He mingles with every
festivity
,
and makes himself an element in every
kind of business or pleasure that goes on in
this great city. Carry yourself with the utmost
speed to any part of the metropolis, there, in
some shape or other, will turn up this African
Ubiquity. Stroll, ride, fish, walk, sail, he
presents
himself as naturally, and in as good
keeping
with the scenery you may be amid as the sky
itself, or the grass, the water, or the pavement.
You are in Castle garden to see the
balloon
ascend; there is a vast crowd,
innumerable
faces, colors of dress, shapes of hat, canes,
children, dogs, &c.; and yet you feel that the
group is not complete, and that something is
wanting to the perfect success of the aeronaut;
and, just as he is about to slip himself loose
from the earth, your unsatisfied eye falls on
Rumbout, tugging at one of the cords, with his
hands entangled, on the eve of ascending as a
sort of unwilling plummet at the end of the
rope to steady the air-ship. A happy voyage to
thee, Rumbout; and be not the fate of Cocking
thine!
Again, you are at the Parade ground, in the
extreme northern quarter of the city. Before
you flash the gaudy coats, gay plumes,
glittering
sabres of officers and privates; the mimic
machinery of battle moves with admirable
precision
in admirable time. A certain solemnity
hangs like a cloud over the place, as it might in
actual engagement, when Death rides out on
his white horse, distributing his darts on either
side. Suddenly a mirthful roar shakes the field.
You thrust through to learn the cause, and
behold
!
the omnipresent Rumbout's arms
dexterously
pinioned together behind by the bayonet
of the guard. He looks like a roasted fowl
brought to the table with his arms reversed.
He had attempted, with his naturally eager and
inquisitive spirit, to get a nearer insight into
the mysteries of warfare, and this is the result.
Chatham square is a singular localitya
most ancient and fishlike place. Any time in
the day before two in the afternoon, you will
see there as motley crowds as may be brought
together in Christendom. As every one knows,
it is the vendue of infirm furniture, disabled
chairs, superannuated stoves, decayed
bedsteads
,
neckless bottles, pots without legs,
frameless looking-giasses, shirts without
owners
,
owners without shirts. Finer voices, in
some of the ordinary keys, you will nowhere
find than belong to the eloquent auctioneers of
the square. There is one, I know, hath the
voice of a clarion; it stirs the spirit to its very
depths, and is like a sudden call to battle. In
a clear noon, when the wind is laid and he lifts
it up: How much! gentlemen, how much!
how much for this small piece of spotted
calico
;
gentlemen and ladies, how much! the
neighboring buildings shake to their base with
the sound, the hackmen pause and listen;
Catharine
street, with its living tides, is silent, and
the cartmen are astounded in their frocks. If
there is any spare coin lurking in any secret
corner of the pocket of any human being
within
reach of his lungs, it will be tolled from its
hidden residence by this magician's spell.
And among the buyers there is at times a voice
to be heard scarcely inferior to his. A watch
is up for sale; or, rather, I should say, that
which was the coffin once of the living works,
the vital parts of a chronometer; a huge, mon
strous, unformed shape of metal. Whether tin
or silver be the main ingredient in its
composition
,
is not to be decided rashly. A sweet,
fluent
voice in the throng, however, assumes the
decision; Threepence per pound without the
works, three and a half with! It is the
bugle
voice of our friend Rumbout.
I have been out in many snowstorms, and
always met Rumbout running hither and
thither
,
half bent, with his hands in his pocket or a
snow-shovel on his shoulder, looking for a
small job. It always excites odd feelings
in me to see a negro in a snowstorm.
Innumerable
strange and jostling contrasts bustle
into my brain, and make themselves busy in
framing a many-colored web of humorous
association
.
The absurdity is so bold between the
pitch-black animalcul moving about on the
surface, and the white masses piling themselves
around him on every side, and pressing upon
him from above; as if the heavens would
smother him to death with his oppositea
horrid
mummy, wrapped in winding-sheet wide
as creation. Foul blot on the page of nature.
Death's-head in the midst of gay bells and
merry
shows. Black swan on the clear stream of
Sterchio, dimming its pellucid waters. Goblin,
dungeon-intruder into the heaps of half-molten
silver (as are these brilliant snowheaps),
stealing
upon them like a dark-visaged thief flushed
with the hope of plunder. It seems as if the
earth should gape and swallow up this
inconsistency
this
living foe to her fairness and
whiteness; yet Rumbout hobbles along,
knowing
and dreaming none of these things. My
vein in this sketch is episode on episode.
I love, in a clear summer afternoon, to glide
up the East river in a light boat, and, dropping
anchor near the classic regions of Hurlgate,
partake the pleasant and contemplative joys of
angling. Many such sunny hours have I spent,
leaning over the boat's side, pretending to be
on the watch for the finny prey, but, in truth,
deep in a meditation on some bygone scene, or
building up fairy palaces from the ooze below,
and peopling them with fishlike nymphs, in
half dresseswater-colored silkswith pretty
round faces, and a train to their garments as
long as a queen's. And every time that I have
thus occupied my fancy, about the middle of
my revery I have heard the careful dash of an
oar, the gentle dropping of a line in water, and
looking up, have immediately beheld
Rumbout
the ubiquitous.
He is never out of place. In crowds, look
for Rumbout. Of processions, shows,
wassailings
,
riots (in an innocent way), feastings,
fastings
,
mobs, multitudes, he is a natural
constituent
.
He has a face that becomes all these
things, and, like the painter who wrought a
hand, in which he was skilful, prominently
into
all his pictures, so Rumbout works in his
picturesque visnomy upon the ground of these
numberless exhibitions and diversions. I doubt
much whether a street-organ ever sounded in
our goodly city out of hearing of Rumbout. He
listens afar off, and soon hies to the spot. No
band of musicians ever played in our
thorough-fares
if Rumbout were missing. He is the
man that forms friendships with the drummer's
boy, and takes liberties with the third
flute-player
!
It is he that asked the captain of the
Flying guards, how much he paid a yard for
the flannel in his coat?meaning his red
uniform
.
No presence, however imposingno
authority, however grave or dignified, can
awe down the spirit of the immortal negro. He
has bearded the recorder in two petty larceny
suits; and has threatened Mr. Hays (the
ancient
Hays) with a drubbing! Omnipresent,
Rumbout seems also to be immortal. He has
been called Old Rumbout, I have been
informed
,
since the year 1800. He is Apollo
ever young. He has never looked younger
than at present; he will never look older. The
principles of life and youth seem to be rooted
down deep in the constitution of Rumbout.
These plants seem to flourish best in that rich,
black mould. Time can not pluck them up. He
appears to have known but one season of life.
Surly winter, sad autumn, capricious spring,
have not visited him.
He is an incarnation and creature of the
golden summer; gay with lowering clouds that
seem more than they mean, prodigal, content,
with fruit and blossom mingled; for Rumbout
has never seen want yet. Like the great sun,
in his favored season that we have spoken of,
he
works leisurely, making a long circuit in his
laborsslowly, pleasantly, from the morning
to the eve. I think Rumbout was educated a
rag-gatherer. He goes through his vocation
more as if it were an elegant recreation than a
gainful mode of life. To appropriate the
language
of the studio, there is a delicacy in his
touch, a mellowness and freedom in his style of
handling, and a picturesqueness in his grouping,
that render Rumbout the Raphael of his craft.
END OF MISCELLANIES.SELECTIONS FROM ARCTURUS.
[
Eighteen
numbers of
Arcturus
the monthly
magazine from which these selections are made
were published in 1840, '1, '2, under the direction of
the present author and Mr.
Evert A. Duyckinck
.
The author avails himself of thisthe earliest
opportunity
that has offeredto acknowledge the
advantage
its conduct derived from the genial and
graceful pen of this gentleman, suited so well to
shed through the pages of a periodical a kindly
light, and to make each corner glow with a
sentiment
dropped fresh from a fancy well-instructed.
Other and acceptable aid was furnished in various
essays by Mr.
William A. Jones
, truthful, acute,
and vigorous, and equal, in the writer's humble
judgment, to the best of their kind, at that time
published in the United States. With Mr.
Auld
(little, but worthy to be greatly, known), unrolling
month by month, an old, quaint tapestry, wrought
with figures Rabelaisian and devices of the age of
Secundus; and Mr. J. M.
Vancott
, a rising man
at the bar of New York, coming in at the close, in
a compact and well-ordered argument, the author
would have leftas these were the mainstays and
props of the undertakingbut few tributes to pay.
Others stole upon its pages by degrees, in no
unacceptable
whisperings or utterances, but these were
its key-notes, heard oftenest and not ungratefully
by its readers. Their services were at least
successful
it
is well known--in awakening an answer
to their thoughts in many places, and in calling
forth the favor of the general press of the country.]
July
15, 1843.
POLITICAL LIFE.
The
American is called to play his part,
whether it be cast in the higher or lower
walks of life, amid many novelties of incident,
situation, and emotion. It is true that as far
as costume and many of the lesser appliances
of character are concerned, he adjusts himself
in an antique mirror, and is guided in the mere
language of his part by the prompting-book of
fashions and habits long in use and borrowed
from abroad. At a distance he hears the
conflict
of many kingdomsthe tumult of great
masses of men striving together in ancient
combinations
,
and around him lie the wrecks of a
world of humanity that has passed or is swiftly
passing away. As far, however, as the inner life
of the man is concerned, the fountains from which
he draws his inspiration are fresh and new. The
sky above him is a new sky, the earth beneath
him is a new earth, and the living influences
and life-guiding institutions about him are new
institutions and new influences. With him,
custom hath lost its sway, and time and change
are the champions against the field. His life is
not
rounded with a sleep, but whirls
perpetually
through great diversities of accident
and circumstance.
Humanity is here thrown back, as it were,
upon its original elements, and is constrained to
work out its destiny by native hardihood and
internal
force alone. Like the rivers of the land,
its course, it seems to us, is through scenes of
more than ordinary grandeur and beauty;
mountain elevations, illimitable plains, and
valleys quiet and serene. If it chooses,
however
,
perversely to abandon the track of nature,
and to seek channels of its own through baser
soilsso be it, and with the workman rest the
wages of his folly.
Along the way are scattered indications of
his progress, and far onward we see steadily
advancing
messengers that bear tidings of the
times that are at hand. Temporary in part, in
part constant and abiding, are the signs that
meet our eyes as we look abroad on the daily
life, the growing customs, and the expanding
character of the American people. Some of
these shall pass away, because they are of the
time, and some shall remain, durable as truth,
because they are anchored in the permanent
soul of man. From an inspection of the first,
we shall gather amusement suited to the hour;
from the more serious scrutiny of the last, we
shall derive grave omens of the chances that
await the generations yet to be.
Whether the aspects of Political Life, as it
now unfolds itself in our Republic, in stations
high and low, on fields broad and narrow, are
to be held as belonging to the first or second of
these classes, might be matter of question.
With us they assume a double complexion; at
times full of dignity and a certain naked and
Roman simplicity; at others broadening into all
that we can conceive of the ludicrous and
grotesque
.
A noble senator standing on the
platform
of the nation in the honest performance
of duty is to us an emblem of whatever is
manly
and imposing; a congress of three hundred
deliberating on grand questions of polity, on the
armed defences of the country, on the
commerce
that has wings in every quarter of
the earth, are in such moments the imbodied
power, the living personation of twenty-six
sovereign empires. Here we breathe the
inspiring
air of Alps and Allegany; we are in
the high places of the earth. But if, on the
other hand, we enter the public room of a city
ward, and discover a worthy individual, some
forty years of age, bowed double with
congratulations
as he makes progress through the
throng of citizens; smiling upon faces that
respond
to him through squalor; tender in his
inquiries
after the health of babes and wives at
home, of whose existence he has nothing more
than a daring conjectural knowledge; then
ascending
a tub, barrel, or platform, as most
convenient
,
tearing the air as if it were cambric
muslin, and rending the ears of the assemblage
with vociferations loud, false, or incoherent, as
it may chancewe must confess we look upon
a counterfeit presentment, from which every
line of dignity, truth, and nobleness, have been
happily blotted by the artist.
Political life has its turnpikes, its half-way
houses, its highways and its by-ways; there is
a political costume and a political dialect, and
without some knowledge of the road, and skill
in the employment of the appropriate dress and
idiom, the poor wayfarer would find himself, in
truth, in foreign parts, and travelling on a
thoroughfare that literally leads to nothing.
We propose, therefore, for the benefit of those
gentlemen who admire but can not reach, as
well as for the edification of such as decry but
do not covet advancement in the state, to make
an inquiry into the arts of the politician, or the
game of government, as practised under our
own window and within sound of our own
church-bells.
In the first place, then, we must remarkin
order to rescue ourselves from the charge of
exaggeration
,
and our reader from the heinous
sin of unbeliefthat political life has a
transforming
power beyond any element we are
acquainted
with, except, perhaps, the water of
stagnant ponds, which is said, by a quality
inherent
in and peculiar to its own ooze, to be
capable of converting the silly and dull-coated
tadpole into the wide-awake, well-dressed, and
open mouthed bull-frog. Whether this legend
be false or true, certain it is, that not only is
the outward habit, organ, and feature of the
politician
changed by the atmosphere he breathes
and the life he lives, but the very soul and
faculties
,
the minutest springs and movements of the
man are modified. His risings and settings,
his gait and gesture, the cast of his eye and the
grasp of his hand, his garments, his dwelling,
his walks and his pauses, are not only regulated
by the new spirit that has entered into him, but
the pupil of the mind's eye itself becomes so
enlarged or contracted that it imparts other and
strange colors to whatever it contemplates.
The moon, for example, is held by many
painstaking
and worthy people to be a round body
that dispenses light, and planetary in its
character
;
now suppose a law to be enacted by an
opposite party to veil the moon with blankets
in order to arrest its action upon the tides,
which it might be alleged is prejudicial to the
interest of ferry-masters and fishermen; why,
out marches our politician with a grave face
and gives the whole hypothesis over to the devil
by a bold assertion that the moon is a large
Dutchess county cheese, and he can bring
affidavit-men who were in at the churning.
Rivers flow or stagnate, numbers constitute a
riotous mob or a peaceful meeting of citizens,
bullion is heavy or light, and bank-paper rags
or money, according to the prevailing humor of
the believer. An enactment, which in its plain
recorded sections and sub-sections duly ordered,
seemed to him, at the first glance, a law of most
excellent and wholesome tendency, begins, as the
truth grows upon him (after a brief and
business-like
conversation with the executive), to
expand into a many-headed hydra that
threatens
to devour the union and all the little
children
,
and the Lord knows what besides!
We will suppose our politician to have
attained
this useful facility of viewing the world
and whatever it inherits of good, bad, or
indifferent
,
through either end of the telescope; the
first great lesson in his art is achieved.
His next business is attendance on public
meetings and places of resort. Here he acquires
the politician's vernacular, and becomes familiar
with the features and voices of the leaders and
orators of his party. His own countenance
after a while comes to be known, and by
keeping
it constantly at red-heat, as if the fire of
his zeal were unquenchable, he begins to be
reckoned and recognised as a useful member of
the faction. Now a little judicious fawning
well-bestowed, a little activity opportunely
displayed
,
and he will have emerged from the
hedges and thickets in which he has been
beating
without a prospect of sport, and lo! he is
on the avenue.
If not a blood-nag, he may, at least, prove
himself a good draught-horse, kind in harness,
and of most exceeding meekness and steadiness
of gait. Without Romulus, Rome had not
been built; without a patron, our politician
can not ripen. He, therefore, becomes the
factotum
of some eminent manager; runs of
errands
from meeting to meeting, ward to ward,
collecting small statistics, popular rumors, and
tap-room gossip, and at one auspicious Sunday,
tarries from church, and ventures to indite a
handbill.
This elegant production (grander than the
Paradise Lost in the eyes of its happy author),
shines out for a fortnight or more the glory of
walls, pumps, and fences, until washed into
oblivion by the first pelting shower that falls.
No matter, our aspiring gentleman is not
dampened
,
for in the meantime he has had the
felicity
of being named as one of a committee of
five to retire from one of the lesser assemblies
of the ward, to draft resolutions expressive of
X
the sense of the meeting. This is certainly
one of the most trying tasks that could be
imposed
on the wit of man. Here has been a
gathering of some two hundred individuals,
who for more than an hour have had their noses
in the direction of a sallow-faced gentleman, in
dim spectacles, who has been stultifying them
with a prescription compounded of one third
newspaper, one third scripture illustration, and
the balance general slang; and now, forsooth,
as if it were the pleasantest thing in the world,
five plain-witted gentlemen are detailed from
the mass to express the sense of the meeting,
in twelve sonorous paragraphs, very
appropriately
headed Resolutions, to denote the
mortal agony and determination with which
they were brought forth.
The next labor of the politician, and the
next indication of his progress in the regards
of his party, is the appointment to carry a
conspicuous
banner in a public procession. From
this time forth he is acknowledged as a full
lay-brother
of the order, useful, zealous, and
unflinching
;
although it must be confessed, that
the banner-staff pressed with such force on the
gastric region, on this first public trial, as to
impair the poor man's digestion for more than
a week. Unflinching, did we say? Wo betide
the poor rascal if he should draw back or
betray
the slightest symptom of reluctance, though
he were called on to swallow a provision bag
lined with Jack Cade, Tom Paine, and the
immortal
Pantagruel himself. Pleasanter
employment
is, however, just now furnished for his
appetite, for, as a particular favor, he is
endowed
by one of his patronising friends, with a
ticket of admission to a grand barbecue or
festival
,
and there it is that he takes another step
in political life, and offers a volunteer toast, in
his own name.
He may now be regarded as a public man,
but the emphatic seal is not yet stamped on his
character, until a certain eventful evening
arrives
.
On this occasion there chances to be a
thin attendance at the ward meeting; the
candles burn low; the older speakers have been
called for, but called in vain; when a small,
round man, with a face as pale as ashes, is
seen struggling through the crowd at one corner
of the room. To the astonishment, the utter
and entire petrifaction of almost every man in
the audience, he makes his way to the platform,
dismisses his hat, and ascends, and as true as
water flows and working-beams vibrate, he
stretches out his arm and begins to deliver a
speech; an actual speech, full of live similes,
earthquakes, battles, banners, and tornadoes,
not to mention a mixed metaphor of a leviathan,
or some such monster, riding through the land,
like the illustrious Lafayette, in a triumphal
barouche.
At the conclusion of this effort, the meeting
very rationally considering that the orator has
had his turn, try their own lungs in three
overwhelming
cheers, every one of which sounds,
in the ears of our politician, like the general
shout of a nation of freemen, hailing their
deliverer
.
The full glory of his career now breaks upon
him; there is nothing which he can not achieve
by the power of his eloquence; he has but to
lift up his voice, and the highest station heart
could desire is his. In the meantime,
however
,
to keep in practice, and to prevent his
oratory from running to waste, he is despatched
into New Jersey or Connecticut, during a
warmly-contested election, to cheer up the
hearts of the faithful; and since the last comet,
no such luminary has crossed their horizon,
dashing hither and thither, brandishing his
arms aloft, and shouting Freedom, at the
top of his lungs, as if he expected to produce
by the clamor an actual aerial descent of the
goddess from the clouds for the express purpose
of carrying the then pending contest.
Who can deny services like these or doubt
their value? The period has at length arrived
for rewarding this assiduous and laborious
member of the party. He has plied his cane at
public meetings, he has supported banners, he
has contrived handbills and penned resolutions,
he has spoken, he has shouted in the cause, and
he is made an alderman!
Ubiquity has now become an important
attribute
of our political Hercules. He must be
seen everywhere; heard of everywhere; must
be known as a getter-up of theatrical benefits
and charity balls, and a puller-down of public
abuses and overgrown monopolies. At
steamboat
landings, at the departure of packets, on
all festival occasions, whether Hibernian
fiddlings
,
or steamship entertainments, he must
be there; like Dr. Faustus, the fiend would
tear him if he failed the hour. He staggers
under a pressure of engagements, and seems
laboring with some spasmodic affection, which
perpetually lifts his right arm and contracts the
fingers of the hand corresponding to the grasp
of salutation.
In this way his voice becomes at length as
familiar as the toll of the town-clock; his
person
is recognised like the town-hall itself, and
the poor man's hand is as much frequented
as the open thoroughfare of the same. This
accomplishes his purpose; his name is known
and talked of, and although in these
innumerable
places he has never said nor done one
memorable thing or single act, that, taken by
itself, would be considered of the slightest
moment
,
yet so thoroughly are the public blinded
by this perpetual whirl and motion, appearance
and reappearance, in the form of toast or
sentiment
,
song, speech, or resolution, that this
empty-pated puff-ball, is, in the course of time,
regarded as an able, popular, and influential
character.
With ubiquity, assurance, broad-faced,
boundless
,
and invincible, is a necessary attendant.
How meek a man is our juggler! How
patiently
he bears all the burdens men can lay upon
him! With how swift an assumption does he
accept the utmost duties that can be imposed!
No matter how arduous, how high, how low,
how deep the labor that is suggested, he will
undertake it all. On all committees, whether
financial, military, civil, or charitable, you can
not balk him. That problem in alms-giving,
in science, literature, or gastronomy, can not be
contrived so tough that he will not solve it.
He would gravely set about squaring a circle, or
calculating the longitude, if called upon,
without
for a moment entertaining the thought of
advancing his own want of knowledge or
fitness
as a reasonable plea for declining to act.
No! no! all is fish that comes to his net, and
goes to make up the grand chowder of his
political
reputation. What matters it to him
whether he makes his progress by a fair,
straight-forward, honest head-wind, or if his
sail catches every little trifling flaw, side
current
,
and gust of airthough he be constantly
required to shift the helm, to veer, to tack, to
beat up and down, to box the compass, to ride
on the hog's back, to divide hen and
chickens
,
as long as he can keep from the perdition
of the Frying Pan!
It is now, for a time, a question whether this
man shall continue to rise in his profession, or
whether he is doomed to linger in a dull and
tedious mediocrity for the remainder of his
natural life; in other words, whether he shall
be allowed to play the demagogue and people's
man on a large scale, or whether he is to be
confined entirely to the purlieus of the city, the
arena of the taproom and porterhouse.
At first, we think we discover in him a
downward
tendency; but look again, and lo! the
creature is as busy as a polypus in summer,
stretching out a hand here and a hand there,
and still another there, and so effectually
devoting
his office and his leisure to his own
purposes
,
that he has no sooner ceased to be an
alderman for the city, than he has become a
member of congress for the nation; at which,
it is true, his simple-minded old friends in the
country are vastly astonished, never dreaming
that the man had it in him, and ignorant as
their own unshorn lambs of the machinery by
which the deficiency of natural organs was
ingeniously
supplied.
He has now attained an age and station
which requires that some extraordinary
development
of his greatness should be made. Shall
it exhibit itself in the shape of a Dinner to
Mr. Whiffthe presentation of two silver
goblets and a punch apparatus, or shall it
come in the more imposing form of a visit
to the northern, southern, or western states, as
it may happen?
The select friends of the great manin other
words, the proprietors of Mr. Whiff, the
politician
,
in fee-simple, and who take upon
themselves
to play off the puppet for such purposes
as they may think convenient and proper
have fixed, we will suppose, upon the visit,
as affording material of the most comprehensive
kind. Now the trumpets begin to blow;
banners
are unfurled, and by dint of skilful para
graphs and the assumption of an immense
interest
in the slightest movements of Mr. Whiff,
on the part of certain operatives or
wireworkers
,
the nation, or a considerable portion
of it, is thrown into a state of intense and most
uncomfortable excitement. It is announced,
with the utmost solemnity, in a morning paper,
that Mr. Whiff lodged the night before last in
Tompkinsville; and such was the anxiety to
get a glimpse of his person and listen to his
well-known eloquence, that the large room of
the largest public house was converted into
lodgings to furnish accommodations for the
thousands
,
who retired to their couches highly
delighted
and soothed by the effects of his
oratory
!
The afternoon journal, not to be outdone in
this grand overture of trumpets, makes its
appearance
with a chubby news-boy at the head
of its columns, waving a fragment of
pocket-handkerchief
,
with Postscript! worked on in
large type, and divulges the astounding fact,
that just as our informant was leaving, Mr.
Whiff had put his foot on board the `Adeline
Elmira,' for the purpose of crossing Smith's
Ferry for Tomtown, on the other side, which he
was expected to reach in about twenty minutes
from the time of embarkation!
Thus by devoting a daily column to the
sayings
and doings of Mr. Whiff, and by
emphasizing
his most trifling acts and adventures, the
blood of the populace is set on fire, and at last
Mr. Whiff arrives. Here is a pretty tumult!
A compact mob, like another Argus, apparently
all eyes, presses toward the wharf, and the very
moment the great man lands, he is snatched
from his feet and hurried into an open carriage,
about which another crowd is gathered to stare
at the illustrious, just escaped, as it were out
of the belly of the sea-monster at the landing.
Now ensues a scene in which the politician
plays the leading character, with a swarm of
citizens at his skirts by way of supernumeraries
and subordinates. Mr. Peter Whiff, standing
erect in his carriage (with a tail dragging
behind
of which the joints are hacks, coaches,
light wagons, sulkeys, and milk-carts),
advances
through the main streets, bowing
graciously
to such heads and faces as may present
themselves
from balconies, house-tops, and areas.
On floats the triumphal procession, and sundry
little short-legged gentlemen make it their
business
to ply their paddles ahead of the carriage
of Mr. Whiff, and to cast frequent glances of
profound reverence and enthusiasm toward the
person of that distinguished gentleman. An
old lady, a devout admirer of great men, stands
against the park railing, with a pocket-glass at
her eye surveying the outlines of Mr. Whiff's
person, and satisfying herself of the actual
outward dimensions of that wonderful
individual
of
whom she has heard so much, and
knows so little.
Every now and then as he passes, some
window
,
some roof, or church vestibule, goes into
a spasm, the most marked symptoms of which
are a violent waving of black beaver hats, and
a deep guttural noise, emitted from the throat.
Meantime the hero takes snuff and waves his
pocket-handkerchief enchantingly, relieving
himself at times, however, by sustaining his
coat-skirts by the aid of his two hands thrust
underneath the same; about this posture there
is always an air of coolness and dignity which
has its effect with the populace. He at length
reaches the public house, his destined quarters;
is hurried up the steps, thrust out of a window,
and although the poor man's throat is almost a
turnpike of dust, and his lungs in scarcely
better
condition than a blacksmith's bellows out
of use for a twelvemonth, he must make a
speech.
At the conclusion another ecstacy pervades
the mob; the great man withdraws, is fed,
watered, and put to bed, like the great South
American Lama. The next day he is roused
at daylight, or thereabout, by a committee of
citizens, and from that moment till the going
down of the sun he is put steadily to the
pleasant
torture of having his whole body shaken,
his joints disturbed, and his tongue unhinged,
by incessant graspings, welcomes, and
salutations
.
A second day he is transported from
place to place, halls of science, town halls,
lecture rooms, repositories, theatres, and public
buildings, squares, wharfs, and cemeteries,
until he almost covets a snug property in one
of the last, where he would doubtless lie very
quiet and easy, unless there happened to be a
wire-worker, or committee-man, in the next
grave. A third day, and there is no pause; a
new round of objects demands his attention, the
neighboring villages, the almshouse,
penitentiaries
,
and what not, are to be visited; and
visited they are, and at each and every of these
Mr. Whiff disembogues a speech: in fact,
wherever he goes, like a public fountain, he is
one ceaseless spout, spout, spout! and like that
too, whatever he utters falls back into the
original basin, and is redelivered over and over
again.
The public sympathies have by this time
been taxed to the utmost, and the capabilities
of Mr. Whiff's constitution so thoroughly
tested
,
that his duties at Washington, or
urgent
business at home, calls him away, and
the town is again allowed to relapse into a
comparatively calm and temperate condition.
The rocket has exploded; we have seen all the
brilliancy it could display, and can afford to be
content until the state pyrotechnists shall be
pleased to let off another.
We have thus compounded the character of
a politician by the synthetic process; and now,
in pursuance of the more ordinary line of our
duty, let us for a moment apply the analytical,
and take in pieces the puppet we have
constructed
in
order that we may learn what
proportion
the wood, hay, and stubble, bear to
each other in the machine, and also by what
springs it is set in motion.
What then do we discover?
In the first place, a radical unfitness in the
man for the part he has assumed; an entire
unconsciousness of the requirements and duties
of the character. In him we discern no primal
sympathy with mankind, which urges him into
the vocation; no strong, stern sense of the
wants, capacities, and rights, of the race whose
champion he proposes to enact. What to him
are the people? Painted faces, shadows,
automata
anything
rather than beings full to
overflowing
,
of passions, sensibilities, convictions
creatures with hearts in their bosoms, and heads
whose only deficiency lies in an inability to
discern
the nothingness of such as pretend to serve
and guide them.
With this moral incapacity, exists an
intellectual
one quite as broad and startling. Past
ages have not been his study; Sidney nor
Adams
,
nor the constellation that lives and shines
in history, have furnished for him the lustre in
which great minds love to walk and meditate.
What knows he of the past? The utmost
retrospection
of his memory is to the date of some
war, some junto or coalition, which shall serve
him as a topic of partisan declamation. Of the
present? Not the spirit that moves and
animates
the masses of mankind, and makes itself
visible and audible in amended charters,
reclaimed
rights, and disfranchised despotisms.
No! with him the chronicle of the hour is
sufficient
for the hour.
The nearest gazette can instruct him in the
latest party triumph; in the proceedings of the
last grand convention, assembled to nominate
some cipher or other to an office of trust and
authority; and teach him to calculate the
chances of obtaining a snug sinecure in the
event of his election. While others are
battling
and dying under the true flag of their
country for the privileges of men, he prefers to
march in some street-procession, under a more
peaceful, a less perilous emblem.
We would not have
him
fight; but we would
have him enter upon the business of statesman
and legislator with a knowledge, a feeling
knowledge, of the great sacrifices others are
elsewhere making to achieve rights and
institutions
which he is called on to perpetuate and
secure. We would have him consecrate
himself
to the service of the state by a baptism
nobler
than that of the brewhouse; by a life
including
less effort to drown the divine calling
of the patriot in the clamor of trumpets, the roll
of vacant drums, and the idle shouts of
multitudes
.
Again, this man's little regard for the people
is shown in the peculiar mode of progression
which he adopts. Instead of being advanced
by the spontaneous popular will, he moves
forward
on a frame-work of caucuses and
committees
,
on which he stands as dexterously
balanced
as the best posture-master of them all.
He does not fight his battles in the naked and
real strength of the popular cause, but prefers
to wage a war of junto with junto; to plot prefers
counterplot in committee, and to represent the
mass, in all his political movements, by a
figure
of speech. The result is as might be
expected
;
he moves up this wooden staircase,
precarious
scaffolding, step by step, and, from a
mere groundling, comes in time to be master
of the house, without a solitary tittle to justify
his occupancy; without, in fact, the real
regards
of the nation. But wo betide him, if one
day a blast should arise when he thinks not,
and, rushing against the frail fabric of his
fortunes
,
sweep them away into utter and
irreversible
oblivion.
The selfish insincerity of this character is
again betrayed in the false and sounding style
of his declamation. His oratory is vague,
hollow
,
and purposeless; full of tropes, figures,
and apostrophes, but wanting in genuine
earnestness
and truth. He is the noisiest of the
worshippers, but he is not on that account
more of a believer in the worship. Instead of
the plain, manly directness which becomes one
who is uttering truths deep as life, and on
which much of the happiness of life depends,
he converts his discourse into a sort of operatic
rehearsal, in which all the quavers, flourishes,
and variations of the language, are attempted.
Or, on the other hand, he bursts upon us in a
tropical exuberance of flowers, sun-beams,
and prattling waters; concluding, perhaps,
with a terrific tornado, or volcanic outbreak.
His heart is not there, and all that he conjures
up is fantastical, unreal, and out of place. His
written productions partake of the same grand
element of insincerity; they are loud, sonorous,
and empty; full of Johnsonian gravity and
indigenous
no-meaning.
Another pernicious ingredient in the
politician
we have attempted to delineate, is a
hunger
and thirst for office; not a desire to hold
office because office must be held, or from an
absolute avarice of the emoluments of place,
but a passion for office for the sake of office, an
affection for the petty consequence, the brief
authority, with which it is clothed by his own
imagination, and the misjudging people by
whom he is surrounded.
The holders of office resemble, in our
humble
judgment, the holders of the carriage
box-seat
;
exalted above us, it is true; endowed
with certain badges of authority, the whip, reins,
and coachman's hat; but acting throughout in
our behalf, and for our convenience, although
certain dullards along the road may choose to
regard
them as the very miracles and patterns of
humanity, the envy of taverns, the glory of
bar-rooms, the wonder and delight of large
public-houses
.
These gentlemen seem to regard themselves
as enjoying an exclusive prescriptive right to
places of trust and profit; and we are almost
satisfied that anatomical investigation would
discover a conformation of body peculiarly
suited
to the occupancy of aldermen's chairs and
clerk's cushions.
It is a fact that will bear scrutiny, we think,
that there are thousands in the United States
who prefer the wages of office to the rewards
of regular industry, and who would render twice
the amount of labor for one dollar of
government
pay, which would be required to produce
the same return in the ordinary course of trade.
They feel that they are resting under the
shadow
of the government wings; that, let what
will happen, the quarter's salary will arrive in
due season, and that their sole responsibility and
duty are to toil blindly on, heeding nothing,
anxious
for nothing but the predominance of the
party-planet that sustains them in their place.
To do justice, however, to the character we
have described, it must be confessed that there
is less of this greed for salary than might be
expected
;
though he does not fail, in the long
run to discover some Pactolian stream that can
be diverted into his own treasury, in the shape
of perquisite, commission on avenues, or other
honorary job. He, therefore, like others, at
last associates office with the happiest
incidents
of his life. The setting up of a new
carriage
from the proceeds, the erection of a more
stylish dwelling-house, or the giving of his first
grand entertainment, with new brass lamps,
and mulatto waiters to match.
To all these radical errors and deficiencies
is to be added another circumstance of some
moment. The multiplicity of objects in which
he is obliged to feel or feign an interest, and
the diversities of character he is expected to
sympathize with, as a man of the people, tend
to dissipate the elements of his own natural
character, and to destroy its original bias. No
single feeling in his breast, no faculty or
quality
,
save an all-absorbing tact, has time to
ripen or mature, and his whole nature is
overrun
with a growth of noxious, distorted, and
unwholesome
objects. A few of the primary
instincts
may maintain their place, but the
integrity
,
the truth and beauty, which belong to a
nature nobly and courageously developed, are
not there.
Better would it have been for him had he
devoted
his life to the contrivance of a mill-wheel,
or the production of a single excellent specimen
of timothy or asparagus; for then there would
have been something like honesty in the man,
an enthusiasm true and unaffected, and a vein
of thought which might have been relied on as
genuine and pure.
Forgetting entirely the claims of nature and
the commands of conscience, he leads a life of
manuvre, duplicity, and stratagem. He is the
slave of time and chance. An error of
salutation
;
a solecism of opinion; a single false step
in the grand train of political plotting, frights
him more than the bugbears of conscience or
the alarms of reason. He lives in a wheel of
destiny, where a moment's pause, a hair-breadth
deviation, would destroy him. He has leased
out his life to clowns and quidnuncs, and he
has no more choice of action or locomotion
than the sultan surrounded by a troop of
bloodyminded
janissaries. His life is therefore false,
hollow, and servile. There is sufficient of ex
21
ternal gilding to dazzle the multitude, and to
achieve mere wordly success; but the heart is
wiser than the head, and there he fails. After
all, the world and the world's affections are not
with him. He serves a purpose; he can ride
his stage like the sorriest hackney of them all;
and then he is taken from the harness and
succeeded
by a jade as poor and wretched, but just
as serviceable. In time he may live to be
turned
upon the common, and when his hour arrives
he drops into a cold, cheerless, and
unapplauded
grave.
The true statesman, with nature's stamp of
supremacy on every action, ascends from the
midst of the people by slow degrees, and attains
his zenith of power and splendor through a long
tract of diligent and steady labor.
He begins with no ostentatious parade of
banners or bustle of zeal in the popular cause.
He plants his first steps on the
foundation-principles
of government; reaches forth his arms
to such branches and buttresses as history and
humanity may furnish; and, by a slow
progress
,
succeeds at last in scaling a height from
which he may look forth on the kingdoms of
the earth, and learn how the world is governed.
In this pursuit no petty spirit of partisanship is
engendered; the small pomp of personal
consequence
is abashed.
Deaf to the idle tumult of the hour, he hears
the loud cry of despairing nations; the voices
of the prison-house; the sundering of fetters,
strong as death; the eager welcome of
dawning
light; and, as God is with them, the shout
of enfranchisement and deliverance. His soul
shoots along the axis of the earth, to the north
and to the south, and either ocean only arrests
its eager sympathies.
But are the interests of his own day and
nation
forgotten in this wide survey of past and
present? No; rather remembered the more,
and served the more truly. From a mind
pregnant
with whatever other times and other
people
have done or suffered in the great cause
of human happiness, spring the guarded rights,
the enlightened welfare, of the country that he
calls his own. The fiercer the assault, the
more secret the breach made elsewhere against
the immunities of mankind, the steadier the
defence
,
the more sagacious the protection of the
same privileges at home. On all occasions, on
every imminent emergency, he is prepared to
justify the principles of his faith, and to give a
new sanction to the institutions under which
he dwells. He lives in the eye of Truth and
Liberty. He shall descend to his grave with the
tears and blessings of mankind.
MR. JAMES GRANT.
[5]
[5]
Portraits of Public Characters. By the author of
The Great metropolis; Random Recollections of
the Lords and Commons, &c., &c. Saunders & Otley:
London, 1840.
Mr. James Grant
, the celebrated British
author, stands about five-feet-three in his
stockings; on reflection, we should perhaps
say five-feet-four. His breadth across the
shoulders
is not more than ordinary; but we trust
we shall not be regarded as trespassing on
delicacy
,
in making known a fact of considerable
importance, namely, that he has a singularly
well-developed pair of legs. We are not aware
that Mr. Grant has ever been esteemed by
anybody
as, strictly speaking, a colossus; but, as
will be observed from the remark we have just
made, his claims to be regarded as such are by
no means slight. The story, therefore, of Mr.
Grant's having kicked an Irish porter through
one of the upper windows of Westminster
Abbey
,
although needing confirmation, is
physiologically
possible.
Mr. Grant commenced life, as we are
informed
having
no personal knowledge of this
fact, we can not be so positive in the statement
as we might otherwise have beenas a tapster
at the Cock and Bull, Cheapside; from which
situation he rose, in due course of time, to be
head waiter at the Gas and Bellows, Strand;
and finally, having been discovered one day by
the editor of one of the leading London
journals
,
writing out an account of a fight between
the barmaid and cook of the Bellows, on one of
the parlor-windows with a magnificent quartz
crystal, he was immediately taken into service
as a reporter, and employed to furnish nightly
descriptions of the various rencontres in the
house of lords, between honorable gentlemen
on the subject of the Reform bill. We
unfortunately
have it not in our power to state at
this moment whether he occupied a place in
the left-hand gallery, to the right of the
speaker's
chair, or on the left hand of the speaker,
in the right gallery; our impression is it was
the left-right. A curious story is told
illustrative
of this part of Mr. Grant's career, which,
although not of the slightest earthly importance,
may be worth repeating here. It is said that
a pet donkey belonging to a coalheaver in a
neighboring street, was in the habit of
watching
the messenger who was sent from the office
of the journal in question, to receive such
supplies
of the night's reports as Mr. Grant might
be prepared to furnish. Just as he turned the
corner leading to the door of St. Stephen's, the
donkey, fixing his eye steadily on the editor's
messenger, would start off at a smart gallop,
and, as a matter of course, reach the door
several
seconds before the messenger, and would
immediately commence setting up a portentous
bray, as if to give notice to Mr. Grant that
more copy, as it is technically styled, was
needed. This summons, we need hardly add,
Mr. Grant at all times cheerfully answered;
coming out at each call with a large roll of
manuscript report, and placing it smilingly in
the messenger's hand.
With regard to Mr. Grant's personal habits,
we have it fortunately in our power to be very
particular. In the morning, having first washed,
shaved, and breakfasted, he grasps his cane
and sallies forth; his first call is on the valet
of his Grace the Duke of Wellington, and,
having
ascertained to his entire satisfaction that
his Grace had a tranquil night of it, that he
has already risen, and is engaged in answering
his correspondents in a blue dimity
morninggown
,
Mr. Grant bids the valet
good-morning
,
and descends the steps. His next
business
is to trip up a one-legged beggar, and
while apologizing for the accident, and
administering
alms, he draws from him an accurate
account of the various impostures practised by
the metropolitan mendicants on the unwary,
by the way of forged letters, calls on behalf of
the daughters of deceased naval officers, and
applications for the relief of sick widows with
seven small children, of which two are always
at the breast. Mr. Grant then, in all
probability
,
takes a pot of small-beer at the nearest
tavern; and seeing just at that moment the
coach of Lord Brougham entering town, with a
vacant place on the box, he invites himself to a
ride, and, ascending by means of the ordinary
leather straps, he takes a seat by the side of
his lordship's coachman, and enters into a
very pleasant gossipping conversation with that
functionary, in the course of which he learns a
vast deal about the characteristic habits of his
lordship; among others, a peculiarity his
lordship
has of winking at his footman when off
duty, and of indulging himself in throwing
miraculous
somersets backward and forward over
the top of the coach, whenever it has occasion
to stand still for more than a couple of minutes
at a time. Before leaving his elevated friend, Mr.
Grant probably extorts from him a promise that
if his lordship should chance to drop a wig
in the course of any of these surprising
gymnastic
exercises, to bring it straightway to him
at the office of the London Journal, of which
Mr. Grant is editor, and receive half-a-crown
for his pains.
But Sunday is by all odds the busiest day
with Mr. Grant. From morning till night he
is on the move; popping his head in at Mr.
Croly's church in time to hear that
distinguished
orator announce his text; hurrying away to
hear Mr. Fox, the Unitarian clergyman's,
firstly
;
the Rev. Mr. Melvill's, secondly or thirdly;
the Hon. and Rev. Baptist Noel's, fourthly;
and so on through all the divines of the
metropolis
.
It is said there is not a man in London
who performs a more laborious sabbath-day's
work than Mr. Grant, including even the
clergymen
who preach three times, and the
gentlemen
who sing base in the various metropolitan
churches.
By the way, we should not forget to mention
here that this gentleman is the author of
Random
Recollections of the House of Lords, in 1
vol., post octavo; Random do. Commons,
do., do.; two series of The Great
Metropolis
,
two vols. each; The Metropolitan
Pulnit
,
in we forget how many volumes;
Sketches
of London, 1 vol., octavo, with cuts; and
some other works, one of which, Portraits of
Public Characters, in 2 vols., is, we believe,
just out. It is not positively known whether
Mr. Grant has ever written poetry (these works
being all in prose), but, it is supposed, if he
should ever undertake poetry, it would be
his object to rival Sir Richard Blackmore; and
by many it is considered, should he make
the attempt, that he would be successful.
The intellectual characteristics of Mr. Grant
are easily made out. His style, although,
perhaps
,
it can not be said to be equal to that of
Mr. Jeffrey or the Hon. Babington Macauley,
in brilliancy, is certainly one of the most
remarkable
of the present day. There seems to
be in this distinguished gentleman's mind, if
we may venture upon so bold a phrase, a sort
of circumambiency, which leads him to beat
about his subject, keeping, in the meantime, at
a due distance from it; much, as our readers
may have observed, as one of the horses on
sale at Tattersall's dances round the jockey,
who holds a rein and whip in his hand,
looking
at him with great earnestness and gravity,
but taking heed, meanwhile, to keep very
respectfully
out of his reach. That this is
owing
to a peculiar conformation of intellect on
the part of Mr. Grant, we are satisfied; but
nothing could be happier than this singular
style for the class of subjects he has chosen,
being chiefly distinguished statesmen, mighty
divines, and gigantic bibliopoles; to use a
significant phrase which Mr. Hume
occasionally
employs in the course of one of his
economical
speeches, It's just the thing.
Nothing could be more artful than Mr.
Grant's narrative of what he has seen; and we
are satisfied if it should ever be his good or
evil fortune to meet with a dog Cerberus, we
should immediately have three graphic
biographies
from his pen, one for each head; and
the same of a hundred-headed hydra, if he
should happen to fall in with one; a life for
each head, or one tremendous life in a hundred
volumes. Mr. Grant's pictures are all
full-lengths
;
and although he can not be said to be
strictly rhetorical in his manner, yet there are
very few divines who can equal him in
subdivisions
,
in dwelling skilfully on a topic, and in
going back to it after it is entirely exhausted.
In fact, we are pretty well convinced, although
we have no positive information on the subject,
unless our moral conviction that such is the
case can be so considered, that Mr. Grant's
habits of writing are like those of our
countryman
,
Mr. Willis, whom he describes in his
latest production as follows: He does not
take nor require time to think, when engaged
in his literary avocations. Ideas crowd so fast
upon him, his perception of the best points in
his subjects is so ready, that the moment he
takes his pen in hand he starts off at a
railroad-rate
,
and never slackens his pace until he
becomes
physically exhausted.
THE SOLEMN VENDUE.
Mr. Abraham Sable
was in town a short
time since, for the purpose of selling a few
vaults in Christ church churchyard, Tarrytown.
There is snug lying there, I will warrant,
almost as snug as in the abbey, and our
melancholy-minded
friend did well to bring them to
the New York market, where purchasers must
be found, if anywhere. Think but of those who
want graves, and you will know whether there
should be bidders for his commodity. First,
there are all the weary, whose hope in life has
perished; the suiter that sought love, and found
tears, anguish, dark, dreary nights, and long,
melancholy, purposeless days; the friend, whose
close companion of many dear, dear hours, has
fallen from him with a cold look, and
unforgiving
eye, and a hand close shut to his expectant
grasp, like stone; the merchant, whose last
ship has gone down, far off, with all her
freightage
in the cruel Indian ocean; and the poor
lone mother, whose only son sunk in that same
ship, in the gloomy sea, and whose heart begins
to break over the thought that her home is
desolate
for ever. Here is a desire for graves!
There are other chapmen for the occasion;
the poor politician, by whom opportunity has
swept and left him on the shore, officeless,
remorseful
,
moping evermore, with hands thrust in
his pockets, and eyes that wander from face to
face bereft of the old smile, the urgent greeting
look, that begged for a remembrance at the
November
ides.
There is another who would seek his grave
as familiarly as his own chamber in the night,
who would make his couch there as cheerfully
as under his own roof-tree, one who would
stretch in the dark shadow of the vault, as
readily
as under the canopy of a green tree, or a
bright cloud in summer; for him whose fair
renown
is soiled and mildewed to the worldfor
him a cheap family-vault would be a
homestead
,
indeed, a quiet retiring-room, into which
he could step and fall asleep from the slanders
and evil tongues of men. Bid high for the
grave! for it is a desirable property, a
habitation
that can shelter us from the harshest storm
that ever yet blew over the earth. Let us buy
graves early! for he that dies without this great
provision is poorpoorer than the neediest
beggar
,
and must have the last charity dealt to
him, the mightiest. But who shall sell graves?
Who is powerful enough to deal in this
wonderful
warethis concluding and imperishable
merchandise? It seems as if an angle, and no
inferior one, should descend in our midst and
put to sale this great commodity.
Who bids? Who bids, for this fine vault,
with accommodations completedug in the
choicest clay, with eight steps descending, and
a warranted door of iron? Comfortable
tenement
,
secure, silent, and rare. No arrest, no
service of process, can come there. No judge's
voice, no marshal's truncheon, no oppressor's
rod. Who bids? who bids? You of the slip
pered shank and hollow cheekit is yours
for you have already taken possession with
one foot planted on your new estate. Another,
larger, ampler, more spaciousfor a more
commodious
tenant. Apoplectic mortal! I have
your bidit is a good one, and well thought of,
for next week you shall enter upon your
purchase
.
A third! Why do you draw back? Will
none in this great crowd try for a third? Ah!
there is a modest chapman: pale, thought-sick
youthyou must drop, drop with others, and
eldersthis measures you to an inch, and the
deed will be made out to-morrow, before the
sun sets.
This would be an attentive auditory, I think,
a respectful and silent throng of purchasers,
and the competition wondrously timid and
accommodating
.
Neighbor would nod off the
bargain
from his own head to neighbor, and the
solemn salesman would lift up his voice alone
in the streets of Babel.
There is also a choice of graves. Who
bids? who bids? Here is a damp, cold vault,
laid in a hard soil, with perpetual drops oozing
through upon the coffin; lay there the
dull-hearted
miser, in whose breast no kindly
affection
took root, and where hope, charity,
love of neighbors, kindred, and children,
withered
away in the chill region of self-seeking
and love of gain.
Yonder the spade has done its work in a
cheerful slope, on which the sun smiles through
three quarters of the long summer day; it is a
fitting burial-place for the good man, whose
eye, like this pleasant upland, loved to look
forth on scenes of peace, quietness, and
content
,
and to lend to them a new beauty and joy
borrowed from itself.
Here, where the grave strikes deep amid
the gnarled roots of this great oak forest, that
contends manfully with wind and tempest, and
holds stout fast of the earth, hither bring the bier
of the towering son of power, whose renown was
immovably established, and whose fair head
lifted itself high up toward heaven without fear,
or rather, with great rejoicing and delight.
Under
this evergreen turf, crowned with early
flowers in spring, with long-lingering
snowdrops
in the ungenial time, the great river
evermurmuring
by, and the distant mountain
stretching
its shadow over the water till it falls on this
selected spot of earth, here lay the poet, in the
midst of glorious sights and sounds and odors,
of which he is a part now, and was once a
partaker.
Who shall have this grave? Who bids?
Who bids for a sepulchre that frowns upon us
fearfully like this? Adders' nests, newts, and
ground-moles beneathlong, hoary, moss-clad
trunks midwaysombre birds of omen, the
evil-boding
crow, and the grim, selfish owl, above:
who seeks to lie there? Ah! it is that
black-haired
man, with blood-spots on his wrist, and
an unquiet devil in his eye; it is his; and he
longs for it, for he is a murderer that cowers
and trembles in the broad face of light. Hurry
him to his grave, and bless him. Be quick with
the obsequies, for he gasps in the pure air of
day. Tarry not; for Jesus' sake tarry not
with tressels and biers, sable hangings and
hearses, for he yearns for his couch, as the child
yearns for his cradle, or the wild beast pants
for its den. Hide him! hide him swiftly in
the earth!going, gone! That bid passed like
an arrow, and a readier chapman one could not
desire.
Whom shall we lay here, in this desolate
chamber, built in a blasted soil, on the banks
of a dry channel, over which withered trees
stretch their dead arms, and in the top of one
of them lies the skeleton of an eagle, with his
wings drooping over the sides of his nest, struck
dead by irresistible lightning? Whose grave
is this? Thine, old Indian chief! Apparel
his heroic old corse in its feathers, its
buffalo-robe
,
and its wampum-belt, and lay it down in
this region of gloom and barrenness; a kindred
home for a kindred spirit.
This is a sweet tomb in this delicious vale,
smothered, as it were, in excess of roses, violets,
and golden buttercups; a gentle wind sighs
along its roof and makes apt music for the
slumbering tenant beneath. Birds of pleasant
plumage and tender song haunt here, and a
field-lark hath built its emblematic nest (from
which it soars so steadily and cheerfully to
heaven) at the very mouth of the grave. A
choice tenant must inhabit so choice a tomb.
It is that pale maiden, on whose cheek a faint
bloom lingers amid a fast triumphing paleness,
as a little tinge of summer colors, oftentimes,
the icy skirt of February, retreating and
returning
ever and anon. Lay that gentle lady
gently
down! She was deserted in her prime, and
carries a broken heart, meekly and mildly, to
her appointed home.
Far beyond, where poison henbane, and
hemlock, and deadly aconite, with creepers of
noxious qualityjust where that skull of a
copper-snake
peeps from the earth, find a suitable
burial for witch and sorceress, and compounder
of fatal drugs. The adder will creep to her
grave, and the black raven flap his wings over
it in triumph, for powers of evil, whether of
water or air, are kinsfolk and connexions.
Bury the boatman by the shore, and the
astronomer
on the mountain; the warrior lay by
the side of the cataract, whose din mimics a
mighty battle, the clashing of shields, the
braying
of trumpets, and the shock of foaming
carnage
.
For the sons of doubt, whose lives were
swift and dark with turbid thoughts, find a
sepulture
on the banks of gloomy currents that
have their well-springs in cold, icy hills, and
their ending in wide, illimitable, restless seas.
Bury the quiet man in valleys, and the
children of strife in the storm-swept plain, or in
the heart of cities, where they shall be
trampled
on by friend and enemy, and have no quiet
nor rest even in the grave.
Bury children in gardens and scented or
chards; aged people and grandsires, in Ione
woods, to which their age is kindred; and on
the heirs of fame, the kindlers of high thoughts,
friends of the oppressed, deliverers of nations,
bestow the whole wide earth, with its
mountains
and valleys, lakes and running streams,
and echoing cliffs, as a tomb, a monument, and
a memorial.
CITIZENSHIP.
The
colossal event of October was the
explosion
of the grand political fraud-mine
[6]
[6]
The introduction of voters from Philadelphia at
the election in New York, in large numbers, and by
contract.
at
the almshouse in the presence of his honor the
Recorder, and the city District Attorney. No
incident of the kind has, within our memory,
created so general and earnest a commotion
among the members of all parties, as well as
among the community of less excitable citizens,
who belong to none. Whether this was a
high court of preliminary inquiry, convened
for great and solemn purposes; or whether it
was a mere congress and junto of partisans for
sinister objects, we shall not inquire.
Certain leading questions of less doubtful
character have become involved in the chief
subject, and of these we shall speak freely, and
as every right-minded American would desire
to have us speak.
The first, and most striking, is the evidence
this case furnishes of the readiness of the
community
to fall off into parties and party
divisions
on any matter that may be presented.
Now, as we humbly regard it, neither party is
to be considered as the exclusive friend and
champion of truth. As far as our humble
observation extends, neither is to be held as
the immaculate and single advocate of
justice
.
Goodness and right do not inhabit so
clearly on this or that side of an accurate,
straight line, drawn by party wisdom or party
honor. Oh no! Truth is diffused more like
the atmosphere, and pervading all regions and
things, preserves the general soundness and
purity of the world; it does not lie heaped up
in masses, or gathered in overwhelming
treasures
within the camp of any chieftain or
company
of political knights-errant. The strong,
wholesale clamor, therefore, for or against any
measure or act, is unwise and false to a sound
general principle; a qualified and restrained
advocacy or opposition lurks in the constitution
of mankind, and in the very nature of things.
Party divisions, can not, and, perhaps, should
not be abolished; but there must arise in the
progress of events, questions far above all such
sectarian and narrow feelings; questions
affecting
the foundation of government, and the very
stability of all institutions. The purity of
elections is with us just such a question, and
demands a generous abandonment of party
views, and a bold and prompt declaration in
behalf of good principle, wherever it may show
itself. A clear, integral, unquestionable
expression
of the popular will and meaning, is
with the present frame of government to be
desired, furthered, prayed for above all civil
blessings. Let the nation speak out; and
accursed
be he that counterfeits, intercepts, or
misinterprets its true manly tones. Be a brand
indelible as life upon him that lends himself
forthright, or by indirection, to corrupt the
great franchise. Let him stand in the midst
of the community, like the first murderer, as
one who would strike at the life of first
principles
,
the scoff, the utter contempt and
loathing
of all men. On his tomb be inscribed the
national malediction in the bitterest and
briefest
words that national wisdom and indignation
can frame! Let no man who regards his own
fair fame, or the fair fame and tranquillity of
his children, palter with this Abaddon of
political life; and, on the other hand, let no
ready accuser or convenient judge lay the charge
of such countenance lightly on any man's head!
Nor let a considerate and all-accomplishing
people, urge on or assuage the clamor further
than the strictest ends of true justice require.
Resolution and prudence should be our
counsel
in such emergencies; and, judging with
tranquillity, we should condemn and punish
with terrible directness.
Regarding a single incident of citizenship
a great and noble incident it is truewith
these feelings, we can not but regard
citizenship
itself as a high privilege, and one which
should not be frivolously conferred or assumed.
To be an American citizen is to be a free man,
not merely as far as bonds and captivity are
concerned, but to enjoy a noble liberty of
thought and feeling, unfettered by the old and
castomary restraints of more cumbrous forms
of government. His thoughts have no wall of
circumvallation built up from immemorial
times to overshadow and hedge in their liberal
range. Life is thrown open to him as a fair
untrodden field, on which to enter, with
whatever
implements of wisdom, sagacity,
forethought
,
truth, and fortitude, God and nature
have granted him. He is more sovereign than
the highest sovereignty of all old empires;
having a mind unawed by past traditions,
and cheered to its duty by every hope in the
fature; resting, as it were, on the broad hill
side of nature, and looking forth, in the eye of
the sun, on whatever presents itself, with true
natural impulses, and with a just regard to the
actual relations of objects. It is not necessary,
that is to say, it is not inherent in his condition,
that he should adopt unwise or disproportioned
views of art, of God, of society, nor, in fact,
of any truth or set of truths.
He sees, as from a tower, the end of all.
He feels, or he should feel, called on to
exemplify
humanity, and to render to the world the
true reading and solution of many vexed
problems
in government and social life. He sits at
the plain table of uncorrupted truth; before
him lies the map of human action, unbroken
by the track of previous adventurers, or
marked
with conjectural shoals and soundings, the
sunlight falls clear upon it, and the fresh air
of heaven breathes on him its true inspiration.
Is not this a task and service sufficiently great,
noble, and momentous, to be placed in any
man's hand? And would you not suppose
that a little culture, a little glimmering of
civilization
,
and some faint approaches to a manly
demeanor, were needed in him who presents
himself as an expounder and illustrator of
these new truths?
How much would it ask to perform these
services
of American citizenship well and truly!
What wise research, what profound sagacity,
and steady temper of soul!
Attend our court of naturalization a day or two
in advance of any coming election, and see how
nobly, with what a terrible striving toward this
ideal standard of citizenship, these requisitions
are met! If philosophy has cast her robe, and
taken in its stead a most inviting and
fragmentary
apparel of foul linen and broken
fustian
;
if manhood and civilization have deserted
broad brows and intelligent features, and taken
up their abode in uncultured heads and
carbuncled
faces, then is our county court indeed the
porch and vestibule of truththe very gate of
the republican heaven.
What glorious elements of citizenship lie
imbedded
in the rude nature of this man! What
cunning and earnest sympathies must this B
otian
enjoy with Plato, the founder of republics
with Harringtonwith Hampden that lived,
with Sidney that died, for the establishment of
free institutions! Something, assuredly, of the
heroic valor that battled it with the tyrant at the
defile of Thermopol, beams in his eye;
something
of the manly fortitude that defended
Breed's hill, certainly betrays itself in the strong
lines of his hard countenance. What Hancock
sacrificed, what Franklin fabled, what
Jefferson
counselled, what triumphant George
Washington
achieved, must be known to him. Swift
indeed is our new-born American gentleman's
apprehension of what truth and duty require at
his hands in this new country, where his lot is
now for ever cast. With a steady hand, and
well-assured of the solemn enterprise in which
he is embarking all that he has of manhood, of
hope, and hope of happiness, does he affix his
nameor, more likely, the dignified
signmanual
of his mark, to the oath that severs
him for ever from all old-world allegiances, and
binds him sternly to the charter under which he
has preferred to dwell.
Do we despise the poor, the unlearned, or
the humble, because we hold this language?
God forbid! Is it our wish that honest-hearted
manhood, apparelled, it may be, in rags, and
held low and cheap in the world's esteem, should,
for any reason whatever, be robbed of its
suffrage
,
and made to keep its peace in the
presence
of power, or wealth, or hereditary scorn?
God and all his good angels forbid! But we
do desire, as fervently as we can desire
anything
,
that American citizenship shall not be
cheapened; and that it may not be, we would
hold our countrymen everywhere to a strict
accountability
,
not only to themselves, but to their
posterity, for all acts by which it may be
endangered
or diminished. If no better barrier
can be raised for its protection, let us adhere
religiously to the letter and the truth of the
standard at present established by law. When
these ill-omened candidates for investiture with
the citizen's robe present themselves, let them
be placed by the side of the measure known to
the polity of our government, and let us learn
whether they reach the mark or tower above
it. Call into court, in the full face of day, on
every occasion of creating an American citizen,
some substantial, judicious, and true witness,
who can swear, with a conscience awake to
the service it is engaged in, that the
catechumen
there present has
behaved himself for
five years last past, as a man of good moral
character, attached to the principles of the
Constitution
of the United States, and well disposed
to the good order and happiness of the same
.
The testifying oath, as is well known, is
taken
,
in many cases, by some staunch
affidavit-maker
,
for groups of half-a-dozen or a dozen
applicants at a time. This creature is
generally
a miserable electioneering agent, the tool
of some party or other, and who swears
himself
through all that is required of him with
the steady action of a hardened hackney.
Extensive
and discriminating indeed would be his
acquaintance with men, if he could, in all these
instances, furnish the nice testimony required
by law. Familiar, in truth, to a degree almost
miraculous, with the actings and doings, the
noonday and midnight paths of obscure, dark,
and unnoticed creatures, must this
steady-swearing
gentleman be, to give his Amen to the
clerk's voice as he recites this portion of the
bath.
But still more marvellous must be his insight
into the metaphysical operations of the
candidate
,
and in close communion for many days
and many nights must these two worthies have
dwelt, ere, we should think, its concluding
sanction could be safely echoed.
Ay! here is a thick, dull, reckless fellow of
a naturalization agent, infinitely better read in
the paltriest party journal of the day, than in
any work of higher morality, who takes upon
himself to affirm, under the solemn requisitions
of an oath in open court, that another thick,
dull, reckless fellow of an applicant for
naturalisation
is, forsooth,
attached to the principles
of the Constitution of the United States! and
WELL DISPOSED TO THE GOOD ORDER AND
HAPPINESS
OF THE SAME!
The whole picture, as it presents itself to
our mind, is too broad and Hogarthian to excite
any feelings but, on the one hand, of hearty
mirth, or, on the other, of deep detestation and
lament.
The individual who volunteers to testify to
these nice questions of opinion and practice, is,
ten chances to one, the nightly frequenter of a
common taproom, where his accurate estimate
of the character of his friend has been formed
over occasional pots of cheap beer; and the
conviction of his attachment to constitutional
principles, doubtless wrought in sundry lucid
and logical discussions of the favorite text from
the Declaration of Independence, that all men
are born free and equal, particularly the two
gentlemen in question.
To say of any man, that he was, of a truth,
attached to the noble principles of our
constitution
,
and well disposed to the good order and
happiness of these United States, knowing
truly
how much was required for the good order
and happiness of such a government, would be
to pronounce his highest eulogy. For an
American
,
born on the soil, reared amid usages and
habitudes that are daily lessons to his young
understanding, and taught by all that he sees,
hears, or dreams, something of the character of
the government of which he is a pledged
supporter
,
an enlightened good sense effects much,
if not all, of what a foreigner must acquire by
patient research, by anxious questioning, and
by years of strenuous devotion to the spirit of
free institutions. Let him not, therefore, take
upon himself lightly the proud character of
American citizen; let him not dare to become
a legislator for twenty-six sovereignties, to sit
in the grand councils of free, thoughtful men,
bearing a large portion of the world's hopes
and fears upon them, without a grave
preparation
for the duty! Curses, both loud and deep,
must wait on him and his, if by any inefficiency
or violence or mischance of theirs, the world's
great hope should be obscured or blighted: and
let us, the native and natural owners and
defenders
of the soil, take heed that by no weak
or idle or misplaced philanthropy of ours the
same evil issue be not wrought, and that the
malediction, with double and fearful force, fall
not on us!
EVERY FOURTH YEAR.
It
is pretty well known all over the world by
this time, we imagine, that the American
people indulge themselves every four years
with a national entertainment on a very grand
scale. The chief figures in the divertisement
are two gentlemen natural-born citizens, who
have attained to the age of thirty-five years,
and been fourteen years residents within the
United States, who kindly offer themselves as
objects of playful abuse, elegant invective,
satiral dissection, and such other intellectual
pastimes as their fellow-citizens may think
proper to engage in at their exclusive risk and
expense. This leads, of course, to many happy
biographical sketches of the two gentlemen,
many delicate investigations into varions parts
and passages of recent history. It is therefore
now regarded as a question pretty well settled,
that a candidate for the office of president of
the United States, must be not only a gentleman
of eminent civil capacity, but also one holding
in perfect contempt the ordinary ease, comfort,
and peace of mind, that citizens of a less noble
temperament are supposed to seek after.
All the actions, traits, peculiarities, and
characteristic
features of his past life, are as
matter
of course brought to light and examined
with a truly Cuvierian scrutiny and caution;
the shank-bone of the political mammoth meets
with the same attention as the great spinal
column; and in a due state of preservation and
dissection, he is presented to the public; having
first, however, undergone a grand inquest at
Baltimore or Harrisburgh, where ten score and
ninety coroners a side have passed upon the
illustrious subject. Being thus formally
invested
with a candidateship, our mammoth
politician
strides forth into the field of controversy,
and playfully swinging his trunk this way and
that, and discharging its contents, covers the
land in every quarter with huge epistolary blots
and great patches of financial or other
temporary
disquisition.
Now commences the strife of giants; Anak
to Anak, and as in the conflict of Milton's
angels, the very foundations of the earth are
removed to furnish ammunition for the mighty
battle. Against the person of the one
combatant
is discharged a long and fierce cannonade
of cutting charges of recent misconduct; while
the other finds himself suddenly smitten, and
actually reeling under the force of a ton-weight
of decayed pamphlets, whirled about his ears
by the sturdy arm of some committee or junto.
The one is incontinently fetched a blow on the
ear with a portentuous file of some forgotten
Advertiser or Advocate; and the other,
as summarily, has all the wind knocked from his
body politic by the clenched fist of an old
campaigner
or veteran reminiscent.
On all possible questions are the candidates'
opinions demanded; on all possible questions
are answers given. Letter follows letter in the
columns of the public journals, like peal on
peal through a sultry tropical sky.
A general uncovering of abuses, corruptions,
and enormities of either party, takes place, and
the whole country is filled with the outcry of
exposed culprits, and the odor of governmental
gangrenes. The land swarms with declarants
and affidavit-makers. The office-holders stand
to their arms! and the office-seekers set up an
astounding cry of siege and onslaught.
Miraculous changes of opinion are announced
in the newspapers, and the names of twenty,
thirty, or forty recusants to the administration
in power are every now and then published
like so many certificates to the efficacy of a new
pill or patent nostrum, or the hand of a testator
set to some solemn instrument, by which the
whole power and patronage of the government
are conveyed to the only lawful legatees and
descendants, the party then out of power.
Canvasses
are taken in steamboats and
stage-coaches
,
at church-raisings and
baby-christenings
,
by which the fate of the dominant party
is held to be conclusively settled by majorities
almost too great to be recorded and accredited.
The age of hurly-burly and universal oratory
has actually set in, and from every conceivable
vantage-ground, the general deluge is loosened
and descends upon the people in a long, copious,
unintermitting flood for more than forty days
and forty nights.
A contest like our recent general election we
imagine was never seen nor known before in
this or any other country. Fifteen millions of
people (for we hold that wives and children
are implicated in all the acts of husband and
father, and do, in the eye of law and truth,
whatever is done by their principals), hurrying
to and fro in wagons, stage-coaches, and
steamers
;
lengthening out in bannered processions,
or packing themselves close in dense auditories
and masses; silent as death or the calm
midland
sea under the breath of some potent
speaker, or bursting again into shouts and
multitudinous choral songs of political faith or
political triumph. What eye has before seen
spectacles like these? Night marches by
torchlight
;
pilgrimages by land and water, from
every point of the compass, every whither;
cities roaring like dens of lions, with a conflict
of many voices; inoffensive dorps and villages,
rudely taken by the collar as it were, and
roused
into states of huge activity and immense
bustle by delegations and committees from more
stirring places; to what tends all this? Simply
to the calm, clear enunciation of the popular
will. These were but the preliminary triumphs
of that peaceful conqueror and arbiter, the
ballot-box. By startling auspices like these
was the approach of that little ark of our civil
faith proclaimed; and in the midst of such
demonstrations
,
and in a conflict stormier than
our history had ever known, was it placed high
and supreme, above all dishonor, where God
grant it may rest through all future times!
Six months or more before the momentous
eventto speak more particularly of its
incidents
painters,
printers, engravers, were kept
busily at work in furnishing ensigns of the
most gorgeous colors, placards of an unrivalled
magnitude of text, and badges of the greatest
possible plausibility for house-tops, fences, and
button-holes. The whole intellectual activity
the literature of the country, for the time,
seemed to take a political form. Epics yielded
to long narrative speeches; elegies were
superseded
by dolorous articles on hard times in the
newspapers; Tom Moore was forgotten amid
the sweeter melodies of Tippecanoe and
Tyler too; mathematical science was
concentrated
on the framing of election returns; and
biography assumed the form of very lifelike
and racy sketches of the characters of the
various
candidates for office.
But more particularly was great industry
displayed
in the department of song-writing. So
melodious an era was probably never before
known in the whole history of the world. The
ballad of old Bishop Percy, the lay of the
Minnessingers
,
the rondean, the ode of Pindar and
Dryden, were completely eclipsed by the race of
improvising minstrels that suddenly sprung into
existence in every quarter of the land.
Impromptu
was the rule of composition, and the
bards chanted whatever the gods inspired on
the spur of the occasion. They did not weary
themselves with preliminary studies, with
currycombing
Pegasus, and training and
caparisoning
him, with great show and outlay of labor,
for the Parnassian journey. Not they! On
the contrary, they stood up right manfully on
the first barrel that presented, and proceeded
instantly to do the task allotted. They did not
cudgel their skulls for fine conceits or
high-flying
fancies; the first word that came was as
good as Homer or Tyrtaeus, and they chanted
on, singing and composing in a breath; and if
what they uttered fell into metre, so much the
better; if not, a thousand or two good
bellowing
voices roared the chorus through
triumphantly
,
and bore it beyond criticism.
Among other things worthy of note, the
principle
of association seemed during the recent
canvass to have suddenly acquired an astonishing
force. The ordinary political gatherings and
committees
could not satisfy the gregarious
propensity
.
Every possible kind of club was formed.
A fraternal, a family feeling sprung up among
politicians, and they were no longer to be seen
singly, but always in troops and herds of
hundreds
or thousands. Among these, visits were
passed in a truly excellent social spirit; New
York making a journey of a hundred miles to
interchange salutations with Dutchess county;
and gentlemen assembling under the delicate
designation of Butt-Enders in Brooklyn or
Williamsburgh, exposing their exquisite
persons
to the fatigues of a ride of twenty miles or
more to their brethren on the island, the
Molly-hogs
of Patchogue.
The democratic tendency of the times was
humorously betrayed in the ornithological and
other designations which these clubs, in their
baptismal fervor, saw fit to take to themselves.
Leaving the national bird, the eagle (who may
be supposed to have not a few aristocratic and
monarchical qualities), in the clear upper air,
they assumed, as the most hideous emblem they
could fix upon, the great, stupid staring owl,
the
Strix Cunicularia
, or burrowing owl of
Bonaparte, and under his characteristic
auspices
,
filled the night with their dreadful
screeches
and uproar. Rivalling these in happiness
of title were the gentlemen of the hyna club,
who gave the world to understand, by this
designation
,
that the fury and savageness of their
partisanship were by no means to be called in
question. Then there were the civilized and
Christian worthies, who, laboring under a
terrible
propensity to employ their lungs, and who,
taking pleasure in affrighting quiet citizens by
the strength of their clamors, carried on their
trade under the style and appellation of
Roarers
.
To these are to be added Unionists,
Faugh-Ballagh boys, the political hussars of the
rank and file, Tips, North-benders, and a legron
more of rare, curious, and felicitous description.
For a time the community seemed to have
lapsed into the barbarism of the original
inheritors
of the soil, and to be striving to restore,
for a season, the old Indian divisions into tribes
of every possible, bloody, and ferocious
designation
.
Some even had their war-whoop in
true Indian style, and could give it with a truth
and energy which satisfied all within hearing,
of their genuine claim to the savage and
barbarian
character they had playfully assumed.
Others, as we have elsewhere hinted, chanted
heathen and outlandish ditties, with an effect,
which a Mohawk or Seminole melodist might
have pined to rival.
Let no man suppose, from this light and
cheerful view of the subject, that we regard
the recent contest with any other feelings than
such as deep reverence and respectful
consideration
prompt. We look upon a general
election like that through which we have just
passed, as the great act of national supremacy
We listen to its verdict as to the voice of a
nation
by no means feeble, by no means
dishonored
,
by no means impaired or cast down. We
take heed of it as the high periodical trial of
the constitutional strength and the popular
intelligence
.
No event isno event can be to
us, and to all Americans, nor in truth, rightly
understood, to all the world, of graver import
than this. Here is the earthquake incident to
your boasted foundations; the quadrennial
spasm that shall test the sinew and heart of
your apparent vigor. Let us then, we implore
you, so gird ourselves as to approach these
grand recurring incidents with increased hope
and faith, with increased means of encounter
and triumph. From each conflict with this
eventful occasion, let us come forth unbroken
in strength, by all means; schooled, if it may
be, how to avoid certain errors in its conduct,
certain lapses from the spirit that should be
with us before we enter upon it, and during its
continuance. If possible, let the people, the
mass and general people, be so elevated as not
to need appeals to the eye or the appetite; nor
to require enticing emblems or taking devices
to fix their faith in this party or that. Let us
bring our political strifes more and more to the
broad tests of truth; to expositions of principle,
and to appeals to the sound hearts of
enlightened
thinkers. This can not be done at once. It
can not be effected to-day nor to-morrow.
We do not take it upon ourselves to say that
all emblems and devices are to be condemned
and denounced as mere springs and impostures.
Good hearts and true have been fired, at
memorable
times, to noble actions, by the sight of
stars, or crescents, or meteors, floating over
them; by the hovering wings of emblematical
eagles, or the bronzed rage of visionary lions.
By the peculiar power of the imagination,
such symbols are made to represent, in heroic
brevity, the faith, the valor, the achievements,
the whole glowing features of one's native
land. With gathered force, all that she has
done, perilled, or suffered, enters his warm
heart, and stimulates him to put forth the best
of his strength and manhood. Symbols are
therefore
needed, in a peculiar crisis, where much is
to be wrought at the instant, or where the mind
requires to be raised into a condition of more
than ordinary intensity and force. But civil
government
is no such affair; that is, in a great
measure, a matter of plain sense and deliberate
procedure. Calm and unimpassioned
understandings
are required to construe constitutions, to
examine and discuss questions of
administration
,
and to scrutinize and compare the
characters
of candidates for office. No heroic
ardor
is needed in the performance of these plain
duties. There is no sudden, instantaneous
effect
to be produced, which calls for direct,
dazzling
appeals to the eye or the ear. Time does
not press; months may be taken to form
opinions
,
and months more to act upon them. The
enemy does not stand before you to be cut
down or borne over by one sweep of sabres, or
a single charge of cavalry. He is to be
reached
at a great distance and by circuitous
approaches
.
He is to be conquered by delay,
which matures opinion; and to be wrought
upon by peaceful spells, speaking to him,
reasoning
with him from the little aulic chamber
of the ballot.
It is fair matter of question whether too
much is not staked on this single cast for the
presidency.
Was it intended by the framers of our
constitution
that such extraordinary overwhelming
prominence should be given to the executive
office? That it should be made the object of
intense hope, of agonizing apprehension, as it
now is? On the contrary, if we read aright
the policy of the founders of this government,
it was meant that the whole federal
administration
should advance in a line, occupying an
equal share of the public jealousy and the
popular regards. Events have in some degree
wrested this purpose aside; the personal
character
of some of our chief magistrates, and in
other cases, the incidents of their time, have
caused the general eye to be fixed with too
great anxiety on this single office, and to
associate
with its doings the whole conduct of
government. The president of the United
States is not, should not be the government of the
United States. It is folly and madness so to
regard
him; it is treason and sacrilege for him so
to regard himself. On this point the public mind
has taken a false bias for several years past,
and with monomaniac violence to truth, has
wrought innumerable evils by neglecting the
claims of the other elements of government on
their attention. Standing singly as he does,
the president will at all times attract a large
share of observation and notice; but alone,
unsupported
or discountenanced by other
authorities
,
his power for evil is comparatively slight
and superficial. He can cast arrows of
desolation
into the land; but these failing, the nerve
that impels them home is utterly wanting, and
they fall harmless in the midst of the people.
As recently administered and regarded, the
presidential arm is clothed with thunder, and
whatever bolt is shot forth rattles and blazes
through the whole length of the land,
scattering
dismay, confusion, and ruin. In a tranquil
and regulated view of this office, these things
could not be.
The presidency of these United States is
certainly
a glittering mark; a grand epoch in any
man's career to become an historical
personage
,
in the same noble line with Washington
and Adams. But is not the ambition of our
greatest intellects too much directed to this
point? Is not this office regarded too much as
the only supreme station of honor and renown?
To be chief magistrate of twenty-six sovereign
states is a noble pre-eminence; but is it nothing
to be chief Thinker, chief Teacher, or chief
Poet of the same union? Are arms and civil
power to wrest away for ever, from majestic
learning, from passionate truth, from climbing
philosophy, the crown and laurels of the earth?
We trust not. The sword protects, the
truncheon
sustains our chartered privileges as
communities
;
but deeper into the nature of man,
and with a more potent and fruitful energy,
does the voice of the uninaugurated thinker
pierce. He labors at the foundations of
humanity
;
and there discovers hope and charity,
fancy full of earnest dreams that foreshadow
truth, faith in man, reverence, and divine
aspirations
,
without which all government and
social
administration would straightway crumble
into chaos and barbarous disorder.
There are other pinnacles besides the
capitolian
,
which we desire to see occupied. Office
and power dazzle the world for a season, and
shake it with their loud chariot wheels; but
they pass away, and the still small voice of the
printed thought, then unheeded, breaks forth
on the after age with an almost supernatural
clearness and force of utterance. The
statesman
is pursued by shouting and tumultuous
multitudes; while the poor scholar (the
master
and tyrant of his destiny) is strolling in
some far-off silent field with a single friend.
The next generation, perhaps the very next
year, right comes into possession of his own,
and while thousands hang on every breath of
the poet, the poor politician is gone into the
the land of forgetfulness, accompanied only by
the shadow of his renown.
THE FIELD DEATH.
Little
Tom Hubble was a miserable wretch,
a poor, beggarly scamp, and might as well have
been, for all the provision this world made for him
in the way of food, raiment, and lodging, a little
shivering cherub on one of the tombstones, in
the Gowannus churchyard. It is true, Tom
enjoyed
the reputation of living with a flourishing
old grandfather, who thought all the world of
Tom, and who was supposed to do nothing else
all day but contrive projects how he should live
on pudding and poultry, be clad in fine linen
and exquisite broadcloth, and lie down in soft
beds, with the echo of pleasant stories,
narrated
for his special benefit, lingering in his ear
to sooth his lumbers. Tom, however, who
had a way of seeing things that was peculiar to
himself, was pretty well convinced that what
he discovered regularly, three times a day, on
a little pine table in the corner of a small back
kitchen, was a veritable dish of black scraps of
bread, with two or three dry beans straggling
about among them; that the apparel in which
he was allowed to endue his paltry limbs
whenever
he went abroad, was, to be sure, a sort of
gala dress, made up of motley fragments of the
old gentleman's cast-off garments, in various
stages of antiquity and decaybut that his
actual
,
in-door, daily garments, consisted of a
little
more than a small carter's frock, a straw
hat in a state of decline, and a pair of high
boots that served for stockings, pantaloons, and
leggins.
Besides all this, Tom was either so
wonderfully
acute or so miserably stupid, as to discern in
the couch on which these same limbs, so
ignominiously
treated in broad day, were stretched at
night, nothing more nor less than a pallet of
hard straw, in a little cockloft, with a bag of
musty bran by way of a pillow.
Notwithstanding all these little
circumstances
,
Tom's grandfather was accounted and held
by all Gowannus to be a large-souled, spirited old
gentleman, who knew what became his dignity as
the oldest inhabitant and freeholder of that
respectable
village as well as any man, although
he did indulge in one or two trifling
eccentricities
,
which, if they had been known to the said
townspeople, might have materially abated their
respect; one of which was, that the old
gentleman
professed to obtain his household supplies
from sundry friends of his who were in that line
of business in town, and who chose to show the
intensity of their affection for him in this
substantial
way; whereas, the truth was, and this
the old gentleman knew perfectly well, he was in
the habit of stealing over to the city when he
would be least missed, and purchasing, at very
low rates and from very low traders, cheap
articles
in a somewhat decayed and questionable
state of preservation. The other singularity
which tended to blind the sagacious burghers,
was a habit of his (as in the case of poor Tom),
of never presenting himself in public unless in
full costume, and of a very picturesque and im
posing character; consisting of a venerable
white broadbrim, a reverend, wide-skirted, blue
coat, with silver buttons, smallclothes of an
excellent
quality, polished top-boots, and an
emphatic
cane, with a head as white and bald as
that of the old grandfather himself.
Although it will be seen from this that the
astute commonalty and gentry of Gowannus
were in the way of being slightly deluded and
overreached, yet was Tom Hubble inclined to
look upon it all as a pleasant little
entertainment
,
with undress rehearsals in the old house,
and performances in the open airwith the
exception
of the spare diet, and that he thought
hadn't the slightest perceptible flavor of humor
in it, but, on the contrary, was to be held as
extremely dull, barren, and unsatisfactory.
With some such reflections passing through
his mind, Tom sat one morning at his little
pine table, endeavoring to enliven his dry meal
with a few grains of salt that he had brought
in his pocket from an old fisherman acquaintance
of his, upon his scattered beans, when he was
suddenly roused by the old gentleman's
shouting
in his ear, in a very obstreperous voice:
What the devil are you about, boy!
putting
salt on your beans?
Yes, this
is
saltI believe, said Tom,
timidly.
Are you sure it's saltyou young rascal?
roared the old gentleman. Isn't it rock-crystal
powdered, or white sand, or something of that
sort? Come, you had better make it out one
of these two.
It's saltnothing but common table-salt,
reiterated poor Tom Hubble.
Nothing but common table-salt!you
thriftless young vagabond; you talk of it as
familiarly as if you had seen it every day of
your life. You'll be the ruin of me yet, with
your extravagant waysI know you will!
No, I won't, grandfather, said Tom, with
some slight hesitation, as if the boldness of the
old man's prediction had made him a partial
believer in what he propounded.
Yes, you willdon't tell me you won't,
said the cross-grained old gentleman. None
of your won'ts, and shan'ts, and don'ts, and
mustn'ts, with me. Your day's over in this
house, so you may get out as soon as you
choose.
Tom stole a glance at his grandfather, and
then shivered a little; then he took up a crust
in his fingers, shivered a little more, dropped
his crust, and stole another glance; scarcely
knowing where he was, or what he was doing.
I say you may get out of the house!
shouted
the grandfather. Isn't that plain Saxon
English? Get you gone; you have devoured
my substance long enough!
Without allowing Tom any great length of
time to ponder on the true interpretation to be
given to these passages, the old man stepped
forward, kicked over the little pine table,
scattering
the contents of the dish far and wide
over the floor; seized Tom himself by the
collar
,
and dragging him through the outer room,
pushed him swiftly into the street. He then
rapidly closed the door, turned a bolt, and took
his station at a window which looked out upon
poor Tom Hubble, and watched the further
pleasure of that forlorn youth. Poor Tom's
first motion, on finding himself landed in the
street, was to turn about and make a survey of
the edifice, from which it was his impression,
although he was not sure of it, he had just been
summarily ejected. True enough, there it stood,
the same dilapidated, discolored old building,
with which he had been familiar so many years.
Yes, and there in the old window was displayed
a full-length illustration that satisfied him his
construction of the text could not be far amiss.
The truth, then, was, he had been turned out
of his grandfather's house in open day, and there
stood his grandfather, muttering curses, and
raising his hands to heaven in imprecations of
trouble and disaster upon his poor, weak,
childish
head; and what should he do?
Tom's first inclination was to go and drown
himself in a dreary pool, that stood in a cluster
of hemlocks, beyond the hill; then he thought
he would like to fly with the wind into remote
places, deserts, and wildernesses, where he
should be all alone, and never see again the
cruel face of that old grandsire of his. He
ended
by rambling away, like one bewildered, he
knew not whither, only getting farther and
farther
from the village at each step, and
saddening
as he walked. Now and then he paused a
moment, thinking that he had better go back,
and falling on his knees before the old man, beg
his forgiveness with clasped hands and
weeping
eyeshe knew not for whatand find
shelter
once more under the old roof, and try to be
happy in spite of cares, and crosses, and spare
meals; but as he gained the brow of the
upland
,
the good resolution strengthening
momently
within him, he ventured to look back at
the old homestead (the bower of his boyhood),
and there he discovered, through tears that
almost
blinded him, his old grandfather still
standing
,
rigid as a statue, in the window, his bald
head uncovered, and his hands uplifted in the
same fixed attitude of malediction and menace.
This decided him, and he wandered on. He
reached a sunny little meadow beyond the brow,
and there he sat down, and, in spite of his
sorrows
,
could not fail to take note of the little
creatures at his feet; in truth, never were they
more dear to Tom than now that he was
deserted
of all the world. The high-vaulting
grasshopper
was foremost, cutting all sorts of capers
in the air; the solemn cricket was faring to and
fro in his black cloak, like a friar full of
errands
,
through all his little parish of greenland;
toadsyes, toads, as airy and fantastic as
clowns at the circus, were caprioling about in
their spotted jackets; and large bullfrogs,
emerging from the spring, came shambling up
the slope, and with their great eyes stared at
poor Tom, as if they felt very anxious to know
what it was that troubled him.
Thus he straggled about all day, in a kind of
wild dream, made up partly of gloomy images
of the village life he had fled, and partly of
pleasanter fancies drawn from what was about
him. His little heart warmed toward every
fair object that he saw, and he scarcely passed
a tree greener than others without feeling what
happiness there was in this world; and then,
again, as the shadow of old sorrows fell upon
him, it grew as cold and dreary as a stone.
Night was coming on fast; Tom had had no
food all that day; but shelter from the chill air
and the bleak winds he must have, and
accordingly
,
after due thought and pondering, he made
his way with some difficulty into a piece of dark
woods, far off to the southeast; and,
embowering
himself in a thick shade of bushes, he sought
rest for his little, weary limbs.
All that night he lay in the wood, slumbering
a little at times, and then starting up at sight
of strange objects that haunted his dreams; in
truth the whole region seemed, to fanciful little
Tom, to be full of all sorts of wonderful
spectacles
and singular noises. At one time he
thought he heard a lion's roar, away off in a
dismal corner that he recollected passing, and
which, now that he bethought himself, might
have been a veritable lion's lair; and then he
imagined that he discovered up in the twilight
gloom of the tree-tops, great birds of evil omen
brooding and hovering about, and ready to
pounce on him with their hungry talons. About
midnight, however, he was wakened by steps
passing lightly by, and looking forth from his
covert, he discovered a coffin borne on poles by
two men, who seemed dejected as he could
gather from their bowed heads and slow steps,
and to be bearing a burden that was heavy to
their hearts, although light enough it might be
to their mere manly strength. They seemed,
too, to have come from a great distance, and to
have had a gloomy midnight march upon the
highway, for the coffin was covered with dust,
and wet with dew.
This poor child is dead, said one of them,
as they passed, and thanks to God for it!
Her dwelling-place was full of strifes, and
gloom, and sadness; but her grave shall be, I
promise you, one after her own heart!
Do you think we are pursued? asked the
other.
Not at all; not at all! he answered
promptly. He dare not do that! it would be
too great a peril even for him to meet a brother
in this lone wood, by the side of her coffin.
Did she die, then, of a broken heart, as
people say? are you sure of that?
Come with me to-morrow, after she is laid
safely in the earth, he answered, and I will
show you the little window out of which the
poor girl used to lean when it was breaking,
and I'll point to the grass underneath it, where
her warm young tears (God make them fruitful
of remorse to him!) fell, and ask you whether
it is not greener, and taller, and darker too,
than any that grows near the spot. The
young man laid down his end of the bier for a
moment, turned his back upon his companion,
and wrung his hands convulsively together. It
was for a moment only, and resuming his
burden
they hurried on.
This seemed to be a timely lesson preached
to poor little Tom, and one that taught him
how, when the great world is slumbering in
cities and hamlets, when church-towers, and
mighty squares and thoroughfares are asleep,
there is sometimes a deep, restless sadness in
the heart of obscure places, and that men are
tossed, and vexed, and tormented with wrongs
that would keep the world awake, if it but
knew of them.
Tom felt that he was not alone, even in that
dark thicketwhich he had deemed impervious
to the track of manbut that other hearts
were bleeding with his, and that time was
bringing on the funeral company, and the train
of mourners as well there as he could in the
open fields in broad day, or through the
villagestreet
on sabbath afternoons.
When day dawned it wakened through the
wood many cheerful melodies, that had slept
there all night long, and which, had they but
spoken in the darkness and gloom, would have
sounded like angels' voices to the poor boy; but
were now in the broad day no comfort whatever
to him.
He crept forth from his lodging as cheerless
as child well could be; nothing moving in his
mind but a vague desire of returning to the
village, and making good the name he must
have lost by his flight, by casting himself at
the very door-stone of his stern old grandfather,
and imploring him to come forth and take his
life, for charity's sake. With this sharp
anguish at his heart, the boy stood on the brow
above Gowannus, looking at times to the great
city beyond the river, and wondering if in all
its mighty throng there was one poor wretch as
sad, as hungered, and disconsolate as he.
By slow, uncertain, timorous steps, he wound
his way down the slope, and found himself, now
that the morning had grown into a full bright
day, standing in an open field or common in the
very centre of of the village.
Tom's return, quiet and sad as it was,
seemed
to set the little place beside itself; for he
had no sooner planted a foot on the village
ground than the whole region was in an uproar.
Heads were thrust from windows, moping and
mowing and making faces of disdain and anger
at him; fingers were pointed from every
direction
toward his unhappy person, and even the
village children, who should have felt for little
Tom's cares and troubles as if they had been
their own, formed themselves into a mob and
commenced pelting him at a distance, with
stones and dirt.
Tom was no saint, at least no Saint Stephen,
to submit meekly to this species of martyrdom,
and might have avenged himself to his heart's
content on this detachment of his enemies, had
not his turning about to do so, always produced
a very sudden and ignominious dispersion of
the small gentry, who fled pell-mell, crying out
that Tomugly Tom was after them. To be
sure there was a single cheerful ray in this
gloomy hour of Tom's trial, for as he stood, the
centre of all these angry eyes and this shower
of contumely, a poor old fisherman, a sort of
crony of his, came up and accosted him with an
open hand, but having business somewhere or
other not to be neglected, he was compelled to
hurry away, and to leave the little sufferer alone,
with the cold blood rippling about his heart,
like a tide at sea.
After a while the fierce eyes were drawn in,
the admonitory heads ceased to wag, and the
school-bell called the little scholars away, and
Tom, weary and sad, and riveted as it were to
the spot, sat down on a stone, a sort of
horse-block
,
and tried to think over the unlucky
chances of the day, and to sound his own little
heart to learn from it how he had borne
himself
in his troubles; whether as a true-hearted
noble boy, or as a sad fear-naught and
scape-gallows
.
He found nothing there that
reproached
him very sharply; and then he looked about
him to see whether natural objects, such as the
sky, the earth, and the great bay, gave note of
any sudden change, which might have driven
men out of their wits, to treat him thus.
The earth seemed as green and fresh as ever;
the little knolls looked as cheerful, and the
little nooks and valleys as calm and shady.
The sky had certainly lost none of its
brightness
,
but stood there as blue, as serene, and
immovable, as it did the first time he looked up
to it; and there lay the glorious bay, as proud,
as hospitable, as inviting to great ships, as on
the first day it smiled on the Half-moon of
Heinrich Hudson. He did not know that the
old man had caused the town to believe how
that vile off-shoot of his, Tom Hubble, had
smitten him, his old grandsire, and spat upon
him, and fled from him with curses and fiendish
looks, like a little wretch as he was. This
Tom did not know, and so he sat there an
image of silent despair, in the midst of all the
life and bustle of noonday, plunged in deep
thought; when a tall figure, unobserved by
him, glided from an old dwelling behind, and
stealing on him unawares, its arm was
stretched
over his shoulder, and ere he could do more
than discover, in the shadow that fell before
him, one which he knew, from its often before
having stealthily marred his boyish sports and
pleasuresa knife had struck deep into his
unquiet
little heart, and given it rest at once and
forever. Unnoticed by any, the figure glided
back.
Tom's head declined upon his knees without
a gasp or groan; and in that posture the poor
boy's corpse remained through two hours of
high noon, neglected by all, and unapproached.
The grandfather had so darkened the boy's
character, that not a soul would draw near to
the stone where he had been sitting quite as
desolate, but not as haughty and vindictive, as
the sea-eagle on his rock.
At length, as night began to fall, and the
business of the day to pause, attention was
again turned toward the wicked boy; as he
was watched for a long time, and not
discovered
to stir limb or muscle, censures of his
obstinacy
and dreadful temper grew louder and
louder, until the whole village was fairly
embarked
in a swelling chorus of invective and
indignation.
But when some one, more compassionate or
observant than others, suggested that he might
be dead of very shame and grief, or perhaps of
hunger, the village was perfectly astounded,
and lifting up its pious hands, cried out that he
dared not do it; it would be too much for even
him. The dissenter who had evoked all this
clamor, by the audacity of his suggestions, now
advised them to go and see, and as much as
gave out, that if hea sort of professional
watcher at sick-beds in the neighborhood
knew a dead body from a live one, Tom Hubble
was as ready for a shroud as any man, woman,
or child at present in that village. Pricked
and stimulated by the ironical observations of
this gentleman, three or four formed themselves
into a delegation, and waited upon poor Tom,
and found him, true enough, as void of life as
an assistant-preacher or an unfeed attorney;
much to their confusion and wonder.
Everybody
was shocked and smitten aghast with
horror
and amazement, and Tom Hubble's
character
advanced steadily in value as the wonder
grew.
How could it have happened! at noonday,
in our most public street, with a hundred eyes
upon him!
Here was wonderment sufficient for half a
dozen good sized villages; and Gowannus made
the most of it.
The village was, in truth, stunned and
bewildered
;
and somewhat touched at heart too,
notwithstanding its pragmatical conduct toward
poor Tom when living. His good qualities
came up freshly into many a memory; and
little acts of charityof kind consideration for
poor creatureseven the little thefts and
pilferings
from his grandfather's store, to be
bestowed
on houseless, foodless wretches, pleaded
in behalf of the boy's corse, and began to
gather about it something of a romantic and
generous interest.
Some even, now that they remembered all
that he had been, and the cruel death he had
died, with that red gash in his bosom, wept
tears that fell upon his cold heart, and the now
colder stone on which, they now first
unavailingly
called to mind, he had sat for hours that
day, unprotected and forlorn. But who was
poor Tom Hubble's murderer? Where was he
with such lightness of foot, and skill of hand,
and strength of hate, as to have plunged the
knife into a young boy's heart, at broad
noonday
,
unseenyea, even unsuspected? The
news must be given to his poor old grandfather;
and will it not break his heart, much cause of
displeasure as he may think he should harbor
against poor Tom?
Some one was despatched to the old man's
house; and knocked loudly, but no answer;
nor to a second, nor a third knock; and the
messenger, therefore, made his way into the
house of himself.
The first room was empty; but in a back
closet or pantry, removed from the tumult and
noises of the street, he discovered the old
grandfather bent over a dark chest, and plying
his fingers with the utmost speed, in counting
gold and silver coin, which he dropped into the
chest with gloating eyes, and a jingle that
seemed to make his heart jump.
Without heeding the addition to his company,
the old man kept on counting with great
rapidity
and earnestness, and muttering to
himself
,
until the messenger touched him upon the
shoulder, and whispered in his ear that Tom
Hubble was dead!
What say you? cried the old man staring
about him, like one in a dream, Tom Hubble,
my little, darling grandson, Tom Hubble, dead!
It can't be. You are practising on me. When
did he die? Where? How?
To these questions, the messenger could, of
course, return none but vague and
unsatisfactory
answers; at which the old man seemed
very wroth and furious; glaring upon him with
wild eyes, and appearing to regard him as an
idle intruder upon his privacy. Renewing the
questions in a louder and more preremptory
voice, and receiving the same replies, he seized
the unlucky messenger, and, with little ado,
thrust him forth from the house.
The messenger had scarcely returned to the
group gathered about the body of Tom Hubble,
when the old grandfather was descried moving
down upon them with great strides; bearing in
his hand an uplifted stick, and menacing them
at a distance with extreme violence.
As he drew nearer, they retreated from the
spot, and his eyes fell upon the corse, as it lay
stretched upon the rock, with the great red
gash gaping in its breast. For a moment, the
old man paused and looked wildly round, and
then he went and sat submissively down by the
side of the corse, and took its head in his lap,
as if he would call it back to life with
caresses
and mournful smiles. He sat in this way
for more than an hour; the villagers standing
back and gazing on the spectacle with wonder
and pity. He then drew off his old
wide-skirted
coat, cast it upon the boy's dead limbs, and
staggered like one blind or in a bewildering
dream, back to his dwelling.
For a long time the old man's house was still
and noiseless as death itself; the crowd had
gathered again about the fatal spot, when he
was discovered reaching forth from an upper
window of his dwelling, and fastening against
its walls the dead boy's carter's frock, and
presently, above it, the old melancholy straw
hat. He then brought forth from within, a
decayed old saddle, with a pair of rusty
stirrups, and hung them above the window on
a wooden hook; one by one he thus produced
every dilapidated, mouldy, and ruinous
implement
that had laid rotting and mouldering in
corners and closets for half a century, and fixed
it against the wall, until the whole house-side
was covered, like some ancient temple, with
testimonies of famine, close-pinching thrift, and
lean beggary. Inside out, of a truth, was the
old house turned, and every one looked on,
wondering where this phantasy would end.
This display completed with dangling ox-chains
and rusted horse-shoes, there was a pause until
the old man was again seen emerging upon the
roof, shouldering an old square table, and fixing
it on its centre, as for his evening meal;
presently
,
scant provisions followed, and, having
first planted a reel on another corner of the
house-top, he sat down, in view of all
Gowannus
to despatch his thrifty fare. Neglecting
this employment, he would every now and then
start up; at one time busying himself with
great industry in going through the mimicry of
reeling off yarn and winding it in imaginary
balls; at another, carefully shading his eyes
and looking steadily through the Narrows for a
long time, as if on a search for some ship in
which he had a special interest. In this way,
as long as he could be seen, the old man
passed
from freak to freak; and when night came
on he might be discovered for a long time,
stalking back and forth, like an evil spirit,
through the gloom, and filling the whole region
where he walked with an indescribable dread
and wonder.
During all that night watchers sat by the
poor boy's corse, which lay upon the rock rigid
and motionless. The night-dews fell upon
them thick and fast, but they watched on,
knowing how sacred a charge was in their
trust, and feeling how deep indeed, was the
mystery that brooded over the little spot on
which they kept their vigils. Perfect stillness
reigned everywhere, and the village was
sepulchred
in a deep sleep, through which passed
from house to house images of deadly murder,
stern hands upon feeble throats, and stealthy
knives plucking at the life of innocent young
bosoms. But a single light pierced the general
gloom, and that moved restlessly about the
dwelling of the old grandfather, sometimes
showing itself at an upper window, and then
glancing to and fro in the lower chambers of
the house; then it would be interrupted by a
figure passing between, which cast its tall
shadow gloomily over the spot on which the
murdered corse was resting.
The morning brought no light to the mystery,
although it wrought new changes in the
fantasy
of the old man, and seemed to waken in
his brain whatever strange, uncouth, or raging
fancies had been slumbering there during the
night. The moment day dawned he put forth
his head to know of the watchers whether they
had seen a flock of crows pass that way; and
if they should, to ask them back to meals in
his name. A moment after it was again forth,
and he wished them in the Lord's name, and
as they loved him, to catch him a long-nosed
weasel, and hang it on a pole at the end of his
house to scare away goblins and witches. Then,
after getting out at the window, and sitting in
the casement with his legs dangling down for
half an hour or more, he would suddenly start
back, and throwing himself at full length on
the floor, would lie there as if in a torpor for a
long space. In the mean time the preparations
for the boy's funeral proceeded, all in the open
air, for among other freaks the old man had
denied it entrance, standing at his door and
raising his hands with a wild look against the
bearers; but when it was laid cleanly and
silently on the bier, and was ready to be borne
to the grave, he rushed forth, and seizing one
end of the tressels, vowed that he would carry
the child to his burial.
All along the way some mad antic or other
escaped him, which would seem to denote that
his brain had been shattered by the poor boy's
dreadful death; none venturing to cross his
wildness, withheld either by fear or reverence
of his sorrowful age. At one time he would
arrest the procession in mid career, and stay it
till he could pluck up long blue grass and
bunches of field clover to cast upon the
coffin; and then clutching it up, he would
hurry forward at such a pace as to throw
the whole train into disorder and strange
confusion
.
When at length they had reached the grave,
the old man, dropping his end of the burden
with such suddenness as to nearly overturn the
coffin, stepped hastily forward, and bidding the
diggers stand aside, struck the spade deep in
the earth, and plying it swiftly, soon finished it
to its very bottom.
This done, he drew back; and the attendants
who had stood apart regarding him in wonder
and surprise, approached and lowered the coffin
gently to its appointed place, which was scarce
accomplished, when the old man again
stepped
swiftly forward and cast a huge stone down
into the grave; giving them to understand that
it was an anchor which would steady the coffin
in the earth until judgment-day, when it would
surely have its doom. The grave was speedily
filled, the turf duly levelled, and the company,
saddened and amazed at all they had seen,
turned
away, leaving the grandfather standing hard
by alone.
The last time they looked back from the
highway, they discovered the old man walking
rapidly to and fro along the grave, and
stamping
at times with savage fury on the earth, as
if he regarded the poor boy buried there as his
deadliest foe!
THE SCHOOL-FUND.
Looking
directly at the heart of the subject,
we must frankly confess, that no question of
greater moment has arisen among us than the
recent application of the Roman church for a
portion of the joint school-fund of this state and
city, for the use of eight Catholic schools,
governed
according to the creed and discipline of
that religious body. The petitions for this
purpose
have been addressed to our city council;
have been discussed and argued before them at
great length; and now that the case is fully
before us, the grounds of this remarkable
application
seem to be these:
First; a want of confidence on the part of
the petitioners in the Public School Society of
this city, and in their mode of conducting the
business of education in the schools in their
charge.
Secondly; a desire to procure from the
municipal
government, an appropriation of funds
for the support of schools for the education of
Catholic children, who could not be
conscientiously
intrusted to the teaching of the common
schools now in use.
The want of confidence in the School Society
is enforced by charges of incompetency;
treachery
in the performance of their trust;
causing
the pupils to become untractable,
disobedient
,
and even contemptuous, toward their
parents
unwilling
to learn anything of religion
as if they had become illuminated, and could
receive all the knowledge of religion necessary
for them, by instinct or inspiration.
A further topic under this prominent head,
appears to consist in the regret of the
petitioners
that there is no means of ascertaining to
what extent the teachers in the schools of the
society
carried out the views of their principals, on
the importance of conveying early religious
instruction (which the petitioners modestly
represent as heretical and infidel) to the
susceptible
minds of the children. That is to say,
as we understand it, the petitioners feel quite
competent, in one of their accusations, to
decide
as to the minutest results of the
instruction
given in common schools; namely, that it
fabricates fanatics, zealots, and little Lutheran
dogmatists; and in another, immediately at its
heel, and just as open to inspection, they are
stone-blind, and capable only of giving
utterance
to a very profound inuendo. The
petitioners
had the good fortune to hit upon
another
capital topic of declamation, and we blame
them for not making more of it.
It is suggested that the common school
system
is a dreadful thing for the children of the
poor; yea, it is artfully contrived, the
petitioners
believe, to deprive them of the benefits of
education! The poor, therefore, as the
petitioners
very ingenuously argue, naturally and
deservedly, withdraw all confidence from it.
What a gold-mine is this that we have struck
upon
in the very centre of Zahara, the very last
place in the world where one would be looking
for ingots and solid wedges of the precious
metal
!
How this argument in behalf of the poor
the children of the poorrings on the tongue!
It has the true jingle, there can be no doubt of
that; and we are surprised that Messieurs, the
petitioners, have not displayed more activity in
circulating it. Holding ourselves subject to
their supreme displeasure, as clippers of true
coin, we must state a fact or two as to this
very remarkable withdrawal of the confidence
of the poor.
The whole number of children between five
and sixteen in the state of New York, in 1837,
was five hundred and thirty-nine thousand
seven
hundred and thirty seven; and the number
instructed, five hundred and twenty-eight
thousand
nine hundred and thirteen; leaving a mere
fraction of a fiftieth or sixtieth uninstructed
throughout the whole state. Coming nearer to
the question, we find that of sixteen thousand
children taught at the public schools in this
city, one thousand four hundred and
eighty-eight
,
or about one tenth, are the children of
laborers; one thousand four hundred and
sixtyone
,
or nearly another tenth, are the children
of widows; nine hundred and forty-five,
shoemakers
;
five hundred and two, cabinet-makers;
four hundred and sixteen, masons; five
hundred
and seventy-nine, tailors; four hundred
and ninety-three, blacksmiths; while of
clergymen
there are but thirteen; of doctors,
forty-four
;
lawyers, twenty-five; and sundry
personages
who see fit in census-tables, tax-gath
erers' books, and subscription-lists, to return
themselves
gentlemen
, are responsible for twenty
six. These figures convey, we trust, a quiet
rebuke to the petitioners, which should not be
lost on them, unless they are determined to be
deaf to the despotic voice of simple addition.
We come now to the second topicthe
teaching
of the children of the petitioners can not be
conscientiously intrusted to the common schools.
This charge is of the true Janus complexion;
at one time it is alleged that the common
schools are infidel, utterly void of religion; at
another, they are ultra-Protestant; now Janus
wheedles us with the great length and
demureness
of his Quaker or Presbyterian
physiognomy
;
and then he alarms and terrifies us
horribly
by the distortions and grimaces of his hard,
unbelieving countenance. Shifting and
turning
,
and winding itself out of this syllogism
into
that; taking now one disguise, and now
another, we confess we can discover in the
whole of this application, nothing but a
zealous
,
obstinate, and persevering purpose of using
the public money for the furtherance of a
certain
class of religious tenets, and the
advancemen
by the most strenuous agency, of the
interests
of an ecclesiastical corporation. It is, or
appears to be, their conviction, that there can
be, and their determination that there shall be,
no schools without distinct religious beliefs
without their creed, their paternoster, their
surplice, and their basins of holy water.
There is a class of people, we are aware, to
whose imaginations man can never present
himself without his prayer-book, his collection
of psalms, and his Sunday hat. It is
impossible
for them, by an unfortunate law of their
nature, to contemplate him in any other than
his strictly religious and pew-holding character.
This, it seems to us, is narrow and unjust.
There is a world outside of the walls of the
sanctuary. There are many acts into which
religion does not, can not enter. There can
be no doctrinal truth in the structure of a clock
though it may moralize as wisely as the best
homilist of them all; and but a slight portion
of evangelical spirit in a pair of honest
household
bellows, for instance, although its lungs
may blow as round a blast as any divine in the
land. There is no such thing known among
the plain, homely people of every-day life, as
Catholic carpenters, or Presbyterian bottlers of
beer, or Swedenborgian makers of windmills.
One of Dr. Nott's stoves would dispense, we
imagine, no more heat to an heretical
Romanist
,
fire-deserving though his sins might be,
than to a sturdy and conscientious
Congregationalist
of the true orthodox complexion; nor
do we think that Professor Olmsted's patent
would exhibit a greater alacrity in consuming
a dissenting Baptist, than a full conforming
Churchman.
It is the purpose of the common schools to
create
citizens and not Christians. Citizen is a
lower
degree, it may be, in the same school with
Christian; and out of the wise and just
performance
of social dutyof obligation to men
in communitiesmay spring, in due season, the
higher order of sacred, Christian character.
The Christian includes the citizen; but who is
it that tells us, because this child, this little
creature of the public goodness, has not been
born with the vision of an angel he shall not
be allowed to see at all; that unless his little
eyes are made to look direct down the
optical-glasses
of this orthodoxy or that orthodoxy, he
shall lie in the cradle of a helpless and idle
imbecility
all his life?
In this great question, the community,
imbodying
itself in all its majesty and collected
force, has a voice above all sects, all
dominations
,
powers, and principalities. It demands
for itself life without discord; it pleads for
peace, free from controversies and schisms
that the great heart may be calm and serene,
whence issue the social currents by which its
children are nurtured and sustained.
It is not pretendedthere is no charge against
the School Society, as Mr. Hiram Ketchum
suggests
that
it has not performed the duty of
furnishing a good, common, ordinary, literary
educationthat it has not given what it was
bound to givethat it has not enabled the
children
to read, and write, and cipher. The
petitioners
demand more. Their ambition is not
to be squared and measured by the ambition,
humble and just though it be, of the other free
citizens of this state. They clamor for higher
nutriment; they stand on tiptoe, above all their
fellow-citizens, aspiring to catch glimpses of a
celestial sapience denied to the vision of the
little scholars, and the adult trustees of the
public school. Yea, it would appear from one
view of the subject, as we have already
suggested
,
that the petitioners desire to have their
peculiar religious tenets taught and disseminated
at the public cost; that they claim the peculiar,
and, in this country, extraordinary privilege,
of dipping into the state treasury for the
support
and furtherance of an ecclesiastical
establishment
.
They knew that the constitution of the
land, the spirit of free institutions, stood between
them and their object, and yet they push forward
with all the vehemence of clamorous
memorials
,
popular excitements, and public meetings,
toward its attainment. Why, then, this urgency
of petitions? They must have sought, it seems
to us, one of two results. Either, firstly, the
success
of their application, from the show of
numbers
by which it was countenanced, in the very
face of all constitutional objections; or,
secondly
,
the disruption of the entire school
system
,
not only here, but throughout the state, by
means of a plausible outcry against its actual
or assumed abuses. No false motive may have
mingled in the attempts by which these results
were to be accomplished. The petitioners may
have been sincere, honest, patriotic. That we
leave with God and their own secret thoughts.
For the wilful violator of our constitution and
established liberties, there is but one answer,
and that is to be had in the field; but we pity
with the regard of a steady and sincere
commiseration
,
the man or set of men who would,
in sober reason, attempt by any means, or
under
any assumption whatever, to disband the
five hundred and forty thousand youth of this
state, who receive instruction at the public
schools; who could look calmly on, while the
heat of an intolerant zeal was dissolving the
bands that knit them together into one large,
innocent, and growing company; and could see
them turning sorrowfully away from the old
district schoolhouse, where some hope, some
little
ambition, had begun to dawn upon their
minds, back to the squalid hut, or the cheap
farmhouse, or the dark alley, from which all
such hope, all such ambition, must be
henceforth
excluded for ever!
We hear much of conscientious scruples, in
this discussion. To what purpose has
conscience
just now become nice and scrupulous?
What portentous shape hath the goblin taken
just at this time to shake its delicate fibres?
Reading, writing, and the use of the globes!
The little mimic ball, that humbly represents
our planet, swarms with direful hieroglyphics;
the twenty-six letters have formed themselves
into a terrible regiment of black dragoons, and
the unpretending school-slate, is one of the
devil's cards in this profound game that is
played to ensnare consciences and entrap the feet
of the unwary. We can not say that we feel an
extraordinary respect for any man whose
conscientious
scruples are found travelling on this road;
22
we are rather inclined to commend him to a dark
lantern and the crutch of an octogenarian.
Daylight and a swift pace, that keeps abreast
of social rights, are no pleasures of his.
Conscience, sitting serenely in the breast of
man, sagacious and austere, and lifting her
teriole
front against whatever debases, obscures,
or mars the soul, inherits a noble realm of duty
from which she can not be drawn to do
task-work
for hire, or favor, or the furtherance of a
doubtful cause. She inspires scruples that
speak out, in very audible tones, against the
oppression of tyrants, the crafts of priests, the
violences of wicked men, and not against the
rights and immunities of humble children,
pensioners
on our bounty and justice for a few
words of healthful knowledge. Doth conscience
stand in the portal, rebuking common schools?
What is there in all their wise and plain
operations
at which she can be justly affronted? The
common school recognises a God, a conscience,
and Savior; a Being that holds the ends of the
wide universe together; a tribunal that
arraigns
the crimes and vices of men; and a
mediator
,
pleading and interceding between the
two. A Creator and a judicial spirit within us,
all men will admit; and if any say they can
not take cognizance of the great head of the
Christian church, to them we make answer, in
a merely secular view of the case, that it is
through the imagination the heart is purified;
and whenever they can present to our
contemplation
a nobler, lovelier image, and one more
likely to arrest the regards of a wise and pure
soul, we will, if the sternness of their exactions
so require, have our Savior depart from the
consecrated school-room, and hail with joy and
earnest acclamation the advent of the glorious
substitute.
We are not the apologists of the system of
common schools. We are not even advised
that it needs apologists or advocates. If it has
errors and defects, let them be amended and
removed; but unless objections to it more
manly
,
and cogent, and more consonant to what has
been considered the spirit of American
institutions
,
than those urged by the petitioners in
this ill-advised and unwarranted application
can be advanced, we say, let it stand, grounded
as the pyramids. Let it spread its wide base
until it embraces the utmost verge of society;
let its foundations be struck deeper and deeper,
until they shall be known to rest on the great
heart of the community; and let its turrets and
its summoning towers ascend until they are lost
in a tranquil sky, objects of steady admiration,
exciting hope, and cheerful regard to all people
that lie in their shadow, and within sound of
the tuneful voices that echo from their walls!
THE SCHOOL FUND AGAIN.
It
is the business of zealots and sectaries,
as all the world knows, to be on the constant
hunt and look-out for a vantage-ground, for
some little plot of the wide domain of passion
and prejudice, that may be reclaimed for
private
culture and advantage. This purpose is
accomplished, sometimes clandestinely,
sometimes
by creating an issue, in which they cause
themselves, by a melo-dramatic dexterity of
posture and aspect, to be regarded as maligned
and persecuted. The tactique of the gentlemen
in questionthe humble petitioners for a
portion
of the school fund of New Yorkseems,
however, to lie in the assumption of a tone and
attitude of perpetual demand and requisition;
to be constantly claiming, and in no very feeble
or doubtful tone, some right or privilege that is
their due, and which, so they protest and
asseverate
,
it is a burning shame they are kept out
of. They begin, perhaps, moderately enough;
they object, it may be, at first, merely to a
shoe-tie. The tie isn't in very good taste, it
must be confessed, and had better be altered;
and so it is, to oblige the projector. Then you
must change the fashion of your hat, the cut
of your coat. Then they get a degree closer,
and require that you shall not wear your natural
hair, but a bob-wig of their contrivance, and
for which they hold a patent. Next, they would
have you sway your body, thus and so, when
you see a gentleman in a white gown, and
hear him reciting something out of the heathen.
They next require of you to be a little more
guarded in your language; not to make quite
so free with your spiritual superiors, and to
bear in mind what is written in the fathers,
or in a certain tract that they can mention,
concerning the authority of those holding from
the Pontiff. Then they would like to have you
conform your mindan easy metaphysical
procedure
to
the received doctrines, dogmas, and
creeds of the church; and in the event of your
declining to adjust your thoughts by the
standards
placed before them, you are invited out
one clear sunshiny morning to take a ramble
(with a goodly retinue of attendants and
bodyguard
at your heels) to one of the public
squares, pronounced a knave and a heretic in
the face of day, and ere you can fairly discover
what it's all about, they have given you over
to the devil, and you are roasting and crackling
in the flame, as merrily as a Christmas pig.
How is this extraordinary consummation
effected? Simply by considering you as an
idiot, without a soul or a conscience; quietly
setting aside all your common-sense notions, as
surplusage and impertinence; and by claiming
for themselves the most refined sense of right
and wrong, the most scrupulous and delicate
moral convictions. It is an ordinary trick of
self-seekers in society to secure to themselves
immunities and privileges, by professing an
extraordinary squeamishness of stomach, which
relucts at anything less delicate than the
bird's rump; a nervous dislike of draughts,
which embowers them comfortably between
ladies on a sofa; a constitutional susceptibility
of vision, which is offended at the glare of
numerous
lights, and which carries them home to
bed as soon as the oysters and game are out of
the way. These gentlemen always labor under
the heavy affliction of conscientious scruples;
constitutional impediments to enjoyment. Of
agitation, they make a religious duty, part of a
religious system. By constantly disturbing and
alarming the community, they at length acquire,
over its pursuits and objects, the influence
which is conceded, out of mere weariness and
physical exhaustion, to men of a restless and
troubled temperament.
The present application is the boldest
attempt
,
within our knowledge, on the part of a
religions body, to interfere with our municipal
affairs. The effort to procure a portion of the
common school fund for private and sectarian
uses, is nothing else than an invasion of the
educational police, as it may be properly called,
of the metropolis; an attempt to break down
one of the strongest muniments that law and
civil order have erected in our midst.
This is, in all probability, as resolute an
effort as ever can be made to secure an
appropriation
of the fund for improper objects. The
original petition strikes clearly home at the
purpose in view; it was supported and enforced
by some of their most ingenious and skilful
debaters
;
and emanated from a body, whose
numbers
authorize them to say, that one third of
the vagrant children, defrauded of instruction
by the plan of the school society, are theirs;
and who will, therefore, rest content with
nothing
less than a leonine division of the booty.
The fund, the fund in a currency of their own
they will even name the very marking of the
billsapplied as they choose to requirethey
will have or nothing.
Through every thoroughfare, you will see
hordes of little, tattered, unhatted creatures;
the very champions of raggedness, whose
flag-like
garments flutter in every wind, and
proclaim
the triumph of a natural instinct for
streets and open yards, over the seductions of
tasks and school-rooms; these are the
parishioners
of the good Roman bishop, who vindicated
their condition as one infinitely above the
artificiality
and heathenism of a public school.
Joyous, rampant, with all the little smiling
seeds of heroic viciousness, lurking in their
young bosoms, ready one day to bear the fruit
of the stealthy or the bloody hand, and to
blossom
in dark alleys and by-ways, where crime
patrols day and night; this is a more pleasing
field of contemplation, than walls darkened
with alphabetic characters, teachers, that, at a
given stipend, inculcate infinite heresy, without
so much as knowing it, with a comfortable
climate
,
of stoves in winter, and sunny holydays
between schools, out of doors in summer.
Is it necessary to teach infidelity? asks
the Right Reverend advocate of the petitioners,
before the common council. It does not
require
the
active
process. To make an infidel,
what is it necessary to do? Cage him up in a
room, give him a secular education, from the
age of five years to twenty-one, and I ask you
what he will come out, if not an infidel?
Between these trowsered and turbaned little
Turks without, and the rank and obnoxious,
but, at the same time, well-taught and
clean-apparelled
infidels within, we admit it may be
a sore trial to choose; but we must be allowed
to confess, with due deference to the good
bishop, that if he be right in his view of
secular
education, and in insisting, that the state
should contribute to a proper religious training
of her youth in sects; we are forced to confess
that our government stands on no foundation
whateverrather on a foundation of rolling
stonesand that the first tolerably muscular
arm pressed against it, must, of necessity,
throw it clean over, and tumble it among the
rubbish of decayed states and mis-governed
empires
.
If there can be no secular education,
there can be no state.
In sober truth, we do not consider it
necessary
to inquire, at present, whether religion is
an essential element of a complete and mature
education. We oppose the petition, simply on
the ground that it seeks to convert a tax, laid
by the state or city government, to a religious
and sectarian object.
If the public school society, as is asserted,
were a monopoly; if it be irresponsible to the
people; if it fail to educate the children of the
poor, it could not affect the view of the
question
which we feel bound to take. All these
considerations would operate most powerfully
in procuring a reform of the school system in
this city, but are by no means arguments that
a corporation (one employing a public fund for
religious objects) of a still more obnoxious
character should be erected.
On this distinct position should all
applications
of the kind be met. It seems to us
almost
waste of time, to inquire into the matter
more nicely. That the present application has
been listened to calmly; met in protracted
sessions
of the city council and the state senate,
by able men, in careful debate, and at length
allowed to become a question in nominating
committees, are proofs of patience and liberal
forbearance, that could scarcely have been
expected
from the supposed eagerness and haste
of our American temper.
If the whole organization of the public
school society is to be changed, because it does
not square with the idiosyncracy of a certain
class of citizensa minority, in point of
numbers
,
a miserable entity in tax-paying capability
why should not our entire municipal condition
be changed?
The Jews, and with very great show of
justice
,
too, may insist on keeping open shop on
Sunday; cause a session of aldermen to be
called at the hall, to consider some pressing
grievance; order the omnibuses out (for one or
two of them may seek to go a journey to
Chelsea
),
and fall into a horrible ferment should all
other citizens decline to take down their
shutters
and proceed to their avocations. The
Quakers will at once, and rightly enough,
disband
the military companies. The
Cameronians
or Covenanters, will destroy the
ballot-boxes
and have no voting under a government
which does not publicly recognise the Christian
religion. The Seventh-day Baptistscoming
a little in conflict, it must be admitted, with
their Hebrew brethrenwill insist that the
omnibuses
be all laid up; the drivers taken down
from their seats, and put away in a mow or
manger, to enjoy their sabbath slumbers; would
send the city fathers home to apparel
themselves
in a garb suited for church and the grave
duties of the diaconate; and have every
bow-window
made close as a tomb. Nay, further;
we can not see why the face of the city itself
should not be subjected to constant changes, to
accord with the temper or whim of any
projector
,
if only sufficiently clamorous, whatever. The
conscientious mathematician may demand that
our public squares shall all be laid out in
octagons
and rhomboids; the oil-dealer, of an
expansive
soul, may suggest the doubling of the
public lights, and a revival of the exploded
custom
of embellishing the mayor's residence with
a pair of lamps; the delicate-minded tailor,
insist
that the city watchmen shall be put on the
patrol in gaiters, and the latest Parisian
curvetailed
coats; then, the architect, pricked by
scruples of conscience, may say that there is
no religion in square church-towers, and cry
out, with a lusty throat, for pointed spires, with
the good gilt ball and weather-vane at top.
There is reason, truth, urgency, in these
latter
,
as well as in the earlier requirements; but,
casting down the Public School Society, in
place of the old, disorderly pagan-breeding
organization
,
what system is to be substituted?
And how are the objects of a new mission to be
accomplished?
They are to be effected by depriving the
present system, in New York, of its character
of universality, and exclusiveness, and by
opening
it to the action of smaller masses, whose
interests and opinions may be consulted in their
schools, so that every denomination may freely
enjoy its `religious profession' in the education
of its youth.
[7]
[7]
Report of the Secretary of State upon memorials
from the City of New York, respecting the distribution
of the Common School moneys in that city, referred to
him by the Senate.Albany, April 26, 1841.
The secretary, the coryphus of the new
order
of things, would fain map out the
metropolis
into an infinite number of little plots and
subdivisions, each with a characteristic
religion
and discipline, under the governance of
its own priests and teachers; here a little
scarlet
patch of Romanists, there a blue one of
Presbyterians; a water-tinted subdivision for
the Baptists, a sable plot for the African
freeholders, a deep red and perdition-colored
section for the favorers of endless
punishment
.
Now, does this learned gentleman, does any
citizen, of a taxpaying respectability of
understanding
,
imagine that a community so diverse
and heterogeneous, could, by possibility, hold
together a twelvemonth? could last even
through a single charter election?
There is no ground on which a community
stands so comfortably together, as that of a
common system of education for the mass; and
whoever, by whatsoever indirection, would
abolish or remove this, is, in truth, an enemy
to society, and virtually proclaims the law of
his own will and interest superior to the
general
welfare.
By what lines Mr. Spencer proposes to
distinguish
and separate his imaginary districts of
conscientious friends of education, we are at a
loss to conjecture. There are to be parishes,
nice, charming sections and sub-sections,
occupying
a certain breadth or square dimension of
the metropolis, in which the nervous advocates
of sectarian instruction are to enjoy the
advantages
of the new system; to elect their own
officers; to select their own teachers; and to
take to themselves the immeasurable luxury of
school-books, in which Ignatius Loyola and
Csar Borghia are, as is proper, always spoken
of in respectful terms. But let us consider, if
one of the new academies dominates over a
certain
tract of city ground, it draws into its fold
all that fall within its bounds; but are we
sure they will come? May there not be, now
and then, a stubborn recusant, a headstrong
Protestant, perhaps, in a Catholic
school-diocese
(set apart by the most dexterous and
accurate
survey of the secretary), who can not be
made to understand exactly why his child
should be taught to believe in the pope because
the Romanist is so delicately conscientious as
to withdraw his faith from the old public school
system. The Protestant may claim his right to
swear by the public school society, quite as
strenuously as his Catholic friend to invoke the
Virgin, and to say yea and nay by the
paternoster
.
Who shall run lines for the secretary, so as
to bring in all that are of a mind, and nicely
avoid striking anywhere against prejudices,
religious
whims, or, so called, conscientious
scruples?
If that society had charge of the children of
one denomination only, says the secretary,
there would be no difficulty. It is because it
embraces children of all denominations, and
seeks to apply to them all a species of
instruction
which is adapted only to a part, and which,
from its nature, can not be moulded to suit the
views of all, that it fails, and ever must fail, to
give satisfaction on a subject, of all others, the
most vital and the most exciting.
This seems to us involve the fatal
misapprehension
(to call it by its best name), on which
the application for a division of the fund is
founded, namely, the notion that the Public
School Society is, or should be, a religious
corporation
.
Now, its objects and purposes, if
we understand them at all, are expressly
secular
.
Other they could not be, unless in direct
contravention of our whole social compact.
With such a view of their duty, we could have
no school system, either district or
metropolitan
.
The state can not know religion, save in
one or two cardinal acts of worship, in its
public
conduct. But it can and will apprehend
social
necessities, that operate as links and
ligaments
in holding the community together. An
education, essentially and primarily secular, is
one of these. An important aim in any system
of instruction provided by the state, would be to
furnish a mass of ideasa platform of general
informationon which all could meet in
harmony
,
and with a perfect concordance of
sentiment
and opinion.
That our government is republican, would
be one of these; that it is a government of
opinion, and not of superior strength and force,
another; that it is a government allowing the
widest liberty of thought and utterance,
within
the limits of good order, is another and vital
sentiment.
That there was a council of Nice once; that
Martin Luther bearded the pope (although an
important historical circumstance); that
Cranmer
was burned; that the Geneva model of
church government was first recommended to
the Scotch in 1560, it cares nothing. The
moment
it listened to narratives like these, it
would lose its dignity and character as a state,
and would become, from that time forth, either
a religious commonwealth, which is quite
doubtful, or, most probably, a field of furious
encounter, in which bigot would hunt down
bigot, and sectary fly at the throat of sectary,
with all the spirit and animation that belong to
controversial feuds.
All that remains for the state to do,
therefore
,
is to waive away, with a mein of majestic
rebuke, conscious of the grave charge intrusted
to her hand, all that would fain approach her,
either in menace or supplication, for favors
that conflict with this. This is the highest and
noblest favor she can confer on her children.
To give them the best, the purest secular
instruction
in her power, free from all taint of
injustice
or unkindness, toward this class or that;
subject, of course, to whatever of frailty and
uncertainty in attaining its objects, is incident
to whatever is human. Let her not be for a
moment lured aside from the great path of duty
she is pursuing. Her march is on the open
highway; and however pleasing or attractive
may be the pastures of a selecter and diviner
knowledge, offered to her view by the magic
lights of one school or another of philosophers,
self-seekers, or truly good Christians, let her
keep on her way, moving along with an ear
and an eye, quick and apprehensive, for
whatever
belongs to her character as a state, but
deaf and unseeing, where any would presume to
make of her a gatherer of tithes, or an umpire
between contending sects.
THE UNREST OF THE AGE.
Ours
is the age of suicide and mysterious
disappearance. Some Jacob May or other
going
forth on a plain mercantile enterprise,
thinks proper, for his private sport and
entertainment
,
to hide himself for a season from the
search of his friends; puts the police on the
look-out; causes the river to be dragged;
creates
a horrible tumult of newspaper
paragraphs
all over the country; and, finally, turns
up some quiet morning, walking the streets of
New York or Philadelphia as placidly as if
nothing had happened.
The truth is, custom and social usage sit
hard upon men; and they strive to escape
from them by every possible device and
self-delusion
.
Some fly off into remote countries,
and wander over deserts and burning sands to
be free; others penetrate into remote seas, and
sit down by shores where the tyranny is more
tolerable because it wears a different garment
and gayer crown. Others find relief in wild
speculation; in schemes for forming society
into
parallelograms or rhomboids, and in
contriving
theories by which men shall get along
without
any society or organization whatsoever.
Others
again, can not trust themselves alone, and are
scared mightily if they are discovered moving
in any enterprise without the approval of
multitudes
.
The restless spirit of the age separates
men, on the one hand, into units, and makes
them solitary and discontented; or gathers them,
on the other, into noisy and tumultuous masses,
shouting for change, reform, and progress. The
world lives abroad, and is not to be found at
home oftener than once a week, and then only
if the weather is blusterous and turbulent
without
.
The domestic feelinghouseholdsare in
a measure abrogated, and men are to be found
at clubs, lectures, conventicles, and other
public
gatherings. The action is all external and
superficial; and the heart of society, the
private
home, has, in a considerable measure lost
its life, and ceases to supply the vital
circulation
which society so much needs. The great
number of violent deaths proves that the
soothing
influences of home and kindred are not felt
as they should be.
Men can not keep hands from themselves.
They wreak upon their own persons the
wrongs and restless violence of the age, and
take vengeance with the summary knife or
cord on the disastrous spirit that rules the
times. The blood of self-slaughter cries out on
every hand; nothing, it would seem, can arrest
its flowing. Peace and prosperous fortune can
not stay the deadly hand; pleading wives and
children appeal to it in vain, and religion
itself
stands dumb and awe-stricken in presence
of the ghastly demon of suicide.
Men struggle with it, and wander up and
down streets, and by the side of calm rivers,
but the perturbed spirit will not rest. The
monster can not be foiled, but must have his prey.
They fall on their knees, calling great God
to help them quell the devilish thought; but it
triumphs like a fate. They stagger before
mirrors
and glasses, to know if the sight of a
human
countenanceeven their own, in this
moment
of terrible delusioncan not shame the
fiend or scare him back. The next moment
his unhappy dupe lies weltering in blood,
with a prayerbook, perchance, grasped in his
struggling hand, opened at the page which
pleads that we may be spared from
temptation
.
Can an age or a country be right-minded
and true, where such things happen? Is life
so fearful a burden in this land of ours, that
men should snatch themselves from it with
insane haste, and post out of it as if it swarmed
with hydras and chimeras? Is the sky
murkier
or the earth sadder here than elsewhere?
Have men weightier cares or sharper crosses
in this latitude than in Nova Zembla, or in the
Friendly islands of the Pacific? Of cares and
crosses, growing necessarily out of climate or
condition, there are not; of hardships
self-created
,
and had passions, idly fomented and
encouraged
,
a great plenty. We are mad for
money, mad for office and empty power.
If we sought money eagerly that we might
scatter it among the poor and needy, and make
of its idle glitter a sunshine in dark places,
the good purpose would sanctify the pursuit,
and men would not go mad and take their own
lives, however the enterprise might end. If we
sought power over the hearts and consciences of
men, and aimed to glide into their thoughts among
genial influences, springing from a happy
exercise
of genius or virtue, it would be well, and
the world would have good cause to honor our
graves. But when wealth, interpreted, means
bond and mortgage piled on bond and mortgage,
and an excellent character at the bank; and
power desires no nobler position than a high
stool at a desk, in the department of state, or a
sounding voice in the halls of political or
religious
strifeall is not well; but, rather,
hollow
,
tottering, and unsafe, to him that ventures
abroad.
The times do not satisfy the desires of the
mind. The literal hardness, the prosaic
austerity
of the habits and pursuits of the age,
furnish
but little encouragement to the
imaginative
and aspiring part of the soul. Insanity,
in many cases, suicide, and other terrible acts
of desperation, seem to us the rebellious
outbreaks
of a nature wronged and tortured by
the iron condition in which it is placed. Men
know not what deep, overwhelming injustice
they do to themselves in neglecting or disdaining
the imagination. Slighted or kept under, it proves
the most deadly foe of all the human powers,
and bodies forth instantly, in vindication of itself,
a hell gloomier than Dante's, and peopled with
shapes twenty times more terrible. The
human
mind can not repose on facts; nor find
permanent ease and security in the unadorned
incidents of a life of mere business or action.
These are too definite, too readily summed up
and concluded. The round is easily run, and
the limit soon discovered. It needs something
remote, uncertain, shadowy, and boundless,
which shall operate as a perpetual stimulant to
our restless nature, and a perpetual
gratification
that can not be exhausted. The remedy,
thena part of it at leastlies here; in
furnishing
occasions of enjoyment to the
imagination
,
and in cultivating the arts and pursuits in
which it is the chief element.
Paintings, in which the ideal world is
shadowed
forth, or in which the actual world is
raised to the standard of a glowing or cheerful
ideal, feed this passion with its best sustenance.
A country blessed with a Raphael and an
Angelo
,
is of a happier and more equable
temperament
,
all other circumstances conforming, than
one which has not a single great painter, and
is compelled to point to its signboards for
specimens
of art. Pictures in which character is
exhibited in grotesque or humorous phases, by
relieving the mind from the painful pressure of
rigid and exact life and custom, further this
grand object.
On this ground can poetry be safely vindicated
from all cavil and opprobrium. Poetry sends this
hard, round, methodical world of ours, through
the great void in which it moves, trailing
behind
it a glory and brightness, full of hope and
cheerful auguries to men. The emanation in
this case is mightier and fairer than its source;
and we are taught by the sublime influences of
bards and prophets, speaking and chanting in
noble pages, that what is not is greater than
what is or seems to be. A golden light, serene,
genial, and blessed, is shot down from the
bright world of romance and rapturous truth,
in which we walk with a proud consciousness
of a high, but as yet unseen destiny, and of
faculties that yearn after something better and
grander than the planetary crosses of the
present
life.
In the creation of character, too, of a purer
and more chivalrous cast than that of actual
men, literature is rendering a great service to
the world, and drawing it away from the mean,
petty usages, the degrading tricks, and gross
customs of our everyday life. In the
contemplation
of these romantic portraitures, in the works
of novelists and poets, the age finds relief, and
forgets, for a time, the hardships of society, and
the despotism of circumstances. Even where
the writer adopts a contrary course, it is a
satisfaction
to the world to have a Squeers, or an
Iago gibbeted high before them, in the full
length of their desperate villany. These are
their sport and pastime, a sort of lay figures to
receive the heaped-up scorn and contumely of
all mankind. In either event the object is
accomplished
,
and the quarrel with bad fortune
or cursed chance is for the time silenced, or
turned into a more melodious and promising
wrangle.
Let it not be said that the world's homage to
men like Scott, and Dickens, and Wordsworth,
is extravagant or irrational. It is men like
these, loboring for the purposes we have
attempted
to describe, that preserve the healthful
action
of the general mind, and furnish to many
hearts consolations and solaces that could
scarcely be found elsewhere, this side of
scripture
.
The age can not do them too much
honor
,
for they are the chief friends and
benefactors
of the age.
We do not pretend to say that in the
cultivation
of art and literature lies the sole remedy
for the heavy evils that oppress the hour; but
in them we find many of our faculties and
passions
wisely exercised, which employed in the
common businesses and pursuits of the world,
are degraded, abused, and misdirected, or
imperfectly
engaged, so as to create incalculable
misery and crime.
The multitude of newspapers and new
inventions
,
crowded patent-offices, swarming streets,
and thronged rivers and mountain-sides, bear
testimony to the restless spirit of the age. The
world is at the top of its speed, and yet it
industriously
plies whip and spur, as if it thought
itself moving at a snail's pace. The demands
of trade and commerce will scarcely account
for this. There is an unquiet devil at the heart
of the times, which pricks them perpetually on,
and makes of the whole race a sort of
wandering
Jewry, doomed to have no rest nor pause,
until the hearse and the undertaker are at the
door.
Of alarmists and preachers of agitation, we
have sufficient; we need apostles of peace and
tranquillity. It is necessary that the heart of
the age should be soothed and calmed, and its
vast activity turned to some better account than
place-hunting and money-piling, the uproar of
battle and the mad cries of trade.
The serene spirit that lives in good books,
the music of good men's voices, the quiet shades
of the sanctuary, and the sabbath stillness of
thoughts above the age, should be sometimes
sought, and would not be sought in vain. The
consolations of literature and truth, imbodied in
paintings and many-colored pages by the
masterhands
of our generation, would not come to us
without warning and encouragement, and we
would not then dare to curse God and die,
because
life seemed to us without hope, and void.
OUR ILLUSTRIOUS PREDECESSORS.
American
antiquities have of late become
quite popular. Relics and memorials found on
our own soil are beginning to be talked of with
the same degree of interest as if they had been
dug up among the Picts, Pelasgians, or ancient
Druids. Native pottery, of a thousand years
old, has risen in the market, and while new
temples of Christian worship are going up on
every side of us, people begin to throng, in
imagination at least, about the doors of those
sacred old edifices that stand on our southern
and western border. The time may come when
the Mound-builders shall be used to point a
moral or adorn a tale, as well as Greek or
Roman
;
and if a railroad should be struck through
the heart of the Alleganies to the Atlantic,
would it be wonderful if some tumulus of half
an acre, superficial measure, should be
transported
bodily to the centre of Chatham-square,
and employed as a pulpit for chaste political
harangues, for denunciation or exaltation of
sub-treasury, and the general discussion of
finance and default. Mr. Delafield has done
something, by publishing a gilt-edged quarto,
toward bringing about so happy a
consummation
.
If a book like his, or Mr. Caleb Atwater's,
could have been placed in the hands of the first
pilgrim that landed on Plymouth-rock, we think
he would have stared a little. A pretty new
world! he would have said, where the whole
back part of it is crumbling and falling in
pieces, after this fashion! Such is, in fact,
the precise truth of the matter; and busy,
active-minded
men are now engaged in snatching
such morsels from decay and utter extirpation
as lie in their power. We trust that they will
be cheerful and zealous in their labors, and not
allow themselves to be discomposed or put out
of countenance by an occasional draught of dry
dust or sepulchral ashes. The work must go
on, must be prosecuted, until we are assured
how those martial old fellows, those
antediluvian
buck-eyes and hoosiers, the
Mound-builders
,
carried it in their day against wind,
tempest
,
heart-ache, and the thousand pains that
flesh is heir to. Let us know how they loved
and made love, what grain they planted, how
light was furnished, and how pew-rents stood,
so far toward sunset, a thousand years ago.
How they fought we know, for stout spears,
sharp arrows, and helms of proof tell the story,
though the head that wore, the arm that
wielded
,
and the eye that aimed, are long ago
mouldered
in the dust. Who was their great man in
their palmiest day? Was he, Webster-like, of
huge thews and sinews; or did he steal upon
the nation in the dwarfish shape and guise of a
Van Buren? Or were their politics, their
parties
and political divisions, based on some
tomb-building
question? whether man's last lodging
should be round or square at top? with two
openings or twelve?
Another question of vast importance, in
which all Pearl street and half Greenwich has
an interest, what ware did they use? what
particular importation of crockery? Or were
they in total darkness, entire ignorance of
dinner
dishes and tea-sets? No point has been
more thoroughly vexed among the antiquaries
than this; and we would respectfully suggest
that a scholarship be founded by our merchants
in that branch of business, to be entitled the
delf or red-pottery scholarship, for the specific
investigation of this subject. New patterns
might
be discovered, and trade receive a fresh
impulse from the other side of the Alleganies
and the borders of the Oregon. How was
business
conducted among these old heathen? How
was society held together? Were there such
things as clubs, sects, friendships, among that
bookless and unchronicled generation of men?
Not an author among them, we are sure; not
an editor or sonneteer, who has left a file or
a stanza to enlighten us. Were bonds and
mortgages and brokers known among them?
or have these inventions come in since the
flood? We do trust in heaven that further
researches
will not disclose to us (at that early
day at least), the existence of a stock-market
west of the Ohio; although we have a shrewd
suspicion that some such startling truth will
come to light, from the position in which many
bodies are found on the banks of Marietta and
the upper Wabashnamely, stretched at length
under aged trees, with mouldered ends of rope
or flax, or some material bearing a striking
resemblance
thereto, in close neighborhood with
their necks. Fatal evidences, we fear, of fancy
gambling and its logical consequences!
Treading-wheels
and stock-dealers we had hoped
were contemporary.
Would the endorsement of one's name on the
back of an oblong scrap of foolscap, subject
one with that primitive people to the nuisance
of a notary's clerk, subsequently of a notary
himself, and finally to that prime pest and
ornament
of modern communities, a
practising
attorney
?
This instrument of torture, the
promissory
note, is perhaps to be referred to the
same epoch as brokers and treading-mills.
Another pointwhere did their ancient
legislatures
convene? In the mammoth cave, or
in some of the larger mounds? We think the
latter might be recommended as an august and
impressive place of assembling, to any
legislative
or other corporate body. Bones,
death's-heads
,
grinning skulls, would preach nobly
against rascality, bargaining, and corruption.
No jobs could be managed in such a vicinity.
Dead neighbors would lift up their bare arms
and withered palms, to strike or deprecate bold
or timid violaters of right and justice. As to
the dress of these dumb and mummy
mound-builders
,
can there be doubt? We may rest
established in the faith that they did not wear
swallow-tail coats, peaked boots, and stiff
neckstocks
did
not thrust their shrewd sconces into
that utter abomination, a black beaver noggin.
They the rather flaunted it in loose, flowing
robes, sandals, and majestic pagan turbans!
Furthermore, did they enjoy that noble
annual
festival, a charter election? When
mound-builder
rushed against mound-builder, and
mummy
was scurrilous to mummy, that some little
denizen of a pothouse might be alderman over
a circuit of a dozen tumuli (in one of which
he should be stuffed to-morrow), and conserve
the peace against river-rats and ground-moles?
Perhaps they had other and more stirring
amusement, as their walls and covered ways
would seem to indicate a pretty vigilant foe to
be taken care of on the outside!
Can we think of this ancient, solemn, and
buried race as enjoying parties of pleasure,
tea-gardens
,
boating, rockets, and other frivolous
divertisements? Is the conjecture plausible
enough to impose on our understanding, that
juvenile mound-builders were in the habit of
crowning the day with a dash out of town
in a box, or pillory rather, suspended between
two enormous fly-wheels, and careering it along
the bank of the Mississippi, or under some
jutting
cliff of Allegany, at the rate of seventeen
miles an hour, with a tandem of bison?
How does the notion strike us of one of these
silent and reserved skeletons strutting a paved
street, perfumed, gloved, and corseted? Will
the imagination endure to think of a tomb-full
of these interred and stately people, starting
up into a popular assembly, and shouting their
lungs in pieces to have a farthing taken off of
beer, or a smirched bank-bill cashed in copper?
Can we conceive of them rushing about in
fragmentary hats and dilapidated waistcoats,
spouting patriotism at taverns, and asking to be
paid for it afterward?
To leave their sports and come to matters of
a graver naturemuch discussion has occurred
as to the purpose or purposes to which certain
round and square buildings of stone within
their borders were applied. Some assert that
they were employed as watch-towers to keep a
look-out for an approaching enemy from the
north or west; others will have it that they
were light-houses to guide navigators over the
prairies; and a third party (of a more serious
turn of conjecture) assures us that they were
built for no less purpose than the use of the
reverend clergy, and occupied by them as
reading-desks
.
Their supposed system of
sun-worship
,
and out-of-door religion, lends some
plausibility
to this guess. We believe that these
towns were built by the auctioneers, and were
put in daily requisition by them in their ordinary
course of business.
They had auctioneers; of that we are
well-assured
.
No man with a genius for the
business
could have gone long without catching at
the facilities for its prosecution afforded by
tumuli
,
barrows, and stone-towers. Standing on
one of these at noonday, he would as naturally
lift his voice in the line of trade as an adult
rooster from a wall.
How much, how much! a prime yoke of
bison! Two years old this season. Going
going. Now a dozen helmets; Sledgekopp's
make; with bucklers and breastplates to match
cheapgoing cheap, to close the affairs of a
retired warrior! This was on the day of sale;
but how he managed to announce his auction,
is not so readily imagined; whether by a boy
hurried through the country on the back of a
hackney buffalo, a punchy and full-winded
older
mound-builder, with a bell (as in our modern
Boston, the creature of yesterday), or by the
cheaper device of a flag thrust out at the top
of one of the towers of stone.
The glorious wilderness of the mound-build
ers appeals to us by considerations deeper and
tenderer than these. In this fertile and
flowing
region, it is said, that first and happiest
garden, the garden of Eden, once stood. Here
Adam (if this pleasing conjecture be true)
received
the title-deed, the great fee of the earth,
from his sovereign and paramount Lord; and
in this selectest spotone that should be
consecrated
in the hearts and memories of all the
long generations of mankindhe first took by
the hand the blessed creature, who made a
paradise
of all the earth when they were driven
forth beyond their garden-wall. Cunning and
excellent child of nature! who could not bear
the circumscription of rampart and river, and
who would rather sin and be free, than a
blissful
prisoner, tethered to happiness and spotless
joys! Tread lightly, therefore, on the fair
fields of the west; for you know not what
ancient and cherished echoes may be
slumbering
in its cliffs and river-sides, nor how gently
the fore-parents of us all are sleeping there!
THE FIRST PRESIDENTIAL DEATH.
[8]
[8]
William Henry Harrison, of Ohio, was inaugurated
President of the United States March 4, 1841, and
died the 4th of April following.
Death
has spoken to the American people
in a voice of consequence and power he can
not hereafter surpass. He has spoken from the
Capitol, and standing amidst the highest
memorials
of authority this nation can know.
There may not be in the voice an unrivalled
depth of passion, nor a heart-piercing
sharpness
of agony, but all of force and solemnity to
be acquired from high station, newness and
splendor of office, and the sustained gaze of
many millions of free people, sounds in the
accents
he has recently uttered. Poets and men of
genius, in God's good time, will arise, and labor,
and die a death that comes much nearer to
the heart than this; philanthropists and
prison-searchers
,
like Howard, and emancipators
of men, will enter the tomb with a more
tearful
train; patriots, falling on the plain amid
foes to civil liberty, and martyrs dying for
conscience'
sake, must shake the bosom with a
profounder
grief.
Nor was this death altogether wanting in
incidents
of an heroic description; up to the
Capitol
the good president marched, amid throngs
of earnest friends, all eager to grasp his hand
and cry out God bless him! as he passed; the
benisons of thousands hung upon his steps, and
he planted himself in the chief chair of state
under many cheerful auspices and promises of
good at hand; in three-and-thirty days he was
laid out in the presidential mansion to receive
callers; but no more to stretch to them the
welcome hand, or cheer them with the joyous
eye. A month's presidenthe came into
power
in a whirlwind, which subsided shortly into
the low-whispering dirge of death.
When we call back to our imagination the
banners, the loud, free shouts, the boastful
drums, and the choral songs of November, and
see how they have died away into an April
mildness of tears, and shrouded emblems, and
slow mournful marches and processions, we
learn that we live in two worlds that glide into
and interchange with each other. Light and
shadow never lay closer side by side.
Assuming
power in the midst of triumph and
acclamation
,
our late chief magistrate laid it down
in quietude and a solemn stillness never to
be broken. The great robe of office changed,
as of itself and with miraculous swiftness, into
the silent shroud and plain bands of utter peace.
We rejoice that the good old man is gone. The
future time grows dark upon the view. What of
discord, and war, and civil confusion, labors in
the gathering cloud, God only knows. It was
eminent good fortune, that he whose life had
been happy and triumphant, should pass out of
it ere its peace was broken by the sounds of
alien hostility; or, to a true spirit, the more
fearful murmurs of disaffection or distrust, from
his own countrymen and people.
We rejoice that he is dead, inasmuch as this
one death, high and lamented as it is, has
consummated
a great truth, and confirmed our faith
in free institutions and free men. A change
which elsewhere often wrenches thrones from
their foundations, has here been wrought with
the silence and dignity of a funeral pageant.
The supreme power of the land has descended
into the second constitutional handsby no
arrogant
transmission of blood, nor insolent
interference
of armed menwithout a pause or a
murmur. Our faith in men, our reverence for
the constitutional charter, have moulted
whatever
spot or soil they may have acquired in any
recent mischances, and, new-fledged, ascend
again, and with an undoubting eye dare
contemplate
the future in its most boding and
disastrous
shapes.
Never, we will venture to say, never was
the attachment of a people to its institutions
exhibited with more sense, decorum, and
constancy
,
than in the present trial; never were
the better elements of the American character
evoked with greater success, although the
lapidary
hand that called to the surface the bright,
new aspects and colors, was cold and deadly.
In a former article, illustrative of the
incidents
of the recent presidential canvass,
[9]
[9]
Page 330.
we
had occasion to speak of the employment of
emblems and devices in furtherance of political
or party objects. The same subject now arises
with a less cheerful complexion; and the
question
at present is, how far the use of shrouded
standards, badges, crapes, and printers' rules,
as denotements of grief, is wise and necessary.
There is, unquestionably, a class of minds
men of refined or imaginative temperament
with whom they are not needed, whose delicate
sense of sorrow is, perhaps, offended by the
display of any symbol or evidence of feeling
whatever. They would enjoy their grief in
silence
,
and cherish the dart that has pierced
their breast, in secrecy and repose. They ask
for no gloomy weeds, no sable hearse, no long
train of mourners, no pomp of obsequies, or
funeral
observance. These, influenced by a true
delicacy of feeling, perhaps, would not have
the metropolis defile through its own streets in
divisions of clergy, laity, magistracy, and
soldiery
;
with sections and sub-sections, composed
of ex-aldermen and ex-presidents, the horse of
the deceased, led by his aged servant, an urn
shrouded in black, and twenty-six pall-bearers,
representing the twenty-six states of the Union.
But it should be borne in mind that the class of
meditative and thoughtful sorrowers for a
public
man is extremely limited; and that it is for
the general mind, and for the purpose of
stamping
upon it a deep and salutary conviction of
the bereavement, that these devices are
intended
.
The shrouded eagle brings home the pointed
dart with double force to their bosoms; and the
golden-lettered banner, blotted from the sun by
dreary crape, makes thick and palpable the
sense of their grief. The artisan, who would
scarcely trouble himself with profound
reflections
that would justify lamentation, and whose
heart is, perhpas, scarcely alive to the nice
sensibilities that constantly vibrate and keep
grief true to its object, as he strikes a blow
upon
the bench or the anvil casts his eye upon
the dark band that encircles his arm, and feels,
of a truth, that a great and good man has fallen.
Keeping, therefore, this side of quaint and
foppish
distinctions, such as the wearing of the
badge above the elbow for the military token of
grief, and below it as the citizen's, we hold the
influence of public ceremonials and
appropriate
emblems, justifiable and useful; the eye is
fixed, the heart improved, and the memory kept
fresh.
Depressed and humiliated by an occasion,
that towered too high for it to strike at, we
rejoiced
to see with what efficacy the evil spirit
of party was laid and made to hold its peace for
a season. Despotic, slanderous, Ishmael-like,
and brazen, as it is, it could not keep its front
amid the solemn scene, but slunk away from
the fraternal obsequies, and crouching in the
distance, sits at gaze, ready, we doubt not, to
re-enter his realm at the earliest chance. Would
that he might be made there to inure, a
miserable
exile, an outcast, marplot, and
peace-breaker
for
ever and ever. He has been no
friend of ours; has done us no good service,
that we know of, for sixty years; on the
contrary
,
has not spared pains or toil to make us
restless, embittered, and belligerent toward one
another. Why, therefore, he should be
permitted
to put men together by the ears, to harass
and excite them, from year's-end to year's-end,
and from Maine to Florida, is beyond the power
of plain sense to comprehend. Is this spirit so
fierce and barbarian in his nature, that nothing
but skeleton hands can smite him dumb, and
dead men's voices quell the devil that rages
within him? Is no appeal sufficient which
emanates
from quiet firesides, the calm privacy of
domestic life, past goodness, present worth, or
future usefulness, that candidates for office
must be assailed with demoniac energy and
bitterness
,
and be made to repent the day they
were rash enough to lend themselves to the
public service? Does any one believe that our
politicians and statesmen, our chief counsellors
and advisers in critical affairs, are the gross,
sinister, and corrupt men, they are painted in
the harangues of partisan declaimers and the
paragraphs of party prints? Does any one
hold either party to be the jacobinical club, the
mercenary junto, the base, false foe of our
institutions
,
which its opposite charges it to be?
No, no. The silence and grateful
reciprocity
of an occasion like the late presidential
burial
,
disclaims and repudiates any such belief as
harsh and unjust; proves that the violence and
fierceness of party are an unnatural and
feverish
condition of the body politic, and calls upon
us from the very bosom of its repose and
screnity
,
to make our political differences henceforth
differences of judgment and opinion, and not of
idle passion and insane perversion of character
and truth.
Another kindred lesson we have been taught
by this great event; that the American press
possesses, under all its abuses, a profound sense
of justice and right; that it is willing to be a
co-worker with the public mind in the
expression
of humane and charitable sentiments, and
liberal opinions.
Everywhere has it written of the recent
death with forbearance, good feeling, and a
proper regard for the charities of life. Back
and forth through every part of the land have
the mournful tidings been tolled and echoed;
and the whole press has been but one continuous
chime of melancholy bells, responding,
iterating
,
and harmonizing with each other.
Whatever
errors of taste, or defects of mere critical
judgment may be charged upon our journals,
we have uniformly found them, apart from
partisan bias, sound and clear on questions of
morals, and just, so far as they were informed,
in advocating the right and rebuking the
wrongdoer
.
Certain ingrained abuses we fear there
are, dark flaws of passion, and stains of
prejudice
and error, which we devoutly wish might
be purged away; but for the good which it has
done, we thank it, and trust it will date from
the present hour its new calendar of kind
offices
,
enlightened humanity, and temperate
advocacy
of truth.
The respect of republics for magistracy and
constituted authorities can not be hereafter
called in question. This, the first occasion
on which the whole nation could unite to
exhibit
,
by undoubted testimonials, their respect
for the common head of all, has given birth to
expressions of regard unprompted by precedent
or prescriptionfor there were no such guides
in the present casebut flowing spontaneously
from the popular heart. Nature spoke out
from its own primitive shrine, suggesting,
directing
,
and inspiring what was to be done, and
the result was a simple and genuine homage
worthy of a free nation. For the man, deep,
earnest sorrow, we doubt not, was felt; but
for the president, a sterner and more
comprehensive
regret. It was the great office
distenanted
that caused dismay, the sense of an
awful
bereavement, and general gloom. When
the nation looked up and discerned a great
blank in the firmament of its powers and
principalities
,
whence its chief planet had
departed
,
what wonder that it started back and
stretched its hands to the heavens, in
deprecation
of the mighty Providence that had wheeled
it from its sphere.
Standing at the portal of the tomb, and
reverently
regarding the illustrious dead, it seems to
us as if a solemn voice issued forth counselling
peace, fraternal love, amity with nations, and
trust in God. Death has drawn nigh to us, and
seems as if he stalked with majestic port across
the threshold of our homes, and had seated
himself by our firesides to read us a lesson
from the great text-book of Providence which
he ever bears in his hand. Oh, wiser far than
all human scripture and black-letter teaching
is the practical homily by which he informs us
of the solemn requirements of duty, household
justice, national purity, and, chiefest of all, of
the eternal crisis toward which every man is
hastening with that gloomy guide as his usher
and chamberlain!
A MOVEMENT IN CLERKDOM.
There
is no example on record of a more
successful rising than the recent one of the
clerks of New York, to relieve themselves of
the thraldom of overwork. From the
beginning
,
it furnished evidences of a sure and
ultimate
triumph; first a speak no larger than a
man'sno, not so largeno larger than a
clerk's hand, appeared in one of the public
prints, a mere paragraph; then the anonymous
call of a public meeting; then the proceedings
thereat, with a brief reference to several
eloquent
and masterly speeches delivered; a
chairman's
name appended at full length, in large,
and two secretaries, in small type; then a
petition
drawn up, a delegation of clerks
appointed
to bear it before the mastersthe mighty
retailers
themselves; and then, it sounded like
a report of cannon throughout all clerkdom,
four thousand strong,victory! freedom! the
clerks are emancipated, have accomplished
their own deliverance, and shall measure tape
and falsify colors no more, henceforth and
forever
,
after eight o'clock, evening.
Now, as the stroke of the hall clock was on
the VIII., there was a low murmuring sound
heard all through the city, of keys turning in
great rusted locks; parties were seen strolling
alonggroups of two, or three, or more
looking
back upon the barred door and closed
bow-windows
with an air of triumph, mixed with a
doubt whether it could be so; whether that
cursed old shop, that had eaten the heart of so
many delicious evenings, was at length gorged
and satisfied with twelve hours' work. Some
of them, too, would stroll about the town for
hours, in this same state of mixed wonder and
pleasure, looking at all the long line of
darkened
shop windows; and when this sport was at
an end, fairly exhausted, some would betake
themselves to this resort, some to that; part to
oyster-houses, to eat shell-fish against each
other, for the charges; some to lectures, some
to concerts, and not a few to bed, to dream
about a clerk's paradise, where all the
employers
it
may be supposedare turned into
shop-boys
,
and made to serve the clerks with
innumerable
spotted neckcloths and endless yards
of light drab, for pantaloons, day and night.
The tumult could scarcely be expected to end
with the dry goods clerks. The fire spread.
The hardware clerks, notwithstanding the
severity
of their vocation, were the next to catch
the contagion; summoned their general
meeting
;
had their masterly speakers, and
resolutions
of pith and supplication; their committee,
their petition, and Io Pan! they, too, are
enfranchised
.
The next thing, news came in that Newark
had risenthe respectable and potent burgh of
Newark, New Jerseythat she had burst the
shell, and struggled to be free.
This spirit of emulation and public
commotion
so operated, at length, upon the boot and
shoe clerksa class slow of thought, and
heavy-heeled in the march of reformthat
they, too, raised the bannersupposed, at the
distance from which we watch the fray, to be
a cordwainer's apronrushed into the mele,
and bore off, with suprising resolution and
good fortune, a counterpart of the clerks' free
charter
Magna Charta Clericorum
.
Then followed the hatters' clerks; then the
jewellers'; and then came limping along, last
of all, the maligned, abused, and miss-called
fry of cutters' and clothiers' servitors. From
quarter to quarter, the excitement spread, the
spirit of resistance was aroused, until at length
the whole realm of clerkly life was in motion.
Petitions flowed in apace; masters yielded;
shop after shop was carried, as if by storm;
and darkness, as of an eclipsea great gloom
preceding the dawn of all clerkly joy and
happiness
came
over the city as the fatal hour of
eight was struck.
Notwithstanding the formidable array thus
presented to the masters, and the fulminations
and threatenings of the aroused populace of
clerks, a few were fool-hardy enough to resist
their demands. Here and there, through the
chief streets, a stray light was seen twinkling,
and forms gliding back and forth behind
counters
the
ramparts of the tyrannical masters
busily engaged in discharging yarn-balls
from boxes; accumulating on the
counter-scarp
,
as it might be, material for demi-cannon
sleeves, and other hostile offices. This was,
of course, not to be tolerated for any great
length of time. At first peaceable measures
were adopted, to drive them from their position;
they were only called vampyres and monsters,
by anonymous writers in the newspapers.
Then a significant hint was given out, to the
effect, that if they, the retailers, set any value
whatever on their show-windows and
specimenpatterns
,
they would look out for themselves.
One correspondentthe most vigorous and
Saxon of the clerkly penmenin a private
communication to a merchant in Chatham
street, wrote, I would merely say to you to
begin with, that you had better look out for
your glass, if you want to save them from being
smashed; moreover, you had better look out
for your head, if you want to save that, as this
course of yours will
not
be allowed. And,
true enough, a night or two after, a small
body of resolute clerks was seen marching up
Chatham streetstaggering to and fro, as if
laboring up against a terrible burden of
oppressed
feelingsalong Chatham Row, and
getting
abreastas nearly so as their feelings
would allow themof the fork of Centre
street, moved down, with terrible directness,
upon a shoe-shop that was burning away
merrily
,
without a thought of what was
approaching
,
two revolving lights, and three stationary,
at the rate of more than half a foot of gas an
hour. In a trice there was a crack, as of glass
shivering; then another; then crack again; a
missile glanced past the head of the
shop-keeper's
daughter; the shop-keeper himself is
struck, and has fallen; his head-clerk, a
chicken-hearted
youth, who, from very fear and
povery of spirit, had refused to join in the
movement, has crept into the bowels of the big
boot for a shelter; a dead silence ensues, and
with one good, round shout, the assailants
swept out of sight.
These outbreaks were, however, only few in
number, and of temporary duration. In a short
time, so successful, as we stated, at the outset,
was the rising, that not an obnoxious light was
seen burning; not a shop-window was left to
assail; and with a complimentary
announcement
of the names of all who had come into
the new sumptuary regulation, the conflict was,
in a great measure, at an end. In the mind
of the observer and the philanthropist, a
startling
question now began to put itself.
How is this mighty mass of disbanded
activity
to be employed? What shall be done
with it? Flushed with a victory, so recently
achieved, it is not likely they would subside at
once into the habits and usages of ordinary
life. It was suggested, that there were the
military companies, not under the best discipline
in the world, to be re-organized; that the ardor,
so triumphant in the late rising against the
masters, might be turned to account in drills,
target-shootings, fence-exercisethat is,
forming
a mathematical straight line against a wall
and other martial divertisements. A taste
for colors, derived from their day-light pursuits,
and the habit of marching up to a counter, and
keeping in a line with it all day long, it was
supposed, would give them peculiar advantages
in this new enterprise. A battalion of four
thousand spruce clerks, marching, by night, to
the sound of flutes and soft recorderswith
both of which, habits of nightly serenading
make them familiarwas a spectacle that
many hoped to see. This would not do. There
was another occupation, in which they might
embark which would afford a vent for the
roused spirit of the reformers. There is a
grand modern specific for all possible ills; a
creature of all-work, equal to any task that
may be laid on it. It builds ships and
steam-boats
;
can put a custard on one's plate, and a
patch on one's trowsers, free of charge; opens
and closes theatres; buries one man in Potter's
field, at will, and builds a monument half way
to the stars over another; is regaled on
strawberries
and melons, the first of the season;
has a voice in every companyheard above all
others; hangs this man; is at the heels of that,
all through the Union, turn wherever he may;
makes zanies and idiots, by its so potent arts,
of wisest men; and elevates to the chair of
Plato and Socrates the merest dolts and
madmen
.
The combined wisdom and resolution of
the metropolitan clerks, therefore, fixed on a
NEWSPAPER, as the representative of their
enfranchised
activity; and before us now lies,
wide-awake, and coiled for a spring, the latest
offspring of the hundred-headed pressThe
Clerk's Gazette. The two numbers under our
eye give evidence of what is called a healthy,
moral tone, and exhibit qualities which must
be a source of infinite satisfaction to their
friends and patrons. We have, says the
Clerk's Gazette, No. 2, youth and enthusaism,
hand in hand with talent, energy, and
experience
!
Now if there be any one thing that pleases
us more than another, or all others, it is to see
a public journal conducted with this species of
modest assurance. Nothing can be, certainly,
more satisfactory to a subscriber, than to know
that he has the honor of perusing the
lucubrations
of a Solomon every morning; and
nothing
can be more charming as establishing a
frank and candid communication between writer
and reader, than to have the editor furnishing,
six times a week, or oftener, a regular and
exact
inventory of all the traits of his character,
the little personal peculiarities so fascinating
among friends, so agreeable in a select domestic
circle; how much more entertaining and piquant
when blazoned in print!
The next number of this journal, quoth
the Clerk's Gazette, will be the best that has
appeared. We have said it.
That we like. It is short and terse; comes
to the point at once, and promises, without
halting, that the Solomon of Wednesday last
shall be, by Wednesday next, thrown
completely
into the shade, made quite an idiot of, by the
revised, improved, and regenerated Solomon,
now on his way, with a new number of his
journal under his arm.
Macte virtute!
The war waged with the masters is at an
end, and thisthe Gazette of the conflict
seems destined to acquire for the combatants,
laurels grown in a more peaceful soila
garden-plant
,
whose root is refreshed and enlivened
with ink, instead of blood.
It is scarcely necessary to add, that the
revolution
,
so imperfectly narrated, has our best
wishes, that it may be as permanent and
enduring
,
as it has been sudden and decisive; that the
hours rescued from the gymnastic and toilsome
exercise of counter-crossing, may be devoted to
pursuits, at least as graceful, if not quite so
profitable and remunerating. The clerk of
the great metropolis of New York, are a
formidable
body; they have shown, by a single
shaking of the mane, in the recent struggle for
liberation, of what effects they are capable;
and it only remains for them to carry into other
employments, the same sagacity in undertaking,
the same energy, force of combination, and
public spirit in prosecuting, and the same
firmness
and wisdom in securing a good resultas in
the recent movementto acquire for themselves
the character of setting their hand to no plough
that does not go through the furrow
triumphantly
to an end; of raising no shout or battle-call,
that is not musical with the very notes of victory.
END OF SELECTIONS FROM ARCTURUSINTERNATIONAL COPYRIGHT.
A SPEECH
ON
INTERNATIONAL COPYRIGHT,
DELIVERED AT THE
DINNER TO CHARLES DICKENS,
AT THE CITY HOTEL, NEW YORK,
February 19, 1842.
The
president (Washington Irving, Esq.),
having proposed the sentiment, International
CoyprightIt is but fair that those who have
laurels for their brows should be permitted to
browse
on their laurels, Mr. Cornelius
Mathews
responded:
I answer your summons, Mr. President,
under
some restraint. I am not quite sure that it
becomes me, an humble lay-brother of the order
of authors, to trouble a diplomatist and Spanish
minister, in any way, with the insignificant
affairs
of the fraternity. But when I recollect
how the distinguished gentleman on your right,
a monk, at least, if not a bishop, has been
lately
received in this great city of ours, I am
reassured
.
Knowing how you, once an honored
member of the craft, are going forth from the
country, its ambassador and representative,
and how he, a man of letters, in full communion
with the brethren, has just entered itI think
I may venture to say a word or two of rights
which you hold in common. In speaking on
the subject of an International copyright, at this
time, I would not be understood as being moved
by any new impulse or sudden enthusiasm; but
as uttering convictions carefully considered and
long entertained.
That I am speaking in the presence of an
eminent foreign writerthe universality of
whose genius, appealing by its delineations to
all classes and conditions of men, would seem
to entitle him to a universal recognition of his
rightswill, I believe, by no means diminish
the force of what I may say.
It is argued sometimes, I know, that authors
have no rights; and a paper-dealing tradesman
of this city, greedy of some sort of renown, has
lately contended if we could but get English
books at the cost of type and paper (the author
being considered an impertinent third party),
all the ends of good literature would be
answered
.
I might ask this artful casuist, how it
would suit his conveniencehe being a man of
some stamp and character among his neighbors
to come abroad in the open light of dayin
a coat yet odorous of the fingers of the
petitlarceny
thief; a hat savoring of the burglar's
fist; his pockets jingling with the transferred
coin of a bank robber. But I look beyond this
miserable economical subterfuge, and seek,
somewhat farther down, the actual operation
of an uncopyrighted foreign literature,
reprinted
without restraint. There is at this moment,
waging in our midst, a great war between a
foreign and a native literature. The one claims
pay, food, lodging, and raiment: the other
battles
free of all charges, takes the field prepared
for all weathers and all emergencies; has
neither
a mouth to cry for sustenance, a back to
be clothed, nor a head to be sheltered.
The conflict between a paid literature and
an unpaid, is a fierce one while it lasts; it can
not last long. The one relies on the feeble
and uncertain impulses of authorship; the other
is driven on by all the restless interests of trade.
What, sir, is the present condition of the field
of letters in America? It is in a state of
desperate
anarchywithout order, without system,
without certainty. For several years past, it
has been sown broad-cast with foreign
publications
of every name and nature. What
growth has ensued? No single work, so far
as I can see, has sprung up as its legitimate
result; no addition to the stock of native poetry
or fiction; no tree has blossomed; no solitary
blade struck through the hard and ungrateful
turf. Whatever has been produced has been in
spite of opposition from within and without; has
been the bright exception, not the rule. Instead
of being fostered and promoted, as it should be,
our domestic literature is borne down by an
immethodical and unrestrained republication of
every foreign work that will bear the charges
of the compositor and paper-maker.
Under the regulations of an International
copyright, the work of a British author would
be published here in its order; would take its
chance with other works, native and foreign;
would be valued and circulated according to its
worth; and would hold its rank in due
subordination
to the judgment passed upon it by the
side of other compositions. What is the case
now? A new work by the author of Charles
O'Malley reaches this countrya pleasant,
lively, vivacious picture of Irish life and
dragoon
service, well worthy of being printed by
some prominent house, furnished to the
libraries
,
and put into the hands of a liberal circle
of readers, in due course of trade. This would
be proper and natural. On the contrary,
twenty
,
yea, fifty or a hundred handsfor the giant
of republication is single-eyed and
many-handed
are
thrust forth, spasmodically to clutch
the first landed copy; it is followed, watched
to its destination; violent hands are perhaps
laid on it, to snatch it from its first possessor;
it is reprinted; early copies are despatched
into
the country; new editions follow, in
pamphlet
,
in book, by chapters in a thousand
newspapers
;
the land is vocal with the unrestrained
chuckle of the daily and weekly press over this
new acquisition; while no other writer,
whatever
his merit, if his popularity be but a degree
less, is listened to. What hope is there here
for the native author?
The odds are tremendous; and I do not
hesitate
to say, sir, that if he had thousands to
lavish
on the printing of a single work, a press in
every village, a publisher of enterprise and
spirit in every city, the purchased control of
fifty newspapers, he would be only beginning
to enter the field on anything like fair terms
with Dr. Lever. The one literature, the
foreign
,
is propelled through the country by steam,
the other, the native, halts after on foot or
in such conveyances as a very narrow purse
may bargain for. Principles, it may be, alien
to our own, travel with the speed of lightning,
while national truths, in which we have the
profoundest interest, follow at a lacquey's pace
behind. As an American I feel this and I avow
it. From the contemplation of that
distinguished
author, glorying in the zenith of a
reputation universal as the light of day, my
eyes turn away, and in the sequestered retreat,
in the cramped and narrow room, seek that
other brother of his, poor, neglected, borne
down by the heavy hand of his country, laid
like an oppressor's upon him; and I feel that
the conditions of human life are hard indeed.
Far be it from me, sir, to indulge in idle
repinings
over any of the inevitable sufferings
of authors or of men; farther be it from me
to cast any shadow upon the general joy of
this occasion; but I feel it my duty, as I trust
in God I always shall, to say something,
wherever
I can, in behalf of the victims of false
systems, the children in this casethe orphans,
rather, I might saywho inherit the wide
kingdom of thought, and who toil bitterly in
secret, in labors not seen of the eye, that the
world may have enough of mirth and cheerful
truth to make the day wear through. Standing
here to-night, the representative, in some
humble measure, of the interests of American
authors in this question, I say they have been
treated by this people and government as no
other of its citizens; that an enormous fraud
practised upon their British brethren, has been
allowed so to operate upon them as to blight
their hopes and darken their fair fame. They
have remonstrated, and will, until the evil has
grown too great to be encountered, or is
subdued
.
I might speak especially in behalf of
the company of young native writers, who,
seeing how well the world was affected toward
good literature, and moved by some kindly
impulses
of nature, may have hoped in their way
to add something to the happiness, something
to the renown of their country. But we are
advised how others, who thought they had
secured
a constant and enduring hold on the
public
good will by past character and services,
have also been affected by the present injurious
state of affairs.
You, sir, for example, in that retreat of yours,
classical in the world's affections, having
matured
a work of some value and which you
think ready for the metropolitan market, take
passage down the Hudson in company with one
of your farmer neighbors, who has, perhaps,
just fattened his fall stock to a grainwith
your manuscript in your pocketrecollecting,
too, that in times past, your handicraft has been
held in some reputeyou flatter yourself you
will find a prompt purchaser for whatever you
bring. You call, sir, on certain traders in
street, you suggest the MSS. For heaven's
sake, Mr. Irving, is the response of the
blandest
member of the firm, the one that talks to
the authors, don't plague us just now; we
have a profound respect for your talents, an
ardent affection for American literature; but
Mr. Bulwer's Zanoni has arrived, and we must
have a hundred hands on it before night. Call
again, we shall be happy to see you!
Then, sir, meditating on the patriotic
courtesy
of the gentleman you have just left, you
shape your course toward a great publishing
house in Broadway; famous heretofore for a
certain solidity and selectness of publication,
but having been lately bitten by the Number
viperwhich, by the by, is encompassing the
earth, like the great snake of the Hindoo
mythology
they
beg you with some natural tears
in their eyes, not to interrupt them just then;
The big papers, the mammoth press, is on
the alert; they must have `Handy Andy' on
the counter by Saturday or the tide will be
down with them; and behold, sir, the author
of the Sketch Book, the illustrious historian of
New York, very much in the situation of the
ostrich of the desert having an egg to lay, but
nowhere to lay it; and, like it, I might add,
greatly disposed to hide his head for very shame.
How has it fared sir, in the meantime, with
your sturdy neighbor and his charge? In
robustious
23
health, cheerful of spirit, with no
misgivings
whatever, he makes the voyage to New
York; remembers many a hearty welcome,
many a lucky market in times past; and has
no sooner touched the wharf, then he is seized
upon by a dozen or more red-cheeked hucksters,
who well-nigh embrace him from the joy they
feel at his coming; he runs hastily over an
inventory
of what he has broughtso many
turkeys
of a year old, so many spring chickens,
so many cocks and hens, and before he has had
a chance to unbutton his overcoat, his
merchandise
is off his hands, and he casts about in
his mind at what comfortable chop-house he
shall hold an interview of settlement, and
reckon his gains over a snug meal and a glass
of choice cider.
Now, sir, I would ask, is not your brood of
speckled fancies, as honestly begotten from the
beginning, as his parti-colored capons? Are
not your historical truths as solid and
substantial
,
as real to the mind as his gross-fed turkeys
to the body? Are not your racy courses of
humor as much a solace and comfort to the
soul as his web-footed waddlers to the palate?
The property is as real, as actual in one case
as the other; and why should it not command
its price? That, sir, is a wretched country, or
a wretched condition of things, where the best
products of the best workman in any
department
are not in demand. And it is just so here
at present.
The public taste is so deeply affected by the
interested laudations of inferior authors by the
republishers, that the value of literary
reputation
,
as well as literary property, is greatly
impaired
.
No distinction is made between good
writers and bad; they all appear in the same
dress, under the same introduction; and the
judgment of the general reader is so perplexed
that he can not choose between Mr. Dickens
and Mr. Harrison Ainsworthbetween the
classical drama of Talfourd and the vapid farce
of Borcicault. As this system deepens and
strengthens itself, as it does every day, an
American celebrity will cease to have any
semblance of the discriminating applause of a
contemporaneous posterity, and be regarded
only as the confused shout of a distant crowd.
I know that to many of our trans-atlantic
brethren their American reputation is dear and
valued; and for their sakes I would not have a
system endure by which its worth will be so
surely diminished.
This brings me, gentlemen, to another aspect
of the cause I am pleading with you. It has
been matter of surprise in some quarters that
Mr. Dickens, a British writer, has addressed
the American people on the subject of copyright.
Amid the happier visions which have crowded
his English chamber for the last five or six
years, are we quite sure that no corsair face
has ever looked in?no eager visage of the
ink-stained pirate, with a hand stretched
stealthily toward the MS. on his desk, to snatch
it away ere it was dry, and blazon it
throughout
the whole New World, as an acquisition
honestly made? May not his brightest hours
have been darkened, at times, by the fancy of
a grim row of republishers rising before him
line upon line of readers, beginning at the
Atlantic
and stretching to the very verge of
Oregon
,
with lines crossing them from Penobsect
to the Mexican Gulf, all busy in the self-same
task, turning page after page of what he has
writtenroaring with laughter, melting in
tearsuntil the contemplation of it (with the
thought that no honest penny was gained to
him by all this pleasant show that was going
forward) has become actually painful to his
mind? And when, landing on our shores,
those very readers, many of them, drew nigh
and took him by the handin a very earnest
friendly grasp, tooand made solemn vows and
protestations of friendshipwas it less than
natural that he should speak to them, in the
confidence of frank discourse, of what had so
often pressed painfully on his thoughts?
He was among brethren, in his own younger
brother's house, and because he ventured to
speak of a patrimony they held in common,
with a like interest as himself, shall he be
condemned
?
But all this broadens into a general question,
and one to which we are bound to give heed.
I will take it for granted, sir, that every
gentleman
within hearing of my voice is aware that
fifty-six British authorsand among them
many that have given lustre to the age
applied
to the American congress for an
international
copyright, and were refused. I will
also take it for granted that every gentleman
here admits that there may be a good
indefeasible
right and property in a book as in any
other state. By what casuistry or
jurisprudence
does that which is property in one
latitude
in one civilized country, cease to be
property
when transferred within the limits of
another
?
The most precious property of one country
in another, as I regard it, is its books. To us,
what is Germany, half so much as Goethe?
Greece, but Homer? And England is nearer
and dearer to us by her long array of great
writers, than by the constant intercourse of
commerce, the closest
compacts and treaties of
amity. Her writers ask that this claim should
be allowed; that all the relations of the two
countries shall not be reduced to a gross,
material
standard; but that they shall have a
property
,
as they have a right, in whatever of noble
sentiment, of enduring thought, they may
impart
to us; and that we shall have a like
property
with them. That we have heretofore
enjoyed
their labors free of charge, is nothing;
that we have lived on their free bounty for a
long time, creates in us no claimas it should
no desireto become perpetual almoners of
theirs. A true spirit of national fair-dealing,
not to say national dignity, would impel us to
disclaim the charity, and persuade us to
purchase
what we read, as well as what we eat
and wear.
I have said nothing, sirand I might have
said muchof the mutilation of books by our
American republishersthat outrageous wrong
by which a noble English writer, speaking
truths in London dear to him as life, is made
to say in New York that which his soul abhors.
This sir, silent and uncomplaining as it seems,
is a despotism as gross as that of the rack and
the thumb-screw, which wrings from men
under
torture, falsehoods to flatter the tormentor.
What right have I, sir, to stifle the utterance
of any manly spiritto offer him opportunities
of speech, and then, in bitterest mockery,
abridge the truth he would deliver? Soul
speaks to soul through all distances of time
and space; and accursed should he be that
ventures to thrust his uncouth shadow as a
softening medium between the two! We have
friendly treaties, Mr. President, by which
property
and person, as commonly acknowledged,
are sacred between the two nations. Is it not
worth the while of statesmen and legislators
to incorporate hereafter a provision by which
the great rights of thought, of the soul
speaking
in its highest moods, shall be cared for and
guarded?
I desire to see the two sections of
Anglo-Saxon
literature on either side of the great
ocean moving harmoniously onward; they
giving to us whatever they have of maturity
and art, and we returning, as we are bound,
all of freshness and vigor with which a new
world may have inspired us. I desire to see
something of the great debt, now accumulated
for ages, which we owe to the brotherhood of
British writers, cancelled; first, in the true
honest currency of dollars and cents, known to
the union as the representative value between
man and man; secondly, in works of genius,
the growth of our own soil, colored by our own
skies, and showing something of the influences
of a new community, where nature comes fresh
and mighty to her task. A thousand voices
now slumber in our vales, amid our cities, and
along our hill-sides, that only await the genial
hour to speak and be heard. Silence would no
longer brood, as it now does, over so many fair
fields, nor, moon-like, hold the mighty waters
fast. Allegany would have a voice, to which
the metropolis, with its hundred steeples and
turrets, would answer; gulf and river, and the
broad field would reply, each for itself, until
the broad sky above us should be shaken with
the thunder tones of master spirits responding
to each other; the whole wide land echo from
side to side with the accents of a majestic
literatureself-reared, self-sustained,
self-vindicating
!
I offer you, Mr. President
An International Copyright
The only honest
turnpike between the readers of two great
nations
.
AN APPEAL TO
AMERICAN AUTHORS AND THE
AMERICAN PRESS,
IN BEHALF OF
INTERNATIONAL COPYRIGHT.
Gentlemen
:You have the credit, at this
moment, of ruling the worldat least, your
part of it; and can not yet enact a single
statute
by which your share of worldly right and
profit shall be secured to you. Walking, in the
world's eye, as strong and beautiful as angels,
you can not perform the day's work, counted
either in money or in bill-making influence, of
a rude Missourian or a lean Atlantic citizen.
Aiding, as you do by your inventive genius,
in all the great enterprises of the day; pushing
forward every great and good undertaking to
an issue of success; you lack the will or the
skill to create a simple mill-contrivance by
which your grain may be ground and bread
furnished
to your board.
You project, but do not realize. You sow,
but do not reap. You sail to and fro
merchantmen
and carriers to all the world of
thought, the whole ocean overbut find no
harbor
and acquire no return. How much longer
you will consent to keep the wheels of opinion
in motion; to do the better part of the thinking
and writing of these twenty-six states, without
hire or fee, it rests with you to say. I merely
put the case to see how it strikes you.
I address you in the mass, writers of books
and framers of paragraphs together, because,
at bottom, all who wield the pen have
interests
in common, and because I am anxious (I
confess it) to have the whole force of the press
whatever shape it takes, combined and
consolidated
against an injustice which could not
live an hour if the press knew its rights and its
strength. The rights and the respectability of
the one are, in the end, the rights and
respectability
of the other; based in both cases on the
worth and dignity of literary property.
No community is secure, it seems to me,
where any law or fundamental right is
systematically
violated; either by instant vindication,
through blood, and pillage, and massacre, or by
the more silent and deadlier agency of the
opposite
wrong, and a whole brood of fierce allies
sprung from its loins, is this truth, at all times,
asserted and made good. From the original
wrong, lying in many cases close to the heart
of society, there spreads a secret and invisible
atmosphere of pestilence, in which all kindred
rights moulder and decay, until their life at last
goes out, at a moment when no man had guessed
at such a result. Neither statesmen nor people
are, therefore, wise in tampering with a single
principle, or in yielding a jot of the immutable
truth to plausible emergency or the
fair-seeming
visage of an immediate good.
The law of property, in all its relations and
aspects, is one of these primary anchors and
fastenings of the social frame. And what evils,
I am asked, have grown from the alleged
neglect
of literary property? I will mention one,
by way of illustration.
You are all of you aware, by this time, that
the extensive printing and publishing
establishment
of Harper and Brothers, Cliff street, New
York, was burned in the early part of June, and
that a heavy loss accrued to them from the
burning.
The fire was attributed, immediately after it
occurred, by the public prints to the hand of
design
.
It is supposed that one object of the
incendiaries
was to obtain copies of a new novel by
James, of which the Messrs. Harper had the
exclusive
possession
. Another paper enlarges
this statement; We see suspicion expressed
that the object was to get possession of a new
novel, `Morley Ernstein,' which was in sheets,
for cheap publication
. Here is a natural,
logical
sequence, and just such a one as might
have been expected. If the conjecture should
not prove a fact, it ought to be one, because
this is just the period and the very order in
which we might expect an incident of this kind
to occurperhaps not on quite so large a scale
nor with the necessary melo-dramatic
admixture
of fire. It might have been a plain
burglary
,
prying a warehouse door open with a bar,
for a copy; or knocking a man over, at the
edge of evening, and plucking the sheets from
under his arm.
Piracy and burning are perhaps so nearly akin
that, after all, they have wrought out the
sequence
more naturally than if it had been left to
the friends of copyright to suggest to them in what
order they should occur. In Elia's legend a
building is burned that a famishing China-man
may have roast pig; in the reality of the
present fire, a publisher's warehouse was put in
flames, not only to prevent a famishing author
from having roast pig
in prsenti
, but also, by
a decisive blow, to further the good principle
that there should be no roast pig, nay, even salt
and a radish, for famishing authors in all future
time. Let it not be said I press this point, a
mere surmise, too far. Surmise as it is, it
receives
countenance and consistency from a
previous
fact, namely, that one of the large
republishing
newspapers was charged not long since
by the otherand this was made a matter for
the sessionswith the felony of abstracting the
sheets of an English work from the office of its
rival. This, an invasion of property, is only
one of the external evils growing out of a false
and lawless state of things. Of others, which
strike deeper; which create confusion and
error
of opinion; which tend to unsettle the lines
that divide nation from nation; to obliterate the
traits and features which give us a
characteristic
individuality as a nation; there will be
another, and more becoming opportunity to
speak.
As it is, by fair means or foul, the weekly
newspaper press, with its broad-sheet spread to
the breeze, is making great head against the
slow-sailing progress of such as trust to the
more regular trade-winds for their speed. And
this, fortunately (as error can not long abide in
itself), is creating changes of opinion of infinite
advantage to the great cause of international
copyright.
A little while ago we had the publishers
petitioning
and declaiming against an
International
copyright (I forget what arguments they
employed
),
and, lo! their breath is scarcely spent
when the ground slides from under them, and
the whole publishing businessat least, a
considerable
section of it, which they meant to
uphold by false and hollow propshas tumbled
into chaos, and an organic change has passed
through the world of publication. Now they
beginand we are glad to have so powerful
and so respectable a body converts to our side,
on whatever termsto see the matter in a new
light. The affection for the people, and the
cheap enlightenment of the people and the
people's
wives and children, which they made bold
(out of an exceeding philanthropy) to proclaim
in marketplaces and the lobbies of congress, is
wonderfully dwindled.
It is not a pleasant thing, after all, to have
one's printing-house and bindery burned to the
ground, even for so laudable an object.
Suppose
we have the law; a little civilized
recognition
of the rights of authors (merely by way
of clincher, however, to the absolute, primary,
and indefeasible rights of publishers) might be
an agreeable change from this barbarous
system
of non-protection. The old plan, it must
be admitted, has its disadvantages. Let's
have the law. And here you may suppose the
hats of certain old, respected, and enterprising
publishers, to rise into the air, in a sort of
fervor
or ecstacy, which it is entirely out of their
power to control.
Is there, or is there not, a property in a book
a primitive, real, fundamental, right in its
ownership, as in any estate or property? Often
and clearly as this question has been
determined
,
the opponents of a law, by stress of
argument
,
are driven upon denying it over and over
again, and making use of every sort of ridiculous
and irrelevant illustration to crowd the right
out of the way. They fly into all corners of
creation in pursuit of an analogy, and come
back without as much as a sparrow in their
bag.
One of them, for example, says, We buy a
new foreign book; it is ours; we multiply
copies
and diffuse its advantages. We also buy a
bushel of foreign wheat, before unknown to us;
we cultivate, increase it, and spread its use
over the country. Where is the difference?
If one is stealing the other is so. Nonsense!
neither is stealing. They are both
praiseworthy
acts, beneficial to mankind, injurious to
nobody
,
right and just in themselves, and
commendable
in the sight of God. This reasoner,
of a pious inclination, and most excellent
moral
tendencies, has made but a single error. He
thinks the type, stitching, and paper, are THE
BOOK! He forgets that when you buy a book
you do not buy the whole body of its thoughts
in their entire breadth and construction, to be
yours in fee simple, for all uses (if you did the
vender would be guilty of a fraud in selling
more than a single copy of any one work), but
simply the usufruct of the book as a reader.
Any processes of your own mind, exerted upon
that work or parts of it, make the result, so far,
your legitimate property, and is one of the
incidents
of your purchase. To reprint the work
in any shape, as a complete, symmetrical
composition
,
is a violation of the original contract
between the vender and yourself; whether it
be in folio or duodecimo, in the form of
newspaper
or pamphlet, there lies THE BOOK,
unchanged
by any action of your own mind. The
wheat, of which you have purchased the
bushel
,
in the meantime, has been sown in your
field (there's a difference to begin), which has
been prepared by your plough and plough-horse
for its reception, the kindly dews and rains of
heaven, which would answer to the genial
inspirations
and movements of the mind, in the
other case, descend upon it; it is guarded by
walls and hedges from inroad; the weeds and
tares which would fain choke it are plucked out
by a careful hand; at last it is reaped and
gathered
in by the harvestman to his garners.
The one bushel has become a thousand; but
it has passed through a thousand appropriating
and fructifying processes, to swell it to that
extent
.
It has not been merely poured out of one
bushel-measure into another bushel-measure.
Though the one plough the earth, and the
other plough the sea, the world will recognise
a distinction, a delicate line of demarcation,
between farmer (man's first occupation) and
pirate (his last). The republishersthe
proprietors
of the mammoth pressgroan under
the aspersion of piracy and pillage laid at their
door. They complain of the harshness of
epithet
which denounces them as Kyds and Mac
Gregors. They must bear in mind that authors
and republishers are likely to consider this
question
from very different points of view; that
the poor writer, regarding himself as defrauded
of a positive right and of a property as real and
substantial as guineas, or dollars, or doubloons,
may feel a soreness, of which the other
party
,
living as he does on the denial of that
right and the seizure of that property,
without
charge or cost, may not be quite as
susceptible
.
Let us make an effort to bring this
point home to these gentlemen, in an obvious
and intelligible illustration.
How would the worthy proprietors of The
Brother Jonathan like it, if, when their edition
of Barnaby Rudge or Zanoni had been
carefully
worked off at some expense of
composition
,
paper, and press-work, and lay ready
folded
,
in their office for delivery; how would they
be pleased if just at that moment, when the
news-boys were gathered at the office door
pitching their throats for the new cry, a gang
of stout-handed fellows should descend upon
their premises and without as much as by
your leave, or gentlemen, an you will!
sweep the entire edition offbear it into the
next street, and there proceed to issue and
vend it, with the utmost imaginable steadiness
of aspect; with an equanimity of demeanor
quite edifying and perfect. Why, gentlemen,
to speak the truth plainly, you would have a
hue-and-cry around the corner in an instant!
Your
ejaculations of thief, robber, and burglar,
would know no pause till you were compelled
to give out for very lack of breath; and the
whole community would be startled, at its
breakfast the next morning by an appeal to its
moral sensibilities so loud and lightning-like,
that the coffee would be unpalatable and the
very toast turn to a cinder in the mouth.
Now it should be borne in mind that the
large weekly press, whose influence we are
anxious to counteract, and whose interest is
rapidly becoming the leading one in opposition
to the proposed lawhas arisen since the
agitation
of this question; has embarked its
capital
,
and has grown to its present power and
influence in the very teeth of a solemn protest
of the authors whose labors they appropriate.
It should also, in fairness, be added that some
members of this huge fraternity only avail
themselves of the law as it now stands, as they
think they have a right, and hold themselves
ready to abandon the field or adapt themselves
to the change whenever a new law requires it;
in the meantime meeting the question fairly
and reasoning it through in good temper. The
very paper which I have employed in
illustration
is chargeable with no offence against
literature
,
society, or good morals, save the single
taint of appropriating the labors of authors
without pay, and defending the appropriation
as matter of strict right and propriety. Only
in a community where a contempt for literary
rights has been engendered by long
malpractice
could such sentiments have obtained a
lodgment in minds of general fairness and
honesty.
If the hostility to a law of reciprocal
copyright
be as deep-seated as is alleged, why has
there not been some able argument (raised
above sordid considerations and looking wide
and far upon the question in all its vast
bearings
),
expounding to us the grounds on which
this professed antagonism is based. When we
ask them for a syllogism they give us an
assertion
.
My dear sir, how can you waste time,
perplexing yourself and the public with this
barren question! We supply readers with a
novel, a good 3 vol. novel, for a shilling; and
as long as we can do that they will remain
deaf to all your appeals. The
argumentum
ad crumenam
, the syllogism of the pocket, has
in all ages carried the sway! This is the head
and front of their declamation, of their invective
and their facts. This is
the
fact! This boulder
(offered in lieu of bread), they beg us of the
author-tribe to digest; this is their bulwark,
their fortressno, their burrow ratherinto
which they skulk at the approach of a poor
author, quill in hand, prepared to drive off the
game
fer natur
that lay waste his
preserves
and make free in his clover-field.
Now of all arguments this of Cheapness is
most questionable and unsafe. It has a comely
and alluring visage, is smooth-spoken and full
of promise, but we must have a caution where
it may lead us, for it is as full of trick and foul
play as a canting quaker; as precarious a
foot-hold
as the trap of the scaffold the minute
before
the check is slipped! Cheap and Good are
a pleasant partnership, but it does not happen
that they always do business together. Taking
cheapness as our guide and conductor, we can
readily make our way, in imagination, to a
publishing shop where the principle is
expanded
into a pleasing practical illustration. The
shop is, of course, in a cellar (rent twelve
shillings a quarter); the attendant is a
second-hand
man cast off from the current population
of the upper world into this depository (wages
four shillings a week); his hat, being still on
the cheap tendency has followed him out of
Chatham street, in company with a coat
rejected
of seven owners the last of whom was a
dustman, vest to match and boots borrowed of
a pauper (cost of the entire outfit five shillings
and a penny); behind a counter that totters to
the earth at an expense of five pence or more
for repairs, he dispenses the frugal literature
of which he is the geniusthe paper being of
such an exquisite delicacy and cheapness that
a good eye, by glancing through, may read
both sides at once; the purchaser plunges down
with a sixpence (most economical of small
coin) in his pocket, and bears off, in a
triumphant
apotheosis, four-and-twenty columns, to be
read by the light of a tallow twopenny that
sputters
cheapness as it burns. This is the glory
of the age; the crowning honor and triumph
of America. Who would have the heart or
the hardihood to blur that fair picture of
popular
knowledge and cheap enjoyment? Why,
sirs, to speak a serious word or two in your
ear, this plea of cheapnessa miserable escape
at best, where a question of right and wrong
is concernedpushed to its extreme (and as
cheapness is urged as the sole criterion and
measure of advantage we are warranted in so
doing) would drive literature to the almanac,
which can be afforded at a penny; and the age
of the brown ballad would return upon us in
all its primitive graces of an unclean sheet, a
cloudy typography, and a style of thought and
expression quite as pure and lucid.
Pass a copyright bill and we are told we
should soon learn the difference between 1
10s. the London price of Bulwer's Zanoni, and
the American price of 25 cents. How long
it is also triumphantly askedhow long
would our reading public almost
commensu-rate
with the entire population continue at such
a rate? What if it did not last a minute?
Truth and honesty are of a little more worth
than a reading public even as wide as the
borders
of the land. Of the elevation of the
peoplethe instruction of the peopleI hold
myself a friend, no man more, but I do not
propose to begin their enlightenment with a
new version of the decalogue, so amended as
to admit all the opposites against which it is
directed, as virtues which we are enjoined to
cultivate.
Suppose these gentlemen do furnish good
literature at a low price by dint of paying the
author nothing, they should bear in mind that
there is a place where it is paid for, or it would
most assuredly prove as miserable as it is cheap.
The literature is valuable not exactly because
they spread it before the world in large sheets
every Saturday morning, at sixpence a copy;
but because there happened to be in another
country certain enterprising publishers, of a
somewhat different stamp, who thought it worth
their while to cheer the writer in his labors,
by paying him a good round sum for his
copyright
.
I repeat it, an unpaid literature can not
contend with a paid one; nor can itwhile
money is a representative of value and a
motive
for exertion in all other pursuitsbe as
good. Do I imagine then that an international
law will create great writers? Not at all.
Under any lawoppressed by whatever
bondage
or tyranny custom chooses to lay upon
themmen of great genius will struggle into
light and cast before the world the thoughts
with which their own souls have been moved.
They will speak though mountains pressed
upon them. But there is a wide class
composing
the body of a national literaturewho
can claim no such power; essayists,
philosophers
,
whose impulses are not great, periodical
writers, all are silent when the law and the
trade fail to befriend them. It is these that
need the constant stimulus, the genial
inspiration
(denied to them in any great measure by
nature), of pay. It is the shining gold, decry
it as we may, that breeds the shining thought.
It may be asked how does this question affect
the press? The press, forming a part of the
great body of writers, is affected by whatever
affects the writers of books; for the bond by
which the entire brotherhood is held together
is so close that it can not be struck in any
part without feeling the shock in its whole
length. The same injustice by which the
author
falls in station and place, drags down the
journalist. The rights of all who use the pen
are rights in common; varying only in degree
and as they may be affected from time to time,
by circumstances of the hour or day. Beyond
this the actual and immediate pressure of a
vast amount of reading from abroad, poured
upon us without limit or regulation, begins to
be felt by the daily and weekly press; they
find attention drawn off from the article or
political speculation in their own columns,
prepared with care and judgment, to the cheap
re-print; and are driven upon abandoning the
field or joining in a pernicious system of unpaid
appropriation against which their better
judgment
revolts.
I now close this appeal, and in doing so I
would venture to urge upon you the importance
of concert and a steady action in behalf of
this law, at all times and in all places where
you are called on to employ that sacred
instrument
of thought, whose immunities are so
grossly outraged.
The popular mind has, in this country, made
wonderful advances in the appreciation of
political
truths and principles. There is no
reason
why it should not make an equalthough,
perhaps, a laterprogress in truths that relate
to literature and art. The popular mind, as
all our institutions require, is essentially just
and true; and, once enlightened by a sufficient
array of facts and with time to arrange and
digest them, will act with energy and wisdom
on this as on all other questions of which it is
the arbiter. Depend upon it, this bill, although
adversely regarded by your senate and
representatives
at this time, will ultimately triumph.
It will go up to the senate-chamber, year after
year, with new facts, pleading for it with an
urgency which considerate legislators can not
resist. In the meantime it is your duty, as I
trust it is your desire, to enlighten the general
mind as to the truths on which I have ventured
to insist. Seize the instant. In town, in
homestead
and city, let these principles be spread as
wide as the writings they would protect; and
search, with a fearless eye, the national heart,
to find whether there be not some kindly corner
where it is willing the seeds of a national
literature should be lodged. Speaking in the
accents of persuasion with which God and
nature
have endowed you, and through the
organs
of opinion which every one of you may,
more or less, commandyou can not be long
resisted. Together in a phalanx, before which
kings and princes grow pale, enter upon the
mighty task. Hand in hand, voice answering
to voice, in tones of mutual trust and cheerful
hope press forward in the noble labor to which
you are summoned. That union which, in
politics and war, is strength, will prove in
literaature
,
as well, your champion and deliverer.
New York
,
June
, 1842.
THE BETTER INTERESTS OF THE
COUNTRY,
IN CONNEXION WITH AN
INTERNATIONAL COPYRIGHT.
A Lecture delivered at the Lecture-room of the
Society Library, Feb.
2, 1843.
From
the moment when the peak of Harvard
college, in New England, cut the skytwenty
years only after the first permanent foot was
planted on the continentAmerica was
predestined
to be a nation of readers. That early
promise and destiny she is amply fulfilling. She
reads in the cradle and the college; in the
packet
and upon the highway. The doors of a
thousand
lyceums are cast open and readers throng
in. She reads in the hut, the tavern, and the
stage-coach. She pauses at the corners and
reads again; and as the swift spirit of steam
snatches her from her feet and bears her away,
she still turns the page and reads what she can.
Her youth, her manhood, her age, are all busy
at the task. Her decrepitude and her strength,
her pale scholars and her carmensturdy and
gowned as well, are classmates in the common
pursuit. The forms are full wherever the eye
ranges; and the rustle of leaves, as they turn,
fills the air, from the schoolhouse on the edge
of Memphremagog to the deck that floats upon
the Mexican gulf.
It is therefore of vital consequence that she
read aright. Having no central standards of
opinion, no fixed classes as examples and guides,
her mind is the result of a constant
intercommunication
of part with part, section with
section
,
through the press. The general sum of
her reading represents and controls her thoughts,
her habits, and her government. Her
institutions
,
modelled originally on the necessities of
her situation in place, time, and progress of
opinion, must be either sustained by a
literature
(meaning by literature in this connexion,
whatever is circulated in a printed form)
assimilating
with these, or be modified by
another
literature which is too rigid to coalesce, and
strong enough to break in pieces and
appropriate
to itself whatever it approaches.
It might happen, for a time, that the outward
form of government, and daily habit of action
would continue, while the mind, the heart, and
spirit, would be changed and strangered within.
A dreadful spectacle. A great nation
staggering
on, by a sort of instinct, in its old paths,
blind, purposeless, maniacal! The body
retaining
its springday vigor, lusty, full of an
ambitious
strength; and yet, within, a mind at jar
with its powersworking through all the limbs
a deadly change, and giving to its aspect the
look of one who wanders in the dark, by the
edge of stormy seas, that may swallow him up,
or among enemies, whose cold shadow he feels
stealing upon him, to stab him if he pause.
The education of the American people lies,
after all, in what they read; the soul, that
governs
its acts, enters through the eye that dwells
upon the printed page. Now, in its growth,
in the susceptible and plastic period of youth,
it should have a wise regard to the influences
to which it subjects itself; most of all to such
as steal upon it in silence and without
warning
of their approach.
Out of the past come voices of triumph and
encouragement; in the future gleam eyes of
hopeful invitation and welcome; but the
present
,
the time that is upon us and about us, is
thick-set with dangers. A steady foot, a
regard
fixed constantly upon the true lights and
standards of our course, can only carry us
forward
.
We should not wander into other spheres,
into other quarters of the sky, to take an
observation
of our path. Over our own home lies
the heaven to which we must look for guidance
and for omens.
As a great nation, standing in the very front
rank of the guides and examples of mankind,
America should desire to possess a literature,
whether foreign or native, only under the
broadest
and clearest sanctions of right and justice.
Already it is whispered through the world
that she is false to the high faith she professes.
It is muttered from corner to corner of Europe
that she can violate, on the very spot made
sacred
by many trials and sacrifices of an heroic
stamp, the clear obligations of man to man,
community to community. She owes it to
herself
and to the great cause of which she is an
acknowledged representative, to stand forth,
and, gathering her pure robes about her, repel,
by instant action, aspersions so unworthy of
her faith and her fame. When I think of
America
,
as she should be, she always rises before
me a majestic personationcolossal, steadfast,
heavenward and noble in her look, and
towering
infinitely above base usages and habitudes of
gross creatures. But when I regard her in some
of her acts, she seems shrunken from these
great proportions, crouched meanly upon the
earth, and peering, with a starved and guilty
Jook, among cinders and fragments for some
pittance, which she would fain clutch and guard
as a precious inheritance. It has been said that
England should place this question of the
author's
right on the true ground before she
claims anything at our hands; that she should
recognise, as she has failed to, the perpetual,
indefeasible right of an author in his work,
before
she demands any part of that right from
us. What matters it to us whether England
or all the world fail in justice, shall it stay us
in the path of truth and duty? We have not
withdrawn into this new world, far from the
strifes of old centuries, packed close with usage
and injustice, to be cumbered with the doings
or undoings of others. We are here, between
ocean and ocean, to lead a life as pure, to
administer
examples as great, as God grants us
strength to render. If we are the first to restore
to an injured class rights long withheld, to place
the author upon his feet, to clothe him in the
garment that becomes his station and pursuit
so be it! We can claim no higher honor, no
profounder glory, than to have so done.
A gentleman who has acquired distinction as
an historian, lately standing in a lecture-desk,
in this city, expressed a doubt whether there
could be a property or exclusive right in
intellectual
and spiritual results. Thoughts and
ideas were of a part with the sun and air, as
free and universal as they. Now, it must have
been within that gentleman's knowledge, that
the sun and air themselves, when incorporated
in specific results, certain chymical compounds,
for example, can be subjects of property as
clearly
as a hat upon one's head, or the house over
us. He must have known, also, as a wise and
diligent reader of scripture, that there are
distinctions
of person and character, even among
the spiritual beings of a higher world, some
being
ranged in classes and others known
specially
by name. The very angels have an identity
of their own, in act and thought, over which
they may be supposed to exercise the control of
intelligent creatures. On this very truth, that
each creature, each angel, and each man, has
an individual property in whatever constitutes
his better being, hangs the immortality of the
soul itself. If thought were held in common
by all mankind, there could be, in effect, but
one manone being with multiform limbs and
organs and a single soul, in possession of the
globe. It is in the doctrine of a personal
identity
,
an individual and exclusive right to certain
elements and issues of thought and feeling, now
and henceforward for ever, that the pains and
penalties, the hopes and alarms of a present
and a future being have their hold. This new
dream of the universal commonness of soul and
thought, would fill the universe with God and
void it of his creatures. One should have a
care, in indulging the speculations of so
boundless
a philanthropy, upon what shoals he may
be driven! It may cost a greater outlay of
wind and sail to get back, than the original
chart of the voyage contemplated!
If I may throw open literary property to all
the world, why not all other property? If there
may be an allowable agrarianism of ideas, why
not of acres and tenements as well? What
would be the result if all the farms and estates
in America were to-morrow made common, we
can, in a measure, guess. There would follow,
as these very reasoners should know, a grand
disruption of society. I have a shrewd notion,
that the gentlemen who claim to have thought
out the author's book in common with him,
employing him only as secretary to the
commission
,
may be of the very lineage and creed with
those who claim as a right one eye of the
author's
spectacles and one sleeve of his coat.
The world has not yet answered to itself in the
consequences, for the unjust distinction it has
chosen to make between the property of the
head and the hand. Not a slight part of the
disasters of kingdoms, in later times may, in
my humble judgment, be charged upon the
unjust
and uncertain tenure by which authors and
governors of opinion have been allowed to hold
their rights, and the false conditions under
which they have, on this account, labored. The
world prospers best when to each man it allots
his right and protects him in it. Sooner or
later the right here, as always, will vindicate
itself.
I warn you, I warn you not to withhold this
law. There are portents already in the sky;
sounds, echoing audibly along the earth;
voices
in the air, that tell us that the thoughts of
two nations can not mingle and become as one
without law, with impunity. The quick ear
catches the clashing of hostile opinions afar off
the eye, strained anxiously upon the future,
discerns floating into the horizon a dark bulk
of alien thoughts, which, bearing down upon
its dear and deep-freighted hopes, with a shock
silently given, strikes them to the bottom and
rides smoothly over their wreck.
I do not deny, I would not be so understood,
that the noble literature of England, old and
new, introduced among us under the sanctions
of justice, and with a proper recognition of the
author's right, would be of eminent service to
the American people. We have arrived at a
point in the progress of the world, where it
becomes
us to make use of every help, lawfully
within our reach, to sustain us in the position
we would maintain. What there is in that
literature
to cheer, to enlighten, to move, and
sustain
,
the spirit of a great nation, no man here
need be told. Every footfall within its sacred
range, answers in an echo of proud
remembrance
;
every hand laid upon its records,
returns
us from the leaves a musical and familiar
voice that binds us there. But if on every page
there lies spread the palm of the purloiner; if
in every path we encounter the face of the
republisher
without right; if, at the bottom of
all, there lurks a wrong and an injustice,
depend
upon it, so surely as the great heavens
are over us and the great rivers by our
city-walls
flow to the sea, we will grow, truly, none
the wiser nor prosper the more, by every or any
English book that comes so branded to our
hands. It may be good, noble, lofty; may
carry
us, seemingly to the very heart of truth, the
very heaven of all pure fancies; but while
enjoyed
under these false conditions, all our
profit
will, somehow or other, and according to an
everlasting law, turn to loss; all our progress
bring us back, through a blind round, to the
dull goal from which we set out.
To bring these considerations to bear upon
the immediate question of an international
copyright
,
I first remark, that an inevitable proof
that the present system of relying upon and
appropriating a foreign literature is false, lies
in the vast number of minor evils (which, like
the testimony of circumstances, can not err) to
which it gives birth.
What is the process by which in regulated
times and countries where the cheap
enlightenment
of the people is not a theory of
publishers
,
a book is brought before the world? Not
assuredly in a spasmsuch as nature gives
when she throws off her evil humorsbut by
some kind of orderly procedure. The work
having grown up in the author's mind, slowly
and with a calm reliance, it might be hoped, on
a just judgment from his peers, is announced
as on its way to the public eye. Attention is
fixed upon it from that distance; if a work of
research, the studies of scholars and men of
letters are made to run parallel with it, and
when at length it is yielded to the world, it is
received with no idle and boisterous haste, but
becomes the subject of a close analysis and
deliberate
opinion. At all points the author's
rights are regarded; having grown up under
the author's eye from the beginning, his fame
is well considered; and in the end the book
takes it place according to some standard of
judgment among others of its class. All this
is and has been from the earliest time reversed
in America. Here an author is an anomaly; a
needless excrescence of nature; a make-trouble
and mar-plot, a mere impertinence. A book is
supposed to grow up by some sort of
spontaneous
process beyond the seas, and to be
imported
into this country with rutabaga and the
yellow hop. Pursuant to this enlightened and
liberal view of the matter, there were
established
,
a good while ago, certain baronial castles,
keeps, and places of look-out, whence the
respective
masters might look abroad, each
upon the domain he had engrossed. There
was the barony of Cliff-street on the one
hand, which included the Pelham vineyards,
the barony of Chestnut-street, Philadelphia,
which overlooked the Waverly manors, and
the Boston barony, with extensive water-rights
and rights of piscary (as the courts say) in
Marryat. Nothing could be more cheerful
than to see the various lord-heritors of these
great domains ascending to the castle-top, and
with a lordly and benignant eye, regarding the
toilers in their respective grounds so nicely
parcelled off.
Ah, ha! one of them would say; see how
the sweat pours from old Sir Walter! That's
a sturdy old fellow, and the blades grow double
wherever he treads!
The Post captain drags the net and ploughs
the sea quite as satisfactorily; and Sir Edward
Bulwer, being of a lighter build, makes up in
activity what he lacks in muscle. Could
anything
go on more agreeably! Certainly not,
as long as these book-barons understand each
other; but every now and then they must have
a frisk (getting jolly on the good wine served
to them out of authors' skulls) and harry into
each other's fields with a vengeance! Then
there's a time! Such a crying out of courtesy
and lack of courtesy! Such a babblement of
rights and usages! Such a devout and
monastic
horror of the infringement of publishers'
privileges all through Cliff street and Chestnut
and Washington, it makes one's blood run cold
to think of it! And among them all is heard
every once and a while the tenor of Sir Edward
Lytton, the piping cry of the Captain, or the
feeble voice of old Sir Walter, growing every
moment fainter, beseeching, in heaven's name,
to be thought of in all this fray to the amount
of a day's wages or two, and something to keep
the life in them while they are in the field!
Certainly, certainly, this is an anomalous
case for logicians of an ordinary understanding
and discernment to deal with. Here, it is
alleged
,
that the principals, the authors
themselves
,
have no rights whatever in the products
of their brain; yet, somehow or other, it
happens
that their agents, factors, and underlings,
acquire through them and their labors some
sort of rights about which all this pother of
usage and courtesy and publishers' privileges
is kept up! Why, it is as plain as the
northstar
,
nay, as plain as sun and moon, that if the
author was rightless in the premises, his
subordinate
must be so cumulatively. No matter.
In the very midst of these difficulties there
came upon the field a gigantic fellow, who,
with great eyes that saw everything and
swaggering
stride that trampled on everything,
(pausing only long enough to blow himself out
to his full dimensions) advanced, and in the
very style of the famous Welch giant,
announced
that Her could do that herself. And so
it proved; he could not only do that, but a
great deal more. Instead of claiming a plot or
parcel of the country, this champion at arms
set up at once a right to the entire continent;
instead of addressing a note of compliment
as the old barons occasionally wouldto the
gentlemen beyond the water, asking to be
allowed
to import their products, he cut the
matter
short by laying violent hands on them
before
they were well through the custom-house;
in fact, the blustering new comer went on at
such a rate that he fairly deafened and
distracted
the old lords-heritors; and by the time a
year or two had gone by, they were driven to
their wits' ends.
Who knew but if he continued in this fashion
much longer he would have the very castles
down about their ears? What was to be done?
Why they must meet him in his own style of
windy bravado, and to save their towers from
coming down about their ears, and to keep him
at a respectful distance, they were compelled to
wrap them in flamesto break into them with
powerful burglarsin the newspapers, every
time a new consignment came to hand!
Notwithstanding
their manful resistance, the giant
and one or two big brethren that joined him,
came after a while to have it all his own way.
He began to issue bulletins tooto warn
trespassers
off of
his
premises, and to hold out to
the populace the promise of an unlimited
vintage
from his orchards. Every week there
was open gate, when all the vassals and
dependants
of the giant rushed in and were fed
at Sweeney's charges. The worst of it was,
this fellow was as full of tricks and balks as
an old horse; he baked portentous loaves it is
true, but then with a big knife that hung in his
hall, always ready for use, he served them such
slices and sections as he thought proper,
expanding
or abridging the segment, according to
his whim; and all this was done with a racket.
Now, a bookthe staple of the giant's
dealings
being
a quiet creature, predestined to
hold a perpetual dumb intercourse with the
world, its birth might be expected to be orderly
and noiseless. On the contrary, its entrance
into
this
world at least is attended (under the
giant's auspices) with an outcry that a sultana
elephant, or tiger-mother of Bengal, panged
with young, might envy. The country is taken
by storm. The streets of cities are filled with
a flying squad of newsboys. Seaboard and
landward swarms with agents and outrunners.
The decks of steamboats, the pouches of
mail-stages
,
cars of railroads, swell with the
baggage
of the invader. Flags and placards fly in
every direction announcing that the enemy has
landed. The city is harassed and kept for
nights sleepless by reason of the new troops
turned up in their ominous yellow or scarlet
uniform, quartered within their threshold.
Publishers, from a tranquil and slow-moving
people, grow suddenly excited, hurry-scurry
hither and thither, make yard-high
announcements
in the newspapers and on the fences, of
impossibilities achieved or to be achieved by
them; and unless they attain a circulation of
fifty thousand, which gives them a glorious
opportunity
to abuse the author and make good
their bank-account, would go out of the seven
precious senses (perhaps there's an eighth in
such cases) with which Heaven has endowed
them.
Now, I venture to doubt, with due respect
for the talent at appropriation and business
enterprise
involved in these proceedings, whether
all this hurrah of literature is of much actual
service to the country. As a display of
ingenious
jugglery by which an early copy is
landed and of physical force in hurrying it
through the press, no American can fail to
regard
it with profound admiration. But when
one comes to consider that the work in
question
may reach the printer's hands in the
morning
,
and the reader's at night of the same day;
that it may possibly contain (as does one of
these documents now before me) a careful and
deliberate assault on the doctrine of voting by
ballot and universal suffrage, or as does
another
,
an assertion that America is stocked
with white villains, or another, filled with a
variety of licentious delineations that I dare no
more than hint at, I confess, that I, for one,
can not exactly see that the gentlemen in
question
are turning their talents to a very good
account
.
To be sure, they tell me that I am
an enemy to the enlightenment of the people,
a book aristocrat, entirely void of patriotic
ardor. So I am; if my ardor, my republicanism,
and my friendly disposition to enlighten the
people, can be turned to no better account than
this. But if, on the other hand, by some sort
of legerdemain of which I was master and
which I practised in connexion with the
republication
of the works of foreign writers,
without
remuneration to the author, I could
transform
my disposition to enlighten into an annual
revenue of twelve or fifteen hundred dollars,
my republicanism into board and lodging, and
my patriotic ardor into an easy-running
curricle
,
hung low to the ground, I might perhaps
consent to come into this ingenious way of
viewing the thing. I might, under the
over-whelming
logic of these circumstances, be
willing
to convert my country on the one hand
into
a sewer or deposite of all the cast off
ribaldry
and dullness of the old world; or, on the
other, into a great mill or mangle, where books
of a better sort should be tortured with an
ingenious
cruelty, dislocated in every page,
broken
and fractured in every paragraph, beaten
lifeless of all meaning and thrown upon the
world mangled and maimed, at the mercy of
every chance reader who has a shilling to
bestow
.
At the top of this I might, after
pocketing
,
or boasting to have pocketed on one of
these republished productions, the year's wages
of an honest man, I might turn upon my
benefactor
,
whose abject and miserable creature I
was (for I was fed from his hand), and call
him knave, fool, and villain, with a
volubility that could only be construed into
madness by a generous man. I might even, in
the plenitude of a genius for great and noble
obliquities, go a step beyond this; if I found
any fellow-countryman, one who had happened
by some great good or evil fortune to have
drawn the same breath with me, rising up, and
in the tone and accent of a man, denouncing,
without hope of interest or reward, with no
unworthy
or ungenerous motive, all this as paltry,
unjust, and thankless, I might (having the
board and lodging, the annual stipend, and
the low-hung curricle still in view) proceed to
vilify and asperse that countryman by every
low art in my power; I might belie his acts,
misquote his writings, scorn his friendsI
might go even farther; I might ride from office
to office in my low-hung curricle, and entreat
various conductors of the public press in God's
name to do a little vilification in my behalf in
their respective daily, weekly, and monthly
organs of opinion! I might be spurned from
some, cowed down by a manly indignation at
others, or, perchance, have an unwilling
welcome
lent at others. What then? There's my
low-hung curricle, my weekly allowance and
the board and lodging secured, and I would
even go on as I had begun. Nature having
denied to me the generous spirit of a brigand
or pirate of the main, I will be the tame villain
of civilized life, the slasher of native
reputation
,
the stipendiary slanderer of writers
beyond
the sea!
This is the legitimate spawn of the
republishing
system; and it is under such auspices
that a portion of the American mind is now
forming. All along the western border works
framed and issued by hands like this are
scattered
,
and make their way, unchecked by purer
influences. There, in many places, no native
author ever pleads the cause of his countryis
ever allowed the pure and great privilege of
instilling
into the young heart fancies, or hopes,
or warnings, that have grown up in his own,
under the same free sky.
The evil spirit has there its undisturbed
sway! Are you willing that the public service
shall be employed in thus deadening and
stupefying
one mighty limb of the general good?
Does it not occur to you that other seed should
be sown, other harvests gathered, than that
great field now receives and ripens? The
cause of one is the cause of all; and what
they derive of unmixed injury in their new
estate
,
we, in an elder condition, draw in,
qualified
,
but by no means neutralized. With them,
the false literature stands by itself, a single
growth; with us, it strikes down a better plant
that strives to lift its head.
No one will be hardy enough to deny, I think,
that American literature is virtually stifled
under
the operation of such a system. God
forbid
that I should not believe that great souls
may be born among us, stillequal to this or
any disastrous crisisable to front it, and
addressing
it in the tones of high and passionate
natures, bid it be stayed for a while. Men
who, in the face of disaster and suffering, and
the hard oppression of a country that knows
them not, and hears them not, by a slow and
generous toil, raise up images of greatness and
beauty in our midst, not recognised at first by
the bewildered eye, but whose silent presence
comes at length to be known and felt, and to
form a part of the national life. Others, who
people the common air with our fellow-citizens
of fiction, nobler than truth; and others, again,
who, masters of a divine patience, in silence
and amid dark discouragements, weave through
society and the disorders of a new and
troublous
state, the threads of a true belief that
bind together and brighten all. These, God be
thanked! are so near akin to high spirits of
another sphere, that hunger nor thirst, nor the
keen wind can stay them from performing the
golden circuit on which they are boundfrom
bearing the glad message they are charged to
deliver to mankind.
But it is of another and lower race that I now
make question; and I ask, where is the
common
body of American authors to be found?
how are they employed?
I will not say in what cobwebbed lawyer's
dens; in what editorial cribs reeking and damp
with papers brought from far and wide, piled
to the very wall; on what high stools at
bankers'
desks, the younger brood swarms and
makes trial of the daily quill; but of the
acknowledged
and recognised tribe, whose names
run so trippingly from the tongue and form the
picturesque tail of the great paper-kite that
national self-love sends up from day to day.
With one or two exceptions, these refrain
altogether
from bestowing upon the public regular
and complete works, books in one volume or
two, carefully elaborated, and claiming the
general attention by the patient genius with
which they have been wrought out. On the
contrary, they are discovered by whoever looks
for them, moving rapidly about among certain
painted boothsthe fashionable magazines
running in and out with their crisp bundles of
manuscript, and partaking of such hurried
hospitality as the master of the booth can
afford.
Sometimes they are placed at the head of the
table with a story in three courses before them;
others are thrust into a corner to mumble a
sonnet; and others, again, ramble up and down
where they choose, regaling themselves out of
a neat paper of powdered maccaroni. One
gentleman, in other words, furnishes a most
moving and pathetic tale of a riband or a
laceveil
another,
a light and airy poem of
sentiment
about nothing; and, another, the
delightful
history of Arthur Melton, and all his
agreeably common-place love passages with
the charming young lady heroine, Helen
Edgecombe
.
This is American literature; the literature
of one of the foremost nations of the earth;
the literature of a country that gave birth,
only a little while ago, to the man George
Washington, and issued the Declaration of
Independence
to the world. Let no one suppose
I do not entertain a respect and admiration
proportioned to their meritsfor many of the
writers engaged in the fashionable magazines,
or that I would cast unnecessary censure upon
those at the head of the periodical publications
in question. They are all common sufferers in
an unhappy state of things.
For the evils of that system they may justly
point to the law and the public taste; for the
advances upon its earlier condition they may
take credit to themselves. But none of these
circumstances can shut from view the fact
that the active, immediate, current literature
of America, is to be found at this moment, in
certain popular magazines, fronted with
fashion-plates
,
and brought up at the rear with an
overwhelming array of authors' names, in
capital
letters.
This is the condition of a province; of some
little, obscure petty state, ashamed to show its
head among nations, and capable of subsisting
on the very stalks and husks of literature. If
it be not an object with us to escape out of this
low flat, this Chinese garden of all that is
petty
and absurd in letters; if we can dwell
contentedly
there; and if the national energy and
dignity of character should fail to yield under
the accumulated evils of a system like this, we
may fairly count upon ourselves as a nation of
tranquil philosophic thinkers, destined to
endure
for everan everlasting model of
self-satisfied
debasement to the world!
This can not, however, hinder the admission,
that this country is, in literature, at the present
time, a dependency of Great Britain. It has
every mark and characteristic of that servile
condition. In the first place it relies for its
very literature of amusementwhich, if any,
should be self-suppliedon a distant country.
It pauses before it makes up its historical
records
for the researches of hostile scholars. It
borrows the learning of antiquity through the
factorship of compilers, farther distant than
the seats and fountains of antiquity themselves.
It appropriates without credit, in many cases,
its fiction, in some its divinity, in others, its
learning; it imitates, without stint, the
productions
it can not honestly rival. Wanting
in the healthy tastes of an original and produc
tive people, it selects, not infrequently, the
worst parts of the literature it appropriates.
It has on every and all of these accounts,
neither head, nor limbs, nor proper powers of
motion, but tumbles about upon the stage of
its existence a sort of idiotic monster, whose
purposeless look and gaping mouth, craving
everything, sets the looker-on into a roar. This
it is to be a province and appanage in
literature
;
and it is to this condition that we bind
ourselves by law.
Instead of this, what might we, reasonably,
have counted upon? Not a mature,
harmonious
,
complete literature; but works at least
spontaneous in their growth, and akin, in some
measure, to the life of man in a world full of
suggestive newness both to eye and spirit.
Rugged they might have been as the mountains
and cataracts among which they were produced;
mere ballads, echoing the cry of enemies
withdrawing
into the shadow of the wood, or
welcoming
the advent of the stranger-ship over
the rough sea-billow. Something of a lusty
strengththe vigor of a manly and
rough-nurtured
primeshould have seized upon the
share and driven it a-field. A certain
grandeur
of thought, a wild, barbaric splendor it
may have been, should have shot forth its fires
on every side, and made the wilderness to glow
in the forge-light of high passion and thoughts,
coultered to and fro with a giant's hand. Not
herenot here at leastshould the soul of
man, in one of its noblest employments, have
shown itself cramped, servile, abject, and
obsequious
to custom. Here, where the free
spirit lifts its head and speaks what it will, it
should have something more to say.
There are grounds, lying in the very depth
of our necessities, from which a hope arises
that our literature might have a peculiar force
and truth of its own. The very nakedness of
our new condition, depriving us of all aid from
the picturesque combinations of society, might
be reasonably expected to drive us upon a
profounder
delineation of the inner life; the secret
of which seems to have been lost, with rare
and distant exceptions, with the great dramatic
writers. The number of our newspapers, read
so widely, and making known every particular
of actual life, would have a similar influence,
and compel our authors to a higher and
profounder
exercise of inventive genius.
And here, too, should authorship, the writing
of books, be a noble pursuit. Claiming, as we
do, to be a nation of thinkers, it does not
become
us to degrade the parents and guides of
opinion into an abject class. Recognising in
them the men who, by sagacious foresight and
a wise fancy, widen for us the great future
upon
which we are entering, we should clothe
them in fair apparel and smooth their locks
with a considerate hand. Above all rank and
station, above presidencies and principalities,
should the men be raised, who cultivate and
raise up in us faculties of thought, and passion,
and will, before which all this show of house,
and temple, and monument, dwindles to a
purposeless
shadow. A government of opinion
lives in the soul of its authors and teachers.
Out of that alone it can draw its true life; and
beyond that, it holds its existence a prey to
swift confusion, to blood, and disorder, and
angry
riot. Upon them, then, her best influences
should be shed; she should strive to spread
abroad through their path, peace, bounty, and
content, that her own way may partake of a
kindred calm.
What results, then, do I expect to flow from
the passage of a proper law?
I can not presume to predict, in detail, what
these might be, nor the exact form they may
assume. They will be, doubtless, great in
number
;
great, perhaps, beyond the sanguiue
expectations
of its advocates. A single remark
would embrace, in effect, the purpose of all
I could say:The spirit of wise legislation
would act like the creative law, breathing
truth and order among the elements of
confusion
.
It will reconcile, renew, separate, and
combine, so subtly, that no eye could foresee
all its operations. Among the expected
changes
I would venture to mention:
Firstly; the entire reorganization of the
book-trade; at present, as I have shown, in a
great measure dismembered and broken. A
legitimate and honorable class of publishers
would spring up, to take charge as well of the
interests of the foreign author, having
copyright
in this country, as of the domestic writer.
An increased interest in the writings of native
authors would, of course, be created; and
Amercan books would be placed before the
public in such form and through such channels
as to command their share of attention. The
relation of author and publisher would be
restored
to something like its old conditions:
elevated
,
it might be hoped, by a more
intelligent
spirit of dealing. Authors and
publishers
both thrive best, when each can entertain
a friendly and respectful regard, on account of
accomplishments, toward the other, and feel
that they have earnest and noble interests in
common. The book-trade, as a business or
calling, would rise in dignity, and in its rise
would help to raise up literature itself. The
rule always holds, I believe, that a race of
high-minded publishers springs up
contemporaneously
with great and popular writers.
Secondly; a greater productiveness in
literature
here at home, and a greater unity in what
is produced. The false appetite engendered
and stimulated by the competition and
shopcries
of the republishing press, once appeased,
many English works of light and worthless
character would grow stale on the ocean; and
being cast aside, American works, of a better
class and spirit, would take their place; the
public mind would have leisure allowed it to
discriminate, and the good works of domestic
origin would be fairly measured with books of
their own kind of English growth. The
literature
of the country, freed from the irregular
and occasional character it derives from the
spasmodic effort it now costs author and
publisher
to get each work before the world, would
move forward, with a steady march and a
uniformity
of production, in each department to
which the national talent was directed. The
periodical literature of the country, freed from
the extraordinary predominance of foreign
works, brought before it for notice, constantly
jostling aside others of native growth, would
rise to a higher criticism and method of judging
works of art of all classes. The criticism of
the country, dealing at present, in great part,
with works from abroad, adopts a careless tone,
borrows from foreign journals, and fails to
enter
upon the subject in the strict and careful
spirit it would take if it grew up, side by side
with the works it noticed.
Art, too, at present a sad sufferer, with its
kinsman, might be expected to awaken and
open its eyes once more upon an atmosphere
through which light and life began again to
move. Apart from its share in the general
decay
,
Art feels the evil influence of the
incursions
of foreign genius without the regulations
of law. The incessant employment of native
skill in copying and reproducing, without limit,
the designs of foreign artists, would have a
tendency
to breed a race of imitators, and to inspire
our efforts in this kind, with all the petty vices
that belong to a school of imitators. A
disrespect
for genius would be engendered; a base
and low style of design and execution
fastened
upon us; and to all these would be added
an unsparing spirit of plagiarism and foul play,
as regarded works designed and constructed
abroad. Restoring to the arts of design, as of
kin to literature, their just rights, the foreign
artist, as well as the foreign author, would
enter
the field on fair terms, and would know that
he could protect his interests if he chose.
In the presence of a new and living
literature
,
such as belongs to this soil, much of the
criticism that now flies abroad and makes itself
clamorous at noonday, would skulk into
darkness
,
and, creeping into convenient retreats,
would screech and gibber unheard. The
presence
of true standards, of manly examples of
criticism, and such would arise in a
well-regulated
state of things, would awe into
everlasting
silence the brood of maggot-pies, and
buzzards
,
and carrion vultures, that now obstruct
the light, and, spreading their obscene,
chittering
wings before the eyes of the people, shut
the clear heaven from the view, and make them
believe that darkness is day, and little
twilight-walkers
,
grown men, perchance.
Thirdly; and this is the last I shall at
present
refer tothe growth of a purer and better
tone of opinion at large. It can not be
denied
,
I think, that what may be called a
certain
heroic unity of thought and act, which
marked this country at an earlier period, has
been impaired. A certain steadfastness, with
which the Republic once marched to its
objects
,
has been, somehow or other, invaded. I
A a
can not believe that the ancient spirit has
entirely
died out.
The better mind of this country is, in many
of its best aspects, unrepresented.
Overshadowed
by a foreign literature, it lurks
underneath
,
and would, in the course of time, be
altogether
subdued. Nothing else can supply to
a country the place of a literature in maturing
and consolidating national opinion. At home
a literature is a constant presence, uniting all
parts and sections in a general bond. Abroad,
the country rises or sinks, seems imposing or
insignificant, in proportion to the front its
literature
presents to the world. A certain
vacillation
in the acts and sentiments of this
country seems to me attributable, in some
measure, to the want of counsel from mature
minds, living aside from political life, and
capable
of breathing over the broad surface of the
land a spirit of profound knowledge and
tranquil
truth. Any act by which a characteristic
literature was aided in its birth, would help to
steady opinion and to mature a consistent
reliance
on men and truths here at home.
And now what is it withholds the instant
passage of a law, in pursuance of justice, the
sacredness of rights not to be gainsaid or
argued
away, and our own better and nobler
interests
as a nation of just men, given in some
measure
to literature and the study of works of genius?
The future time, eager and fruitful, presses upon
us. If we were assured that we are at this
moment
enjoying the highest selfish advantage,
from this system, there is no worthier time in
which to level it to the ground, and vindicate
ourselves by a great act of self-denial. Cheaply
are its fruits spread before us, it is true; what
the value of that cheapness is, I have
endeavored
elsewhere to show. Cheap in its birth,
cheap in its reproduction, cheap in its
tendencies
,
cheap in its results, it is, in Heaven's
truth, if rightly regarded. Of its better part, I
venture to say, and in this view I think British
authors will concur, that in the event of the
passage of a law of International copyright,
they will be prepared to place their writings
before the American people at a price suited to
the character and extent of our reading
community
.
This will be their interest, and this,
I venture to predict their course. As for
ourselves
,
we will find in this, as in all other cases,
that a magnanimous performance of duty will
bring with it its own just reward.
The passage of an act of International
copyright
will, it is asserted,
tempt
Britsh authors
to write expressly for the American market;
and this is counted upon as one of the injurious
results of a new law. Admit this conjecture
to be true, and what ensues? Admit that the
temptation of a wide and democratic
community
of readers presents itself to the imagination
of the British author, and that, fired by the
prospect of great gain or the hope of a fame
echoing from Oregon to the Atlantic, he enters
upon the task of inditing books for the Ameri
can public, can we not understand that his
writings, to be acceptable to his transatlantic
readers, must address themselves to their
republican
sympathies and hopes; that he must
treat of man according to this new experience
of ours; that he must speak of the American
future as full of promise to the awakened
interests
of mankind. Will he, in the
meantime
,
being strong and powerful enough to
speak through the darkness and tempest of an
ocean, be unheard at home? Being in some
measure popular, will not the circumstance
that he lifts his voice to a kindred people over
the sea, call around him friends and adherents?
It will; and America, his great friend and
patron
(according to this conjecture) will find in
him a republican champion on the very shore
of Britain, armed to fight her battles, to hold a
mailed parley for her right, and to cast before
her breast the invincible shield of a loyal
defence
.
A majestic hope certainly; and one
which the democratic believer, urged on by
whatever zealous belief he may be, should not
be in haste to obstruct.
What! a democratic thinker, one who looks
before and after for pasture for the eye,
faltering
at the prospect of a long line of republican
writers springing up in the very heart of
England
to vindicate his country and spread her
principles through towers, and huts, and huge
gabled factories, where he had despaired of
having the heroic voice of a free speaker ever
reach! It can not be that he would hug to
himself the treasure so lately dug from the
wilderness; that he would hoard and heap up
on this side of the Atlantic the massy ingots so
lately wrought out in bloody sweat and dinted
fields, beyond the grasp of his Saxon kinsman?
Perish, say we, the base contracted
selfishness
of
such
a principle.
It will be, indeed, a proud thing for us to
render to the authors of a kindred people this
sacred obligation. If to this we can join
legislation on a broader and clearer ground
than has been yet occupied, recognising all
over the broad surface of the globe the
indefeasible
and perpetual right of the author to
his labors, the benignant sun will shine on no
other people with a kindlier light.
This great, this permanent honor, is within
our reach. Oh, let it not, I beseech you, let it
not pass away! The step which bears you
forward to make you its master, will be an
angel's stride toward a higher and purer
civilization
than the world has yet known.
I can not believe that the law-givers and
teachers of mankind must speak to us always from
amid the stifling airs of a distressed condition;
cold and shaken with the damps of penury;
uttering only in the intervals of pain and
hunger
,
the oracles by which the world is to be
guided and cheered onward, in its path of
progress
.
Vexed not always with pangs and the
contortions of a suffering frame must these
priests and poets of ours echo and answer the
hopes and fears of their race. Something of
free sunshinea sight of the wide and glad
horizon, undimmed by tears, a little of prosperity
at their hearth-stones, and generous justice in
the highwaysmust be granted them, ere their
full hearts can speak forth the truths resident
there. Not always bended, and broken, and
sick at heart, shall these prodigal children of
humanity be driven out to wander over the
world, feeding where they can, dropping the
seeds of immortal truth on the wayside and by
chance: but raised up, inspired anew by a
return
to the right of their race, the right to
possess and enjoy their own, they shall come
back to us a glorious company, radiant with
hope, and strong in the power to do good!
THE END.